I totally forgot my schedule and appointments of my calendar. Will you find events on my calendar?
It is a pleasure for me, Which date i need to check?
Actually it is on March 5th.
The event will start at 10 am and the event is Dentist appointment.
Ok Fine.It is a very useful information. Do i have any other events scheduled? Will you find on March 13th?
The event will start at 10:30 pm and you need to go for a Movie show.
Ok that's great and i need to know whether i am available on that day. Please find also that?
On March 13th, you have an emply slot starting at 8 pm and slot ends at 10:30 pm
Ok that's great and i need to thank you for your wonderful work.
Take care Have a great day
What is my calendar like for Monday next week.
You have a stylist appointment at Philgood Cuts at 3:30 pm.
Do I have anything scheduled for Wednesday next week.
You have a Westside Gunn concert for 7:30 pm.
That would be fine.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
When do I have some free time.
You have time available next Wednesday between 9:30 pm and midnight.
That would be ok. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
I am not sure when is my friend's birthday so I am going to check the calendar.
Please tell me which date you want to know.
My friend's birthday is on the 9th.
There are 3 events scheduled for you. The first one is Doctor appointment at 11 am.
Let me look on March 14th to see if I have any other events scheduled.
You have a Baseball game at 5 pm.
Great. When is my free time then?
You are free from 8 am to 4 pm.
Great. Thanks so much.
Thanks for being patient and please have a wonderful day.
I want to check my calendar on the 10th of March.
On that day, you will be watching a 10:30 pm showing of a movie at The New Parkway Theater.
Great! I'm looking forward to that movie. What spare time do I have that day?
On March 10th, you have free time spanning from 8 am to 1:30 pm.
That's good to know.
Do I need to help you any further?
You do not need to help me further. Thanks for reminding me of what I'm doing that day.
Enjoy your day.
I want to see the events on my calendar.
What date were you inquiring about?
I want to know about the 4th of this month.
You have a Dentist appointment with Bautista Maximilian at 4 pm.
Thank you. When am I available?
Next Monday there is an empty slot from 8 am to 2:30 pm.
That sounds great.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's it. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you check events on my calendar?
What date I should look for?
Look for the 9th of this month.
There is a Soccer game event at 5 pm.
Okay, That sounds perfect. Find me when I am available.
You are available at 2:30 pm till 5 pm on March 9th.
Okay, That sounds great. That will be all.
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
I'd like to check the events I have scheduled on next Wednesday.
Okay, you have an event at 7 pm, it's a movie show.
Great, are there any other events scheduled?
Yes, you have a reservation for 6 people at Rocker Oysterfeller's for 11:30 am.
Is there anything else scheduled for the 9th of this month?
Yes, there are 2 scheduled events. There is a Joe Hisaishi concert that starts at 7:30 pm.
That's good, when am I available?
There is an empty slot from 8 am to 7:30 pm.
Okay great.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Okay, have a nice day.
What events do I have in my calendar?
What date are you curious about?
I want to know about the 6th.
You have an event baseball game: Diamondbacks Vs Rockies at 7:30 pm.
Do I have anything scheduled on the 14th of March?
You have a movie at AMC Mercado 20 at 10:30 pm.
Okay, thanks. When am I available?
You are free on March 14th from 8 am to 11 am.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a great day.
I'd like to check events on my calendar.
What day do you wish to know?
The day is Wednesday next week.
You have an event starting at 4:30 pm about a movie booking for Dumbo.
Do I have anything else planned on the 13th of March?
You have an event beginning at 10:30 am about viewing at ridgeview terrace Townhouses.
That sounds great. Tell me when I am available.
The event starts on March 13th, and you have an empty slot that begins at 11 am and ends at 1:30 pm.
That sounds wonderful.
Could I assist you with anything else?
Nah. Thanks for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I want to see whats on my calendar
Which date are you looking at?
I am looking for Friday next week
You have a Restaurant reservation at Mcdonald's at 6 pm
That's good, when am I free?
You're available next Friday between 1 pm and 6 pm
That's good thank you
Have a nice day!
Can you show me the events on my calendar? I need a verification.
Which date are you looking for?
I want to get details on 1st of March.
You have got event at 1 pm on that day at Restaurant reservation at Pasta Moon.
Please check 9th of this month is vacant.
No sir, you have fixed that day to enjoy Psychedelic Furs concert at 6 pm
Ok, Then which day I will be available?
You are free from 8 pm to midnight on March 9th.
Fine, thank you.
Do you need any other service?
No, that's all. Thank you.
Have a great day sir.
I'd like to verify activities on my calendar, specifically on the 3rd of March.
You have a Dentist appointment with C-Dental X-Ray that begins at 1 pm.
Is there any other activity planned for me on the 4th of March?
You have a Property viewing activity that begins at 4:30 pm.
That's great. Tell me what time I am available.
The day for the activity is next Monday, and you have an empty slot that begins at 8 am and finishes at 10:30 am.
That's perfect; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I want to check the events on my calendar.
Which day would you like to search?
I would like to know the 14th.
You have a Dermatologist appointment with Karls Michael S. at 10 am.
Do I have other events scheduled for the 12th of this month?
You have a restaurant reservation for 4 at Betty Spaghetti starting at 11:30 am.
Sounds good, when am I available?
There is 1 empty slot in your calendar for March 12th from 1 pm to 10:30 pm.
That is good information.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that is all thank you.
have a good day.
Please check Saturday this week on my calendar.
This Saturday Table for 2 at Caputo is scheduled at 7 pm
Is there anything else on the calendar March 12th?
At 6 pm there is a Baseball game scheduled.
Great.
Is there anything else you need?
When do I have free time?
March 12th there is 1 space from 8 am to 12 pm.
Great.
What else do you need?
That's all, thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I want to take my girlfriend on a proper date soon but I don't know what I have on my schedule already. Can you check upcoming events on my calendar?
Is there a particular date you would like me to look at for you?
Yes, I was thinking the 5th of March.
You have a movie show beginning at 11 pm on that day.
Okay, what do I have scheduled for the 2nd of this month?
You have a Stylist appointment at Lotte Beauty Salon at 5 pm on that day.
So far that sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, rather than telling me my scheduled events can you tell me when I am available?
It looks like tomorrow you are free from 8 am until 5 pm.
Great, everything sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that was all I needed at the moment. Thank you.
It was my pleasure, enjoy the rest of your day.
I need the details of my calendar. Look for Friday next week
You have an Dermatologist appointment with Greenbrae Dermatology, cheryl Tanasovich, M.D., Benjamin Nichols, M.D., John Maddox, M.D. at 2 pm
Fine, now check the 6th.
Yes there is one at 5 pm at Juliana Hatfield concert
Ok. Let me see when I am available.
You are available on 3 slots, one from 8 am to 11:30 am
Fine.Thank you.
Any more help?
No Thank you.
Have a good day
I'm kind of curious about what's on my calendar for next Thursday.
Your calendar has a Property viewing event that starts at 12 pm.
Is there anything else on there for the 10th of March?
You also have a Reservation for 2 people at Acquolina at 6 pm.
Okay. Tell me what times I have available.
For March 10th, you have empty slots from 12 pm to 6 pm.
Alright, cool. That sounds good.
Is there anything else you need?
No. Thanks for all of your help.
Have a good one!
I would like to search for an event.
Which day would you like?
The date is 9th of March.
Buddy Guy concert is going to start 5 pm.
Do I have any other events scheduled?
You have Movie show starting at 7 pm.
Do I have other events scheduled?
You don't have any other event for that day. Can I assist you further?
What event do I have on March 4th?
You have a Dermatologist appointment with Bernard Recht, Ph.D., M.D. at 10:30 am.
Sounds good, Show me when I am available.
There is 3 empty slots on your calendar from 8 am to 10:30 am.
Thank you for your assistance.
Have a good day.
I need to check my events calendar for the 6th.
You have an Appointment with Darnell Jr Robert at 12:30 pm.
Good! When am I available?
Your appointment is next Wednesday, but you have an empty slot from 1:30 pm to midnight.
Great! That's all I need. Thanks.
Your welcome. Have a nice day.
What do I have scheduled on my calendar for the 12th of March?
I can see that you have a Restaurant reservation for 3 at Nick's Rockaway at 11 am on that day.
Okay, can you tell me what times I am available that day?
On March 12th it looks like you have an opening between the hours of 8 am and 11 am.
Okay, that sounds good. That is all I needed for today.
Have a great day!
I forgot the events need to attend . will you check the events on my calendar?
Tell me which date i need to check?
the date is 11th of this month.
on that date you have Appointment with Val Mark Dental Studio and the event starts at 5 pm.
Whether any other events scheduled, actually is need to find for the date March 9th?
on MArch 9th you have Stylist appointment at Opus Arcade and the event start at 12:30 pm
Its great and its suits me. Will you find me when i am available?
The date for the event is March 9th and you have empty slot starting at 5 pm and ends at 5:30 pm
Ok will you find any other available time?
Sorry you don't have any other available time? whether you need to find any other thing?
No . thanks for your help.
take care have a great day.
What's on my calendar for the 12th of March?
You have a 1:30 pm restaurant reservation at Blowfish Sushi. Enjoy.
Do I have anything scheduled on the 5th?
Yes. You have a baseball game at 5:30 pm.
Ok great. When am I free?
Next Tuesday, you have a free slot from 2:30 pm to 3 pm.
Thanks. That's all for now.
Have a good one.
Let me check my calendar/
For which date?
The 12th of this month.
You're going to a Thee Oh Sees concert at 7:30 pm.
Sounds good.
Anything else I can help with?
Show my available slots.
For March 12th you have an empty slot from 11 am to 11:30 am.
Sounds good, that's all.
Have a nice day.
Can you tell me what's on my calendar?
Of course. What day?
What events do I have on the 7th of this month?
You have a movie show at 11 pm.
Ok. When am I free next?
Next Thursday, you have a free slot on your calendar from 8 am to 5 pm.
Thanks
Anything else I can do to help?
Nope. Not now
Have a good one.
Can you get my calendar for me?
what date should I start on?
Let's see March 4th.
I see: Movie show starting at 8:30 pm.
What do I have on March 9th?
You'll go to a stylist appointment. It is at 10 am.
Ok, when do I have open?
You have 1 empty slot. It's a long one from 10:30 am. until 7:30 pm. This is for March 9th.
Great. I got it.
Have a good time.
Can you check on my calendar Saturday this week?
You have a Movie booking for Shazam! starting at 4 pm.
Sounds good.
Can I help you with anything else?
Show me when I am available.
You have an empty slot tomorrow from 3 pm to 4 pm.
Ok thank you for checking.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
Can you check for any events I might have on my calendar?
What date are you looking for?
1st of March.
You have a Movie booking for Hotel Mumbai at 9 pm.
What about the 14th of this month?
You have 1 Baseball game starting at 7 pm.
Sounds good. Can you show me any open dates?
You have an empty slot from 4 pm to 7 pm on March 14th.
Sounds good.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
I want to look at my calendar.
Which date?
The 9th of March.
You have 2 events scheduled on that day. One of them is a Movie at Contra Costa Stadium Cinemas at 10 pm.
Okay. Thank you.
Do you need anything else?
When am I available on that day?
You have 2 open slots available, one of them is from 8 am to 10:30 am.
Do I have another opening?
Yes, from 11 am to 10 pm.
Thanks. That's all I need.
Have a good day.
I want to look at the events on my calendar. The date I want to check events on is March 3rd.
On March 3rd, you have scheduled a Restaurant reservation at Venticellos Ristorante Italiano at 12:30 pm.
What about events on the 10th of this month?
Concerning the 10th of this month, there is an Appointment with Dr Ashmita Shetty at 10 am.
Oh I almost forgot about that. That sounds good to me. Thanks for the reminder.
Do you need help with anything else?
Can you tell me when I do not have anything booked or planned?
On March 10th, you have an empty slot that goes from 8 am to 10 am.
So there's about 2 hours of empty time slots. That sounds fine to me. Thanks. That's all I need.
Anytime. Have a good evening.
Can you check my calendar for me?
What date should I check?
March 14th please.
You have a Dentist Appointment at 10 am.
Can you check March 2nd?
You have a Football Game: Raiders vs Titans at 7:30 pm.
Anything else on that date?
You have a Movie show at 10:30 pm.
Okay, when do I have free time?
You're free from 8 am to 7:30 pm.
Okay thanks for that.
Can I help further?
No that's it.
Have a great day.
i must check how my calendar is looking-especially upcoming events
can you tell me what month or date i can look up for you
yes please checkout this date for me 9th of march
ok ive found 3 events on calendar-includes Dentist Appointment which is booked for a 10 am start
seems ok what slot times do i have before then-
you are free from 8 am to 10 am how is that
great this will allow me time to do what i need too before the Dentist
please ensure you have a safe and good day
I want to check my calendar for events.
What's the date you want to know?
On the 11th.
There are 2 events scheduled on you calendar. Apartment viewing at Windsor Ridge for 12:30 pm.
That sounds good. When will I be available?
There's a slot open from 8 am to 12:30 pm.
Are there any other available times?
1 pm to 5 pm are available.
Any other times available besides that?
You are available 6:30 pm to 12 pm.
That sounds good and all I'll need.
Have a good day.
I want to check my calendar for events for Friday next week.
Friday next week, you have an Appointment at Great Clips at 3 pm.
Do I have any events scheduled for the 9th?
You have 3 events scheduled that day, including a Hairdresser appointment at 3 pm.
Perfect. Tell me when I am available.
You are available from 8 am to 3 pm.
Great. Thank you.
Have a great rest of your day!
I need to check my calendar events.
Are you interested in a particular date?
Please check the 14th.
There is 1 event scheduled on that date. It is the Soccer Game: Sounders Vs United at 7 pm.
That's great. Let me see when I'm free.
On March 14th, you have available space from 8 am until 6 pm.
Awesome!
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
i want to check my events on my calendar.
which date did you want to know
i want to know about the date march 12th.
you have 3 events scheduled on that day. you have dentist appointment with Gerald E. Dixon Scott E. Dixon at 12 pm.
it sounds good. show me when i am available?
there are 4 empty slots from 8 am to 12 pm.
did i have any other available time?
you have a another empty slot from 1 pm to 5:30 pm.
do i have any other available time?
you have a another empty slot from 6 pm to 6:30 pm.
it sounds good.
can i help you with anything else?
no thanks.
have a good day.
I would like to check the events of March 6th on my calendar
There's 1 events on the calendar: a Table for 5 at Mcdonald's at 11:30 am
Ok, It's perfect. Let me see when I'm available
Next Wednesday you have an empty slot starting 1 pm and ending at 10:30 pm
Ok, it sounds good
Can I help you again?
No, It's all thanks
Have a nice day
I want to check if I have any upcoming appointments or events on my calender
Which date should I search for?
I want the details for next friday.
You have 1 stylist appointment at 10 am scheduled for that date on the calendar.
That sounds alright. Show me available slots on that day
You have an empty slot from 8 am to 10 am next friday.
That sounds perfect. That is all I would be needing.
Have a fantastic day ahead.
It's going to be a very busy week! I want to check events on my calendar to make sure I am prepared.
Which date were you particularly looking at?
I know the 10th of this month I have something going on.
Yes, you have the dentist appointment with Dr. Prakash Advani at 1:30 pm.
Ok. What other events do I have scheduled?
Don't forget that you're watching a movie at the new Parkway Theater at 10:30 pm.
Ok. Are there any other events I need to remember?
No, there are no other events scheduled for the 10th. Can I help you with anything else?
Yes, could you tell me what I have scheduled on the 13th?
Yes, you have a general practitioner appointment at 4:30 pm on the 13th.
Thank you! Can you tell me what time periods I have available?
Yes, you have availability between 8 am to 12:30 pm.
That sounds good!
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that would be it. Thank you so much for your help!
Have a wonderful day!
I want to check my events calendar.
For which date?
The day after tomorrow.
You're going to a Movie at Century Vallejo 14 at 10:30 pm.
Ok, show when I'm available.
You have 1 empty slot the day after tomorrow from 8 am to 7:30 pm.
Sounds good, that's all.
Have a nice day.
Can you tell me about the events I currently have on my calendar?
Any particular date you are interested in knowing more about?
Tell me more about the events I have on the 10th of March.
For that date, you have the Jason Isbell concert at 5:30 pm.
Any other events scheduled, preferably on March 9th?
On March 9th you have a doctor appointment at 2:30 pm.
Great, tell me when I am available.
For March 9th, you have 1 empty slot at 5:30 pm until 10 pm.
That sounds good, that is all I needed.
Glad I can be of assistance, have a good day.
I want to check events on my calendar. The date is next Monday.
You have a Damien Jurado concert. The event is going to start at 6 pm.
Sounds good. Show me when I'm available.
There are 2 empty slots on your calendar. The nearest one is 8 am to 6 pm.
Sounds good. That is all I need.
Have a good day.
I want to check events on my calendar on March 2nd.
You have a movie show at 10 pm.
That sounds good.
Do you need help with anything else?
Can you tell me my availability?
There's 1 empty slot on your calendar tomorrow starting at 8 am and ending at 12 pm.
Sounds great.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Have a great day.
I need to plan my week. What events have I marked down on my calendar?
For which date?
For March 1st.
You have a Vampire Weekend concert to attend at 5 pm
Is there anything planned for the 13th?
There is a Dentist appointment marked off for 1:30 pm
That's awesome. When do I have time available?
You have an empty slot on March 13th from 8 am to 1:30 pm.
Is there any other time slot open?
Not for this week. Is there anything else you need assistance with?
No. Thanks for your assistance.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you show me all the events on my calendar?
What date do you want to look at?
Select the 12th of March.
There is a Movie at AMC Brentwood 14. It is going to start at 10 pm.
That is great.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Tell me when I am going to be available.
There is 1 free slot on your calendar on March 12th. It starts at 8 am and ends at 1:30 pm.
Fine. That will be all.
Have a nice day!
Please check an event on my calendar on 11th of March
You have hairdresser appointment at 2 pm
What about 10th of this month
You have dermatologist appointment at 2 pm
ok, show me my available time slot
You have 1 available time slot on March 10th from 11 am to 2 pm
ok perfect
Anything else i can help you with
no thats it
have a nice day
I would like to double check my calendar for events on the 8th.
There is a Through The Roots concert beginning at 6 pm on your calendar.
Are there any other scheduled events?
No, that is the only event on your calendar for that date.
What about my schedule for the 6th of March?
There is a Baseball game that begins at 7:30 pm on that date.
Excellent. I would like to see my available times
The event is next Wednesday and you have available time from 8 am to 11:30 am.
Excellent, that sounds perfect.
Is there anything else you would like me to assist you with?
No, that was all. Thanks!
Have a nice day.
I wanna check my calendar for events.
Which date should I look at?
Look at the 6th.
There are 3 events scheduled on this date. You have an Appointment at World Cuts at 3 pm.
What about any other events scheduled for this Sunday?
You have a Dentist appointment at 1 pm.
Okay, sounds great. When am I available?
You have an open time from 8 am to 1 pm.
Any other available time?
You're available from 2 pm to 7:30 pm.
Okay, great. Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a nice day!
Is there anything scheduled on my calendar for March 13th?
You have a stylist appointment at Supercuts for 12 pm.
Do I have anything scheduled for the 1st of this month?
You have a soccer game: sounders vs timbers at 6:30 pm
That's awesome. When is my schedule clear?
You have 1 space available today from 5 pm - 8 am.
That would be fine. I do not need anymore assistance.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Hello, I want to check the upcoming events on my calendar.
Which dates are you looking for specifically?
Please check for later today.
You have 3 events scheduled. You have a Dentist appointment with Kini Ramanand , Kini Lata starting at 1 pm.
What other events do I have today?
You also have a General Practitioner appointment that begins at 3 pm.
Do I have other events scheduled today?
You have a Stylist appointment at Redline Barbers. The appointment is set for 6:30 pm.
Sounds good. Can you please show me when I am available?
You have an empty slot from 8 am to 1 pm.
Sounds great, thank you. That is all I need.
Have a good day.
I need to check my calendar.
What date do you want to check?
I need the 9th of March.
On March 9th you have 3 scheduled events. The first is Apartment Viewing at 10 am.
Give me my calendar for the 13th.
On March 13th you have 1 event. The event id Apartment viewing at Reed Square at 2 pm.
Ok. That sounds good.
Do you need anything else?
Show me when I an available.
You are free between 8 am and 11:30 am.
Do I have any other openings?
You are free fom 12:30 pm to 2 pm.
Do I have any other openings?
You are free from 2:30 pm to 5 pm.
Ok, Good. Thanks.
Do you need anything else.
Not for now, thanks?
Let me know if you need anything else.
I want to check events on my calendar for Thursday next week.
You have a Movie booking for Breakthrough starting at 10:30 pm.
Do I have any other events scheduled?
You have a Reservation for 2 people at Mandalay Restaurant starting at 1 pm.
Do I have other events scheduled?
You have a Viewing at Park Branham Apartments starting at 11:30 am.
Sounds good, when am I available?
You have an opening from 8 am to 11:30 am.
Sounds good. That's all I need.
Have a good day.
What is happening March 9th on my calendar?
You have an Apartment viewing at 11 am.
Is anything else scheduled?
You also have a Dentist appointment at 12:30 pm.
Okay. When should I be available?
There are 4 empty slots on your calendar from 8 am through 11 am.
Okay. That is all.
Have a nice day.
Can you help me check my calendar for events?
What date should be checked?
Please check 10th of March.
There is a 2 pm Appointment at Glam-Up.
Do I have any events scheduled on March 9th?
You have 2 events including a 3 pm Appointment at Sport Clips Haircuts Of Brentwood.
Is there anything else on the schedule?
At 9:30 pm you have a Movie show.
Great, can you show me my availability now?
You have availability from 8 am to 3 pm.
Great!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Not now, thanks for checking for me.
Enjoy your day!
Can you check my events calendar for the 3rd of this month?
You have a General Practitioner appointment with Kelly A. Welsh, M.D. at 12:30 pm.
Anything else?
You also have a Geto Boys concert scheduled for 7 pm.
Okay. When am I available?
You are available from 8 am to 12:30 pm.
That sounds good.
Do you need anything else?
No. Thank you.
Your welcome. Have a nice day.
I want do double check my events for next Thursday.
You have 2 events scheduled that day, one of them is a Dentist appointment with Dr. Susana M. Chou, starting at 10 am.
Any other events?
You also have a Restaurant reservation at Begoni Bistro at 1 pm.
Thanks, show me when I have free time.
You have 3 empty slots in your calender from 8 am to 10 am.
Great thanks!
Anything else you need?
Nope, thank you so much!
Have a great day!
I'm trying to schedule an appointment, can you check the events on my calendar?
Which dates would you like me to check?
Check on the 6th of March.
You have 2 events scheduled. You have an Apartment viewing at 11 am.
How about the 9th of this month?
You have an Apartment viewing at Mission Pointe By Windsor at 12 pm.
Is that the only event scheduled?
You also have a Dentist appointment at 2 pm.
Okay, when am I available to schedule an appointment?
You are free from 8 am to 12 pm.
Am I free any other time?
You're also free from 12:30 pm to 2 pm.
Alright that works, thanks for your help.
No problem, have a good day.
Do I have anything in my calendar for March 12th?
You have 2 events scheduled on that day. One of them is an Apartment viewing at 5:30 pm.
Sounds good. What times am I available on that day?
You have 3 empty slots on your calendar. One of them is from 8 am to 4 pm.
Sounds good.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a good day.
Can you please check my calendar events for March 7th?
Sure. You have an Apartment viewing at 12:30 pm.
Anything else scheduled for Wednesday next week?
At 2:30 pm you have your General Practitioner appointment with Dr. Leland M. Luna, MD.
OK, got it. Please tell me when I'm available.
At the moment you have 3 empty slots in you calendar, one starting from 8 am to 2:30 pm.
Any other available time?
Yes, another empty slot from 3:30 pm to 5 pm.
OK, got it.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that will be all.
Have a good one!
Please tell me about the events on my calendar.
For which dates would you like the events?
Please tell me what events are on next Wednesday.
There are a total of 2 events. At 5:30 pm, there is a General Practitioner appointment.
Please tell me what events are scheduled for March 9th.
There are a total of 3 events. At 6 pm, there is an Apartment viewing at Siena Pointe Apartments.
Thank you. Please tell me when I am free.
You have free time between 8 am and 10:30 am.
Thank you, that's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Hello, I want to check the events occurring on the date of the 11th of March on my calendar.
You have an Appointment at Stem Salon and it starts at 3 pm.
Do I have any other events scheduled that day?
You also have a Dentist appointment with Dr. Minh B. Nguyen that starts at 4:30 pm.
Do I have any other items scheduled on the 1st of March?
You have 3 events on your calendar for that day. You have an Apartment viewing that starts at 12 pm.
Sounds good. Please let me know when I am available.
You have an empty time slot from 8 am to 10 am.
Sounds good, thank you. That is all I need.
Thank you, have a good day.
Can you check my calendar for events?
Sure, what date?
I am checking for the 7th
There is an Apartment viewing at Crestview Apartments at 1 pm
Do I have any other events this Sunday?
There is a baseball game at 6 pm
Sounds good, when am I available?
You have 3 open slots. One is from 8 am to 2:30 pm
Any other times I'm available?
Yes, from 3:30 pm to 6 pm
Great, that's all, thanks
Have an awesome day
I would like to see the events on my calendar and more specifically for the 8th of this month.
There are 3 events which I see to have been scheduled on the calendar. You have arranged an Appointment with Renew Dental Implant Specialists and the appointment is going to start at 4 pm.
Are there other events which I have scheduled for the 1st of this month?
There are 2 other events scheduled on the calendar. You have arranged the Apartment viewing at Lakeshore Apartments which will start at 12 pm.
Seems great. Tell me when I will be available.
I can see that 3 slots are empty on your calendar. One of the slots is from 8 am to 12 pm.
Seems great.
What else can I help you with?
Nothing. I appreciate your help.
Have a good time.
Shelly, check upcoming events on my calendar.
For what dates, please?
Check events for next Wednesday.
You have an appointment with Wafelbakker Anderson Orthodontics at 1:30 pm.
Shelly, are any other events scheduled for that day?
Yes, lunch at Marketbar at 5 pm.
What events are scheduled for the 12th of March.
You have a dentist appointment at 4:30 pm.
Shelly, show me times I'm available that day.
You have 3 empty time slots, from 8 am to 12:30 pm that day.
What are my available afternoon slots?
From 2 pm to 4:30 pm.
Thanks, Shelly.
May I help you with anything else?
No, that's all I needed to know.
Have a great day.
Which events are on my calendar Monday next week?
There are 3 events one of which is a Dermatologist appointment at 12 pm.
What else is on my schedule the 3rd?
There are 2 events. You have an Apartment viewing at 10 am.
When am I available, please.
From 8 am to 10 am there are 2 empty slots.
Is there any other free time?
11:30 am to 12 pm is also free.
Thanks.
Do you need anything else?
No.
Have a great day.
Hey, I'd like to see what I'm doing on March 5th. Can you check my calendar?
Sure. On March 5th you're going to the Girl In Red concert at 5 pm.
Oh great, thanks. When am I available that day?
You're available from 8 am to 11 am.
Fantastic. That's all.
Okay, see you.
I'd like to check on some events in my calendar.
Do you have a specific date in mind?
It is the 8th of March.
You currently have 3 scheduled events, one of them is Apartment viewing, starting at 5 pm.
Thanks! I'd like to see when I have time available.
You're free from 8 am to 4 pm.
That sounds great!
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nope, thanks for your help!
Have a great day!
I need to know the events on my calendar.
Which days events would you like to know?
I need to know the events on the 1st of March.
At 2:30 pm you have a General Practitioner appointment.
Great, when am I free?
You are free from 8 am to 2:30 pm.
Perfect, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with.
That is all I need, thank you.
Enjoy your day.
I want to check what events are coming up on my calendar.
Which date on your calendar are looking to check?
Next Wednesday.
There are 3 events scheduled on your calendar. You also have a Movie booking for Pet Sematary that is going to begin at 9:30 pm.
Great. Tell me when I am available.
You have 4 empty slots in your calendar from 8 am to 10:30 am.
Are there any other available times?
There is also an empty slot from 11 am to 5 pm.
Are there any other available times?
There is also an empty slot from 7 pm to 9:30 pm.
Great. That is all I needed to know.
Have a great rest of your day!
What do I have for events on my calendar for the 7th of March?
There is 2 events scheduled. A Baseball game that starts at 7:30 pm.
Do I have any other events scheduled on March 10th?
Yes you have a 10 am Dentist appointment.
Any other events Scheduled?
A General Practitioner Appointment at 5 pm.
Thanks. Tell me when I am available.
You have a total of 4 empty slots. One being from 8 am to 10 am.
Any other times?
Yes from 11 am to 11:30 am.
Thanks. I am all set.
Have a nice day.
I want to see events on my calendar later today.
There is a Dentist appointment with Park Victoria Dental at 10 am.
Perfect. Let me know when I'm available.
You have 3 empty slots from 8 am to 10 am.
Is there any other available time.
There are empty slots from 11 am to 6 pm.
Perfect.
Is there anything else you need?
No. Thanks.
Have a good one!
I would like to check any events on my calendar, please.
No problem. Which date would you like to know about?
I'd like to know what is on the 6th of this month, please.
Sure. You have a dentist appointment that is scheduled for 3:30 pm.
Ok, great. Can you tell me when I'm available?
You currently have 3 open spots on your calendar. One slot is available from 8 am to 2 pm.
Thank you, that sounds great. That is all I need to know.
You are welcome. Have a great day!
I'd like to check my calendar.
Okay, what day?
Do I have anything on the 5th?
You have a Dentist appointment at 10:30 am on the 5th.
Got it. Do I have anything on the 14th of this month?
Yes, you have 2 events on the 14th. The first is an Appointment with Dr. Julie M. Savant at 5 pm.
Okay, what else do I have?
You also have a Hairdresser appointment at 11 am.
That sounds good.
Is there something else I can help you with?
When am I available on that day?
I found 3 empty slots on your calendar for the 14th. You don't have anything between 8 am and 11 am.
That works, thank you. I don't need anything else.
Sure thing, have a nice day!
I would like to check if I have any events on my calendar next Monday.
I was able to pull up 2 events you have going on. One of those events is an Apartment viewing at 3 pm.
Alright. Is there anything I have going on next Tuesday?
Looks like you have 3 events going on that day. One of which is an Appointment at Fremont Barber Shop at 6:30 pm.
Anything else going on?
Yes, there as an Appointment with Arts Of Dentistry at 1:30 pm.
Okay, sounds like a plan. What time blocks do I have nothing going on?
Looks like you've got 3 time slots open on the calendar. One of which is from 8 am to 1:30 pm.
Great, thank you. That should do it for now.
Perfect. Take care.
I want to see what events are on my calendar.
For which date?
I want to see March 11th.
There are 3 events on that date. You have an Appointment with Marenda Ronald E at 11 am.
Are there other events?
There is also a Movie show at 10 pm.
What are the other events for the 12th of March.
There is a Reservation at McDonald's at 11:30 am.
Perfect. Tell me when I'm available.
You have 3 empty slots on your calendar from 8 am to 10 am.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a good one!
Hey, I'd like you to check my calendar. What am I doing on the 11th?
You're going to the Lyfe Jennings concert at 7 pm on the 11th.
Thanks. Am I doing anything on March 4th?
You're going to an apartment viewing at Hopper Lane Apartments at 10 am.
Okay thanks. When am I available on the 4th?
You'll be free from 8 am to 10 am.
Any other available times?
You're also available from 10:30 am to 5 pm.
Is there anything else?
Yes, you're free from 7 pm to 9:30 pm.
Sounds great.
Is there anything else?
No thanks. That's all.
Okay, see you.
I am very busy in my day-to-day work. Will you please check whether any events on my calendar?
In which date i need to check for the events in your calendar?
I prefer 6th of this month.
There are 2 events scheduled on that date . One is Dentist appointment which is going to start at 5 pm.
whether any other events scheduled in any other date i meant 8th of March?
Yes you have 2 events scheduled on the calendar. The event is going to start at 2:30 pm and the appointment with Donna M Cotner.
well that's great to hear from you. Please find any empty slots available this month.
well, there are 3 empty slots on your calendar and time of empty slots from 8 am to 12 pm.
whether i have any other available time other than 8 am to 12 pm?
Yes you have an empty slot from 1 pm to 2:30 pm.
That's great and now i am aware of all my events and my available time. Thanks.
Take care and have a good day.
I want to check the events on my calendar for the 2nd.
You have a Celine Dion concert starting at 7 pm.
Do I have any other events scheduled on the day after tomorrow?
You have Apartment viewing scheduled at 12 pm.
Do I have other events scheduled?
You have a Dentist appointment with Dr. Sethi And Dr. Virdi at 10 am.
Sounds good. Please show me when I am available.
You have an empty slot from 8 am to 10 am.
Do I have any other available time?
You have an empty slot from 11 am to 12 pm.
Sounds good.
May I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you for your help.
Have a good day.
What events do I have on the 13th?
You have the Lights concert at 6:30 pm.
Great, when am I available?
There are 2 empty slots in your calendar from 8 am to 6:30 pm.
Is there any other times?
You are free from 8:30 pm to 10:30 pm.
Great, that's all.
Have a great day.
I want to check my calender for events. The date I want to look into is the 12th of March.
You have Lights concert happening at 5:30 pm that day.
Are there any other events scheduled for me? What about the 13th?
Yes, you have 2 events scheduled on that day as well. You have Movie show which starts at 10:30 pm.
Okay, sounds good! What days are available?
There's 2 empty slots on the calender. You have an empty one from 8 am to 11 am, from what I can see here.
Alrighty, perfect. That's all I need to know.
You're welcome, have a nice day!
What events are on my calendar for the 14th of this month?
At 7:30 pm you have the Bastille concert.
Great!
Is there anything else you need?
When does my calendar show I am free?
You have nothing scheduled between 8 am and 5:30 pm.
Do I have any other free time?
Yes, you are free from 6:30 pm to 7:30 pm.
Perfect.
Do you need any other help?
That is all, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you help me check which events are on my calendar?
Is there a specific date you would like me to research?
1st of March, please.
There are 3 events scheduled on your calendar. For March 1st, you have an Appointment with Ocean Dental Lab at 3 pm.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you show me my availability?
You currently have an empty slot from 8 am to 3 pm.
Sounds good to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a good day!
I want to check my calendar events.
Which date do you want to check?
Check the 7th of this month.
You have 2 events scheduled on the calendar. The first event is the Apartment viewing at Deer Park Apartments which begins at 4 pm.
Do I have other events scheduled on the 9th of March?
You have Apartment viewing which starts at 1:30 pm.
Sounds good. Show me when I am available.
There are 4 empty slots on your calendar. You have a empty slot from 8 am to 1:30 pm.
Sounds good. That is all I need.
Have a good day.
What's on my calendar?
About which date would you like to know?
Monday next week.
You have a Restaurant reservation at Divino Ristorante at 5 pm.
Are there any other events for that day?
No, you don't have any other events scheduled for Monday. Is there anything else I can help you with?
What's on my schedule for the 14th of this month?
You have a Beyond The Black concert at 5:30 pm.
That's good. Tell me when I'm available.
You're available from 8 am to 5:30 pm.
Thank you. That's all for now.
You're welcome. Have a nice day.
I want to check my calendar for events on the 9th of this month.
Ok, you have Apartment viewing starting at 3 pm.
Do I have anything else on the 8th of March.
You have Apartment viewing at Villa Monterey starting at 11:30 am.
Any other events scheduled?
Yes. There is a Reservation for 5 people at Sicilia In Bocca starting at 7 pm
Ok, sounds good.
Anything else I can help with?
When am I available?
You are available from 8 am to 11:30 am.
Is there any other time available?
Yes, you are available from 12 pm to 7 pm.
Ok sounds good.
Anything else I can help with?
No, thank you so much.
Of course. Have a great day.
I want to check my schedule for March 13th.
You have a soccer game at BC Place at 6:30 pm.
Are there any other scheduled events?
No, there are no other schedules events for this day. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you check my schedule for the 12th?
You have a hairdresser appointment at 12:30 pm.
Sounds good. Can you show me my available times?
You have 4 available time slots. One is from 8 am to 12:30 pm.
Are there other available times?
You have an available time slot from 1 pm to 5 pm.
Are there other available times?
You have an available time slot from 5:30 pm to 6 pm.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a great day.
Please help me check the event o nmy calendar.
On what date do you want me to check?
Please check the date next Friday.
You have a schedule basketball game at 6 pm that day.
How about this Sunday, do I have an appointment on that day?
You do have 3 appointments on that day, one is Apartment viewing that will start at 3 pm.
Do I have other schedule?
You have an Appointment with Dr. Maria J. Moore at 10 am.
Okay, thanks!
Do you need help with anything else?
When will I be available?
Actually there are 4 more empty slots on your calendar from 8 am to 10 am.
How about other time?
You also have empty slots from 11 am to 3 pm.
Okay, thank you!
Do you need further assistance?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you check my schedule and see when I have an opening?
Certainly. Which date would you like me to check?
I'd like to look at the 12th of March.
You have nothing scheduled during the block of time starting at 8 am and ending at 11 am on the morning of March 12th.
Can you check the 13th as well?
On March 13th, your schedule shows an open period of time between 12:30 pm and 2 pm.
That's great. Thanks.
Did you need to add an event to the calendar?
Yes, Can you please add the Chris Webby concert? The event is being held at 2367 Shattuck Avenue.
What time does it begin?
It starts at half past 12 in the afternoon.
Let me review the details. You'd like me to schedule in the Chris Webby concert on March 13th at 12:30 pm. I will make a note that the event will be held at 2367 Shattuck Avenue.
Yes, that's perfect.
Your calendar has been updated.
Thank you so much for the assistance.
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
Not at the moment. Thank you again.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Can you please check my calendar and tell me when am I available?
Sure. For which date?
Please check for Monday next week.
Checking for next Monday. You are free from 8 am to 11 am.
Any other empty time slot for the 9th of this month?
On March 9th you are free from 8 am to 6 pm.
OK. I'd like to add an event.
At what time is the event?
The event is Dentist appointment at 9:30 in the morning.
Can you please tell me the event location?
Sure. It's 17705 Hale Avenue.
Please confirm that you'd like me to add the event Dentist appointment on March 9th at 9:30 am, with the location 17705 Hale Avenue.
Yes, that's correct.
I've added the event.
Thanks a lot for everything, that will be all.
Have a good one!
When am I available?
On what day?
The day is next Thursday
Next Thursday you've an empty slot from 10:30 am until midnight
Ok, It's good. Add an event, please
What is the name of the event? Where does it take place? What time is the event?
Baseball game, at 1 East 161 Street in the afternoon 12
Baseball game, next Thursday at 12 pm, in 1 East 161 Street: do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm.
The event has been created
Thank you so much
Can I do anything else for you?
No, thanks, It's all
Have a great day
I finally have time to do some more planning for my trip. I'm absolutely determined to get my calendar updated today. Would you spend a few minutes with me now, please, so I can know what time I have available on March 13th?
Absolutely. I can help you with that now. Looking at your calendar for available time on March 13th, I show 7 pm to 10:30 pm as open.
What time slot do you show that's available on the 8th of this month?
Your calendar shows the time range 8:30 pm to midnight available on next Friday.
Cool. That's what I need.
Would you like me to fill in that time range on your calendar?
Yes, please. Let's fill in that time range?
What would you like to label the event for that time range?
Let's add the label Leave for airport to that time range.
Got it. Do you want to specify a location or particular time for the event?
Yes, thanks for the reminder. Mark the location as SFO International Airport with the time being a quarter to 10 in the night.
Your calendar is being updated to show the label Leave for airport on next Friday, going to SFO International Airport for 9:45 pm. Shall I confirm that for you?
Yes, please confirm, and we're all set.
Confirmed. The label has been added to update your calendar.
Sweet. I'm much obliged, my dear.
Would you like any other assistance?
Nope, thank you and cheers.
My pleasure. Enjoy the rest of your day.
Show me my free time?
What date would you like to see?
March 10th would be good.
You are free from 8 am till 4 pm on March 10th.
How about on the 9th?
You are free from 2 pm till 3:30 pm on March 9th.
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can help with?
I need to add an event?
What time is the event?
It starts at 2:15 pm.
WHere will the even take place and what would you like to name it?
Title it Restaurant reservation for 6 at Royal Rangoon Restaurant. It is located at 2826 Telegraph Avenue.
Adding an event Restaurant reservation for 6 at Royal Rangoon Restaurant starting at 2:15 pm on March 9th located at 2826 Telegraph Avenue. is that correct?
Yes that sounds great.
The event has been added to your Calendar.
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No that will be all.
Have a great day.
I have to schedule an appointment on the 10th of this month. Can you show me my availability on that date?
You are available from 8 am to 5 pm on the 10th of this month.
Are there any other times I'm available?
You are available from 6:30 pm to 7:30 pm.
Thank you.
Would you like to add an event that day?
Yes, please add an event to my calendar.
What name should I use for the event? Where is the event and what time is it at?
The event is at 877 West Fremont Avenue Ste J2. It starts at 11 am. Put Appointment with Orthoworks Invisalign And Orthodontic Group for the title.
Please confirm the deatils: Event name is Appointment with Orthoworks Invisalign And Orthodontic Group. It is schedule for March 10th and 877 West Fremont Avenue Ste J2. The event is at 11 am.
Yes, that's good.
The event was successfully added to your calendar.
Thank you, that's all I need.
You're welcome, have a good day.
What is my availability on March 4th?
Next Monday, your are available from 8 am until 5 pm.
When am I available on March 8th?
Next Friday, you are available from 1:30 pm until 2:30 pm.
Ok. That's perfect.
Do you need to add an event?
Yes. Please create an event titled Baseball game at 14:00.
What is the event location?
The location is 401 East Jefferson Street.
Please confirm you want me to create an event titled Baseball game for next Friday at 401 East Jefferson Street at 2 pm.
Yep. That's right.
Your event has been successfully added.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. Thanks. That's it.
Ok. Have a great day.
When am I free on the 13th of this month?
On March 13th, you have a free slot from 8 am to 11 am.
Great
Would you like to schedule something?
Yes, add an event to my calendar
Of course. Can I get the name, time, and location for the event?
It's Soccer Game: Whitecaps vs Kansas City at 777 Pacific Boulevard. It starts at 09:00.
Please confirm your new event event: Soccer Game: Whitecaps vs Kansas City at 777 Pacific Boulevard, 9 am on March 13th
Yes that's right
Added to your calendar
Thanks so much
Anything else I can help with?
Nope I'm good
Always here for you
Can you tell me when my schedule is free for the day on the 11th?
I can see that according to your schedule for March 11th you are free from 8 am to 4:30 pm.
Do I have other hours when I will be free for the March 14th?
From what I can see for March 14th you are going to have free time from 1 pm to 7:30 pm.
That seems nice.
Do you want to add some special event to your schedule?
Actually yes! I am planning to do something and I would like to add it in my schedule.
Can you tell me the location of the event you want to do and at what time will it happen? Do you have a specific name which you want to use for the event?
I will be going for a meal out so make a Reservation at Lulu's Kitchen as a title for the event. The restaurant is located at 1657 Willow Pass Road and the time that it will happen is one pm.
Can you please confirm that the name of the event you want to add to your schedule is Reservation at Lulu's Kitchen on March 14th. The event is scheduled to happen on 1657 Willow Pass Road address, and the time when it will happen is 1 pm.
That seems great.
Your event has been successfully added to your schedule.
I appreciate your help.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you gave me.
Have a good time!
Can you show my availability on March 6th?
Event date is next Wednesday and your available time is from 5 pm to 6 pm.
Please check my availability on March 10th.
Your have an empty slot from 8 am to 6 pm on March 10th.
That is fine. Mark this event in my calendar for my reference.
Can you tell me the time and place of that event, so that I can mark and also let me know, by which name, do I note the event in your Calendar?
Make a note of that event in the name Appointment with Koppe Michael J and the time is 9 am at 5 Bon Air Rd # 114.
Please confirm to make a note of a event name Appointment with Koppe Michael J scheduled on March 10th at 9 am in 5 Bon Air Rd # 114.
Yes, that will be perfect.
The event was successfully noted in your calendar for your reference.
Thanks a lot.
Any more help you want me to do?
No, that's enough, thanks.
Have a great day.
I'd like to see my availability.
For which date do you want to check your availability?
I'm interested in the 5th of March.
You are free between 9:30 pm and 11 pm on next Tuesday.
Do I have any availability on March 10th?
You are free from 1:30 pm to 10:30 pm on March 10th.
Okay. I want to add an event to my calendar.
What event is it and where is it happening?
It is a Dentist appointment with Wirebenders at 2075 Lincoln Avenue # A.
At what time is the event?
It is scheduled at quarter past 2 in the afternoon.
Shall I add a Dentist appointment with Wirebenders at 2:15 pm on March 10th scheduled to be held at 2075 Lincoln Avenue # A?
Yes. Please go ahead.
Event has been added to your calendar.
Thank you for the assistance. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Tell me when I'm available.
Which date would you like to know?
The 6th.
The date for the event is next Wednesday and you have an empty slot beginning at 4:30 pm and ending at 7:30 pm.
Are there any other available slots on the 14th of this month?
The date for the event is March 14th and you have a slot starting at 5 pm and ending at 5:30 pm.
That sounds good.
Would you like to add an event to your calendar?
Yes I would like to add an event.
Where is the event happening and what should I call it?
Use Table for 2 at Mcdonald's as the title. The location is 23989 Watkins Street.
What time is the event?
The event time is evening 5:15.
Please confirm the following: the event name is Table for 2 at Mcdonald's and it is scheduled for March 14th at 5:15 pm. The location is 23989 Watkins Street.
Yes that works.
I have added the event to your calendar.
Thank you for the help.
Can I be of further help?
No, thank you.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to see when I'm available on the 1st of March.
That date is today. You have an empty space in your diary from 8 am until 10:30 am.
Do I have any other space available on the 10th of March?
You have an empty slot on March 10th between 9:30 pm and midnight.
That's great. Can you add an event at the Community gym into my calendar
What time does the event start?
It starts at 9:45 in the night.
What title would you like for the event.
Can you call the event Gym.
Just so I've got this right, you would like to schedule an event starting at 9:45 pm at the Community gym on March 10th. The name for this event is Gym.
Yes that sounds great.
This event has been successfully created and added to your calendar.
Thanks.
Do you need help with anything else?
No thanks.
Enjoy your day.
What's my schedule like on March 7th? Any free time?
Yeah, next Thursday you got nothing penciled in from 3:30 pm to 5 pm.
Wasting away in Margaritaville.
Do you want me to schedule something in?
Yeah. There's something going on at 2905 Grove Way.
What the name of this shindig? What time does it start?
Pencil in a Table for 2 at Mcdonald's for 15:45.
Next Thursday at 3:45 pm, you want a Table for 2 at Mcdonald's at 2905 Grove Way on your schedule. Is that right.
You got it.
Done. Added to your calendar.
Good job. I'm chill for now.
Enjoy yourself then.
Can you check out my calendar and find me a time when I am available?
On which date would you like to find an availability?
On the 4th of March please.
The 4th of March is next Monday. On this date you have a free time period from 8 am to 5 pm.
Okay great, that's what I thought. Add an event to my calendar for that day.
What time is the event, and where will it be happening?
The event will take place at 2891 University Avenue in the morning 8:15.
What should I title the event as?
Title it as The Hives Concert.
Please confirm the following: The Hives Concert at 2891 University Avenue on next Monday starting at 8:15 am.
Confirm that.
The event has successfully been added to your calendar.
Great, thanks for your help bud.
You're most welcome.
I would like to know when I am available next Wednesday
Next Wednesday you have an empty slot from 1 pm until 2 pm
Ok, then add an event
What is the name of the event, and what time is it?
Hairdresser appointment at half past 1 in the afternoon
What is the address of the event?
1053 Cochrane Road Suite 140
Hairdresser appointment next Wednesday at 1:30 pm, in 1053 Cochrane Road Suite 140: do you confirm?
Yes I confirm, perfect!
The event has been created in your calendar
Thank you so much!
Need more help?
No, thanks, it's all
Have a nice day
Hello, could you show me what time am I available on the 6th of March?
You are available next Wednesday from 12:30 pm, all the way through midnight.
I see, how about my available timing this Saturday?
You are free tomorrow from 4:30 pm to 5 pm.
That sounds great.
Would you like me to add an event to your calendar?
Sure! Please add an event titled Restaurant reservation for 4 at Ristorante Fratello which is located at 1712 Meridian Avenue.
May I know what time would the event commence?
Yes, it will start at quarter to 5 in the evening.
Please confirm the event scheduled tomorrow at 4:45 pm titled Restaurant reservation for 4 at Ristorante Fratello, which will be held at 1712 Meridian Avenue.
That's perfect.
I have added thee event to your calendar.
Thank you for your kind assistance.
Do you require any further help?
No, that's all I need. Thank you!
Sure, have a great day ahead.
I am hoping to go view an apartment on the 11th of March. Do I have any available times that day?
Yes, on March 11th you are free from 8 am until 6 pm.
Ok, that sounds great!
I can add the event to your calendar if you would like.
Sure, could you please add it for 9:30 am?
Yes, what would you like to use for the title of the event and do you have a location you would like me to add?
Oh, sorry, please title it Apartment viewing and the location is 4875 Clayton Road.
Alright, I will add the event Apartment viewing at 9:30 am on March 11th at 4875 Clayton Road. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Alright, the event has been added to your calendar. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all I need right now. Thanks so much for all of your help.
It was my pleasure, enjoy the rest of the day.
On March 9th show me please when I will be available.
You have on March 9th an empty slot that start at 8 am and ends at 6 pm.
In the 6th I have any other available time?
You have next Wednesday an empty slot that start at 2 pm and ends at 10:30 pm.
Please add an event on my calendar with tile Appointment with Dr. Azadeh Jafarnia at 2:30 in the afternoon.
The event where is happening?
At location 301 Sycamore Valley Road.
Event name is Appointment with Dr. Azadeh Jafarnia and sheduled date in on next Wednesday at location 301 Sycamore Valley Road.The scheduled will be at 2:30 pm
Sounds pefect for me.
Event was successfully added.
Thanks for your help.
Can I still help you now?
No.Thank you very much.
Have a great day!
I want to know what time I have available.
Which day do you want to look at?
The 9th of this month is what I'm curious about.
For March 9th, you have empty slots starting from 11 pm to midnight.
Do I have any other open slots, particularly for Saturday this week?
For tomorrow, you have empty slots from 8 am to 4 pm.
Alright. That sounds great.
Is there anything else you need?
Sure. Please add an event to my calendar.
Okay. When is the event and what should I name it?
Please put a Property viewing in the morning 8:30.
Where does this event happen?
It's located at 1375 Montecito Avenue.
Let me make sure. You want to add a Property viewing event for tomorrow at 8:30 am that takes place at 1375 Montecito Avenue.
Yeah. That is correct.
Okay, I've added it to your calendar.
Thanks for the help!
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Nope. That's it. Thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you search for my available timing?
When do you want me to search in?
Show me my free timings on March 10th.
You have an empty slot from 8 am to 5 pm on March 10th.
Can you look for any other empty slot on 9th of March?
You have an empty slot from 11:30 am to 1 pm on March 9th.
That sounds good to me. Add one event to my calendar.
Can you give me the details of the event like name, timing and place?
The name of the event is Buddy Guy concert which will be occur at 235 West 46th Street at 12 in the afternoon.
Please confirm the details: You want me to add an event with name as Buddy Guy concert happening on March 9th at 235 West 46th Street at 12 pm to your calendar.
Yes, That is correct.
Your event is successfully added to your calendar.
Okay. Thank you very much.
Do you need my help with anything else?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a great day.
When am I free on March 5th?
Next Tuesday, you're free from 2:30 pm to midnight.
Ok. When am I free on the 8th?
Next Friday, you have an empty slot from 6:30 pm to midnight.
Ok good.
Would you like to book something?
Yes. Add to my calendar an event at 261 Driggs Avenue, Brooklyn.
All right. What name should I use? What time?
It's Amber Run Brooklyn concert at 19:00.
Please confirm: adding Amber Run Brooklyn concert for next Friday at 7 pm. The address is 261 Driggs Avenue, Brooklyn
Yes that's right
I've added that to your calendar
Thanks so much.
Anything else you need?
Nah. Thanks.
Always here for you.
Please show me when I have available time slots.
Which date would you like me to search through?
The 4th of this month is the date I want you to check.
There is an event next Monday that you have planned. You have an empty time slot that goes from 7:30 pm to midnight.
What about March 2nd? Do I have any available time then?
There is an event scheduled for tomorrow. You have space of free time that ranges from 8 am to 1:30 pm.
Okay that sounds fine. Now, can you please add an event to my calendar?
Where is the event taking place and at what time?
The event will take place at 600 Wilbur Avenue at nine am.
What would you like to name this event?
List this event under the title Property viewing please.
The event, Property viewing, is scheduled for tomorrow at 600 Wilbur Avenue at 9 am.
Yes. that sounds correct.
I have successfully added the event to your calendar.
I appreciate the help. That's all I need for right now.
Thank you. Have a wonderful day.
When do I have open availability?
Which day shall I look at?
5th of March, please
Next tuesday there's room at 9 pm until 9:30 pm
Hmmm, what about the 13th?
On March 13th you have 8 am to 6:30 pm open.
Ok, can you please book a dentist appointment.
Sure, where's this event and what time?
24307 Southland Drive and it's at 8:30 am
Please confirm the following event: An 8:30 am dentist appointment on March 13th located at 24307 Southland Drive
Yes, perfect
This event is confirmed in your calendar
Great, thanks.
Will that be all?
Nope, thanks.
Have a wonderful day
Can you tell me when I am going to be available?
Do you have a particular date in mind?
Show me if I am available on Thursday next week.
For next Thursday, you have empty slot that starts at 12:30 pm and ends at 6:30 pm.
Sounds good, thank you.
Do you want to add an event for next Thursday to your calendar?
Yes, please add an event to my calendar at quarter past 1 in the afternoon.
How should I name the event?
Name the event Movie at Contra Costa Stadium Cinemas, located at 555 Center Avenue.
The event is Movie at Contra Costa Stadium Cinemas at 555 Center Avenue, which is scheduled for next Thursday at 1:15 pm correct?
That all sounds correct.
Your event was successfully added to your calendar.
That will be all, thanks for your help.
Your welcome, have a good day.
Hey, can you show me when I'm free?
In what date?
The 12th of March.
You're free from 8 am to 4 pm.
Good to know.
Would you like to add an event on your calendar on that time?
Yes, I would.
What is the event? Where will it be?
It's a General Practitioner appointment with John Toth, D.O. at 401 Gregory Ln # 248.
What time will it be?
At 2:30 in the afternoon.
Can you confirm the details? You have a General Practitioner appointment with John Toth, D.O. at 401 Gregory Ln # 248. The date is March 12th and the time is 2:30 pm.
Yes, this is it.
I successfully added it to your calendar.
Thanks for the help.
Can I assist you in anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Hey, when am I available?
For which date would you like to know?
March 11th.
You have an empty slot from 8:30 pm to 10:30 pm on March 11th.
Great. Add a new event to my calendar.
For what time? What is the event and what should I name it?
Gym. It's at night 9:30 in the Community Gym.
Please confirm: you want to schedule Gym for March 11th at 9:30 pm in the Community Gym. Is that correct?
Yes, that's it.
Successfully added it to your calendar.
Thanks for the help.
Can I assist you in anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
When am i free?
Please specify the date?
12th of March
ok, for March 12th you are free at 7:30 pm to midnight.
That is good
Do you want me to add any event to your calendar?
Yes, please.
Please provide the details: time, location and the name for the event.
Sure, the event starts at eight in the night and is located at 1500 South capitol street southeast. put it by the name Baseball game: Nationals Vs Reds.
Sure, please confirm: Event named Baseball game: Nationals Vs Reds for March 12th located at 1500 South capitol street southeast starting at 8 pm
yes that right
ok, added to your calendar
Thanks for the help
Any thing else?
No, thats it
Have a great day!
Can you tell me when I am available?
What date are you wanting to know about?
The 9th of March.
On the event date of March 9th you have an empty slot starting at 9:30 pm and ending at midnight.
Do I have another available time on the 10th of March?
On March 10th you have an empty slot starting at 12:30 pm and ending at 7:30 pm.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Add an event to my calendar.
What type of event and what is the event name?
The event name is Toto concert and it is at 858 North Broad Street.
What is the time of event?
The time is afternoon 12:45.
The event name is Toto concert scheduled for March 10th at 12:45 pm and the location is 858 North Broad Street.. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
The event was successfully added.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
When am I available on next Wednesday?
You are available from 4:30 pm to midnight on next Wednesday.
Can you look for any empty slot on 9th of March?
You are available from 8 am to 1 pm on March 9th.
Okay, That sounds great to me.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, Can you add an event to my calendar?
What should I put as the name, address and time for the event?
Put the name as Movie booking for long shot which will be at quarter to 10 in the morning at 2508.
Please confirm the details: You want to add an event with the name as Movie booking for long shot and the schedule timing as 9:45 am on March 9th and address as 2508.
Yeah, That sounds great to me.
Your event has been successfully added to your calendar.
Okay. Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you.
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
Can you help with my schedule, openness?
What date should I check?
Look on the 12th.
You have an open slot at 8 pm on March 12th. That time of openness ends at 10:30 pm.
Are there any other available times on the 2nd of March?
Tomorrow you have an opening at 3 pm. lasting until 4 pm.
Great. Add something for me will you?
What time and where will it be?
3:15 in the afternoon at 5 Bon Air Rd # 114
Which name do you want listed for this?
Place Appointment with Koppe Michael J.
Ok, this is what I have for you: Appointment with Koppe Michael J. at 3:15 pm @ 5 Bon Air Rd # 114 tomorrow.
That's great thank you.
Ok, it's on the books.
great thanks.
Can I help with any other activity scheduling?
No, I'm good thanks.
Thanks a lot.
Can I see when I'm available on the 10th of March?
You have empty slots starting from 8 am to 5 pm on March 10th.
Is there any other time available? What about March 7th?
Next Thursday, you have an empty slot starting at 1 pm and ending 9:30 pm.
Okay. Can you add an event on my calendar?
What is the event and when and where is it happening?
It's happening at 2901 East Hastings Street at 2:15 pm.
What should I call it?
Please name it as Billy Idol concert on my calendar.
Just to confirm; you want to add the Billy Idol concert next Thursday at 2901 East Hastings Street at 2:15 pm to your calendar?
Yes, that sounds perfect.
Okay, I've added it to your calendar.
Thanks for all the help.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Nope, that's it. Thanks.
Okay. Bye! Have a great day.
When am I available on March 5th.
The date is next Tuesday. You are free between 8 am and 3:30 pm.
What other free time do I have on the 8th of this month?
You are available next Friday between 2:30 pm and 5 pm.
Great.
Do you want to add a calendar event?
Yes I'd like to add an event to my calendar.
What would you like to call this event? What is the time and location?
The event address is 50 South San Mateo Drive and the time is afternoon 3. The title is General Practitioner appointment.
Ok so just to check this is correct: You would like to create an event called General Practitioner Appointment next Friday at 3 pm. The address is 50 South San Mateo Drive.
That's correct.
The event has been successfully created in your calendar.
Thanks.
Would you like help with anything else?
No that's all for now thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Hey. Can you show me when I am available?
In which date?
March 8th, please.
There are 4 empty slots for that day. One of them is between 8 am and 10 am.
Do I have any free time on March 11th?
You have 2 empty slots on March 11th. One of them is between 4:30 pm to 5:30 pm.
Any other time available?
There is another between 8:30 pm and 10 pm.
Sounds good. Create a new event on my calendar.
Great. What's the event?
The location is 4175, 42151 Blacow Road.
In what time? What should I name the event?
At afternoon 3, please. It's a Hairdresser appointment.
Can you confirm the details? You want to set a Hairdresser appointment on March 11th. The location is 4175, 42151 Blacow Road. It is scheduled to begin at 3 pm.
Yes, that's it.
I successfully added it to your calendar.
That's all. Thanks for the help.
Have a great day.
Show me my availability
What date are you talking about?
For the 5th
You have 3 empty slots. You have an empty slot from 8 am to 10 am
Is there any other time available? Maybe on the 3rd of this month
There are 2 empty slots on that date, you have one from 2 pm to 6 pm
Anything else available?
Another slot from 9 pm to 12 pm
That sounds good
Do you want me to add something there?
Yes, add an event
What time? and where is it happening?
It's at 2 pm. A hairdresser appointment at 1880 Solano Avenue
Confirming you have a 2 pm hairdresser appointment at 1880 Solano Avenue the day after tomorrow
Yes that's correct
I've added it
That's all for now, thanks
You're welcome. Bye
What is my availability on the 14th.
On March 14th, you are available from 11 am until 5 pm.
Ok, thanks a lot.
Would you like me to add an event to your calendar?
Yes, I guess I should. Could you just add Apartment viewing.
Alright, would you like me to add a location?
Oh, yes, the apartmen is at 1015 Fitzuren Road #7.
Is there a specific time that you are viewing the apartment or should I just add a note for the day?
I think I will go at my lunch break, so please just make it for 12 pm.
Alright, I will add the event, Apartment viewing, to you calendar for 12 pm on March 14th at 1015 Fitzuren Road #7. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct. Please add it to my calendar.
Alright, the event has successfully been added to your calendar. Do you need anything else?
No, that's all I need right now. Thanks for your help.
It was a pleasure helping you. Enjoy your day!
Can you tell me when I am available?
Sure, what dates are you checking on?
Can you check the 13th of this month?
On March 13th you are available from 8:30 pm to 10:30 pm
What about the 9th? Any times available?
On March 9th you are available from 8 am to 1 pm
Great, can you add an event?
Yes, what time does it start?
It begins at 09:45
Ok, what is the name of this event?
It is the Joe Hisaishi concert
Ok, and where is it?
It is at 881 7th Avenue
Just to confirm, you want to add the Joe Hisaishi concert on March 9th and 9:45 am to your calendar? It is at 881 7th Avenue.
Yes, that is correct
Great, I have added that event to your calendar
Ok, thank you
You're welcome, anything else I can help you with?
No, that is all
Have a wonderful day
Hi, i need a help with an event, Show me when i am available, the date is march 1st
The event is on today, Yo have an empty slot starting at 3 pm and ends at 5:30 pm
Thanks for the information, May i know any other available time? The date is the 7th
The event is on next Thursday, Yo have an empty slot starting at 1 pm and ends at 4:30 pm
That seems good for me
Would you like to add this event on your calendar?
Yes, sure, Please add this event to my calendar, Put Appointment with Quach catherine for the event title and event location is 2664 Berryessa Road # 210.
Could you tell me What is the for the event?
The event time is afternoon 2:30
Please confirm the details: The event name is Appointment with Quach Catherine and scheduled date is next Thursday and time is 2:30 pm, Event location is 2664 berryessa Road # 210.
Yes, That seems good for me
Congrats, The event successfully added to your calendar
Thank you very much for your help, That is all i need
You are welcome, Have a great day
I need you to list my available time slots.
Is there a particular day you want to know about?
Yes that would be the 9th of March.
You have a chunk of available time that starts at 10:30 am and ends at 6 pm on March 9th.
What about March 13th is there any available time on that date?
March 13th has one slot open from 7 pm to 7:30 pm.
That one will work. I want an event put on my calendar please.
For what time?
It will begin at 7 pm.
Where will it be and what should I call it?
I have to go to 1447 Cedarwood Lane # A, call it a Doctor appointment please.
You would like the following entry made on your calendar: Name of event is Doctor appointment to be held at 1447 Cedarwood Lane # A in the time slot 7 pm on March 13th. Is this the correct information?
That's perfect thank you.
The event is on your calendar.
That's great, thank for your efforts, that will be all.
May your day be filled with happiness.
Please show my availability for the 4th of March.
For next Monday, you have availability at 8 am to 12:30 pm.
How about availability on March 8th?
Next Friday you are available at 8 am to 11 am.
Please add an event.
When and where is the event and title?
Event is 8:15 am at 1722 First Street title Movie booking for HIgh Life.
Please confirm next friday 8:15 am at 1722 First Street title Movie booking for HIgh Life
I confirm that all.
Added to your calendar.
Thank you that is all.
Have a great day.
When am I available on the 11th of March?
There are 3 empty slots. 8 am to 2:30 pm is open.
Are there any other times Friday next week?
There are 2 slots. You have 3 pm to 4:30 pm available.
Are there any other available times?
5 pm to 12 pm is open
Sounds good
Would you like to add an event?
Yes please.
Where and when is the event? What name should I use for the event?
You can name it Baseball game. It will be at 1500 South Capitol Street Southeast. Time: evening 7:30.
Please confirm: The event name is Baseball game. It will be next Friday at 7:30 pm at 1500 South Capitol Street Southeast.
Yes, sounds good
The event was added to your calendar.
Thank you for your help.
Have a good day.
When am I available on the 13th?
On March 13th you are available from 4 pm to 10:30 pm.
Am I available on the 2nd of this month?
You have 1 empty slot tomorrow from 8 am until 12:30 pm.
Great. Please add an event.
What would you like to name the event and what time does it start?
The event is Dentist appointment with Mark A Watson in the morning 9:30.
Where does the event take place?
The event takes place at 2505 Samaritan Dr.
Please confirm: Dentist appointment with Mark A Watson tomorrow at 9:30 am at 2505 Samaritan Dr.
Yes, that's correct.
Your event has been added.
Thank you, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you check my calendar for availability?
Yes, what day should I check?
Check on the 1st.
Okay, that's today. You have an empty slot from 8 am until 11:30 am.
Great, add an event to my calendar.
Can you tell me the time and place of the event, and what I should name it?
Sure, put Viewing at Fountain Plaza Apartments for the title. It's at nine in the morning at 300 Hilary Way.
Okay, please confirm that I'm scheduling you for a Viewing at Fountain Plaza Apartments at 300 Hilary Way which will take place today at 9 am.
Yes, that's right.
I've added it to your calendar.
Thanks, that's all!
Have a great day.
I want to see when I have free time.
What date are you interested in?
I want to know for the 7th of March.
You have an upcoming event next Thursday. You would be free from 8 am to 5 pm
That's awesome. Add appointment with Dr. Jaswinder Ghuman for that day.
What time would you like to make the appointment?
I want it at quarter past 8 in the morning.
Where would it be taking place?
The location is 540 North Santa Cruz Avenue Suite B1.
I would like to confirm the following information: You have an appointment with Dr. Jaswinder Ghuman next Thursday at 8:15 am at 540 North Santa Cruz Avenue Suite B1.
Yes, that would be correct.
I have made the appointment.
I appreciate your help
Do you need my assistance with anything else?
No, that would be all.
Enjoy your day.
Please show me my availability.
Which date would you like to find availability for?
Show me details for March 5th.
For next Tuesday, you have availability from 6 pm to 10:30 pm.
Thank you. Please add an event titled Reservation for 3 people at Market.
Where is the event happening?
The event will be at 1347 Main Street.
And what time is it scheduled for?
It starts at 18:15.
Please confirm that you want to add an event titled Reservation for 3 people at Market, to be held at 1347 Main Street, for next Tuesday at 6:15 pm.
That's correct.
Event has been added to your calendar.
Thank you for the assistance.
Anything else I can do for you?
No. Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a great day!
I'd like to know when I'm free.
Which date would you like me to check?
What's my schedule for the 5th of March?
For next Tuesday you're free between 12:30 pm and midnight.
Excellent.
Would you like me to add something to your calendar?
Yes. I'd like to schedule an event for 1:30 in the afternoon.
Where is the even taking place?
The event's located at 3911 Figueroa Street, and you can log it under Football Game: Usc Vs Utah.
To confirm: You'd like me to schedule the event Football Game: Usc Vs Utah on 3911 Figueroa Street for next Tuesday at 1:30 pm, correct?
Yes, that's correct.
The event has been successfully added to your calendar.
Thank you so much for all of your help.
Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No, that'll be all. Thank you.
Enjoy your day.
Can you show me all the days I have available on my schedule?
Absolutely! Which dates would you like to know?
Can you show me what's available on the 8th?
Ok, you have an empty slot from 6 pm to midnight next Friday. Would you like me to set the date for the event?
Do I have any time available on the 10th?
Ok, you have an empty slot from 8 am to 10:30 pm on March 10th. Would you like me to set the date for the event?
Yes, sounds good.
Would you like to add an event to the calendar?
Yes I would like to add an event.
What is the name and time for the event? And where is it located?
The event is called Murder City Devils concert. It is located at 1234 West 7th Street at 8:45 am.
Please confirm the following: The event is named Murder City Devils concert. It is scheduled for March 10th at 8:45 am and will be happening at 1234 West 7th Street.
Yes, that is correct.
The event has been successfully added to your calendar.
Thanks for your help. That will be all for today.
Thank you! Have a great day!
I need to know when my schedule is open.
What date do you want?
Saturday this week, please.
You have 3 openings. One of them is from 8 am to 11 am.
Okay. I need to schedule something for one pm.
What's the location?
19920 Olivewood Street.
What do you want to call this event?
Apartment viewing at Pointe At Cupertino.
So schedule Apartment viewing at Pointe At Cupertino at 19920 Olivewood Street for tomorrow at 1 pm?
Yes, that's correct.
Okay, I've added it to your schedule.
Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Please show me when I am available. The date is 5th of March.
The date for the event is scheduled for next Tuesday and you have an empty slot starting at 1:30 pm ending at 5 pm.
Are there any other time available? The date is March 7th.
The date for event is scheduled for next Thursday and you have an empty slot starting at 2 pm and it will end at 6:30 pm.
That's good. Please add it to my calendar and mark the event title as Hairdresser appointment.
What is the time of the event and when is this event happening?
The location for event is 65 West Main Street and the event is scheduled for 3 in the afternoon.
Can you please confirm the following details. The event Hairdresser appointment is scheduled for next Thursday at 65 West Main Street with scheduled time of 3 pm.
Yes. That's perfect.
The event has been successfully added to your calendar.
Thanks for your assistance.
Can I assist you with anything else?
No. I am good for now.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to know my availability.
Which date would you like to know more about?
Tell me about the 4th.
For next Monday you're available starting at 11:30 pm and ending at midnight.
Do I have anything else available? What about the 12th of March?
For March 12th you're available starting at 12:30 pm and ending at 10:30 pm.
Okay, that's good.
Do you need to add any events to your calendar?
Yeah, I do need to add an event to my calendar. It's at 12:30.
What would you like to name the event?
Call it Viewing at Felson Management Corporation.
And where will this take place?
It's at 41277 Roberts Ave # 32.
Okay, I'll add Viewing at Felson Management Corporation on March 12th at 12:30 pm and it's 41277 Roberts Ave # 32, is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I've added it to you calendar.
Thanks for helping.
Do you need anything else from me?
No, thanks again.
Okay, have a good day.
I need to figure out a time I can meet my parents for dinner. Afterwards, we'll go checkout an apartment. Let's find out when I have some time available on the 3rd of this month, please?
You want to schedule an event for the day after tomorrow. You have some time available from 4 pm to 7:30 pm.
What about Thursday next week? Do you see any free time on that day?
You want to check next Thursday. Your calendar shows you are free from 4:30 pm until midnight on that day.
Okay, that's great..
Shall I fill in your calendar for that time?
Yes, please. Let's fill in that slot now.
All right. What title would you like for the event. Also, Let me know where you are going and at what time?
Yes, give it the title Viewing at Villa Fontana Apartments at 50 East Market Street for a quarter past 6 in the evening.
Got it. The addition to your calendar is for next Thursday at 6:15 pm for the event titled Viewing at Villa Fontana Apartments, located at 50 East Market Street. Shall I confirm that for you?
Yes, that's on point.
Confirmed. The event is now on your calendar.
Wonderful, amigo. That's it for now. Your help is greatly appreciated.
Of course. Enjoy your day.
I want to know when my schedule is free for Monday next week.
You are looking for the next Monday, and I can see that you have no scheduled events from 11 am till 8:30 pm.
That seems nice. I would like to schedule an event in my calendar.
Can you tell me the name of the event you want to schedule, and the time when the event will be happening? What about the location of the event?
The event will take place at 960 Blossom Hill Road at half past 11 in the morning. The title for the event can be Stylist appointment at Kinder Cuts Kids Hair Salon.
Can you please confirm that you want to schedule an event at 11:30 am for next Monday, titled Stylist appointment at Kinder Cuts Kids Hair Salon, and the event is situated at 960 Blossom Hill Road?
That seems right.
The event you have requested has been added to your schedule.
I appreciate your help. That would be all.
Have a good time!
I need to go for an event on thursday next week. will you show me when i am available?
You have an empty slot starting at 11:30 am and ends at 3 pm on next thursday.
Whether find any other available time on my calendar? probably for the 10th .
You have an empty slot starting at 12:30 pm and ends at 1 pm on March 10th.
ok it sounds good to me.
Whether you need to add an event to your calendar?
Yes, I need to add an event to my calendar that is at half past 12 in the afternoon.
What is the name of the event i should used and when it is happening?
The event location is 2500 milvia street and please put event title as General Practitioner Appointment with Roxanne C. Fiscella, M.D.
ok please check and review the following details so that i will confirm it. The event name is General Practitioner appointment with Roxanne C. Fiscella, M.D. The date for the event is March 10th and location is 2500 Milvia street and scheduled time is at 12:30 pm
ok , that's great.please confirm it
the event have been successfully added to your calendar
Thanks a lot for your immense help .
take care have a great day
Show me when I'm availble on the 9th.
There are 3 empty slots on your calander. There's one rom 8 am to 11:30 am.
Do I have any other availble time on the 12th of this month?
There are 2 empty slots on your calendar. You have an empty slot from 2 pm to 6:30 pm.
Sounds good.
Would you like to add an event?
Yes please.
What name should I use for the event? What time is the event?
The event time is 14:00. Put Hairdresser appointment for the title
Where is the event happening?
The location is 10095 Saich Way #2.
Please confirm the following details: the vent name is Hairdresser appointment. The sceduled date for the event is March 12th. The location of the eent is 10095 Saich Way #2. The scheduled time for the event is 2 pm.
Yes, that sounds good.
Successfully added event to your calander.
Thank you for the help.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a good day.
Can you help show my schedule for Thursday next week?
Sure, next Thursday you have an empty slot from 8 pm until midnight.
That sounds right.
What event would you like to add?
Just a moment.
Where will the event be? Do you know the time or date I should use to denote it?
List Community gym at quarter past 9 in the night. Just put Gym as the title.
Ok, I have: Event name: Gym, next Thursday at Community gym at 9:15 pm.
That's perfect.
You have the event added.
Good, thanks.
Have a good time.
When am I free on March 4th?
The event date is next Monday and you are free from 6:30 pm to 7 pm.
That's good. Can you add an event and time is quarter to 7 in the evening
Which place is the event going to take place? In what name should i save the event?
The event is taking place in 3455 Homestead Road. Save the event name as Apartment viewing.
Please confirm this: The event name is Apartment viewing. The scheduled date for the event is next Monday. The location of the event is 3455 Homestead Road. The scheduled time for the event is 6:45 pm.
OK. That's perfect.
The event is added successfully
Thanks a lot
Do you want to d anything else?
No. Everything is done.
Have a nice day.
I want to know when I am available.
Which date did you want to know about?
March 2nd.
Tomorrow, you have an empty slot starting at 8 am which ends at 12 pm.
Do I have any other available times? The date is the 13th.
March 13th, you are free from 9 pm to 10:30 pm.
Okay, great that sounds perfect.
Would you like to add any events.
Yes, please. Add the event in location Home.
What should I call the event?
Put Bedtime as the event title.
What time would you like that?
At 9:30 in the night.
Let's confirm the following. On March 13th, your bedtime at Home is scheduled for 9:30 pm.
Yeah, that sounds perfect.
I have successfully added that to your calender.
Thanks for your help.
Can I help with something else?
No, that's everything.
Have a nice day.
When am I available?
For which day?
The 10th please
On March 10th, you are free from 7 pm until 10:30 pm.
How about next Monday?
Next Monday, you are free from 11 am until 6:30 pm.
Perfect. Thank you.
Would you like to add an event?
Yes, I would like to add an event.
When and where is the event?
It will be a Dentist appointment at 128 El Cerrito Plz. Time: morning 11:15.
Please confirm: Dentist appointment next Monday at 128 El Cerrito Plz for 11:15 am
Yes thank you
Your event has been added
Thank you for your assistance.
Can I help with anything else?
Nope. Thank you so much.
Have a good day.
Hey, show me my schedule.
What date are you interested in?
Please check march 13th.
Ok, on March 13th you have a slot from 8 am to 1 pm that is empty.
What about March 3rd? Do I have any time then?
day after tomorrow you have a slot all the way from 8 am until 11:30 am.
Great, add something will you?
What name should the event be given?
Appointment at the Dreadlocks Salon please.
What's the time and event activity location?
341 7th Street at 08:45
OK confirm please: Appointment at the dreadlocks salon day after tomorrow at 341 7th street at 8:45 am.
You have nailed it again.
Great, it's added.
I thank you for your help.
What else can I help with?
Nothing now, thanks.
Have a good appointment.
Could you please show me when Im available.
Which date should I search for?
Check for the date 10th of March
You have free from 8 am to 1 pm
Is there any other available time?
You have another free slot from 2:30 pm to 12 pm
Do I have any other available time for next Monday
Yes you are free from 4 pm to 12 pm
Its great please add an event on my calender
What is the name of the event and where is the it happening?
The location is 2227 Piedmont Avenue mark as Football Game: Golden Bears Vs Trojans as event title.
Whats the time for the event?
Its 5:30 in the evening.
Please confirm this : The event name is Football Game: Golden Bears Vs Trojans on next Monday by 5:30 pm at 2227 Piedmont Avenue
Yes thats perfect
The event is successfully added to your calendar
Thanks a lot for the help.Thats all for now.
Have a great day ahead.
I need to know when my schedule is clear.
For which date?
For this Sunday.
You have free time the day after tomorrow from 3:30 pm to 7 pm.
Do I have any spare time Monday next week?
There is time available next Monday from 8:30 pm to midnight.
Fine. I would be going out somewhere at night 9:45
What is the name of the event and where is it taking place?
The title would be Laundry and it would be taking place at the Laundry room.
I would like to confirm the following information: laundry at the Laundry room for next Monday at 9:45 pm
That would be fine.
I have added it to your calendar.
I appreciate your assistance.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No. You have been very helpful.
Enjoy your day.
Show me my open calendar on 5th of this month.
You have 4 empty slots between 8 am to 12 pm on your calendar.
Any other available time on the 14th?
There are 3 empty slots between 2 pm to 2:30 pm
Any other empty slots?
You have empty slot from 3:30 pm to 5 pm on your calendar
ok great.
Do you want me to add an event to your calendar?
Yes please
What is the event and where is the event at what time?
Please put Property viewing from half past 11 in the morning at 49 Gold Mine Drive
Please confirm your calendar for Property viewing on March 14th 11:30 am at 49 Gold Mine Drive
Yes thats correct
Event has been added to your calendar
Thank you
Anything else ?
No thats it
Have a nice day
Show me my availability for the 12th of this month please.
OK, I show that you have availability at 8 am until 2:30 pm on March 12th.
Ok, that's great.
Did you want to add an event to this calendar?
Yes actually, Please add event title as General Practitioner appointment.
Sure, for what time ?
This is event is morning 9:30.
Ok, Where is this event happening?
Event location is 31 Panoramic Way #201.
One moment, Please confirm details: Add calendar event General Practitioner appointment on March 12th at 9:30 am. This event is located at 31 Panoramic Way #201. Is this correct?
Yes, sounds perfect.
Great. event has successfully been added.
Thanks. That will be all for now.
Your welcome. Have a wonderful day.
Can you please let me know my availability.
Sure, which date would you like to check?
The 9th.
There is availability from 8 am to 12 pm.
What else is available?
There's also an empty slot at 1:30 pm to 4 pm.
Hmmm, what else is open on the 7th?
There's open space at 1 pm to 3 pm.
Perfect, please title it, Reservation for 3 people at Mexico Lindo.
Can you please provide the location of this event?
Yes, 1 o"clock in the afternoon at 33306 Alvarado-Niles Road.
Great, please confirm your reservation details: Reservation for 3 people at Mexico Lindo next Thursday at 33306 Alvarado-Niles Road for 1 pm.
Correct.
This event is successfully on your calendar.
Awesome, thanks.
Is there anything else you would like?
Nope, thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to schedule an appointment. Can you check what's available on my calendar?
Sure, what day?
What does the 13th look like right now?
You have 3 empty slots that day. It looks like 8 am to 2:30 pm is open.
What else is available?
Looks like 3 pm to 7 pm is also open.
Do I have available times on the 14th of March?
There are 2 empty slots that day. Looks like 1 pm to 1:30 pm is open.
Ok, that sounds fine.
Should I add an event to your calendar?
Yes, go ahead.
Ok, what's the location, time, and name of the event?
You can just put Hairdresser appointment and make it for 6:30 in the evening at 1374 9th Avenue.
Ok, just to confirm, I'm adding a Hairdresser appointment on March 14th for 6:30 pm at 1374 9th Avenue. Is that right?
Yep, sounds good.
Ok, the event has been added.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a good day.
Show me when I am available on the 2nd of this month.
You have an empty slot from 8 am to 5:30 pm.
Do I have any other free time?
You have an empty slot from 7 pm to 7:30 pm.
Do I have any other available time on the 14th of this month?
You have an empty slot from 4:30 pm to 5 pm.
Sounds good.
Would you like to add an event to your calendar.
Yes,I would like to add an event to my calendar.
What should I call the event? What time is it occurring and where is the event happening?
The event is located at 5500 Campanile Drive at 6:30 in the evening. Name the event Alejandro Sanz concert.
Please confirm the following: The event name is Alejandro Sanz concert and it is scheduled for March 14th at 6:30 pm. It is located at 5500 Campanile Drive.
Yes, that is correct.
The event has been successfully added to your calendar.
Thank you for your help.
Can I be of further help?
No,thank you for your help.
Have a nice day.
Can you show me when I'm available on the 13th of this month, please?
Sure! There are 2 empty slots on your calendar. You're available at 8 am and at 5 pm.
Do I have any available times next Monday?
You have empty slots at 1:30 pm and at 8 pm.
Are those my only empty slots?
No. You also have available time at 10 pm and at 12 pm.
Okay, great!
Would you like me to add an event to your calendar?
Yes, please! The event is located at 801 Welch Road.
What time is the event? What name should I use to categorize the event?
The event is called the ENT Specialist appointment at 14:30.
Okay, perfect! Can you confirm the following details, please? The event name is ENT Specialist appointment. It's scheduled for next Monday at 2:30 pm. It's located at 801 Welch Road.
Yes, indeed.
You're successfully booked for your appointment.
Thank you so much!
You're welcome! Can I help you with anything else?
No, that will be all.
All right. I hope you have a good day!
Show me the times I am available on March 14th.
You're free from 8 am to 7:30 pm.
Sounds good. Make an appointment on my calendar for 15:30.
Where are you going for this appointment?
I'm going to a Property viewing at 100 Summerfield Drive.
So do I have this right? You have a Property viewing at 100 Summerfield Drive on March 14th at 3:30 pm?
Yes, that's correct.
I've marked the appointment in your calendar.
Thanks. That's all I need right now.
Have a good day. Bye.
What times am I available next Wednesday?
You have 3 times of availability from 8 am to 1:30 pm.
Do I have any other times available on March 7th?
Your calendar shows 2 open times from 1 pm to 5 pm.
Okay, sounds great.
How else can I assist you today?
I'd like to add an event to my calendar.
What is the time and location of this event?
The event location is 6000 Bollinger Canyon Road Suite 2300 and the time will be at seven pm.
What name would you like me to use for this event?
I'd like the event to be called Movie at THE LOT City Center.
Please confirm that you would like me to add an event named Movie at THE LOT City Center to your calendar schedule for next Thursday at 7 pm. The event will be located at 6000 Bollinger Canyon Road Suite 2300.
Thank you. That sounds great.
The event has been successfully added to your calendar.
Thanks for helping.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
No, but thank you for helping.
Enjoy your day.
When am I available on the 4th?
You are free from 8 am to 4:30 pm.
OK, put Appointment at Great Clips in my calendar, for half past 6 in the evening.
Where is it happening?
It will be at 4045 East Castro Valley Boulevard.
Please confirm this: The event is Appointment at Great Clips. It will be next Monday at 6:30 pm and it is happening at 4045 East Castro Valley Boulevard.
Yes, that's good.
I have added this to your calendar.
Thanks, for the help.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's it thanks.
OK, enjoy your day!
Do you know when I am available?
Which do were you curious about?
The 9th please.
There are 3 spots open that day. One empty spot is 8 am to 1 pm.
Do I have any other time?
You have a time available from 1:30 pm to 7 pm.
Okay add an event during that time.
Alright what are the details of the event?
The title is The Struts concert and it is at 5 in the evening. The location is 89 South Street.
The Struts concert for 5 pm in the evening of March 9th and the location is 89 South Street. Is this all correct?
That is perfect.
Okay the date has been added.
Thank you that will be all.
Have a great day.
Can you tell me if I am available for next Friday?
You have 3 empty slots for next Friday, you are available from 8 am to 11:30 am.
Is there any other time that I am available?
You are also available from 12 pm to 5 pm.
Is that all, is there any empty slots on the 3rd?
On the 3rd you have 1 empty slot, from 8:30 pm to 12 pm.
Sounds perfect, add an event to that date at 15:30?
How should I name this event?
Call the event Viewing at Apricot Pit Apartments, and give it the location 400 East Remington Drive.
You wish to set an event titled Viewing at Apricot Pit Apartments at 400 East Remington Drive, for the day after tomorrow at 3:30 pm?
That all sounds good, yes.
Your event was successfully added to your calendar.
Thanks for all your help.
Is there anything else you need me to help you with?
No, that is all thank you.
Your welcome, have a good day.
Hey. When am I free?
For what date would you like to know?
The 1st of March.
You have 3 empty slots on that day. There is one between 8 am and 1:30 pm.
Yes, sounds good,
Would you like to set an event for that tune?
Yes, I would.
What should I name it?
Put Restaurant reservation for 3 at Perch + Plow as the title.
What time will it be?
At evening 6.
Where will the event be?
On 90 Old Courthouse Square.
Please confirm: You want to schedule an event called Restaurant reservation for 3 at Perch + Plow for today. It's located on 90 Old Courthouse Square at 6 pm.
Yes, that's it.
Successfully added it to your calendar.
Thanks a lot. That's all I need.
Have a great day.
Do I have something scheduled for March 12th?
Your calendar has 3 empty slots: from 8 am to 11 am.
Any other slot?
There's one from 11:30 am to 5 pm.
Anything else for the 14th?
There's an available time from 4 pm to 10:30 pm.
That will do it. I want a reservation for 5 people at Mayflower Seafood Restaurant for the main title. Add it to my calendar too.
Where is the event at?
34348 Alvarado-Niles Road at eleven am.
Let's confirm the following: Reservation for 5 people at Mayflower Seafood Restaurant. It's scheduled for March 14th. It's taking place at 34348 Alvarado-Niles Road. Scheduled for 11 am.
Thank you.
The event's been added to your calendar.
Thank you.
We wish you the best.
Am I available Saturday this week?
There are 3 empty slots on your calendar. From 8 am to 12:30 pm you have time
Sounds good, add an event to my calendar
What event is it, and when and where?
It's a hairdresser appointment at 5 in the evening at 994 The Alameda
Confirming your 5 pm Hairdresser appointment tomorrow at 994 The Alameda
Yes thats right
I've added it to your calendar
Thanks for your help
Anything else you need?
No that's all for now
Have a good day
Do I have any free time on 14th of this month?
Yes, you have 2 empty slots from 8 am to 7:30 pm.
Do I have any free time on the 9th?
There are 2 empty slots on 9th, from 3:30 pm to 9 pm.
That sounds great.
Is there anything you would like me to do?
Add a new event with location 344 East Hamilton Avenue to my calendar.
What name and time should I use for the event?
Use Ophthalmologist appointment with Dr. Edward J. Saub as the title and save the event time as 11:00.
Please confirm that the event name is Ophthalmologist appointment with Dr. Edward J. Saub and date and time of the event are March 9th and 11 am and event location is 344 East Hamilton Avenue.
Yes.
I have successfully added the event to your calendar.
Thank you. That's all for now.
Have a great day.
I need to know when I am available on March 12th.
You are available during the hours of 8 am to 12 pm.
That is fine.
Do you wish to schedule this event in your calendar?
Yes, I would like to schedule the event in my caldendar.
What is the location of the event?
The event is happening at 200 South 3rd Street.
What time will the event occur?
The event is occurring at 7 o"clock in the evening.
What should I use as the event title?
The name to use for the event title is Young The Giant concert.
Please verify the following information: The name of the event is Young The Giant concert. The date the event takes place is March 12th. The concert will be located at 200 South 3rd Street, at 7 pm.
Yes, that is correct.
The concert is scheduled in your calendar.
I appreciate your help. That will be all.
Have a nice day.
Am I available on the 2nd of this month?
Yes, you are available from 8 am to 5 pm.
Perfect, thank you.
Can I add this event to your calendar?
Yes, please add the event and label it Apartment viewing at The Enclave.
Where is The Enclave located?
It's located at 4343 Renaissance Drive.
What time are you planning to go?
I plan to attend in the afternoon 3.
To confirm, I am planning an Apartment viewing at The Enclave at 4343 Renaissance Drive tomorrow at 3 pm.
Sounds good to me!
It's been added to your calendar.
You've been very helpful, thank you.
You have a good day as well.
Show me when I am available on March 14th.
There are 3 empty slots on your calendar,starting from 8 am to 11:30 am
Please check any available time on 1st of March.
Yes slots from 6:30 pm to 10:30 pm
alright
Would you like to add an event to your calandar?
Yes, I want to add an event to my calendar.
What time is the event?
The event time is half past 1 in the afternoon.
Where is the event happening? What name should I use for the event?
Put Ophthalmologist appointment with Rona Silkiss, MD, FACS for the event title. The event location is 1460 North Camino Alto.
Please confirm the details: The event name is Ophthalmologist appointment with Rona Silkiss, MD, FACS. The scheduled date is today. The location of the event is 1460 North Camino Alto. The scheduled time for the event is 1:30 pm.
Yes. perfect
Successfully addded the event to your calendar
Thank you for your help.
Have a Good day.
I would like to see if I am available on the 10th of this month.
You have 2 empty slots on your calendar for the 10th, one being from 8 am to 4:30 pm.
Sounds good. Can you add an event to my calendar for that day?
Absolutely. What name should I use for the event?
Please put Apartment viewing at Arbors At Mountain View for the event name.
Perfect. What time will that event be?
The event will be at two in the afternoon, and it is located at 2290 California Street.
Just to confirm, the event name is Apartment viewing at Arbors At Mountain View, scheduled for March 10th at 2 pm. The location of this event is 2290 California Street.
Yes, that sounds perfect.
Great, I successfully added the event to your calendar.
That's great. Thank you for your help!
You're welcome. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Nope, that was it. Thank you, again!
Perfect. Have a great day!
Show when I'm available.
For which date?
The 1st of this month.
You have 4 empty slots from 8 am to 1 pm.
Any other times free? The date's March 13th.
You have 2 empty slots. One is 4 pm to 5 pm.
Any other times?
You have a slot empty from 6:30 pm to 12 pm.
Sounds good.
Do you want to add an event to your calendar?
Yes, add an event at 19:00.
Where is the event and what is the name?
Taking Back Sunday concert at 50 Upper Alabama Street.
Please confirm: Taking Back Sunday concert on March 13th at 50 Upper Alabama Street at 7 pm.
Sounds good.
Event added to your calendar.
Thank you, that's all.
Have a good day.
Show me my availability.
Which date?
9th of this month
You are available from 8 am to 11 am.
Great
Do you want to add an event to your calendar?
Yes
What and where is the event?
1111 Southwest Broadway at 18:30
What's the name of the event?
Erica Fernandez concert
Please confirm Erica Fernandez concert on March 9th at 1111 Southwest Broadway at 6:30 pm.
Sounds great.
Okay, event added.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, that's it for now.
Have a nice day.
Can you show the when I am available on Monday next week?
You have 4 empty slots on your calendar. There is an empty slot from 8 am to 4:30 pm.
Do I have any other time available on the 9th?
There are 2 empty slots and they are from 2 pm to 5:30 pm.
That sounds fine. Please add an event on my calendar.
Where and when is the event happening? What name would you like for the event?
The event is at 1919 Mount Diablo Boulevard at half past 11 in the morning. Put the event as Hairdresser appointment.
You have a Hairdresser appointment on March 9th located at 1919 Mount Diablo Boulevard. The time is 11:30 am. Is this correct?
Yes, that sounds fine to me.
I have successfully added the event to your calendar.
Thank you for the help. That's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful evening.
I want to check the weather for March 7th.
What city are you checking the weather for?
I want to check in Dixon.
The average temperature is 80 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I want to find a restaurant, as well.
What kind of food would you like to eat? Indian, Italian, etc.?
I want to go somewhere that serves alcohol. Asado sounds good.
I found 1 restaurant. Bud's Pub & Grill in Dixon.
What is the address?
The address is 100 South 1st Street.
Is there live music? What is the phone number?
There is no live music. The phone number is 707-678-4745
Sounds good, thanks.
Do you want to reserve a table?
Yes I want to make a reservation.
What time is the reservation for?
I want to make it for half past 11 in the morning.
Please confirm: A table for 2 at Bud's Pub & Grill in Dixon on March 1st at 11:30 am.
Yes, sounds good. Is it pricey?
Your reservation has been made. The prices are moderate.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can help with?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Please check the weather for me in sonoma on 9th of this month
The temperature in Sonoma is 85 degree with 6 percent chance of rain
how humid would it be
it will be 21 percent humidity
ok, please find me a barbecue restaurant
Schellville grill is a good barbecue restaurant in sonoma
any other restaurants?
sorry i was unable to find any other restaurants. is there anything else i can do for you
can you search again for some himalayan food that also serve alcohol which are affordable
i found 1 himalayan restaurants in sonoma called taste of the himalayas
ok perfect, please make a reservation for me
what time would you like to go there
please make it quarter to 1 in the afternoon
please confirm your reservation for 2 people at taste of the himalayas in sonoma on march 1st at 12:45 pm
please make it three people on next friday
please confirm your reservation for 3 people on march 8th
yes thats correct, can you give me their number and do they have live music
Please confirm your booking for 3 people at taste of the himalayas on march 8th at 12:30 pm. They do dont have live music and their phone number is 707-996-1161
no, forget it. thank you
have a nice day
What does the weather on March 14th look like?
Which city should I check it for?
Search in Mill Valley
The temperature is expected to be 91 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
What about humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be around 40 percent and wind speed is at 2 miles per hour.
How about the weather in Palo Alto on next Tuesday?
The temperature is expected to be 88 degrees with a 27 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I also want to search for a restaurant there.
Any food specifications?
I am craving some burger.
Bazille in Palo Alto is a great place
Suggest me something else
How about bird dog in Palo Alto
Is there live music there?
No, Live music isn't available.
Okay. make a reservation for 1 person on 13th of march 1 pm.
Booking a table for 1 at bird dog in Palo Alto on March 13th at 1 pm.
Okay, what is their price range and address?
They are moderate in prices and are located at 420 ramona street. Your booking is confirmed.
Thank you so much!
Do you need my help with something else?
No, that would be all. Thanks again.
Pleasure is mine. Have a great time there.
Check for me please the weather in Mountain View.
The average temperature for the day should be 91 degrees Fahrenheit and 9 percent chance of rain.
I understand.Find me a restaurant there.
You like a specific type of food.American, Chinese or something else?
Punjabi kind of food will be good.
I have for you 5 options.One is a nice restaurant located in Mountain View called Chaat Paradise.
That's great make a reservation for 4 people on the 12th at afternoon 12:15.
Book a table for 4 people at Chaat Paradise in Mountain View on March 12th at 12:15 pm.I'm right?
Yes is good for me.
Soory but reservation failed.You want to try again on March 12th at 12 pm for 4 people, because Chaat Paradise is a nice place.
Yes is perfect.
Reservation was made.
Is live music available?Tell me the contact number.
Phone number is 650-965-1111 and they not have live music.
Thank you.That's all.
Have a great day!
Do you know the weather on March 9th?
On which city specifically?
In Yountville, please.
It is not that cold, the average temperature on that day is 91 degrees with 11 percent chance of rain.
Alright. Please help me find a restaurant where I could eat during my visit.
Do you have anything in mind? Like Indian, Italian, Chinese, or anything else?
I am craving for some Italian food, pizza and pasta is perfect.
There's 2 restaurants that you might like, but this one stands out. It is called the Bottega Napa Valley located in the heart of Yountville.
I heard they serve great food. Please make a reservation for me.
What time would you like to visit?
Morning 10:30, please.
Please do confirm the following details: reservation at Bottega Napa Valley at Yountville for 2 persons on March 1st, and that is for 10:30 am.
I will be inviting friends over. Please make it for four people and night 8 pm.
Please do confirm the following details: reservation at Bottega Napa Valley at Yountville for 4 persons on March 1st, and that is for 8 pm.
Yes, that's right.
Sorry, I wasn't able to make a reservation. Do you need help with anything else?
That's sad. But thank you. That's good for now.
Havea wonderful day!
Please tell me the weather forecast for March 8th.
Any particular city's weather forecast?
Please check the weather in Menlo Park.
The expected average temperature for the day is 83 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Sounds good! Please find me a restaurant offering Latin American cuisine there.
Cafe Del Sol Restaurant, a nice restaurant Menlo Park is among the 3 I found.
Sure, that sounds good.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here?
Yes, please do make a reservation.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Please reserve it for afternoon 1:30.
Okay, no problem. Please confirm that you'd like to make a March 1st, 1:30 pm reservation for 2 at Cafe Del Sol Restaurant in Menlo Park.
No, sorry there's been a change of plans. Please make it for three people, tomorrow.
Sure, no problem. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like to make a March 2nd reservation for 3.
That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Thank you, and have a great day.
What's the weather like on Thursday next week?
For what city?
Look in Sebastopol.
The average temperature should be 83 degrees Fahrenheit. There'll be a 20 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy? How humid?
The wind speed will be around 1 miles per hour. The humidity should be around 30 %.
What about mill valley?
Average temperature of 91 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 27 % chance of rain.
Find me a restaurant there.
Mexican, Italian, anything else?
I'm looking for some Izakaya food.
I've found Robata Grill & Sushi in mill valley.
what else is there? i need something afforadable.
how about shang hai kitchen in m mill valley.
what's their address? do they serve liquor?
they don't serve alcohol. the address is 247 shoreline highway.
okay, i like the sound of it.
shall i reserve you a table?
yes, i'd like a reservation.
for what time?
for one in the afternoon.
okay, please confirm: table for 2 at shang hai kitchen in mill valley at 1 pm on march 1st.
yes please confirm.
i'm afraid i wasn't able to make that reservation at shang hai kitchen. should i try a reservation for 2 at 12:30 pm on march 1st?
no, don't do that.
is there anything else?
no that's it.
have a great day.
What'll the weather be like on March 9th?
In what city?
Check in Fairfax.
It'll be around 80 degrees and have a 3 percent chance of rain that day.
Okay, can you help me find somewhere there to eat? How about pasta?
There's Fradelizio's Ristorante in Fairfax.
That works, can you make a reservation?
Sure, for what time?
7:45 in the evening, please.
Will do, first confirm you'd lie a table for 2 at Fradelizio's Ristorante in Fairfax for 7:45 pm on March 1st.
Confirmed. What's the number I can reach them at?
Call them at 415-459-1618. That reservation wasn't available. Can I try a table for 2 at Fradelizio's Ristorante on March 1st at 7:30 pm instead?
No, that doesn't work.
Okay, anything else I can do for you?
Nope, thanks a lot.
Enjoy your day.
What will the weather be like on 4th of this month in San Fran?
The temperature will be averaging at around 71 degrees Fahrenheit for the day and the possibility of rain is at 16 percent.
Alright. I need to look for a restaurant which is extravagant in pricing.
What cuisine are you a fan of? Maybe Chinese, Italian or something else?
I would love some Barbecue food.
Can I suggest you this nice restaurant in San Francisco called Acquerello?
Find me some other restaurant.
Would you like Aster in San Francisco. It is a decent restaurant.
Recommend me some other restaurant please.
How do you like this nice restaurant in San Francisco called Aveline?
Get me their address and phone.
It is on the 490 Geary Street and their digits are 415-345-2303.
That will totally work. Book me a table for 1 at 12:30 in the afternoon.
Make sure I got it all right. You want a table at Aveline in San Francisco for 1 person on March 1st at 12:30 pm?
Not quite. I want it for three people.
So you want a table for 3 to be reserved at Aveline?
Change the timing to 12:15 pm for the 3rd of this month please.
So you want to reserve it on March 3rd at 12:15 pm. Did I get that right?
Absolutely. Find out if you can get liquor and if they have live music.
I have reserved it successfully. They have alcohol but no live music.
Thanks a lot. That will be all.
I wish you a nice day.
Can you find me the weather in Novato for March 13th?
The weather for Novato for the day should be an average temperature of 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Okay.
What else can I help you with?
I need to find a restaurant. How about some Pasta?
The Aurora Ristorante Italiano in Novato is a nice restaurant.
Is it a reasonably priced restaurant?
It is a moderate priced restaurant.
Any other suggestions?
How about Chianti Cucina in Novato?
I've changed my mind. How about a Sushi Bar? Price is no object.
I found you 2 restaurants. Sushi Tri might be to your liking. It is located in Novato.
Can I get the phone number?
Their number is 415-382-9988.
Great, that works.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, please make me a reservation.
For what time?
Make it for 13:15.
Please confirm that you would like to book a table for 2 at the Sushi Tri restaurant in Novato. Your reservation is for March 1st at 1:15 pm.
Yes, that is correct. Does the restaurant serve alcohol?
No, Sushi Tri does not serve alcohol. Sorry, I wasn't able to complete your reservation. Should I try to make your reservation for 2 for March 1st at 1:30 pm instead?
Yes, you can try that.
Your reservation is complete.
Thank you very much.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all. Thank you.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
I still haven't figured out what to do for my date coming up. Can you check the weather for me?
Sure, what city?
We'll most likely go to Discovery Bay.
Looks like the average is 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Ok, that's perfect. I need to make a dinner reservation somewhere around there that serves alcohol. Can you see if there are any reasonably priced places with Southern food?
Looks like there's 1 restaurant in Discovery Bay that fits what you want. How about Boardwalk Grill?
Oh, I've heard that one's pretty good. Yeah, let's go ahead and make a reservation.
Sure, what time?
Can you make it for evening 6:30 on the 2nd of this month?
No problem. To confirm, you want to make a reservation for 2 at Boardwalk Grill in Discovery Bay at 6:30 pm on March 2nd. Is that right?
Yep, that's perfect.
Ok, I've made your reservation.
Great, thank you.
Anything else I can do?
No, that's all for now. Thanks.
Sure, have a good day.
Can you check the weather for me on March 13th?
Where would you like the weather for?
I want the weather for Pinole.
The forecast is for an average temperature of 84 degrees Fahrenheit with a 18 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind like?
Average wind speed is 9 miles per hour.
What about the humidity?
Humidity is expected to be 29 percent.
Alright, I'd like to find a restaurant there.
What type of food are you interested in?
I think I'd like to have some Dumplings.
I found 3 restaurants you might like. How about China Delights? It is located in Pinole.
What's their phone number?
You can contact them at 510-964-1882.
Where are they located at? Is there any live music there?
Their address is 1501 Tara Hills Drive. There is no live music there.
Do you have any other suggestions?
Sure, how about China House Restaurant? It is also in Pinole.
Okay, that sounds good.
Should I get you a table there?
Yeah I'd like to reserve a table.
What time should I make the reservation for?
I'd like it at evening 5:30.
So you would like a reservation for 2 people at China House Restaurant in Pinole for 5:30 pm on March 1st, is that correct?
Yes, that will work. What is their phone number? What's the general cost for a meal there?
Sorry, I wasn't able to make a reservation for that time. Can I do anything else for you?
I'd like to try making a reservation again. Try 1 o"clock in the afternoon.
So you would like a reservation for 2 people at China House Restaurant in Pinole for 1 pm on March 1st, is that correct?
Yeah, let's try that.
I was able to make your reservation successfully.
Okay, great! Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No that's all, thanks.
Alright, have a nice day!
I need to find out the weather in Napa.
The average temperature in Napa today should be 85 degrees F and there is a 24 % chance of rain.
Sure, that sounds right. I'd also like to find a restaurant there in the expensive price range.
What type of food were you looking for?
American food would be perfect for me.
I found 4 restaurants for you. One nice restaurant in Napa is Brix Restaurant And Gardens.
Yes, that sounds good to me. I'd like to make a reservation for 2 people this Saturday.
For what time did you want to make the reservation?
I'd like to make it at quarter to 7 in the evening.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Brix Restaurant and Gardens in Napa on March 2nd at 6:45 pm.
That sounds good. What is the address and does the restaurant have live music?
The address is 7377 Saint Helena Highway and they do not have live music. Sorry, I could not make a reservation. Should I try another reservation for 2 people at Brix Restaurant and Gardens on March 2nd at 7 pm?
No, thank you.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thank you.
Have a nice day.
I want the weather in Lafayette on March 4th
The temperature is 91 degrees and there is a 15 percent chance of rain
I want a restaurant there too
what kind of food do you want?
pasta will work good
There are 3 restaurants and at the Locanda Positano and it's in Lafayette
Is there liquor and live music?
They give alcohol and there is no live music.
Yes that works and for one person and I want it on the 10th of this month.
when is the reservation?
It is at 7 o"clock in the evening
Confirm Locanda Positano and in Lafayette and it is at 7 pm for 1 person and it is March 10th
Yes that is good
The reservation was successful
Thank you very much
Can I assist with any other matter?
No thank you kindly
Have a great one
What is the weather like in Santa Rosa on the March 10th?
The temperature is 77 degrees Fahrenheit with 18 percent chance of rain.
How humid would it be?
Around 37 percent.
And how windy?
About 9 miles per hour.
I want to eat at a restaurant that serves a good burger.
There are 9 available. Would you like to try Belly left coast kitchen & taproom in Santa Rosa? It is a nice restaurant.
That would be great. Kindly make me a reservation.
For what time?
For 1:30 pm on the 10th of March 2019
You want a table for 2 at Belly Left coast kitchen & taproom in Santa Rosa on March 10th at 1:30 pm?
Yes, that would be great.
I have made the reservation.
Thanks a lot. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
What is the weather in Menlo Park on March 9th?
There is a 15 percent chance of precipitation with at temperature of 87 degrees.
Give me the weather in Antioch on the 1st of this month.
There is only a 2 percent chance of precipitation and the temperature is 91 degrees.
What is the humidity?
Humidity will over near 17 percent.
How gusty will it be?
The wind will be blowing at 5 miles per hour.
I see. Find me a spot to eat at there.
Do you have a food type preference?
I want some afforadable Lobster.
Search revealed 2 places. Okawa Japanese Restaurant is in Antioch.
Do they offer live entertainment?
They do not offer live entertainment.
What is their location?
They are located at 2327 Buchanan Road.
That is perfect.
Shall I book you a reservation?
Yes, book me a table.
What time do you want to eat?
I want to eat at afternoon 1:15.
You want a table for 2 at Okawa Japanese Restaurant in Antioch at 1:15 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
That is correct. What is their phone number and do they have alcohol?
They do have alcohol and you can contact them at 925-778-1585. I could not book your reservation. Would you like to book at table for 2 at Okawa Japanese Restaurant for 1:30 pm on March 1st?
Yes, that is great.
Your table is reserved.
Thanks a lot. That is all.
Have a great day.
what's the weather gonna be like in campbell on the March 6th?
the weather that day should be 75 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
okay, can you find me a restaurant there?
do you want a specific cuisine like mexican or indian?
some pasta sounds good.
there's 5 places i found that could work. how about A bellagio italian restaurant in campbell?
is there anything else? i need something affordable.
there's 4 places that'll fit your criteria. how about buca di beppo italian restaurant in campbell?
do you have any other suggestions?
how about dicicco's ristorante italiano autentico in campbell?
that'll work, can you book it for me?
for what time?
can you make it for 4:30 pm on the 10th of this month?
you want a reservation for 2 at dicicco's ristorante italiano autentico in campbell for 4:30 pm on march 10th
yes please, do they have live music? what's their number?
sorry i couldn't book that table. is there anything else i can do?
no, thanks anyway.
have a great day.
Can you check the weather in Walnut Creek on March 7th?
It's going to be 72 degrees Fahrenheit with 19 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy it's going to be?
There's a 31 percent of humidity and wind speed should be 12 miles per hour.
Thanks, please help me find a restaurant there.
What kind of food?
I like Izakaya food.
I got 2 restaurants and Ikoi is one located in Walnut Creek.
How pricey is there and do they have liquor?
Yes they have and price range is moderate.
Is there any other option?
Sasa in Walnut Creek.
Yes, I want to make a reservation there.
What time?
At 12:15.
Okay, you want a reservation for 2 at Sasa in Walnut Creek on March 1st at 12:15 pm. Please confirm.
That's fine.
Sorry, I fail to make the reservation but Sasa is nice. Do you want me to try making the reservation for 2 on March 1st at 12 pm?
No, thanks.
Enjoy your day.
What is the weather in Alameda.
The avergare high is 73 degrees Fahreheit. The is a slight chance of rain about 8 percent.
Awesome I want to eat there.
What type of food would you like? Maybe Italian, Chinese or something else.
Lithuanian would be great.
I have 1 option Mama Papa Lithuania Restaurant located in Alameda is really nice.
Where is it Located? Are they expensive?
They are located at 1241 Park Street. They are priced moderate.
That is perfect. I want a table for at 17:15 next Wednesday.
Just to confirm you would like a table for 2 people at Mama Papa Lithuania Restaurant on March 6th at 5:15 pm located in Alameda.
Yes that is great.
Your table is booked.
Do they serve beer. IS there a band playing that day?
They serve alcohol. They do have live music.
Thanks that will be all.
Have a great day.
What is the weather in Fairfield on the March 13th.
The average temp is 74 degrees and there is 0 percent chance of precipitation.
Okay what about Larkspur on March 11th?
The average temp is 89 degrees and the chance of precipitation is 26 percent.
Okay please find me a Brasserie restaurant which is not very costly please.
Left Bank Larkspur Brasserie in Larkspur.
That works for me thanks.
Would you like to book a table?
Yes please reserve a table.
At what time?
At 12:45 please.
Okay you need a table at Left Bank Larkspur Brasserie in Larkspur at 12:45 pm 2 on March 1st, correct?
Yes perfect, thanks. Do they have liquor?
They do not. Your table is booked.
Thank you for your help.
Can I do anything else for you?
No that's all.
Have a great day!
Whats it going to be like outside on March 8th?
Well, it depends where?
How about in Kenwood?
73 degrees on average. Chance or rain is 14 percent.
Any good places to chow down around there?
What are you in the mood for?
Maybe a Lobster.
Then try Salt and Stone Restaurant in Kenwood.
That sounds tasty.
Shall I reserve you a table?
Yes, please do.
For what time?
11:45 should be good.
A table for 2 at Salt and Stone Restaurant in Kenwood on March 1st at 11:45 am?
Yeah, that's right. Will this put a dent in my wallet?
Salt and Stone Restaurant is indeed expensive. But I couldn't get you a table. Should I try 12 pm on March 1st for 2 people?
Yes. Try that.
Done. Bon Appetit.
Thank you. I am all set.
Great. Good day.
What is the weather status in Redwood city?
It is averaging the temperature of 87 degrees Fahrenheit for the day with a 20 percent probability of raining.
All good. Find a nice restaurant in that place.
What cuisine do you like?
I want some Light meal food.
Stacks - Redwood city is a good Redwood City based restaurant.
Get me their phone number and look if they serve liquor.
They don't have alcohol and you can ring them at 650-482-2850.
Cool. That is taken care of.
Shall I book you a table in that place?
Sure. I want you to book it on the 9th for 1 person.
What time should I reserve it for?
I am going there at quarter past 6 in the evening.
So you want me to book you a table at the Stacks - Redwood City restaurant located in Redwood City for 1 person on March 9th at 6:15 pm?
Yeah that is right.
I was unfortunately not able to make that reservation. Can I suggest you making the reservation at Stacks - Redwood City on March 9th at 6 pm instead? It will be for 1 person.
Yeah that will also do.
I have your reservation made.
By the way, do they do live music and is it a low-cost priced place?
No, there won't be any live music, I'm afraid. It is of moderate price range.
Thanks a lot. That will be all.
I wish you a nice day ahead.
Can you tell me how the weather is in San Ramon on March 5th?
There will be a 24 percent chance of rain that day. It looks like the temperature will be 71 degrees Fahrenheit.
Alright, got it.
Do you need something else?
I would love to find a restaurant in that area.
What is the type of food you like?
Vegetarian food would be just lovely.
I was able to find 1 restaurant that is quite pleasant. It is in San Ramon and is named Favorite Indian Restaurant.
Right, I like how that sounds so go aheand and make a reservation for me.
At what time would you like to make the reservation?
I think 6:15 pm would work well.
Please approve the upcoming specifics: Reserving a table for 2 people at Favorite Indian Restaurant in San Ramon. THe time will be at 6:15 pm on March 1st.
Okay, that is fine with me. Is the cost associated lavish?
The cost of meals is moderate. Unfortunately, I wasn't able to make the reservation. Favorite Indian Restaurant is such a lovely restaurant would you like me to see if I an make a reservation on March 1st at 6 pm for 2 people?
Please, that would be great.
I have succesfully reserved a table.
Thanks so very much! That takes care of my needs.
Please have a fantastic day.
Check the weather on March 5th at Muir Beach.
The temp will be 76 with an 18 percent chance of rain.
How about Walnut Creek on the March 13th?
It will be 82 with a 14 percent chance of rain.
How about wind speed?
It will be 12 miles per hour.
I also need a place to eat dumplings.
I found 2. In Walnut Creek, I have China Palace Restaurant.
Do they have liquor?
They do not have liquor.
That is still ok for me.
Is there anything else?
I want to book for the 14th for 3.
What time would you like?
Book for quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
Confirm, in Walnut Creek, China Palace Restaurant at 12:45 pm for 3 on March 14th.
That is good. What is price range and contact?
You are confirmed. Phone is 925-935-3233 and they are inexpensive.
Thanks for the help.
Is there anything else?
That is all today.
Have a great day.
i want to check the weather in healdsburg on March 7th.
the weather that day should be 73 degrees with a 9 percent chance of rain.
okay, cool. can you find me a barbecue restaurant there?
there's a nice place in healdsburg called bear republic brewing co.
that'll work. can you reserve a table for 3 at 1:30 in the afternoon?
you want a table for 3 on march 1st at 1:30 pm at the bear republic brewing co in healdsburg?
actually, can you make it for a quarter past 1 in the afternoon on the 10th?
okay, so for 1:15 pm on march 10th?
yes, perfect.
it's been booked.
what's their address?
it's over on 345 healdsburg avenue.
do they have live music?
no they don't, sorry.
thanks anyway.
is there anything else?
no that's it thanks.
have a good day.
I'm going to be at St. Helena soon. How's the weather there?
It's expected to be at an average of 82 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 22 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. That's reasonable. I'd like to find somewhere to eat there, preferably a place that serves California food and alcohol.
A St. Helena eatery that fits your needs would be Acacia House by Chris Cosentino.
Okay. That works for me.
Want to book a table there?
Yes. I want to book a table for three at evening 5:30 on Wednesday next week.
Sure thing. I'll book a table for 3 at Acacia House by Chris Cosentino in St. Helena at 5:30 pm on March 6th. Is that good with you?
Yes, that works just fine.
I have booked the table.
What's their phone number?
Their phone number is 707-963-9004.
Thanks for that. I don't need anything else from you.
Have a great day!
Could you check the weather forecast for me?
Which city will I check?
In Concord please.
There is a 16 % chance of rain and the ave temp will be 71 degrees fahrenheit.
right fine. Could you also help me source a restaurant there?
What type of food do you prefer?
Pasta would be great.
There are 3 restaurants that may suit. Pasta Primavera Cafe is good and is in Concord.
What other options have you?
Skipolini's Pizza has good reviews and is in Concord.
Are they pricey and do you have a phone number for them?
Pricing is moderate and you can contact them on 925-680-6888.
Yes that suits me fine.
Can I assist you with more?
I would like to book a table at that restaurant for one person at six pm.
To confirm then that is a booking for 1 at Skipolini's Pizza at 6 pm on March 1st in Concord city.
No I want to change that to 5th of March at 12:15 pm.
To confirm then that is the March 5th at 12:15 pm.
Yes that suits me fine.
Unfortunately I could not book that table, Skipolini's Pizza is a good restaurant so should I try to book for 1 on March 5th at 12 pm instead?
no that is ok.
Do you need any other assistance?
No thanks for your help.
Have a lovely day.
I want to know weather on March 5th
In which city you want
In Los Altos on March 1st
The average temperature for the day is 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 6 percent chance to rain
How windy and humid will it be?
Humidy around 19 percent and average wind speed should be 3 miles per hour
Cool find restaurant there
What kind of food you want like Italian or Chinese like that
Sushi kind I want
There are 4 restaurant in that akane Japanese restaurant is a good restaurant in Los Altos
Great make a reservation there
For what time is the reservation
Make it 13:30
Please confirm it : booking table at akane Japanese restaurant in Los Altos for 2 people on March 1st at 1:30 pm
Great. What's their contact information
Your booking is confirmed. Their phone number is 650-941-8150
Thanks a lot for this
Is there any other help from my side do you need
No thanks a lot for the help
Have a great day
Please help me check the weather in Clayton.
The expected average temperature is 70 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 1 percent chance of rain.
All right, cool. Please help me find a fancy restaurant there.
What type of cuisine did you have in mind?
Please find a Steakhouse restaurant.
There's a nice restaurant in Clayton known as Moresi's Chophouse.
Please find their address and see whether they have live music.
They are located at 6115 Main Street, and they don't have live music.
Okay, that is fine with me.
Should I go ahead and reserve a table here?
Yes, please go ahead and book a table.
For what time should I make the reservation?
Please book it for afternoon 12:15.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to reserve a table for 2 at Moresi's Chophouse in Clayton, for 12:15 pm on March 1st.
That is correct.
Unfortunately, I was unable to make your preferred reservation at the nice Moresi's Chophouse restaurant. There's an open table for 2 on March 1st at 12 pm. Shall I try that?
Yes, that's fine with me.
I have successfully made your reservation.
Thanks a lot.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Thank you, and do have yourself a wonderful day!
I need to find out the weather for March 1st.
Which city did you want to find out the weather for?
I need to know the weather in Olema, California.
The average temperature in Olema that day should be 91 degrees F with a 21 % chance of rain.
How windy is it expected to be and what will the humidity be like?
The average wind speed is looking like 3 mph and the humidity should be around 25 %.
Sure, sounds about right. I'd also like to find a restaurant there that serves alcohol.
What type of food were you looking for? You can say Chinese, Mexican, or anything else.
Gastropub food sounds perfect.
I found a nice restaurant in Olema, California called Sir and Star At The Olema.
Yes, that sounds good. I'd like to make a reservation at that restaurant.
What time did you want to make the booking for?
I'd like to book it for next Wednesday at evening 7:30.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Sir and Star At The Olema in Olema, California on March 6th at 7:30 pm.
Yes, that sounds good to me.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thanks a lot.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thank you.
Have a nice day.
I need to find out the weather in Daly City on March 7th.
The average temp in Daly City that day should be 75 degrees F with a 26 % chance of rain.
Sure, sounds right.
Did you need help with anything else?
I'd also like to find a restaurant there.
What type of food did you have in mind?
Noodles would be perfect.
I found 2 restaurants for you. One nice restaurant is Jade Dragon Restaurant in Daly City.
Did you have any other suggestions?
I also found a nice restaurant Koi Palace in Daly City.
Yes, that sounds good to me.
Did you want to reserve a table there?
Yes, I'd like to make a reservation for 2 on March 10th at one pm.
Please confirm you're booking a table for 2 at Koi Palace in Daly City on March 10th at 1 pm.
Yes, that sounds good. Where is the place located?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The address is 365 Gellert Boulevard.
Thanks a lot.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thank you again.
Have a nice day.
I would like to check out the weather in Pleasant Hill on March 5th.
The average temperature for the day should be about 74 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 3 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
There should be an average wind speed of about 12 miles per hour.
How humid will it be?
The humidity should be around 18 percent.
Okay. I would like to find a restaurant there.
What sort of food are you in the mood for? You can say something like Chinese, Mexican or anything else.
Barbecue food would be fantastic.
I have 2 restaurants. Back Forty Texas Bbq is a good restaurant in Pleasant Hill.
That works for me.
Do you want to make a reservation here?
Yes, please.
What time do you need the reservation?
It needs to be at 6:45 pm.
Okay, so you want to book a table at Back Forty Texas Bbq in Pleasant Hill. This reservation will be for 2 people at 6:45 pm on March 1st. Is this correct?
Yes, that works. Could you tell me the address?
I have successfully made your reservation. The address is 100 Coggins Drive.
Tell me their contact number.
The contact number is 925-935-1440.
Thanks so much. That's all I needed.
Have a great day.
Will you be nice and check the weather in Burlingame for me on March 11th please?
It tells me that the average temperature on that day is 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent possibility of raining.
What is the humidity of the region and also what is the wind situation there?
Wind would average on 1 mile an hour speed. 34 percent is the approximate humidity.
Fine. Search for a restaurant there. I love Malaysian cuisine and I can afford intermediate priced food.
Burlingame has a nice place called Coconut Bay Thai Restaurant.
Is there any other restaurant you can find me?
How about the Narin Thai Cuisine in Burlingame?
That will be perfect.
Shall I reserve a table slot for you?
Sure, go right ahead with the reservation.
Tell me the time of reservation.
It should be at quarter past 11 in the morning.
So I should book a table for 2 at Narin Thai Cuisine in Burlingame. You want it at 11:15 am on March 1st?
Yep. Give me their phone digits as well.
I am so sorry I couldn't reserve it. Is there anything else I can do?
Try booking it again and this time let me do it for quarter to 1 in the afternoon.
So you want me to book a table for 2 at Narin Thai Cuisine in Burlingame on March 1st for 12:45 pm?
That is all correct.
I am sorry I couldn't get you the reservation. Can I try booking for 2 people in Narin Thai Cuisine on March 1st at 1 pm instead?
That will also work for me.
I have made your reservation.
Tell me their address.
It is located on 231 Park Road.
Thanks a lot!
Shall I do anything else for you?
Nope, that is fine. Thanks.
I wish you a nice day.
What's the weather like in Union City on March 10th?
86 degrees with a 9 % chance of rain
Thanks, I'd like to find a filipino restaurant.
There's 1 restaurant called Gerry's Grill in Union City
Perfect, please make me a reservation.
What time?
Half past 12 in the afternoon
Please confirm: a table for 2 at Gerry's Grill in Union City for 12:30 pm on march 1st
Perfect.
Reservation is complete.
Where are they located and do they play live music?
Yes, there's live music and the address is 31005 Courthouse Drive.
Perfect, thanks.
Would you like anything else?
No, thanks so much.
Enjoy your day.
Please check the weather on 11th of March.
Which city?
Saratoga please.
It's going to be 89 degrees Fahrenheit with 24 percent chance of rain.
Okay, please find me a restaurant there that serves alcohol.
Do you prefer Indian, American or anything else? What kind of food?
I like Italian kind of foods.
I got 1 restaurant in Saratoga and it's Sole Mio Ristorante Italiano.
Do they cater live music there?
No, they don't.
What is the address?
It's 14441 Big Basin Way.
That's good.
Will I reserve you table there?
Yes please.
What time do you like?
At 12 in the afternoon.
Okay, you want a table for 2 people in Sole Mio Ristorante Italiano in Saratoga on March 1st at 12 pm. Please confirm.
Yes, that's perfect!
Reservation done.
Thanks for all your help.
You are welcome.
I almost forgot I have this trip coming up. Can you check the weather for me in Burlingame on 5th of this month?
Sure. Looks like the average will be 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Ok, and what's the humidity like?
It'll be around 17 percent.
How about the windiness?
Looks like it'll be about 4 miles per hour on average.
Ok, cool. Can you also help me book a restaurant there?
Sure, what kind of food do you prefer?
I'm in the mood for some Asian Fusion.
I found 4 Asian fusion places in Burlingame. How about Barracuda Japanese Restaurant?
Maybe - what else did you find?
There's also a Benihana in Burlingame.
Do they have live music there, and is it fancy?
No live music unfortunately. They're also a bit expensive.
Ah, that's fine. I'll go ahead and make a reservation for 12:30 pm on the 10th of March.
Ok, to confirm, you'd like to make a reservation for 2 people at Benihana in Burlingame on March 10th at 12:30 pm. Is that right?
No, actually, change it to dinner at 6:15 pm.
Ok, to confirm, you want to make a reservation at 6:15 pm for 2 people. Is that right?
No, actually, I'll probably have another friend joining Can you make it for three people?
Ok. To confirm, you want to book a reservation at Benihana for 3 people. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Ok, your reservation went through.
Cool, thanks. That's all for now.
Ok, have a good day.
Please check the weather in Danville on March 1st We have a company meeting there.
There's 24 percent chance of rain on that day. The average temperature is 83 degrees.
Okay, thanks!
Do you need help with anything else?
Yes, can you help me look for a restaurant there that offers spicy noodles?
There's a famous restaurant there that offers spicy noodles, it is called Lotus Thai Restaurant at Danville.
Is it cheap? And do they have live music?
No, they do not have live music. And the price range is moderate.
Okay, that's still good. Please make a reservation for 2 persons at 11:30 in the morning.
Please do confirm the following details, reservation at Lotus Thai Restaurant in Danville for 2 persons on March 1st. Reservation is at 11:30 am.
Yes, everything is fine. Do they have alcoholic drinks?
Booking is confirmed but they do not have serve alcoholic drinks.
Okay. DO you have their contact number and exact address?
Their phone number is 925-743-8424 and the exact address is 115 Hartz Avenue.
Okay, thanks for your help!
Do you need help with anything else?
No,that would be all. Thank you!
You're welcome.Have a wonderful day.
Tell me what the weather will be on the March 11th in Belmont.
It will be 71 degrees with a 21 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity and the wind speed?
The humidity is 7 percent with the wind at 8 miles per hour.
I see. Find me a restaurant to eat at near there.
Do you prefer Mexican, Chinese, or some other type of food?
I am looking for some Parisian food.
Search found 1 restaurant. It is the Iron Gate Restaurant in Belmont.
That is great.
Do you want to make a reservation now?
Yes, book me a table.
What time do you want to eat?
Book a table for 2 at 1 in the afternoon.
You want a booking for 2 people at the Iron Gate Restaurant in Belmont for 1 pm on March 1st. Is that right?
That is perfect.
Your booking is complete.
Thanks a lot. That is everything.
Have a great day.
I'd like to check the weather please.
Where should I check the weather at?
I'd like to know the weather in Cloverdale on March 11th.
The average temperature will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 1 percent chance of rain.
That's great. I'd like to find a restaurant there.
What kind of food do you want?
Cafe food would be great.
I have found 1 restaurant. Papa's Pizza Cafe is a great place in Cloverdale.
Do they play live music?
No, they do not play live music.
Is it a budget restaurant?
Their price range is moderate.
That'll be fine.
Would you like to get a table?
Yes, please make the reservation.
What time do you want it at?
I'd like it at 1:45 pm.
Please confirm the following: You want a table for 2 people at Papa's Pizza Cafe in Cloverdale on March 1st at 1:45 pm.
Yes, that'll be fine. What's their number and address?
Their address is 105 North Cloverdale Boulevard and their number is 707-894-4453. I was unable to reserve that table. Papa's Pizza Cafe is a great place. Shall I try to reserve a table for 2 people on March 1st at 1:30 pm?
Yes, that'll be fine.
The table is booked.
Thanks so much!
Is there anything else?
Nope, thanks again!
Have a great day!
Can you check the weather in El Sobrante on March 13th?
The temperature will reach 82 and there is a 15 perent chance for rain.
What will the wind speeds be?
The wind speeds will be 8 miles per hour.
How about the humidity?
That is expected to be 19 percent.
What will the weather be like in Portola Valley on this Saturday?
The temperatue will be 86 degrees with a 13 percent chance for rain.
Okay can you find me a economical priced pizza spot there please?
How about Parkside Grille in Portola Valley?
Yes that fine, can you make the reservation please.
What time did you want me to schedule your reservation?
Make my reservation for 11:15 in the morning.
Okay that is reservations for 2 at Parkside Grille in Portola Valley on March 1st at 11:15 am?
No it would just be reservations for 1 and make the time 11:45 in the morning please.
Okay that is going to be reservations for 1 at 11:45 am?
Yes that is correct. Do they play live music and can I have the address.
The address for Parkside Grille is 884 Portola Road A1. They only have a table for 1 available on March 1st for 12 pm, would that be okay?
Yes that will work just fine.
Great, your reservation is complete.
Thank you so much
Do you need anything else?
No, that will be all thank you.
You are welcome.
What weather will be in San Lorenzo on March 8th?
Average temperature: 90 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 25 percent
Will it be a windy and humid day?
Average wind speed: 11 miles per hour. Expected humidity: around 22 percent
Ok, thanks. And on March 7th?
Average temperature: 86 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 24 percent
Perfect! I want a restaurant there
Do you prefer Italian, American or other kind of food?
I prefer some Punjabi kind of food
There is 1 restaurant in San Lorenzo: Flavor Of India North & South Cuisine
Is it an expensive restaurant?
No, its price range is inexpensive
Perfect! Are there liquors in the restaurant? What is the phone number?
No, there aren't liquors, they don't serve alcohol. The number is 510-500-9677
Ok, It's fine for me!
Do you want to book a table?
Yes, please. I need a table for 2 people at 6 in the evening
A table for 2 people at Flavor Of India North & South Cuisine in San Lorenzo, on March 1st at 6 pm. Is it correct?
Yes it is. Is there live music?
No there isn't live music. Your table is booked
Where is the restaurant located?
At 15930 Hesperian Boulevard
Thanks for helping!
Do you need anything else?
No, It's all
Have a great day
What's the weather forecast for Livermore on March 12th.
The forecast for Livermore calls for an average temperature of 83 degrees iwth a 29 percent chance of rain.
What about Benicia on March 10th.
The forecast for Benicia calls for an average temperature of 79 degrees with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Where can I go eat there? Maybe some place reasonably priced with coffee & light bites.
How about the First St. Cafe in Benicia?
Cool. Do they have live music.
The First St. Cafe does have live music.
Do they serve drinks as well? Where are they located?
The First St Cafe serves some alcoholic beverages. It is locates at 440 1st Street.
Ok. Any place else?
How about Nine Zero Seven in Benicia?
Any place else?
How about The Rellik Tavern in Benicia?
That sounds interesting. Make a reservation there for two at 13:45 on March 9th.
You want a table for 2 at The Rellik Tavern in Benicia for 1:45 PM on March 9th. Is that correct?
That is correct.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Great! Thanks for the help.
Let me know if you need anything further.
What's the weather looking like for March 2nd?
What city are you interested in?
Search in Burlingame, please.
The forecast calls for an average temperature of 84 degrees Fahrenheit with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Okay, that sounds good. Can you help me find a restaurant nearby? I would like something economical, preferably American food.
How about 37 North? That's a nice restaurant in Burlingame.
Yes, that will be fine. Please make a reservation there for 1 person at 6:15 pm.
Please confirm your request: You are booking a table for 1 at 37 North in Burlingame. Your reservation will be for March 1st at 6:15 pm.
Yes, that's right.
Sorry, I was not able to make your reservation at 37 North on March 1st. Would you like to try for a table for 1 at 6 pm instead?
Yes, please do that.
Your reservation has been made successfully.
Thanks, that was all for now.
Have a great day.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Montara on March 7th please?
Sure. the average temperature on that day is 88 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
May I know how humid will it be on that day?
It is expected to be 15 percent humid.
Sure, could you help me search for an expensive priced restaurant which serves fish?
Sure, there is 1 restaurant located in Montara called La Costanera.
May I have their contact number please?
Sure, you can contact them at 650-728-1600.
Thank you, that is fine with me.
Do you require further assistance?
Could you also help make a reservation please?
Sure, what time would you like to dine in?
4:30 pm is perfect for me.
Please confirm your reservation fro 2 people at La Costanera in Montara at 4:30 pm on March 1st.
Sure, I am fine with that.
Sorry, I am unable to make your reservation, could I further assist you with something else?
Could you make the booking again for one in the afternoon please?
Please confirm your reservation fro 2 people at La Costanera in Montara at 1 pm on March 1st.
Sure, this is fine with me. May I know if they have live music on venue?
Sorry, they do not have live music played. Your reservation has been made!
Sure, that is all the help I need.
No worries, enjoy your meal!
Whats the weather like in Rutherford on the March 10th?
Average temperature should be 79 degrees. There's a 23 percent chance of rainfall.
What about humidy and wind?
You are looking at an average wind speed of 10 miles per hour. Humidity> Around 39 percent.
Any restaurants around there where I can unwind with a drink?
You got a craving for any particular cuisine.
Burgers might hit the spot.
I see 1. Try Rutherford Grill in Rutherford.
Can you grab me a table.
For what time?
5 pm for 1.
Table for 1 at Rutherford Grill in Rutherford at 5 pm on MArch 1st?
Yes. Will this kill my wallet. Where are they exactly?
You have a table at 1180 Rutherford Road. Its in the moderate range, price-wise.
Excellent. I'm all set.
Take care then.
What's the weather gonna be like March 7th?
What city are you talking about?
Sunnyvale
The temperature will be around 94 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 25 percent it will rain.
I'd like a restaurant there.
What type of food do you like?
I want take-out food.
I found 2 restaurants for you. Bombay To Goa is in Sunnyvale.
Do they sell alcohol? Where is it?
They don't sell alcohol. Their address is 151 East El Camino Real.
Okay. I'd like a reservation.
What time would you like the reservation?
A half past 6 in the evening.
A table for 2 at Bombay To Goa in Sunnyvale at 6:30 pm on March 1st. Is this what you want?
That's it. Do they have a fancy price range?
Your reservation has been made. They have a moderate price range.
Is there live music? What's their number?
There's no live music. Their number is 408-245-9999.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else.
No, that's all.
Have a nice day.
Hey, can you tell me the weather on March 1st in Valley Ford?
Sure, it'll be around 72 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Okay thanks. How about in Pinole on March 11th?
It'll be around 89 degrees with a 17 percent chance of rain.
Nice, thanks. Can you find a song for me?
Of course. How about Mahzouz by Tamer Ashor from the album Khayali?
What genre is it?
It's a pop song.
Is there anything else?
How about What I need by the album Expectations from Hayley Kiyoko?
Is there anything else? I like All That Remains. Anything from the Madness album?
I found 1 good song. How about The Thunder Rolls from the Madness album by All That Remains?
What genre is it?
It's a rock song.
Nice, sounds perfect.
Should I play it now?
Sure, cast it to my bedroom speaker.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like to play The Thunder Rolls on bedroom speaker.
No, play it on the display.
Okay, I'll play The Thunder Rolls on the TV.
That's perfect, thanks.
The song is playing now.
Thanks a lot, that's all.
No worries, bye.
I'll be going on a short trip to Napa next Tuesday. Can you check what the weather will be like?
Sure, it looks like it'll be an average of 79 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Great, how about the humidity?
It will be around 15 percent.
Ok, can you also check Olema, California on the 12th of March while you're at it?
Sure, it looks like it'll be an average of 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
Ok, and how humid and windy will it be?
It looks like the humidity will be around 19 percent with an average wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
Cool, thanks. I'm in the mood for some music now. Can you put on a song?
Sure, I found a playlist with 10 songs you might like. How about Dem Beats by Todrick Hall from the album Forbidden?
Nah, not feeling it right now. What else is there?
There's also Strangers by Sigrid from the album Sucker Punch.
What else can you find? I'm in the mood for some Country, like Sugarland maybe.
Ok, how about Babe by Sugarland from the album Bigger?
Oh yeah, that would be great. Can you put it on?
Sure. I'll play Babe on the TV, is that ok?
No, put it on the bedroom speaker.
Ok. To confirm, you want to play Babe on the bedroom speaker. Is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Ok, it's playing now.
Cool, thank you.
Sure, anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks.
No problem. Have a good day.
Could you tell me the weather conditions please?
In what city please?
In Windsor please.
It will be around 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent possibility of showers.
Thank you. Help me find a song please?
I found 10 songs for you. How about listening to Let It Be by Hayley Kiyoko from the Expectations album?
Do you have any Lady Gaga songs?
Sure, there are 8 songs to choose from. Maybe you'd like to hear the Lady Gaga song Always Remember Us This Way from the A Star Is Born Soundtrack?
From what genre?
From the genre Soundtracks.
That will work.
Shall I play that now?
Okay, thank you.
Confirming playback on TV of Always Remember Us This Way.
Perfect, thank you.
The song is playing.
Great, thanks again.
Do you need anything else right now?
No, not right now.
Thank you very much.
What is the weather like in inverness?
It should be 90 degrees fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Great. I would like to listen to some music.
Would you like to hear Paris by sabrina carpenter from the album singular act I?
That would be great.
Would you need anything else?
Just to hear the song.
You want to hear Paris on the tv?
Yes, that's right.
The song has started.
What genre is it?
It is a pop song.
Thanks. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
I need to see what the weather is like in El Cerrito on the March 11th.
It'll have an average temperature of 87 degrees, with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. I now want to listen to some metal music, preferably by Five Finger Death Punch.
I found 2 songs by Five Finger Death Punch you might like. How about I Apologize from the album Got Your Six?
That sounds great! Go ahead and play it on my display.
So, I should play I Apologize on your TV?
Actually, I'd rather you play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
I should instead play I Apologize through your bedroom speaker?
That is correct.
I have started playing the song.
Thanks! That's all I need from you.
Have a great day!
What is the weather in Fairfax on the 12th?
The average temperature is 94 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity and the wind predicted to be?
The humidity is expected to be 41 percent and the wind should be around 7 MPH.
Cool, can you find me some music?
I found 10 songs including Big Bad Wolf by In This Moment from the CD Black Widow.
What is the genre?
Metalcore.
Cool, play it on the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm, playing Big Bad Wolf on kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
Plays song.
Thanks!
Anything else?
No, thanks!
Have a nice day.
Check weather for March 13th.
What city do you want?
The city is Los Gatos.
It will be 91 degrees with a 28 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be 37 %.
How about the wind?
The average speed of the wind will be 1 mile per hour.
How about some song?
I found 10 songs. How about Darkside by Alan Walker in Different World?
How about Sing to Me Instead?
I have Bad Habit from Sing to Me Instead by Ben Platt.
I like Ben Platt and pop song. Do you have more?
By Ben Platt, I have Ease My Mind from Sing to Me Instead.
I want to hear it.
Do you want to play now?
Cast it to television.
Confirm on TV to play Ease My Mind.
No play it on Bedroom Speaker.
Confirm Ease my Mind on Bedroom Speaker.
I confirm that all.
The song is playing.
That is all I need.
Have a great day.
I want to know what the weather would be like?
For which city?
For albany.
It would be 92 degrees fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Great. I want to hear pop songs by pitbull from the album climate change.
There is 1 song. Would like to hear options by pitbull from the climate change?
That would be fine.
You want to hear the song now?
Yes. Play it in my kitchen.
You would like to hear options on your kitchen speaker?
Yes, that's right.
The song has started.
Thanks a lot.
Would you need anything else?
No. Thanks very much.
Enjoy your day.
What is the weather in San Francisco like this Saturday?
The temperature for the day will be 72 degrees and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
Could you find me a song from Amr Diab from the album Shoft El Ayam, I like Middle Eastern music.
There is 1 song, Ana Mosh Anani by Amr Diab from the album Shoft El Ayam.
Yes, play the song on device available.
Play Ana Mosh Anani on Tv.
Play it on speaker in the bedroom instead.
Ana Mosh Anani playing on bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
The song is playing.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help with something else?
No, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
What will the weather be on March 1st?
Which city do you want to know about?
I would like to know the weather in Sunol
Average temperature: 92 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 12 percent
Ok, thank you!
Do you need anything else?
Yes, I'd like to listen a Classical song
There are 8 songs. Do you like Cocaine March by Nico Cartosio in album Melting?
Yes, I like it!
Do you want to listen it right now?
Yes, please, play it on bedroom speaker
Play Cocaine March on bedroom speaker. Is it correct?
Yes, It's correct
The song starts playing
Thank you for helping
Have a nice day
Could you tell me the weather?
Where did you want me to check?
Check Chicago please.
Today's weather shows 73 degrees as the average and a 29 percent chance that it will rain.
That's good to know, would you look for some songs for me?
I pulled up these 10 I thought you would enjoy does this one interest you - Pretty Girl Team by Alkaline off the Alkaline Masterpiece album?
I like that song, play it on the kitchen speaker please.
That's Pretty Girl Team to be played over the kitchen speaker, do I have that right?
You certainly do.
I am playing the song now.
Great, you can go now.
Have a most superior day.
Can you help me check the weather for March 1st for Campbell?
Sure. There will be a 4 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 91 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK. Can you find some Electropop songs? I'd like some Halsey.
How about Halsey playing Colors from the album Badlands?
Anything else available?
How about Control by Halsey from the album Badlands?
Anything else available?
How about Gasoline by Halsey from the album Badlands?
This one's awesome.
Do you want me to play it?
Sure, go ahead and cast it to the kitchen speaker.
Can you please confirm that you want me to play Gasoline on the kitchen speaker?
On second thought please play it on my tv.
Can you confirm that you want me to play Gasoline on TV?
Yes, please do.
I've started playing it.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thanks again.
Have a nice day!
Please check the weather on March 7th.
For which city?
Please check San Jose.
The average temperature will be 80 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Please find me some rock songs like the Brunettes Shoot Blondes in the Bittersweet album.
Knock Knock by the Brunettes Shoot Blondes is on the Bittersweet album.
Okay that works.
Should I play the song?
Yes. Please play on any device.
Please confirm you want me to play Knock Knock on the TV.
Yes. Thank you.
The song has started.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. That will be all.
Okay. Please enjoy your day.
I need the weather forecast for the 7th.
What city would you like to check the weather?
Please check Ciudad de Mexico
For that day there is a 6 percent chaning of rain and the average temperature should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit.
What will the humidity be? Will it be windy?
The humidity will be around 24 percent and the average wind speed 5 miles per hour.
Thanks. Can you sind some songs for me?
I found 10 songs. Do you like Stitches by Shawn Mendes on the album Handwritten?
That sounds great. Please play the song.
Please confirm: play Stitches on the TV.
That is correct. What genre is that?
The song is now playing. It's a pop song.
Thanks.
Can I assist you with something else?
No thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Can you check the weather in Paris, France for me?
The average temperature in Paris, France should be 77 degrees Farenheit. There is also a 26 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you find me some songs to listen to?
Sure. I found 10 songs for you. What about Stay by Rihanna? It is from the album Unapologetic.
Anything else? I really like songs by Lorde.
I found 4 songs by Lorde. How about Buzzcut Season from the album Pure Heroine?
Great, can you play this song?
Confirming that you want me to play Buzzcut Season on the TV?
Yes. What type of song is this?
It is an Electropop song. Your song is starting.
Thank you.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
You're welcome. Have a nice day.
I will go to Millbrae soon. Can you check the weather in there on March 6th?
The temperature will be around 88 degrees Fahrenheit with a 8 percent chance of raining.
That seems nice. Could you play me a song?
There are 10 songs for you. Do you want to reproduce The Zombie Song by Stephanie Mabey from the album Wake Up Dreaming?
Sure, that sounds great.
Do you want to reproduce it?
Yes, please play it.
Please confirm: Playing The Zombie Song on the TV.
No, play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Please confirm: Playing The Zombie Song on the bedroom speaker.
That is correct. What is the genre of the song?
Playing song. It is a Pop song.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
I would like to check the weather.
Which city are you interested in?
I would like Berkeley.
The temperature for that day will be 91 F with a 17 percent chance of rain.
What about the March 6th.
The temperature on average will be 84 degrees F with a 7 percent chance of rain.
What about Long Beach on the 13th of March?
The average temperature will be 72 degrees F with a 9 % chance of rain.
Will you find me some songs?
I have 10 songs you might like including Stone Cold by Demi Lovato in the album Confident.
That will be great.
Would you like to play music now?
Yes, I would.
Please confirm the song Stone Cold on TV.
That would be correct. Which genre?
I started playing a Pop song.
Thanks that will be all.
Have a great day.
i want to check the weather in calistoga on the 3rd of this month.
the weather that day should be 76 degrees and there'll be a 6 percent chance of rain.
how humid will it be?
it'll be around 23 percent.
ok, can you find me songs to paly?
what do you think of riverside by agnes obel off the philharmonics album?
what genre is that?
it's folk music.
is there anything else?
there's also thursday by jess glynne off the always in between album.
cool, play that one.
you want to play thursday on the tv?
yeah
the song is playing.
thanks, that's everything.
have a good day.
What will the weather be like in Pleasant Hill on the 9th of March?
The temperature should average 83 degrees and there will be a 26 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks. Could you look up some songs for me? There's a lot of good ones on the album Narrated For You.
I've found 7 results that you might like. How about Boy In The Bubble by Alec Benjamin from the album Narrated For You?
What's the genre of that song?
It's a Pop song.
Okay, that sounds good. Please play the song.
Okay. I just want to make sure. You want me to play Boy In The Bubble on the TV, right?
No. Please play it on the speaker in the bedroom.
Okay, so you want me to play Boy In The Bubble on the bedroom speaker.
Yes, that is right.
I've started the song for you.
Thanks. That will be it.
Have a great day!
I would like to check the weather in Hercules.
The average temperature is projected to be 81 F and there is a 19 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks, Can you find me some songs by Alkaline?
I found 1 song you might like. How about Pretty Girl Team by Alkaline from the album Alkaline Masterpiece?
Sure, that sounds good.
Should I play it now?
Yeah, play it on my display.
You would like to play Pretty Girl Team on the TV, is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Now playing the song.
Thanks, that is all I need for now.
Alright, have a nice day!
Can you tell me what the weather is suppose to be like on Wednesday next week in Hercules?
The average temperature is suppose to be 84 degrees with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Wind speed should be 6 miles an hour.
Okay. Thanks. I'd like to hear some songs now.
I found 10 that you might like. Would you like Without Me on the album Covers by Alec Chambers?
What's another one?
There's Hyang Giri from the album Mahandini by Dewa Budjana.
What kind of song is it?
A Pop song.
What's another one?
There's Open Up from After The Landslide by Matt Simons.
What kind of music is that?
It is also Pop.
Okay. I'd like to play that one.
You would like to hear Open Up on the TV. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your song will start now.
Thanks so much.
Did you need anything else?
No. That'll do it for now.
Have a great day.
What is the weather going to be like on March 6th in Seattle, WA?
The average temperature is forecasted to be 64 Fahrenheit, and there is a 27 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind like?
Average wind speed should be 4 miles per hour.
And the humidity?
Humidity will be around 29 percent.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
I'd like to listen to some pop songs from the album Illuminate.
How about the song Bad Reputation by Shawn Mendes from the album Illuminate?
Sounds good, can you play that now?
You'd like to play Bad Reputation on the TV, is that correct?
Yeah, that's fine.
Now playing the song.
Great, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that's all, thanks.
Alright, enjoy your day!
I wish to check the weather in Nairobi on march 1st.
105 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day and 0 percent chances of rain there.
How about windy?
7 miles per hour is the average wind speed.
Fine. Can you search me some songs?
I have short listed 10 songs of your likings. What is your opinion about Shiroyama in album The Last Stand by Sabaton.
That is fine.
Any other help you need?
I like to run the song.
Please give confirmation details: Run Shiroyama on TV.
Fine. that's correct.
Song started playing.
Thank you so much.
Any other help you want?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a great day.
I like to check the weather on 11th of march.
In which city you want to check the weather?
I want to check in Sunol.
The average day temperature is running at 76 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 2 percent
Okay, fine. Can you search some songs for me?
I searched 10 songs of your liking. What about the song So High in the album Peace of Mind by Rebelution?
That's very nice.
Are you like to play the song now?
Yes, i want to listen.
Please give confirmation details: Run so high on TV
Yes, this is cool.
Song started playing now.
Can you tell me its genre?
The song is a Reggae song.
Thank you so much.
Any help you want from me?
No, thank you so much.
Have a great day.
What's the forecast for the 8th in Sydney?
99 degrees F with a 7 % chance of rain.
Humidity?
21 percent.
Ok. Find some country songs, on the Honky Tonk Time Machine album.
How about Codigo by George Strait off of Honky Tonk Time Machine?
Great, play it.
Please confirm: play Codigo on tv.
Play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm: play Codigo on bedroom speaker.
Yes.
Playing now.
Thanks.
What else can I help you with?
Nothing, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I want to check the weather condition in Daly City on March 12th. Can you help me to check there?
Yes, please note that the average level of Temperature will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a chace of 8 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about wind speed?
It should be around 12 miles per hour in average. Anything else?
Yes, I want to listen some nice songs by Ben Platt. Can you help me to find the one?
Found 4 songs and what about a song Bad Habit by Ben Platt in the album Sing to me Instead?
Search for some other songs.
Another one song Ease my Mind by Ben Platt was found which is also in from the album Sing to me instead. What is your opinion about this song.
Nothing, can you search for some other songs by Battle Beast and in the album No More Hollywood Endings which contains lot of best songs.
Found 1. What about Eden by Battle Beast in the album No More Hollywood Endings?
That's the one I want and please play it for me now.
Need your confirmation to play the song Eden on TV.
Confirmed. Please proceed.
Song started playing and you can enjoy it now.
Thanks for your help.
Anything else you need?
No, thanks for all.
Have a good day.
What will the weather be in Chi-town on the 10th?
The temperature averages 65 degrees and has a 35 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind speed?
Wind will be 8 miles per hour.
What is the humidity level?
Humidity will hover near 54 percent.
I see. What is the weather there today?
The temperature will be around 73 degrees and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
I see. Play me come Country songs by Jawga Boyz.
Search revealed 2 songs. Do you like All The Girls Wanna Ride by Jawga Boyz on the Kuntry album?
That is the one.
Shall I play the song for you now?
Yes, play the song now.
You want to cast the song All The Girls Wanna Ride on the TV, correct?
That is right.
Your song has started.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need more help?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Can you check the weather for me on March 4th in Los Angeles?
The forecast is for an average temperature of 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Alright, how about the weather on day after tomorrow?
The forecast for that day is an average temperature of 89 degrees Fahrenheit with 0 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity and wind supposed to be like?
Humidity is expected to be around 15 percent, and winds will be around 8 miles per hour.
Alright, how about the weather in Olema, California?
The forecast for Olema is an average temperature of 87 degrees Fahrenheit with 23 percent chance of rain.
Alright, thanks. Can you find me some pop songs to listen to?
Do you like the song Adorn by Miguel from the album Kaleidoscope Dream?
Any other suggestions? I like Prince Royce, especially their songs from the album Double Vision.
How about the song Back It Up by Prince Royce from the album Double Vision?
Yeah, that sounds great.
Should I play that for you now?
Yeah, you can play it in my kitchen.
You would like to play the song Back it Up on the kitchen speaker, correct?
Actually, play it on the TV instead.
Okay, so you would like to play Back it Up on the TV, is that correct?
Yeah that's perfect.
Now playing the song.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that is all for now.
Okay, have a nice day!
I have to verify the weather on the 7th.
What metropolis would you like to verify the weather for/
The city is Cloverdale.
The average temperature for that date ought to be 88 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 22 percent likelihood it will rain.
Okay, alright. Can you look for some music? I prefer music by Kane Brown.
What is your opinion about Homesick by Kane Brown in his album Experiment?
What is the music's genre?
It is Country music.
That sounds wonderful.
Do you wish to cast the song now?
Alright, that's fine.
Please verify the following information: cast Homesick on TV.
Nope. Cast it on speaker in the bedroom.
Please verify the following information: cast Homesick on bedroom speaker.
Alright, that's right.
The music began playing.
Thank you for your assistance.
Is there something else I can assist with?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
What's the weather forecast for the March 11th?
What city's weather would you like?
I want weather for Fairfield.
The forecast average temperature for the day is 89 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 13 percent chance it will rain.
Thanks. Would you please find me a song?
I have 10 songs for your review. Do you like Tom Ford by Teodora, from the album Borbena?
What else is available? I feel like Zac Brown Band.
I have 2 songs that match. How about Colder Weather by Zac Brown Band, from the album Pass The Jar?
Yes, that one.
Do you want to play it now?
Yes, play it.
Please confirm: You are playing Colder Weather on the TV.
Yes. What's the genre for that song?
It's a country song. It is playing now.
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Enjoy your music.
What's the weather forecast for the Sunday this week in Inverness?
The forecast calls for an average temperature of 88 degrees Fahrenheit that day. The chance of rain is 22 percent.
How windy or humid will it be that day?
The forecast wind speed is 1 mile per hour, with about 24 percent humidity.
Okay, sounds good. Please play some music for me.
I have 10 songs for you to try. How about playing Cirice by Ghost, from the album Meliora?
What genre of music is that?
It's a metal song.
Yes! Please play that one.
Do you want to play it right now?
Yes, send it to the kitchen speaker.
Please confirm your request to play Cirice on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, go ahead.
Your music is now playing.
Thanks, that's all.
Enjoy your music!
Can you tell me what the weather is in San Pablo?
I'd be happy to. There is only a 2 percent chance of rain and the average temperature is predicted to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit.
It's going to be a beautiful day.
Can I assist you with something else?
Yes, I'd like to listen to some music.
I have 10 songs you might enjoy. May I suggest First True Love by Kolohe Kai from the album Love Town?
What kind of music is that?
It's considered a Reggae song.
I love reggae. Can you play it on the display please?
You'd like hear First True Love played on the TV. Is that correct?
Yes, that would be perfect.
Your music selection has begun.
Great. That will be all for now.
Enjoy the music.
What is the weather forecast for the March 3rd?
What city would you like the weather forecast for?
Pinole
A 24 percent change of rain is forecasted for that day with an average temperate of 89 degrees.
Ok, can you look for some Reggae songs for me. Protoje is my favorite.
The 1 song I found that you may like is Who Knows from the album Ancient Future by Protoje.
Perfect.
Do you want to listen to the song now?
Yes.
You woul dike to play Who Knows on your TV, is that right?
Yes.
The song will play now.
Thanks!
Do you need anything else?
Nope, all done.
Enjoy your day!
What is the weather like on the March 4th?
In which city should I look?
The weather in Mill Valley.
The weather should be around 90 degrees and there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
How humid will the temperature be?
There is about a 18 percent humidity.
Could you find a song from Jessie J album Who You Are?
There is 1 song Mamma Knows Best by Jessie J from the album Who you are.
Yes, play it on the kitchen device.
Play Mamma knows best on the kitchen speaker.
No, play it on bedroom speaker instead.
Play Mamma Knows Best on bedroom speaker.
Yes, thank you. What is the genre of the song?
The genre of the song is pop.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
Tell me what the weather will be on March 6th.
What city shall I search for?
Check the weather in Belmont.
The weather will be 91 degrees with a 24 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity and the wind speed?
The humidity will be 28 percent with the wind at 4 miles per hour.
I see. Find me some Pop songs.
I found Adorn by Miguel on the Kaleidoscope Dream album.
Can you find something else?
I found African Beauty by Diamond Platnumz on A Boy From Tandale album.
That works for me.
Shall I cast the song now?
Yes, cast it on my television.
You want to cast African Beauty on the TV. Is that right?
That is right.
Your song is now playing.
Thanks a lot. That is all.
Have a great day.
What's the forecast for Rutherford 4th of this month?
Average of 88 degrees and a 12 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Find some songs for me.
I found 10 songs. Try Moon by Kid Francescoli on Play Me Again.
What genre is it?
Pop.
Great.
Do you want to play now?
Sure.
Please confirm: play Moon on tv.
Yes.
Playing now.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I want to check the Weather condition for which I need your help.
In which City you want to check for the weather condition?
I want to check it in Santa Rosa.
Temperature level will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there will be 6 % chances for Rain fall.
Thanks for that and I want to search for some Pop type songs I think it will nice for me to hear it now.
What about a song Adorn by Miguel in the Album Kaleidoscope Dream? This is the best one I think and loved by most of the people. Hope you will also like it.
Yes, this is a good song but I need something else which could be an interested one.
How about a song African Beauty by Diamond PLatnumz in the album A Boy From Tandale?
That is the one I want. Please play the song on my Bedroom speaker. I want to listen it now.
Please confirm to play the song African Beauty on bedroom speaker.
That is okay to proceed.
Song started playing now and you can enjoy.
Thanks for your help.
Anything else you need for now?
No, that's all, thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you check to see what the weather forecast will be in Mill Valley on March 1st?
They are calling for a 24 percent chance of rain with a temperature around 79 degrees.
Thanks. Can you find some music for me?
Would you like to hear Gold by Nick Murphy from the Built On Glass album?
No. Can you check for something from The Martin Garrix Experience album?
Certainly. Would you like to hear High On Life by Martin Garrix from The Martin Garrix Experience ?
Yes that's the one.
Shall I play it now?
Yes. Please play it on my bedroom speaker.
To confirm: You wish to play High On Life on bedroom speaker. Is this correct?
Yes it is.
Your song has begun.
What Genre is this?
It is Pop.
Thank you. That will be all.
Have a nice day.
I need to check out the weather for the the 14th in East Palo Alto.
The average temperature is 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 4 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it? And how humid will it be?
The average wind speed is about 5 miles per hour and there's 21 percent humidity.
Awesome. Could you find me a song?
How about Let Me Down Slowly by Alec Benjamin from Narrated For You?
What's the genre?
It's a Pop song.
That sounds great.
Would you like to play the song now?
That would be great. Play it on the bedroom device.
Please confirm the following: You want to play Let Me Down Slowly on the bedroom speaker.
No, play it on my television instead.
Please confirm the following: You want to play Let Me Down Slowly on the TV.
Yes, that's right.
The song is now playing.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thanks so much.
Have a great day!
Check the weather in Albany.
The temperature is 92 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it?
The humidity is 29 %.
How about March 4th in Occidental?
It will be 84 with a 20 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind speed and humidity?
It will be 2 miles per hour and humidity is 18 %.
Thanks for the info.
Is there anything else?
How about a Sabaton song.
I have Night Witches by Sabaton in Heroes.
I want to hear it.
Confirm on TV Night Witches.
Play it on kitchen device.
Confirm Night Witches on Kitchen speaker.
Change to bedroom device.
Confirm Night Witches on Bedroom Speaker.
That is what I want.
The song is starting.
What is the genre?
The gemre is metal.
That is all I need.
Have a great day.
Please check the weather on March 13th.
Which city?
Calistoga please.
It's going to be 81 degrees Fahrenheit with 2 percent chance of rain.
How about in South San Francisco?
It's going to be 91 degrees Fahrenheit with 12 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid it's going to be?
Humidity is 31 percent and wind speed should be 10 miles per hour.
Thanks.Please find me Country songs like Kacey Musgraves' s songs in album Golden Hour.
Do you like Butterflies by Kacey Musgraves from the album Golden Hour?
That's nice!
Will I play the music now?
Yes play it on speaker in the bedroom.
Okay, you want to play Butterflies on bedroom speaker. Please confirm.
Play it on TV, please.
Okay, you want to play Butterflies on TV. Please confirm.
That's good.
It is now playing.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can help you with?
Nothing for now. Thanks
Very much welcome!
I would like to know the weather in Alamo for the 9th of March.
The days is supposed to be 93 degrees with a 10 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it going to be and what about the humidity?
The wind speed will be 8 miles per hour and the humidity will be around 20 percent.
Can you find a pop song I like Sabrina Carpenter music.
Do you like Almost Love by Sabrina Carpenter from the album Singular Act I?
What other song do you have from the album Singular Act I?
There are 2 songs. There is Paris by Sabrina Carpenter form Singular Act I.
Yes, that is a good song.
Do you want to play the song?
Yes, play the song.
The song Paris will play on TV.
Yes, that is correct.
Started playing the song.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything I can help with?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
Can you look up the weather in Fairfield on the March 6th?
Sure: The temperature will be 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about the humidity?
The humidity will be at 46 percent.
And what about the wind?
That will be going 8 miles per hour.
Cool, yeah. Can you also play some music for me?
Sure - how about the album Last Year Was Complicated by Nick Jonas? The track Under You is popular.
Yeah, let's play that.
Alright, you'd like to play the song Under You on the TV?
Can you play it on the kitchen speaker?
Of course. You'd like to play Under You on the kitchen speaker?
Yes - what genre is it?
This is pop music. The song will begin now.
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
That's all for today.
Have a great day.
I need to know the weather in Sacramento, CA on 12th of this month.
The average temperature in Sacramento that day should be 92 degrees F and there is a 14 % chance of rain.
Ok, how about the weather in Vallejo?
The average temperature in Vallejo that day should be 87 degrees F and there is a 25 % chance of rain.
How windy is it expected to be that day and what is the humidity going to be?
The humidity should be around 32 % and the average wind speed should be 3 mph.
Sure, that sounds right. Could you help me find some songs?
I found 10 songs for you. One song is Supercut by Lorde from the album Melodrama.
What other songs did you have? I like Battle Beast.
I found 1 song for you. It is called Eden by Battle Beast from the album No More Hollywood Endings?
That sounds great. I'd like to play the song.
Please confirm you'd like to play Eden on TV.
Yes, that sounds right. What is the genre of the song?
The song has started playing. The song is a Metal song.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a great day.
Tell me what the weather will be in Castro Valley on March 12th.
The forecast is 93 degrees with a 9 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The humidity is foretasted to be 25 percent with wind at 1 mile per hour.
I see. Find me some Rock music on the Evolution album.
Do you like Are You Ready by Disturbed on the Evolution album?
That works for me. Play the song.
You want to cast Are You Ready to the TV. Is that right?
No, cast it on the bedroom speaker.
You want to cast Are You Ready to the bedroom speaker. Is that right?
No, cast it on the speaker in kitchen.
You want to cast Are You Ready to the kitchen speaker. Is that correct?
Yes, that is right.
Your song has started.
Thanks a lot. That is all for now.
Have a great day.
What's the weather like in LA?
About 76 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 28 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. I want to listen to a good pop song. How about something from the Miguel album Kaleidoscope Dream?
The Miguel album Kaleidoscope Dream? You might like his song Adorn.
Give me a different song.
I couldn't find another relevant song. What else can I help you wiht?
Can you instead find me a metal song from the Ghost album Prequelle?
What are your thoughts on Dance Macabre from the Ghost album Prequelle?
What other options are there?
Ghost also has the song Rats from the album Prequelle. Thoughts on that?
I like that one! Can you play it through the speaker in kitchen?
I should play Rats through your kitchen speaker?
Yes, that is what I want.
I have started the song.
Thanks!
Can I help you with something else?
Not now. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I want to check the weather on March 7th.
In which city you like to check the weather?
Like to check in Point Reyes Station.
76 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day and 16 percent chances of rain there.
What is the expectation of humidity and windy?
1 miles per hours is the average wind speed and 21 percent of humidity.
Okay. perfect. Can you search me some songs?
What is your opinion about Oblivion in album Visions by Grimes?
That is perfect.
Are you interested to play the music now?
Fine. Run it on kitchen speaker.
Please give confirmation details: Run Oblivion in kitchen speaker.
Fine. This is perfect.
Song started playing now.
Thank you so much for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you check the weather for march 13th?
Yes. In which city?
Graton please, check the forecast.
There is an 8 percent chance of rain with average temperature of 86 degrees
Ok. Could you find me some Country songs? Maybe by Jason Aldean from the album Rearview Town.
I found 4 songs. Would you like to hear Girl Like You by Jason Aldean in album Rearview Town?
Sure, that sounds good.
To confirm: You wish to play Girl Like You on TV. Correct?
No, play it on kitchen device instead.
To confirm: You wish to play Girl Like You on kitchen speaker. Correct?
Sorry, no. Play it on my bedroom speaker.
To confirm: You wish to play Girl Like You on your bedroom speaker.. Correct?
Yes sounds good
Your song has started
Thanks so much
Is there anything else?
No that will be all
Have a nice day.
What is the weather on Friday next week.
In what city?
San Mateo.
It should be around 88 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
I want to listen to some country songs from the album Experiment.
I found 3 songs. Homesick by Kane Brown on Experiment is an option.
Yes, play that on my television.
Please confirm, playing Homesick on TV.
No, play it on the speaker in kitchen.
Confirm, playing Homesick on kitchen speaker.
Yes, that is correct.
Plays song.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
Can you check the weather in Foster City on March 14th?
The average daytime temperature is expected to be 91 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 19 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid is it going to get?
The average wind speed is expected to be 1 mile per hour and the humidity might be close to 36 percent.
Thank you. Can you find me some Country songs by Kacey Musgraves from the album Golden Hour?
Shall I play Butterflies by Kacey Musgraves from the album Golden Hour?
Hold on. Do you have something else? Anything by Aaron Lewis from the album Sinner?
There is 1 song called Lost And Lonely by Aaron Lewis from the album Sinner.
That's the one. Please play it on the TV.
Playing Lost and Lonely on TV. Shall I proceed?
Yes, please go ahead.
Song playing now. Enjoy the music!
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Can you check the weather for me in Pescadero for the the 7th?
There's a 4 percent chance of rain with an average of 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be windy?
There might be an average wind speed of 6 mph.
OK, please check also for March 12th.
There's a 19 percent chance of rain with an average of 79 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be windy?
There might be an average wind speed of 8 mph.
Thanks. Can you please find me some songs?
There are 10 songs which I belive you'll like. How about Jason Aldean playing When She Says Baby from the album Night Train?
Awesome. Play it please.
Can you please confirm that you want me to play When She Says Baby on TV.
Yes, please do.
I've started the song.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thanks again.
Have a great day!
Please check the weather.
In which city would you like to know the weather?
Please check Albany.
The temperature on that day averages 92 degree Fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Great. Now, will you search for some songs?
Are you interested in hearing No more sad songs on the album Glory Days by Little Mix?
Yes, that would be great!
Would you like to hear the song now?
Yes, thank you.
Please confirm you wish to hear No more Sad Songs on the TV.
Yes, that is right. What is the genre of this song?
This is a pop song that has begun playing.
Thank you for your assistance! That is all I need at the moment.
Enjoy the day!
What is the weather going to be in Oakley on 12th of this month?
The average chance of rain is 22 percent and the average high is 75 degrees.
I see. Can you find me some music to play?
Search revealed 10 songs. Do you like Why So Serious by Alice Merton in the Mint album?
I sure do.
Shall I play your music for you?
Yes, cast it on my bedroom.
You want me to cast Why So Serious on the bedroom speaker. Is that right?
That is right.
Your song has started.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I'm going to be seeing a friend in Inverness. Can you see what the weather's like there?
It'll be about 90 degrees Fahreinheit, with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Good to know.
What else would you like?
I want to listen to something. Do you have a good country song?
How about All On Me, from the Devin Dawson album Dark Horse?
No thanks. What else is there?
Perhaps All The Girls Wanna Ride from the Jawga Boyz album Kuntry?
Nope. Something else, please.
Okay. Maybe you could listen to Alone With You from the Jake Owen album Barefoot Blue Jean Night?
I love that one. Go ahead and play it on the speaker in kitchen.
So, play Alone With You on the kitchen speaker?
That is correct.
I started playing the song.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you out any further?
Not now. Thanks.
Have a great day.
How will the weather be in Geyserville on the March 3rd?
The forecast calls for an average temperature of 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
How about wind and humidity?
Wind speed is forecast at 7 miles per hour, with humidity around 22 percent.
Okay, thanks. Can you find some music for me? I would like some pop music, especially something like Big Time Rush songs. I like the album Elevate.
I have 1 song for you to listen to. Would you like Windows Down by Big Time Rush from the album Elevate?
That's good. Please play it on my bedroom speaker.
Please confirm that you want to play Windows Down on the bedroom speaker.
Yep, that's it.
Your music is playing.
Thanks, that was all.
Enjoy your music!
I want to know what the weather will be like on Tuesday next week.
What city do you want to know the weather in?
I want to know the weather in Rutherford.
It will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit on average for that day and there will be a 23 percent chance it will rain.
Alright. Now can you look for songs? I really like Pop songs. Songs from the album Ruin Your Party would be good.
How about Take Me Away by Scotty Sire from the album Ruin Your Party?
Is there anything else?
I'm sorry, but there's nothing else that matches. Do you need me to do anything else?
Let's look for more songs. How about Rock songs. I like Starset and the album Transmissions.
There's Carnivore by Starset from the album Transmissions.
Let's keep looking.
There's It Has Begun by Starset from the album Transmissions.
Oh yeah, I like that.
Would you like me to play the song now?
Absolutely.
I'll start playing It Has Begun on the TV?
Yeah, let's play it.
The song has begun.
Thanks a lot.
What else can I do for you?
Nothing. Thanks a lot.
Have a pleasant day.
What kind of weather do you show for the Monday next week, please?
What city is this weather check for?
Suisun City, please.
There is a forecast of 75 degrees Fahrenheit on average during the day with a chance of rain at 3 percent.
Okay. Now, what can you suggest from you songs list?
Well, looking at 10 songs, I show the single Boyfriend from the Piano Songs album by Froggy Fresh. How does that sound?
Hmm, and how would you describe this song?
The song is in the Pop category.
Okay, is there any other song you can suggest right now?
Would the single Superficial Love on the album Safe Haven by Ruth B interest you?
Not sure. Let's keep looking. Do you have some info on The First Time album? I remember I liked a lot of the songs on that album.
Checking The First Time album, the single Peter Pan by Kelsea Ballerini is available.
Yeah? And how is that song labeled?
That song is in the Country category.
I like that.
Shall I play that song for you now?
Yeah, go ahead, on my television, please.
Are you confirming that Peter Pan will play on your TV?
Uh, let's change that to my kitchen, please.
All right. Are you confirming that you want the song Peter Pan to play on your kitchen speaker?
Right on, my friend.
The song will begin playing now.
Hey, thanks a lot.
Would you like some other assistance?
Nope, that's all folks. Your help is much appreciated.
Delighted. Enjoy your music.
Tell me what the weather will be in Martinez on March 4th.
That daytime temperature will be 87 degrees with a 7 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the humidity level?
Humidity will average 21 percent.
Tell me what the weather will be in Pinole.
The daytime temperature will average 77 degrees and it has a 24 percent chance of rain.
Tell me what the weather will be on March 8th.
The daytime temperature will average 91 degrees and there is only a 1 percent chance of rain.
I see. Find me some songs on the This is Acting album.
Search found 4 results for you. Do you like Alive by Sia on the This Is Acting album?
What type of music is it?
It is under the Pop genre.
That works for me.
Shall I cast the song for you?
Yes, play the song for me.
You want to play the song Alive on the TV. Is that right?
That is right.
Your song has started.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need something more?
No, not right now. Thanks.
Have a great day.
What's the weather like at the river in Forestville on 12th of this month?
The Temperature will be 75 and there isn't likely to be rain. It's chance is 14 %.
Will it be windy there?
Not really. Maybe about 10 mph.
Will it be humid?
Not at all, about 36 percent.
Fine, play music now. Try pop, I want Zayn Malik' from his album Icarus Falls. I love those brunette curls of his, he's dreamy.
There are 6 options.What about Dusk till Dawn by Zayn malik.? It's from Icarus falls like you asked.
Fine, fire up the speaker in the bedroom so I can dream of Zayn.
I'm doing it now, Playing Dusk Till Dawn on Bedroom speaker now.
Never mind, I need a snack play on speaker in kitchen.
Here goes: Playing Dusk till Dawn on kitchen speaker.
Fire him up.
Zahn is singing now.
Fine, that's all I really need.
Enjoy the song.
I need to check the weather.
Sure thing, what city do you want to check the weather in?
Check out the weather in Forestville for me.
Alright. The average temperature for the day should be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks. How's the weather going to be March 14th?
On March 14th the average temperature for the day should be around 80 degrees with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks. I'd like to play some music. Can you find songs from Vybz Kartel off the album The Gaza Don?
Would you like to play Summer Time by Vybz Kartel off the album The Gaza Don?
Yes, that sounds great!
Anything else I can help you with?
I'd like to play the song on the television please.
Okay. Please confirm the following: Play song Summer Time on the TV. Correct?
Yes, that's right. Thanks.
Your song is now starting.
Cool, thanks. That's all I need.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
Help me look up the weather.
What's city's weather are you interested in? And for what date?
Check Half Moon Bay on the 11th.
It will be 88 degrees Fahrenheit for the day's average and there's a 6 percent chance for rain.
Alright, let's check Union City.
It will be 87 degrees Fahrenheit for the day's average and there's a 11 percent chance for rain.
Okay, cool. Let's look for songs now.
There are 10 songs you might enjoy. How about Born For Greatness by Papa Roach from the album Crooked Teeth?
What kind of song is that?
It's a Metal song.
Okay, sounds right up my alley.
Would you like me to play the song?
Yeah, play it in my bedroom.
I'll play Born For Greatness on the bedroom speaker, is that correct?
No, I think I want to on my tv.
I'll play Born For Greatness on the TV, is that correct?
Yeah, please play it.
The song has begun.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need me for anything else?
Nope, thanks again.
Have a fine day.
What's the weather in Ciudad de Mexico?
Average of 102 degrees and 0 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Find some songs for me.
How about Take Back Home Girl by Chris Lane from Laps Around the Sun?
Genre?
Country.
What else? Try My Everything by Ariana Grande.
I found 4 songs. Be My Baby is by Ariana Grande off of My Everything.
What else?
Best Mistake by Ariana Grande on My Everything?
Genre?
Pop.
Great.
Play now?
Yeah, on my tv.
Please confirm: play Best Mistake on tv.
Yes.
Playing now.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a nice day.
Can you please check the weather for me?
In which city?
New York City, please.
There's a 37 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 66 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK. Now please find me two rooms in a three star hotel with wifi.
There's the nice 3 star 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge Hotel.
Anything else available. Look for 1 star hotels.
There's the nice 1 star 1 Hotel Central Park.
Anything else which I might like?
There's the nice 1 star 11 Howard.
Do you know their address?
They're located at 11 Howard Street.
Perfect. Let's book a room for 4 days, checking in later today.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book 2 rooms for 4 days at 11 Howard in New York from March 1st?
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me their phone number?
I've successfully placed your reservation. You can reach them at +1 212-235-1111.
Please tell me the room price per night.
Rooms are $288 per night.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thanks again.
Have a nice day.
I would like to check the Bodega Bay weather for March 6th.
The temperature on average is 82 degrees F with a 19 percent chance of rain.
What about Long Beach?
The average temperature is 85 F with a 20 percent chance of rain.
What will the humidity and wind be like?
The humidity is about 27 % and wind 4 miles per hour.
Sure I'd like to find a hotel with wifi there.
There is a 2 star Best Western of Long Beach which is nice.
What other hotels with three rooms are there?
The Courtyard by Marriott Long Beach Airport is a 3 star hotel.
Tell me the phone number.
The phone is +1 562-429-5803.
What's the address?
The address is at 3841 North Lakewood Boulevard for $189 a night.
I like that idea and want to reserve one day on March 6th for the hotel.
The name of the hotel is Courtyard By Marriott Long Beach Airport on March 6th and I'd like a reservation for 1 day in Long Beach for 3 rooms.
Yes, that is fine.
The reservation is a success.
Thanks very much and that is all I need.
Have a great day.
What is the weather in Long Beach?
The average temperature is 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Can you book 1 room with wifi at a hotel there.
There are 10 options. The Best Western of Long Beach is a 2 star hotel.
Where are they located?
They are located at 1725 Long Beach Boulevard.
What other hotels are there?
The Courtyard by Marriott Long Beach Airport is a 3 star hotel.
What's their direct line?
Their direct line is +1 562-429-5803.
That sounds great.
Should I reserve the room?
Yes. Please book.
Will you be checking in on March 1st and for how many days?
Yes. For 3 days.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 room at the Courtyard by Marriott Long Beach Airport on March 1st in Long Beach for 3 days.
Yes. That's it.
Your reservation was a success.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. Thanks. That's it.
Please enjoy your day.
Can you check the weather for me? I need to know what it will be like in Long beach, CA on the 3rd of March.
There is a 23 % chance of rain with the average temperature at 89 degrees.
Thanks. Can you help me find a hotel in Long Beach?
There are 10 hotels in Long Beach. How about Best Western of Long Beach? It is a 2 star rate hotel.
Sounds fine. Can you reserve me a room for one day on the 2nd?
To confirm: You wish to book a room on March 2nd, for 1 person,just 1 day at Best Western of Long Beach located in Long Beach, CA. Is this correct?.
Yes it is.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Can you get me their address please?
Best Western of Long Beach is located at 1725 Long Beach Boulevard.
Thanks. That is all I need today.
Have a nice day.
What's the weather going to be like in Oakland on the 6th of March?
The forecast for that day is an average temperature of 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity like?
Humidity is expected to be about 43 percent.
How about the weather in SFO on the 4th of March?
The forecast for that day is an average temperature of 71 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks. I'd like to book a hotel there. I just need 1 room, and a 1 star hotel is fine, although I want it to have wifi.
I found 10 hotels that match your request. How about the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco? It's a 1 star hotel.
Where is it located? What's the cost per night?
It is located at 749 Taylor Street. The cost per night is $24.
That sounds great, I'd like to make a reservation there. I'd like to get a room for two days.
Would you like to check in on March 4th?
Sure, that's fine.
Okay, so you'd like to reserve 1 room at the Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco for 2 nights, checking in on March 4th. Is that correct?
No, I'd like to book the room for three days.
Okay, so you would like to book a room for 3 days, checking in on March 4th, is that correct?
I want to check in today instead.
So you want to check in to the hotel in San Francisco today, March 1st, correct?
Yes that's fine. What is their contact info?
Your reservation was booked. You can reach them at +1 415-673-3277.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that is all for now, thanks.
Okay, enjoy your day.
Can you tell me how the weather will be in Seattle on March 6th?
It will be around 64 degrees with a 27 percent chance of rain.
Great. Can you get me 1 hotel room there with wifi?
Sure, how about the 2 star Ace Hotel Seattle?
Sure, where is it?
It'S at 2423 1st Avenue.
How can I call them?
Their phone number is +1 206-448-4721.
Actually, is there anything else?
There's the 2 star Belltown Inn.
Is there another one?
How about the 3 star Best Western Plus Pioneer Square Hotel Downtown?
That's perfect, please reserve it.
Sure, for how many days?
For 1 day please.
Checking in on March 6th?
No, on the 1st of this month.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like 1 room at Best Western Plus Pioneer Square Hotel Downtown in Seattle from March 1st for 1 day.
Yes, that's perfect.
Great, your reservation is complete.
Thanks, how much will it cost?
It's $111 per night.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else?
No, that's all.
Okay, see you.
Can you check the weather in Rio Vista on 6th of March.
The average temperature will be 79 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
What about on March 7th in New York City?
The average temperature will be 65 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
What about the wind and humidity?
The humidity will be approximately 18 percent with a wind speed of 7 miles per hour.
Okay. Can you help me book a hotel there?
I have 10 options. 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge is a 4 star hotal.
What is the nightly rate and where are they located?
They are located at 60 Furman Street, Brooklyn for $240 per night.
Sounds perfect. Can you reserve a room checking in on Saturday this week.
For how many days?
I will be there four days.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 room at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York on March 2nd for 4 days.
Yes. That's correct.
Your reservation was a success.
Thanks. That's all for now.
Please enjoy your day.
I will be going to London, UK soon. Can you check the weather on March 4th?
The temperature will be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
How about the wind and the humidity?
The humidity will be around 16 percent and the wind will be at 1 mile per hour.
That sounds great. Could you find a hotel room?
There are 10 possible hotels you might like. 45 Park Lane is a hotel with 5 star rating.
What other hotels are there?
There is Abc Hyde Park Hotel with a 3 star rating.
What other hotels are there? Looking for just one room.
There is Abercorn House with a 1 star rating.
Does that hotel have wifi included? How much is it per night?
The hotel does not have wifi and it is $84 per night.
That sounds good enough, I want to make a reservation.
Do you want to check in on March 4th? How long will be your stay?
I want to check in tomorrow and make the reservation for just one day.
Please confirm: Booking 1 hotel room in Abercorn House in London on March 2nd for 1 day.
That is correct, what is their phone number?
The hotel room has been booked. Their phone number is +44 20 8563 8692.
Thanks a lot, that would be all for now.
Have a great day.
Can you check the weather on March 1st?
Which city?
Atlanta GA on March 11th.
It should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with 0 percent chance of rain.
Okay, please find me a hotel there.
I got 10 hotels and one is a 4 star hotel which is Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza.
That's good.
Will I reserve you room there?
Yes please.
For how many days?
For 3 days.
Will you check in on March 11th?
On the 5th.
Okay, you want to reserve 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza in Atlanta on March 5th for 3 days. Please confirm.
Yes. May I know the phone number and how much will it cost me per night?
Ohone number is +1 470-231-3030 for only $176 per night. Your reservation has been done!
Thank you.
Do you still need any other help?
No, thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Hpw is the weather in Anaheim, CA?
A 29 percent chance of showers with a temperature average of 78.
Find me a hotel there.
A good 2 star hotel is Anaheim Desert Inn And Suites.
What are other choices?
A 3 star hotel is the Anaheim Majestic Garden Hotel.
I like that one.
Should I make a reservation?
Book one room the 1st.
How long would you like to stay?
Three days will work.
I will reserve 1 room at the Anaheim Majestic Garden Hotel in Anaheim for 3 days beginning March 1st with your permission.
Permission granted.
The room is reserved.
Awesome.
Do you need further assistance?
No. I'm set for now.
Enjoy the day.
I would like to check the weather in Nairobi March 4th.
The temperature on average is 88 degrees F there with a 1 percent chance of rain.
What will be the humidity and wind like?
The humidity will be about 15 % and the average wind speed 1 mile per hour.
What about in Philadelphia on the March 10th.
The average temperature would be about 91 degrees F with a 4 % chance of rain.
That works. I'd like to find a hotel room there.
They have a 3 star hotel at the aka University City.
Yes, that is great.
Do you wish to reserve a room there?
Yes, I'd like to make a booking March 6th.
For how many days would you like to book?
I would like four days for 2 rooms.
Please confirm hotel Aka university City on March 6th for 4 days in Philadelphia and 2 rooms.
Yes, that will be great.
The reservation is a success.
What is the hotel phone number and does it have wifi?
The phone number is +1 215-372-9000.
Thanks so much and that is all I need.
Have a great day.
I need to check the weather in Toronto, Ontario
The average temperature for the day is 58 degrees fahrenheit. There is a 13 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it?
The humidity is around 25 percent and wind will be 9 miles per hour
Sure okay. I want a room in a hotel there with 3 star
Best western plus toronto north york hotel & suites which a good hotel in 3 star
Whats its address
their address is 50 Norfinch Drive
WHats the cost per night and is wifi there?
The room costs $216 per night and they dont have wifi
Are there any other hotels i want 2 rooms
I found 9 hotels matching you. Best western premier toronto airport carlingview hotel is a nice 3 star hotel
Yes great. Make reservation there with check in date is later today
for how many days?
I want the room for 1 days
Please confirm this : The name of the hotel is Best western premier toronto airport carlingview hotel for 1 days for 2 rooms in toronto. the checkin date is March 1st
Yes great
Your booking is successful
Thanks a lot
Is there anything you want?
No Thanks a lot
Have a great day
Can you check the weather forecats for the March 10th
In which city?
Seattle, Wa please.
There is a 39 percent of rain with an average temperature of 69 degrees.
ok thanks.
Is there anything else i can do?
Yes. Can you locate a hotel there for me?
There is a nice 2 start hotel called Ace Hotel Seattle.
Do you have their telephone number ? what does the room cost per night?
The number for Ace Hotel Seattle is +1 206-448-4721. Rooms are $44 per night.
Perfect. Can you make a reservation for me to check in on the 9th?
Of course. How many days will you be staying?
I need just one room for 4 days.
To confirm: You wish to reserve 1 room for 4 days on March 9th at Ace Hotel Seattle located in Seattle. Is this correct?
Yes it is.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Thansk for your help.
Is there anything else i can do?
No. That's all I need.
Have a nice day.
What is the weather in Delhi, India on the March 11th?
The average temperature is 103 degrees with a 7 percent chance of rain.
How windy? How humid?
The wind should be around 10 mph, the humidity about 19 percent.
Ok, I need a hotel room there.
Aloft New Delhi Aerocity is a 4 star hotel.
Yes, that is perfect.
Are you ready to reserve a room?
Yes, 1 room for two days, checking in on the 3rd of March.
Please confirm, reservation for 1 room for 2 days at Aloft New Delhi Aerocity on March 3rd in Delhi.
Yes, that is perfect.
Your reservation is complete.
What is the address?
The address is 5b Igi T3 Road, Delhi - Ajmer Expressway, Aerocity, New Delhi.
Thanks!
Anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
Please check the weather in Sydney, Australia.
The average temperature is 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
What will the humidity be like?
The humidity will be 15 percent.
I will need two rooms at a nearby hotel.
28 Hotel Sydney is one of 10 hotels. It has a 4 star rating.
Sounds great. Please reserve.
For how many days and will you be checking in on March 1st?
Yes. That's good. There reservation is for one day.
Please confirm you want me to book 2 rooms at 28 Hotel Sydney in Sydney on March 1st for 1 day.
Yes. That is correct.
Your reservation was a success.
What's their direct line?
Their direct line is +61 2 9102 2828.
Thanks. That will be all.
Okay. Have a great day.
How is the weather in Washington?
The average temperature right now is around 75 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I want a hotel room there.
I found 10 hotels matching your request. One 3 star hotel is the Arc The.Hotel.
How much is it? Is there wifi?
It costs $210 and has wifi.
What else is there?
Cambria Hotel Washington D.C. Convention Center is another 3 star hotel.
Okay, that's better.
May I help you with something else?
Make a reservation for two rooms.
For how long?
Just one day.
Are you okay checking in on March 1st?
Yes I am.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a 2 rooms at Cambria Hotel Washington, D.C. Convention Center for 1 day on March 1st in Washington D.C..
Yes, that's all correct.
Your reservation has been confirmed!
Thank you for the help.
Can I assist you further?
No, thanks again!
Have a great day!
Please help me check the weather on March 4th.
Which city?
Nairobi please.
It's going to be 88 degrees Fahrenheit with 1 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy it's going to be?
Humidity is around 15 percent and wind speed should be 1 miles per hour.
Okay. Please find a room in a hotel for me there.
I got 10 hotels and one is Azure Hotel Nairobi Westlands which is a 5 star hotel.
What's the address of that hotel and rate per night?
It's at Lantana Road and it costs $135 per night.
That's good.
Will I reserve you a room there?
Yes, please.
Do you prefer checking in on March 4th and for how many days?
I want to check in this Saturday and for one day only.
Okay, you want 1 room for 1 day in Azure Hotel Nairobi Westlands in Nairobi on March 2nd. Please confirm.
I want to check in on 3rd of March.
Okay, you want 1 room on March 3rd. Please confirm.
Yes, that's good.
Reservation has been made!
Thanks a lot for your help.
Very much welcome!
Please can you check the weather forecast on 5th of this month?
Can I have the zip code for the city you are searching for?
Sorry, I don't know the zip code but please can you search for the city Paris, France. Is it windy?
The day is cloudy with a chance of 19 % rain and the average temperature would be 70 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it humidity? If so, to what percent?
Yup, it's slightly humidity to around 55 percent.
Thanks for the information. Please can you help me to find a room in a good hotel in Paris.
Sure. I've a list of 10 hotels that suits you. One among them is Ac Hotel By Marriott Paris Porte Maillot which is a nice 4 star hotel. Do you wish to book here?
Please let me know if there are any other 4 star hotels?
Yup, There is a good 4 star hotel, Amastan Paris located at 34 Rue Jean Mermoz, 75008 Paris, France.
What's the cost per night to stay?
They charge $96 per night.
Sounds good to me.
Can I reserve a room for you at this hotel?
Please book 2 rooms at this hotel.
How long would be your stay? Do you wish to check in on March 5th?
I need 3 rooms for 2 days and the check in date will be on 4th of this month.
Please confirm me that you wish to stay at the hotel Amastan Paris, located in Paris for 2 days and you need 3 rooms and your check in date will be on March 4th. Is that right?
Yup, sounds good. Is there wifi connection at the hotel?
Sorry that they don't have wifi facilities. Your reservation is made successfully.
Please can I have their address and contact number?
Sure. The hotel is located at 34 Rue Jean Mermoz, 75008 and you can reach them at +33 1 49 52 99 70.
Thanks a lot.
Anything else you need?
Nope, thanks much.
Have a wonderful day.
I need your help to check the weather condition in El Cerrito on March 8th. Can you do it for me now?
Yes, please note that the average temperature level will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 5 % for rain fall there on that day.
That is useful information and thanks. Also please check the weather in Sacramento on the 5th.
Please note that the average temperature level will be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 2 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about the Wind speed on the same day in the same place?
It will be around 12 miles per hour. Any more information you need on the weather condition.
Yes, let me know the Humidity level.
Humidity will be around 17 % on that day.
That's all I want on weather condition and thanks.
How can I help you further?
I need your help to search for a room in nice hotel.
What about a 1 star hotel named Best Western Plus Sutter house? Hope you will like it.
Yes, I like it.
Do you want me to book the rooms there?
yes, do it for me.
Please confirm to reserve the room from March 5th and up to what date you need the reservation for?
No, please book the rooms for 4 days from 2nd of March and I need only 1 room.
Need your final confirmation to book 1 room for 4 days in Hotel Best Western Plus Sutter House in Sacramento from March 2nd.
That is correct. Please go ahead.
Your rooms are booked successfully.
Can you check whether they have wi-fi connection there?
Yes they have Wi-fi.
Get me the contact number and address of that hotel for my reference.
The address is 1100 H Street and the contact number is +1 916-441-1314.
Thanks for that information and that was useful to me.
Do you need any more help from me?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Check for me the weather in Toronto, Ontario.
For the day the average temperature should be 58 degrees Fahrenheit and 13 percent chance of rain.
I.understand.I will need one room at a hotel there.
I have found 10 results.A nice 3 star hotel is Best Western Plus Toronto North York Hotel & Suites.
Wifi is available? Tell me the phone number.
Wifi is not available.+1 416-663-9500 is the phone number.
Sounds good for me.
Should I make a reservation?
Yes make for one day with check in date March 1st.
At hotel called Best Western Plus Toronto North York Hotel & Suites in Toronto you want reservation for 1 day and 1 room and the check in date is March 1st.Is that okay?
Yes is very good.
Reservation was made.
How much does this room cost per night?
Per night cost is $180.
Thank you.That's all that I needed.
Have a great day!
I am interested in the weather in Nairobi for 9th of March.
The temperature should be 103 degrees Fahrenheit on average. There should be a 0 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
The humidity is about 15 percent. The average wind speed should be 7 miles an hour.
Okay. I need a hotel room there.
I have 10 hotels that fit. Azure Hotel Nairobi Westlands is a nice 5 star.
Could you tell me its phone number and cost per night?
The phone number is +254 709 716000 and it costs $135 per night.
Are any other hotels available? I would like two rooms at a a three star hotel.
Crowne Plaza Nairobi is a good 3 star hotel.
Are any other hotels available?
Crowne Plaza Nairobi airport is a good 3 star hotel.
That sounds good.
Could I help you with something else?
I would like to make a hotel reservation for four days, checking in on the 7th.
So you would like to check in at the Crowne Plaza Nairobi airport in Nairobi on March 7th for 4 days and you need 2 rooms?
That should work.
Your reservation was made.
Thanks so much.
Do you need further assistance?
No, that should be all.
Have a good one.
I would like to check the weather in Philadelphia on March 11th.
On that day, the average temperature should be 72 degrees Fahrenheit and have a 10 percent chance for rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed should be 11 miles per hour.
Alright, how about on March 8th.
On that day, the average temperature should be 78 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 5 percent chance for rain.
Okay. I would like to find a hotel room there.
There is a nice 3 star hotel called Aka University City.
How much will it cost per night?
The room will cost $261 per night.
Does the hotel have wifi and what is its address?
The hotel has wifi and the address is Cira Centre South, 2929 Walnut Street.
Yes, that sounds alright.
Would you like to reserve a room at this hotel?
Yes, I would like to make a booking for 4 days.
Would you like to check in on March 8th?
The check in date will be the 4th.
Please confirm these details: You want to reserve 1 room for 4 days at the hotel Aka University City located in Philadelphia. The check in date will be on March 4th.
Yes, that is fine with me.
Your reservation is set.
Thank you very much. That is all.
Have a great day.
tell weather in castro valley
average temperature is 91 degrees and 18 percent chance of rain
ho about portland on today
75 degrees there and 9 percent rain chance
how humid though?
16 percent there
how windy too?
13 miles per hour
I want a hotel
aloft portland airport at cascade station is 3 stars
I want 3 stars and one room
the canopy by hilton portland pearl district is 3 stars
yes, make a reservation
want the check in march 1st?
I want the room for one day
canopy by hilton portland pearl district march 1st 1 day in portland for 1
yes that is good
it went through
thanks a lot
anything else for you?
no thank you
bye then and have fun
I need to find out about the weather in Stinson Beach on the March 11th.
The average temperature should be 78 degrees Fahrenheit, and should be a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about Seattle, WA, on 13th of this month.
The average temperature for your selected date is expected to be 63 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I need to find a room there.
There are 10 hotels which match your selection. Ace Hotel Seattle is nice and is a 2 star hotel.
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like to reserve a room there?
Yes, please make a booking for 1 room.
Would you like to check in on March 13th? And how many days is the reservation for?
I need it for four days and the check in date is the 7th of March.
Please confirm the following information: The name of the hotel is Ace Hotel Seattle, with the check in date as March 7th, for 4 days. The hotel is in Seattle and the number of rooms is 1.
Yeah, that sounds good.
Your reservation is now successful.
Thank you for that, that's all.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
I will be visiting my sister at Sydney, Australia on March 13th, can you please check the weather for me?
Sure. Upon checking, it says that there's a 5 percent chance of rain and the average temperature is 101 degrees Farenheit on that day. You should still bring an umbrella with you.
Do you think it is humid?
It says here that the humidity is around 20 %. Not that hot I think.
I prefer to go on flying kites, is it going to be windy?
I don't think its a good idea to fly a kite since the average speed wind on that day is just 7 miles per hour.
Yes, I think you're right. Can you also help me to look for a hotel there?
There are 10 hotels that has good rating there. One of it is a 4 star hotel, a nice hotel named 28 Hotel Sydney.
Are there any other four stars hotel? I want a different one. And I am just looking for one room.
There's still 9 hotels that matches your requirement, how about 57 Hotel that is also a 4 star hotel?
I've been there last year. How about hotels with just one star?
Adina Apartment Hotel Bondi Beach Sydney is a 1 star hotel that is cheap and clean.
I heard that they also serve good breakfast. That's a plus to me.
Do you need help in making a reservation at this hotel?
Yes, please. And I would like to check in next Friday. I will go there directly after my meeting.
Okay, for how many days is the booking?
I will be staying over the weekend so that just for two days.
Alright, please have it check before I proceed. Reservation of 1 room at Adina Apartment Hotel Bondi Beach Sydney for 2 days on MArch 8th. The hotel is in Sydney.
Yes, everything is good. You may proceed.
Okay, it's a success!
Yey!Thank you so much! You're such a big help.
Do you need help with anything else?
No,that would be all. Thanks again!
Alright, have fun next weekend.
I need to check the weather in Anaheim, CA.
The average temperature for that day should be 78 degrees Fahrenheit, and there should be a 29 percent chance of rain.
Okay, that sounds good. I need to find a room.
I found 10 hotels which match your requirements. Anaheim Desert Inn And Suites matches your selection and is a 2 star hotel.
Yeah, that works.
Would you like to reserve a room there?
Yeah, I need a booking.
How many days would you like the reservation for? Would you like to check in on March 1st?
Yeah, that works, and I want the room for two days.
Please confirm the following information: The name of the hotel is Anaheim Desert Inn and Suites. The date of check in is March 1st, and will be for 2 days. The hotel is in the city of Anaheim and you would like 1 room. Is this correct?
Yeah, sounds great.
Your reservation has now been made successfully. Their address is 1600 South Harbor Boulevard.
Does this hotel have wifi?
Yes, it does have wifi.
Thank you for that, that's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
can you check the weather in sd on March 6th?
the weather that day should be 80 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
but how windy and humid will it be?
the humidity will be around 23 percent with an average wind speed of 1 mph.
okay, can you get me a hotel room there with wifi?
there's a 3 star hotel called the bahia resort hotel.
that'll work, can you book it for me?
how many days will it be for?
just for 3 days.
is your check in date on march 6th?
yes.
so you want a room for 1 for 3 days on march 6th and the bahia resort hotel in san diego?
yes that's perfect.
it's been booked.
what's their number and address?
it's on 998 west mission bay drive and their number is +1 858-539-8666.
thanks, that's everything.
have a great day.
Whats it like outside?
In what city?
Sacramento. Look up the weather for March 4th.
94 degree on average. It probably won't rain but there is still a 27 percent chance it will.
Great. Grab me a hotel room there.
I got 10 for you. First up is Best Western Plus Sutter House. It got 1 star.
Get me 2 rooms there for one day, the 1st of March.
2 rooms for 1 day at Best Western Plus Sutter House in Sacramento on March 1st?
That's right. Check if they have wifi.
Your rooms are booked and they do indeed have wifi.
Nice Job, Bro.
Thanks. What up next?
A nap. I all set.
Rest easy then.
what's the weather in las vegas right now?
the average temperature today will be 84 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain.
Okay cool.
is there anything else?
i need to find three hotel rooms there, preferably at a 1 star hotel with wifi.
i found 6 places that could work. how does best western plus las vegas west sound? it's a 1 star hotel.
are there any others?
there's also a 1 star hotel called budget suites of america.
that'll work. can you book the rooms for 4 days?
is march 1st your check in date?
yes.
okay, so you want 3 rooms for 4 days, starting march 1st at the budget suites of america in las vegas?
yes, perfect.
it's been booked.
what's their number and address?
their number is +1 702-638-1800 and they're located on 2219 North Rancho Drive.
thanks, that's everything.
have a good day.
I wanna see the weather in delhi, india
temperature is 99 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 4 percent chance of rain.
how windy and humid is it>
humidity is 21 percent and wind seed is 8 miles per hour
how about on march 6th?
the temperature should be 93 degrees fahrenheit and 0 percent chance of rain
how about march 8th
temperature needs to be 98 degrees fahrenheit and 6 percent chance of rain
I want a room in a hotel
10 hotels there and aloft new delhi aerocity is 4 stars
what is the cost and phone?
+91 11 4565 0000 and $176 per night
I want a reservation
wanna check in march 8th?
1 days and check in 7th of this month
confirm aloft new delhi aerocity and check in is march 7th for 1 day at hotel delhi for 1 room
yes, what is the address and does it have wifi?
address is 5b igi t3 road, delhi - ajmer expressway, aerocity, new delhi
thanks a lot
anything else for you>?
no thank you
have a great timr
check weather in delhi, india
average temperature is 99 degrees and there is 4 percent rain chance
I want a one star hotel
aloft new delhi aerocity is a 1 star place
any other hotels there?
andaz delhi - a concept by hyatt and is a 1 star hotel
any other hotels there?
Bloomrooms @ new delhi railway station is a 1 star place
what is the address and phone?
8591, arakashan road, opp new delhi railway station, new delhi and their phone is +91 11 4122 5666
yes that works
how many days for you?
3 days and check in later today
confirm bloomrooms @ new delhi railway station and check in march 1st for 3 days in delhi hotel for 1 person
I want 3 rooms
Hotel delhi for 3
yes that works
it went through
thank you
anything else for you?
No thank you
have a nice one
I wanna check the weather in ATL on the 13th of March
average temperature is 80 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 2 percent chance of it raining
I wanna find a room in a hotel
There are 10 hotels matching your requirements and the AC hotel by Marriott Atlanta buckhead at phipps plaza is great It's a 4 star hotel
How much is it per night?
the room is $108 per night
what is the phone number please?
the phone number is +1 470-231-3030
yes that is great
wanna reserve a room at a hotel?
I want a room for two days and the check in date is the 3rd
Confirm Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza and check in is March 3rd and the reservation is for 2 days and the hotel is Atlanta and the number of rooms is 1
yes that works. Tell me the address
The address is 3600 Wieuca road northeast
thanks a lot
Can I help with any other matter?
no thank you
Have a great day
Please can you find me a weather forecast for Nairobi, Kenya, on March 7th.
On that day, the average temperature should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 8 percent chance of rain.
That sounds acceptable, so can you find me a hotel to stay in there?
I recommend Azure Hotel Nairobi Westlands, a nice 5 star hotel.
What's its address?
It's on Lantana Road.
What else could you recommend?
Crowne Plaza Nairobi is a nice 4 star hotel.
Please search for other options, I just need one room.
You could try Crowne Plaza Nairobi Airport, a nice 4 star hotel.
I am happy with that suggestion, so could you make a reservation for one day, starting on March 4th?
So to confirm, you want me to book 1 room at Crowne Plaza Nairobi Airport, in Nairobi, and you'll check in on March 4th and stay for 1 day. Is this okay?
Yes, go ahead.
The hotel has been booked.
Tell me the address, please?
It's at First Freight Lane Jomo Kenyatta International Airport.
Is wifi available there?
No, it isn't, I'm afraid.
Well, thanks all the same, I'll leave it at that for now.
Have a good day!
Can you check the weather in Seattle, WA on today.
It should be an average of 74 degrees with a 32 percent chance of rain.
I'd like to find a hotel there.
I found 10 hotels. The Ace Hotel Seattle has good reviews. It is a 2 star hotel.
What's the phone number?
It's +1 206-448-4721.
What is the cost?
It is $44 per night.
What are some other options?
Belltown Inn is another well reviewed 2 star hotel.
What's another one?
The Best Western Plus Pioneer Square Hotel Downtown is a 3 star with good reviews.
That one sounds good. I'd like to make a reservation for four days on March 1st 2019. I'd like 2 rooms.
Please confirm: You would like to reserve 2 rooms for 4 days at the Best Western Plus Pioneer Square Hotel Downtown, Seattle on March 1st.
That is right.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Thank you so much.
Is there anything else you need?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
I want to know the weather.
What city's weather would you like to know?
The weather in Chicago.
The average day temperature is 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of precipitation.
Alright, I need to get a hotel there.
There are 10 hotels that match. The Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago downtown is a nice hotel with a 3 star rating.
I prefer a 1 star hotel that has wifi. What hotels match that?
Ace Hotel Chicago is a nice hotel with a 1 star rating.
Yeah, that works for me.
Do you want me to book you a room?
Yes, I'd like to book a room.
Will you be checking in on March 1st?
Yeah, that's a good check in date.
How many days will you need the room?
I'll need it for 4 days. And I need 2 rooms.
I'll book you 2 rooms at Ace Hotel Chicago in Chicago with a check in of March 1st for 4 days, is that correct?
Yes, please book it. And what's the cost per night?
I've booked you the rooms. The cost is $216 per night for a room.
Thanks a lot. That's all the help I need right now.
Alright, take care.
I like to check the weather on march 5th.
On which city you like to check the weather?
I want to check weather in KL.
100 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day and 5 percent chances of rain fall.
Fine. I like to book a room in a hotel there and i want to book 1 room.
There is a nice 5 star hotel called Alila Bangsar.
Do you know any other hotel that i may like?
There is a nice 4 star hotel called Aloft Kuala Lumpur Sentral.
This is perfect for me. I like to book a hotel room.
Reservation is for how many days? Is march 5th is your check in date?
This is okay for me. I want to book the room for 3 days.
Please give confirmation details: Hotel name is Aloft Kuala Lumpur Sentral which is in Kuala Lumpur. Date of check in is march 5th and reservation is for 3 days. Reservation of room is 1.
No, i need the room for 2 days and date of check in is 4th of this month.
Please give confirmation details: Date of hotel check in is march 4th and booking is for 2 days.
This is perfect for me.
Your booking is done.
Can you tell me its address and what is the room cost per night?
No. 5, Jalan Stesen Sentral, 50470 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan and room cost is $156 per night.
Thank you very much.
Do you need any other help?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a great day.
Will you check the weather in El Cerrito on the 12th?
Average temperature is 88 degrees with 18 percent chance of rain.
NYC?
Average temperature is 70 degrees with 4 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy?
Humidity is 17 percent and average wind speed is 7 miles per hour.
Great. Will you find a hotel there?
I found 10. 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge is a 4 star hotel.
Sounds great. Will you reserve a room for one day.
Check in on March 12th?
the 10th.
Please confirm 1 room for 1 day at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York on March 10th.
Yes.
I've reserved the room.
Does it have wifi? How much per night?
$112 per night with wifi.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
I need to check what the weather's like in Anaheim, Ca.
No problem. The average temperature in Anaheim for the day is 78 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Awesome, thanks. Can you find a hotel room for me out there? I need something rated at least 1 star.
Okay, I found 10 hotels matching your requirements. How about the Anaheim Desert Inn And Suites. It's really nice hotel rated at 1 star.
Yeah that sounds great. I'd like to go ahead and make the reservation now. Make me a reservation for 1 room please.
Are you checking in on March 1st?
Yes that's right.
How many days will you be staying?
Book the room for four days.
No problem. Please confirm the following for me: Make a reservation for 1 room at the Anaheim Desert Inn And Suites in Anaheim on March 1st. The total stay will be for 4 days. Correct?
Yes, thank you so much.
Your reservation is complete.
Thank you! That's all I need for now. Thanks again!
Thank you! Have a good day.
Will you check the weather in Sacramento, CA on March 7th?
Average temperature is 80 degrees with 22 percent chance of rain.
Fine. Will you find a three star hotel with wifi?
Courtyard By Marriott Sacramento Midtown, a 3 star hotel.
Great.
Want to reserve a room?
Yes.
How many days? Check in on March 7th?
1 room for 1 day with check in on the 3rd.
Please confirm 1 room for 1 day at Courtyard By Marriott Sacramento Midtown in Sacramento with check in on March 3rd.
Yes. How much per night?
I've completed your reservation. $297 per night.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you check the weather for March 2nd?
Which city do you want to check?
I would like to check the weather in Washington D.C. please.
The average temperature will be 82 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Will there be wind and humidity?
There will be around 16 percent humidity with an average wind speed of 6 miles per hour that day.
Ok, please find me a hotel there.
There is a 3 star hotel called Arc The.Hotel that is very nice.
Are there any one star hotels with three rooms?
Yes, there are 9 of them. There is a nice 1 star hotel called the Cambria Hotel Washington D.C. Convention Center.
Can you tell me the cost of the hotel per night and if it has wifi?
Fortunately the hotel has wifi and the cost of the room would be $261.
Can you find any other hotels that might suit me?
There is a nice 1 star hotel called Capitol Hill Hotel that you would like.
Ok, that sounds good, can I reserve it?
Are you checking in on March 2nd?
Yes, that date will work.
And how many days will you be staying.
I just want the room for one day please.
Please confirm you would like to reserve 3 rooms for 1 day at the Capitol Hill Hotel in Washington D.C. on March 2nd.
Yes, that sounds good!
I have made your reservation.
Can you tell me the cost and the phone number for the hotel please.
Yes, the phone number is +1 202-543-6000 and the room costs $306 per night.
Ok, thank you!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thank you, that is all I need for now.
Ok, have a great day then!
Can you check the weather in Los Angeles on 9th of this month?
It's 94 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 13 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid it's going to be?
Humidity is around 20 percent and the average wind speed should be 9 miles per hour.
Ok, please find me room in a hotel.
I found a 2 star hotel and it's Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills.
That's fine.
Would you like to reserve a room?
Yes.
For how many days?
For 3 days.
Will you check in on March 9th?
I want it next Tuesday.
Okay, you want to reserve 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles on March 5th for 3 days. Please confirm.
Yes, whats's the phone number and rate per night?
Reservation done. Phone number is +1 323-852-7000 for only $234 per night.
Thank you.
Do you still any other help?
No, thanks.
Enjoy your day.
What is the weather going to be like in Toronto, Ontario on the the 9th?
It should be 67 degrees fahrenheit with 0 percent chance of rain.
And how windy?
About 10 miles per hour.
That sounds ok.
Would you like anything else?
I need one room at a four star hotel to stay in when I get there.
There are 10 suitable matches. There is a nice 4 star hotel called bisha hotel toronto.
Is there anywhere else that I can stay?
Cambridge suites toronto is a wonderful 4 star hotel.
Do they have wifi?
No, they don't.
What is the price to stay a night and the contact number?
The number is +1 800-463-1990 and the price is $136 a night.
Yes, that would be right.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I need to reserve the hotel.
Is March 9th a good day for you to check in? How many days would you like to stay?
Just one day and I would be checking in on the 3rd of March.
You want 1 room at Cambridge Suites toronto in toronto for March 3rd for 1 day?
Yes and what is the address?
It is located on 15 richmond street east. I made the reservation.
Thanks a lot. That would be it.
Enjoy your day.
I would like to check the weather in Sacramento on March 10th.
The temperature for that day should be 90 degrees fahrenheit on average with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Sure, that is fine. I would like to find a hotel room there.
I have 10 hotels that should fit what you need. Best Western Plus Sutter House is a nice 1 star hotel.
That sounds great. Make me a reservation.
Would you like to check in on March 10th?
No, I want to check in on the 7th.
How many days do you need the room for?
I need the room for 1 day.
Could you confirm that you want to check into Best Western Plus Sutter House on March 7th or 1 day in Sacramento? You need 1 room, right?
Yes, that is all correct.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you. That is all I needed at the moment.
Have a good one.
I want to see the weather in LAX for the 3rd.
The average temperature is 89 degrees for that day. There is a 0 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I want a hotel room in LA.
Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills is a 2 star hotel you might want to stay at.
What else is there? Change it to a 4 star hotel. I want just one room
I found 10 hotels for you. One 4 star hotel is Beverly Hills Marriott.
Are there other hotels I may like?
Another 4 star hotel is Crowne Plaza Los Angeles Airport.
What's the number?
The number is +1 310-642-7500.
Does it have wifi?
Yes, it does.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, do it.
For how many days is it for?
I want it for 2.
Are you checking in on March 3rd?
No, the check in day is today.
Please confirm the reservation details: Booking 1 room at the Crowne Plaza Los Angeles Airport in Los Angeles for 2 days on March 1st.
Yes, that works great!
Your reservation has been confirmed.
What's the address?
It is 5985 West Century Boulevard.
Thank you, that's all I want.
Have a great day!
Tell me what the weather will be in Fairfield on the March 8th.
The temperature will be 92 degrees with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather be on the 12th of this month?
The temperature will be 82 degrees with only a 7 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity level and the wind speed?
The humidity will hover around 23 percent with the wind averaging 9 miles per hour.
Tell me the weather in Fresno, CA.
The temperature will average 73 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
I see. Find me a hotel to stay there.
Search revealed 5 results. Doubletree By Hilton Hotel Fresno Convention Center is a 3 star hotel.
Is wifi available?
Wifi is available there.
That works for me.
Do you need something more?
Make a reservation for 1 day and three rooms with an arrival date of the 6th of this month.
You want 3 rooms for 1 day at the Doubletree By Hilton Hotel Fresno Convention Center in Fresno and want to arrive on March 6th. Is that right?
That is right.
Your booking is complete.
What is their contact number and how much does each night cost?
You can contact them at +1 559-268-1000 and the cost is $252 a night.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need something more?
No, not right now. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you tell me the weather in Paris, France?
Sure. The average for the day is 77 degrees, and there's a 26 percent chance it will rain.
What about the humidity?
32 percent.
And the wind?
7 miles an hour.
Great, can you get me a hotel room there?
Sure. There are 10 possible hotels, including the 4 star hotel Ac Hotel by Marriott Paris Porte Maillot.
What is its daily cost?
$80.
Perfect. Please book me a room.
On March 1st? How long are you staying there for?
Yeah, March 1st. And 3 days.
You want 1 room at Ac Hotel by Marriott Paris Porte Maillot in Paris from March 1st and for 3 days?
That's right. Can you tell me its number and address?
The room as been booked. Its number is +33 1 84 82 49 09 and its address is 6 Rue Gustave Charpentier 75017.
Thanks a ton. I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day
What's the weather forecast for 14th of this month?
In which location should I check the weather forecast?
Please check in London.
The expected average temperature for the day is 81 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 14 percent chance of rain.
Great, sounds good. Please help me find one room in a two star hotel over there.
45 Park Lane is a nice 2 star hotel.
Please get me the hotel address, as well as the cost per night.
They are at 45 Park Lane, and the room price is $230 per night.
Yes, that works for me, and I'd like to reserve the room for two days, checking in on 9th of this month.
Okay. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like to reserve 1 room at 45 Park Lane in London for 2 days, and your check in date is March 9th.
That is correct.
I have successfully made your reservation.
Please let me have the hotel's phone number.
The hotel's phone number is +44 20 7493 4545.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. That will be all for now.
Thank you, and have great day!
I want to check the weather condition on March 8th for which I need our help.
Do you have any preferred City in your mind to search for the Weather condition on that day?
Search it in Vegas.
The Temperature level will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be 17 % chances for rain fall there on that day.
Thanks for that information. In need one more favor from you that you have to check for booking of rooms in a two star hotel there.
Checked and found that Best Western Plus Las Vegas West is the best Hotel and it is 2 star Hotel as you required. What about your opinion?
That is nice and I need to reserve it now.
Can you confirm the check-in date as March 8th?
No, Check-in will be later today.
Let me know the number of days you want to book the rooms?
Make it for 3 days.
Please confirm to book 1 room for 3 days in the Hotel Best Western Plus Las Vegas West from March 1st in Las Vegas.
That is confirmed. Check out whether they have wifi connection there and get me the address details for my reference.
Their address is 8669 West Sahara Avenue and they have Wifi there. Your booking was successfully confirmed in that hotel.
Thanks for your help.
Anything else you need?
No, thanks, that's all.
Have a great day.
I want to check the Weather condition on a particular date which is the 13th. Please help me to check the same.
Do you want to check the weather condition in any particular City that you have in your mind. Please tell me the same to check for.
Check it in Chicago.
please note that the average temperature level will be 65 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 37 % for rain fall there on that day.
That is nice. Do one more favor to me. Please search for a nice Hotel in that area to book two rooms for me.
Found 10 results and what about your opinion on Ac Hotel By Marriott Chicago Downtown with 3 stars? This is the best I think.
I need to search for something else.
How about a Hotel named Ace Hotel Chicago with 4 stars?
Search for some thing else with 4 stars and also I need wifi connection there.
Ambassador Chicago is the nice Hotel and the same have 4 stars. What about your opinion to proceed further.
Get me the contact number and address details to decide.
The address is 1301 North State Parkway and the contact number is +1 888-506-3471. Hope this information will help you to decide.
Yes, this will be perfect for me.
Shall I proceed with Room reservation there?
Yes, do the same for the check-in date Thursday next week.
For How many days?
I want to book it for only one day.
Please confirm to book 2 rooms for 1 day from March 7th in the Hotel Ambassador Chicago in Chicago.
I want to change the booking from the 5th.
Need your final confirmation to book the Hotel Ambassador Chicago from March 5th.
That is confirmed to proceed and let me know the cost for this reservation per night?
It costs $348 per night and I have booked your rooms successfully.
Thanks for the same.
Anything else you need?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I'd like to find out the weather in LA on March 3rd.
The average temperature in LA for that day should be 89 degrees F with a 0 % chance of rain.
Sure, that sounds right.
Did you need help with anything else?
I'd like to find a room in a hotel there. I'm looking for a 1 star hotel.
I found 10 hotels for you. One nice 1 star hotel is Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills.
How much is it per night and what is their number?
The room will be $156 a night and their number is +1 323-852-7000.
That sounds good to me. I'd like to make a hotel reservation.
For how many days did you want to make the reservation for
I'd like to book 1 room checking in 3rd of March 2019 for 1 day.
Please confirm you're booking 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills in Los Angeles checking in March 3rd for 1 day.
Yes, that sounds right. Where is the hotel located and does it have wifi?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The hotel is at 6399 Wilshire Boulevard and it does have wifi.
Thank you.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thank you again.
Have a nice day.
What's the weather like in Nairobi, Kenya?
The average temperature is hot! 105 degrees Fahrenheit with 0 chance of rain
Ok, book me 1 hotel room there in a 1 star hotel
I found 10 hotels for you. Azure Hotel Nairobi Westlands is a 1 star hotel
How much is that? Do they have wifi there?
A room is $135 per night and wifi is not available
Any other options?
Crowne Plaza Nairobi is also a 1 star hotel
What else do you have? Let's try a 4 star hotel instead
I have 8 options for you. Crowne Plaza Nairobi Airport looks good and is a 4 star hotel
Ok book that please.
Arriving March 1st? Staying for how long?
Yes that's right. I'll stay just 1 day
Please confirm: 1 room at the Crowne Plaza Nairobi Airport in Nairobi, arriving on March 1st for 1 day
Yes please book it
Your reservation is confirmed
Do they have wifi there? What was the cost for that?
The hotel does not have wifi. Your room is $468 per night
Ok good. Thanks
Take care.
What's the weather on March 10th?
In which city?
Check in Toronto.
The average temperature will 73 degrees and there will be a 26 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I want to book a hotel room there.
I found 10 hotels nearby. There's a 3 star hotel called Best Western Plus Toronto North York Hotel & Suites.
What's their address and phone number?
They're at 50 Norfinch Drive and can be reached at +1 416-663-9500.
Sounds good to me.
Should I book you a room?
Yes, please do.
Will you check in March 10th?
No, on the 3rd of March and I'll need 2 rooms.
For how many days?
Just one day, thanks.
Please confirm you'd like 2 rooms at the Best Western Plus Toronto North York Hotel & Suites in Toronto for 1 day starting March 3rd.
Yes, that's right.
I've made your reservation.
Thanks, that's all for now.
Have a good rest of your day.
Can you see what the weather will be in Delhi, India on the 6th of March?
Sure, the average temperature will be 93 degrees with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy do you know?
The wind will be about 7 miles an hour average.
Okay, help me find a hotel room there.
Sure, there are 10 that may work. How about a 4 star hotel called Aloft New Delhi Aerocity?
Sounds great. I'll need three rooms for 4 days starting March 1st.
I'll book it as soon as you confirm that you want 3 rooms at the Aloft New Delhi Aerocity in Delhi, India for 4 days starting on March 1st.
Yup. How much is it a night and does it have wifi?
Your rooms are booked. There's no wifi and its $444 a night.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a good one.
What will the weather be on March 6th in New York?
There is a 26 percent chance of rain that day with an average temperature of 64 degrees.
I need to find a hotel there with wifi.
I was able to find 10 hotels for you. How about 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge? It has a 4 star rating.
That will work. I want to make a reservation for three room and want to check in this Saturday.
How many days should I reserve the rooms for?
We will be staying for three days.
Alright, please confirm you would like to reserve 3 rooms at 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge in New York for 3 days with a check in date of March 2nd.
Yes, that is correct.
Ok, your reservation has been confirmed.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that's it.
Have a nice day.
I want to check about weather condition in a particular area for which I need your help to check the exact level.
Do you have any particular area in your mind to which you need to check the weather condition?
Yes, I want to check it for Paris on particular date that is March 13th. Hope this information enough to search.
Yes, please note that the average Temperature level will be 88 degrees Fahrenheit and 23 % chances for rain fall there on that particular day.
That is nice. I need one more help from you. Can you search for a 2 star Hotel there because I want to stay there for a while and I need 2 rooms.
Found 10 results based on your requirement. What about a Ac Hotel By Marriott Paris Porte Maillot with 2 stars? which is the best I think.
I will decide. Before that I want to know the cost per night for the reservation in that hotel. Do they have wifi there?
No, they do not have wifi connection there and the cost will be $432 per night. Is that okay to you.
No, I want to search some other Hotel with three stars.
Got 9 results. What about Amastan Paris Hotel with 3 stars. Do you need any more information about this hotel to decide?
No, that's enough and the same was okay to me.
Shall I proceed with room reservation at this hotel?
Yes, do it for me now.
Let me know the number of days you are planning to stay there so that I can book the rooms according to your plan.
I think I will stay there for 4 days and book it accordingly.
What will be the Check-in date, whether it is March 13th? or anything else?
Please book the rooms from next Monday.
Need your confirmation to book 2 rooms for 4 days in Hotel Amastan Paris in Paris from March 4th.
Sorry, just now I changed my travel plan and can you book the rooms for three days from 11th of March?
Yes, and need your final confirmation to book rooms for 3 days from March 11th.
That is correct to proceed further.
I have booked the rooms successfully in that hotel.
Thank you so much for your help.
Any more help you need to do?
No, that's enough. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I want to check the weather Condition on March 14th. Can you help me to check the same.
Yes, will check for the same for that day. Do you have any particular City in your mind for which you need to check the weather?
Check it in SF.
The average temperature level will be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 12 % for rain fall there on that day.
That's okay. I have a plan to stay there for a while, can you help me to search for nice hotels?
I got 10 results. What about a Hotel named Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco which is the good one I think and it has 1 star.
Search for something else.
How about a 4 star hotel named Argonaut Hotel?
Let me know the cost and address of this hotel to decide.
Cost for room is $264 per night and the address is 495 Jefferson Street.
I want to search for something else.
What about Beck's Motor Lodge with 2 star? Hope you will like it as it was always in Customer's priority list.
Yes, I also chose the same.
Shall I book rooms in that hotel for you?
Yes, I need to book 1 room for 3 days from next Monday.
Need your confirmation to book 1 room in the Beck's Motor Lodge Hotel in San Francisco for 3 days from March 4th.
Yes, confirmed, g ahead.
I have booked our required rooms successfully.
Thanks for the same.
Anything else you need?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you tell me the weather forecast for March 5th?
In which city?
Check in Moraga.
It is expected to average 77 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Is it supposed to be humid or windy?
Humidity is expected to be 24 percent and wind speeds 1 mile per hour.
Can you also check Atlanta on the March 6th.
It is expected to average 87 degrees with a 25 percent chance of rain.
I'd like to find a hotel there. I'll need 3 rooms and want a 4 star hotel with wifi.
I found 10 hotels that would work. There's the Ac Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza that is a 4 star.
Sounds good. I'd like to make a reservation.
Did you want to check in March 6th? How many days will you be staying?
I just want the rooms for one day the 2nd of March.
Please verify: You would like to reserve 3 rooms for 1 night on March 2nd at the Ac Hotel by Marriott Atlanta Buckhead at Phipps Plaza in Atlanta.
Correct. What is the cost per night? I'd also like their phone number.
The cost is $468 per night and their number is +1 470-231-3030. Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day.
What's the weather going to be like on March 12th?
What city would like to know the weather for?
I want to know the weather for Las Vegas.
The temperature average for the day will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 7 percent chance for rain.
What's the humidity and wind going to be like?
The humidity will be around 22 percent and the wind speed will average at 1 mile per hour.
Okay, nice. Let's find a hotel room there.
The Best Western Plus Las Vegas West is a nice hotel with 3 stars.
What else might be a good fit for me?
The Budget Suites Of America is a nice hotel with 1 star.
Is there wifi at the hotel?
Yes, there is wifi at the hotel.
Can you give me the address? And what's the cost for a night there?
They are located at 2219 North Rancho Drive and it is $105 for a night.
I'm looking for a three stay hotel, is there anything else that might suit me?
The Hampton Inn Las Vegas/Summerlin is a nice hotel with 3 stars.
Okay, that sounds good. Can you book me one room for one day. I'll be checking in next Friday.
I'll book you 1 room at Hampton Inn Las Vegas/Summerlin in Las Vegas with a chien in date of March 8th for 1 day, is that correct?
Yeah, that's correct. Also, does this hotel have wifi, and what's the room cost per night?
I've booked you the room. The room is $87 per night and the hotel does have wifi.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything else from me?
No, thanks so much.
Alright, take care.
I need to know the weather, please.
In which city would you like me to check the weather?
The weather in Fresno for March 6th, please.
The average temperature will by 71 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain in Fresno.
How humid do you think it'll be?
Humidity levels will be around 16 percent.
How windy will it be?
Wind speed will have an average of 3 miles per hour.
Okay. I'l like to find a hotel room in the area.
I see the Doubletree By Hilton Hotel Fresno Convention Center is local and has a 3 star rating.
Do you have any other hotel recommendations?
There's the La Quinta Inn By Wyndham Fresno Yosemite with a 2 star rating.
Cool. That sounds great.
Should I reserve a room for you at this hotel?
Yes, I'd like to make a reservation for two room Monday next week for one day.
To confirm: You'd like to reserve 2 rooms for 1 day on March 4th at the la Quinta Inn By Wyndham Fresno Yosemite in Fresno, correct?
Yes, that's correct.
You hotel reservation has been confirmed.
What's the address of the hotel, and do they have Wi-Fi?
The hotel is located at 2926 Tulare Street, and there is Wi-Fi on the premises.
That's so much for all of your help. That'll be all.
Enjoy your day.
Can you please check the weather for me on this Sunday in Bay Point?
There's a 20 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 72 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK. Please check also for Long Beach on March 12th.
There's a 26 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 90 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be humid?
No. The humidity is forecasted at 4 percent.
Perfect. Can you help me find 1 room in a 1 star hotel with wifi?
There are 10 hotels meeting your criteria. How about the nice 1 star Best Western of Long Beach?
Sounds great. Let's make a reservation for 1 room for 1 day checking in on the 1st of March.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book 1 room for 1 day checking in on March 1st at the Best Western of Long Beach in Long Beach?
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
Can you please tell me the price per night as well as their phone number.
The room is $80 per night and you can reach them at +1 562-599-5555.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thanks again.
Have a great day!
I need the weather for Sydney for March 12th.
The temperature in Sydney for March 12th should be around 101 degrees Fahrenheit. There is also a 2 percent chance of rain.
Good. Can you help me find a hotel in Sydney?
How about the 28 Hotel Sydney? It is a nice 4 star hotel.
That sounds good.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, please. Can you get me 1 room for 1 day?
Would you like to check in on March 12th?
No, I want to check in on March 1st.
Can you confirm the following: You need a reservation for 1 to the 28 Hotel Sydney in Sydney for March 1st. You will be staying for 1 day.
Yep, that works.
Your reservation has been successfully made.
Thank you very much. That's all for now.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
Will you check the weather in Nairobi on March 12th?
Average temperature is 103 degrees with 9 percent chance of rain.
Humidity?
28 percent.
That's fine.
Anything else?
Will you find a hotel room there?
I found 10. Azure Hotel Nairobi Westlands is a 5 star hotel.
Anything with one room?
Crowne Plaza Nairobi, a 4 star hotel.
What's their number? Wifi?
+254 719 096000. No wifi.
Great.
Want to reserve a hotel room?
Yes.
Check in on March 12th? How many days?
Reserve room for one day with check in on 1st of this month.
Please confirm 1 room for 1 day at Crowne Plaza Nairobi in Nairobi with check in on March 1st.
Make that 4 days.
Please confirm 1 room for 4 days.
That's right. How much per night?
$288.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No. That's all.
Have a great day.
I would like to get the weather forecast.
What city do you need the forecast for?
Search in Portland.
The average temperature for the day should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit along with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Okay, then.
Do you need something else?
I'd like a hotel room there.
Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station is a great 3 star hotel.
Could you tell me its phone number?
You can call them at +1 503-200-5678.
What is the address?
The address is 9920 Northeast Cascades Parkway.
Would there be any other hotels that I may like?
Best Western Plus Portland Airport Hotel & Suites is a nice 2 star.
Sounds perfect.
Would you like to reserve a room there?
Yes please.
Will you check in March 1st, and for how many days do you need the reservation?
That sounds good. Make it for 2 days.
Please double check: You want to check in to 1 room at Best Western Plus Portland Airport Hotel & Suites on March 1st for 2 days in Portland?
Yes, that is good, and where is the exact location?
Your reservation was made successfully. The address is 11938 Northeast Airport Way.
Thanks a bunch.
Could I assist you further?
No, that is it.
Have a great day.
Please check the weather.
Which city you want?
I want KL on March 14th.
It's going to be 100 degrees Fahrenheit with 5 percent chance of rain.
How windy it is?
It should be 9 miles per hour.
Okay. Please find me a hotel there.
I got 10 hotels and one is Alila Bangsar which is a 5 star hotel.
It has wifi? And what is the address?
It's at East Side 58 Jalan Ang Seng Brickfields 50470 and they do not have wifi.
Yes, please reserve me a room there.
How many days?
For one only.
Will you check in on March 14th?
On the 11th.
Okay, you want 1 rooms reservation at Alila Bangsar in Kuala Lumpur on March 11th for 1 days only. Please confirm.
Yes.
Reservation done!
Thank you, that's all.
Enjoy your day.
I want to see how the weather is in Philadelphia on March 3rd.
From what I can see the average temperature for the requested day in Philadelphia will be 85 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 21 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me the humidity level there?
The humidity level is expected to be 41 percent.
Alright, fine. I also will need a place to sleep, so find me a room in a hotel there. I want the hotel to be a four star one, and I am in need of just one room. Please make sure the hotel is a 4 star one.
There are 10 hotels which match what you requested. One of the hotels is Hilton Philadelphia At Penn'S Landing which is a good 4 star hotel.
That suits me well. I would like for a reservation to be made at this hotel.
Will you be going at the hotel on March 3rd? Can you tell me the number of days that you are going to stay at the hotel?
That seems right. I will need the room at the hotel for two days.
Can you please confirm that you want to book 1 room for 2 days at the Hilton Philadelphia At Penn'S Landing hotel in Philadelphia for March 3rd?
That is what I want.
Your room has been booked.
I appreciate it very much. Thank you, that would be all.
Have a good time!
Hi, could you help me check the weather on 5th of this month please?
Sure, where would you like me to check at?
In Moraga, please.
The average temperature should be 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Sure, how about in LA?
The average temperature should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain.
I see, thank you! Could you help me find a room in a one star hotel, preferably one with wifi?
Sure, there is a 1 star hotel called Ac Hotel by Marriott Beverly Hills.
What is the nightly cost of staying there?
This will cost you $156 each night.
Sure, this sounds great.
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
Sure, please do so.
Would you intend to check in at March 5th?
No, I would be checking in on Monday next week.
And how many days do you intend to stay?
Just for one day will do.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 room at Ac Hotel By Marriott Beverly Hills on March 4th for 1 day in Los Angeles.
This is fine with me, thanks!
Your reservation has been made!
May I have their address please?
Sure, you can visit them at 6399 Wilshire Boulevard.
I see, and what is their phone number?
You can contact them at +1 323-852-7000.
Thank you! That is all the help I need for now.
Sure, have a great day ahead!
What's the weather like in Fresno, Ca?
It's 72 degrees fahrenheit with a 2 % chance of rain
Thanks, I'd like to find a 2 star hotel room please.
There are 5 hotels that match. How about the Doubletree by Hilton Hotel Fresno Convention Center, it's a 2 star.
Sure.
Shall I reserve a room?
Yes, I want 3 rooms for 2 days on the 1st of this month.
Please confirm your booking: 3 room reservations for a total of 2 days in Fresno at the Doubletree By Hilton Hotel Fresno Convention Center on March 1st
Correct, thanks.
This reservation is complete.
Awesome, thanks for all your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you check the forecasted weather in San Diego on 12th of this month?
Sure. That day will have a 10 percent chance of rain, and the average temperature will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit.
Could you give me the wind and humidity forecast too?
Average wind speed will be 5 miles per hour. Humidity is expected to hang around 27 percent.
Alright, thanks. I'd like to find a hotel room in the area too.
I've found 10 hotels that might work for you. There's a 3 star hotel called Bahia Resort Hotel. How does that sound?
Give me their address. Also, do they have Wi-Fi?
They do have Wi-Fi and can be found at 998 West Mission Bay Drive.
Okay, I like the sound of that. I'd like to make a reservation there.
How long were you planning on staying? Was the first day you needed March 12th?
I just need the room for 1 day, and that's the 6th of this month.
Let's quickly go over the details. You want to reserve 1 room for 1 day at the Bahia Resort Hotel in San Diego. You'll be checking in on March 6th.
That's right. Give me their phone number.
I've made the reservation. Their phone number is +1 858-539-8666.
How much will the room cost per night?
The hotel charges $252 a night.
Thank you. I don't need anything else at the moment.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
What will the weather be like in London on March 14th?
The temperature should be 81 degrees with a 14 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. I want to find a hotel room.
I found a 5 star hotel named 45 Park Lane.
I want to make a reservation for one room for 2 days the day after tomorrow.
Please confirm the following: 1 room for 2 days on March 3rd at 45 Park Lane in London.
Yes.
Your reservation is complete.
Thank you so much, that is all.
Have a good day.
Could you give me the weather forecast for March 7th?
For what city please?
In Portland please.
In Portland, the chance of rain is 32 percent with a temperature of 72 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thanks. May I reserve a hotel room please?
Of course. May I suggest Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station, which has a 3 star rating?
How much is it and where are they located?
The hotel is $114 nightly and the location is 9920 Northeast Cascades Parkway.
Perfect, let's book that please. I'd like it for 2 days starting on the 6th of this month.
Confirming 1 room on March 6th at the Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station in Portland for 2 days total.
Great, thanks. Do you know if they have wifi and what their phone number is?
The hotel does have wifi and the phone number there is +1 503-200-5678. The reservation is complete.
Thanks for your help.
My pleasure. Anything else right now?
Not right now, no.
Thank you, take care!
I would like you to check the weather for March 5th.
What city should I check?
check Inverness.
The temperature on average should be 77 degrees fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Could you check the weather in New York on March 10th?
The average temperature will be 59 degrees fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Okay, look for a hotel froom for me in Inverness.
I have 10 hotels that should be suitable. 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge is a nice 4 star hotel.
That sounds great. Make me a hotel reservtion for 3 days, checking in on March 1st.
Could you confirm that you want to check into 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge New York on March 1st for 3 days, and that you need 1 room?
Yes, that is good. What is the address?
Your reservation has been made. The address is 60 Furman Street, Brooklyn.
I appreciate it. Thank you, that is all I need.
Have a great day.
Can you please check the weather for 13th of this month?
Sure, in which city?
Tiburon but check for the March 10th.
There's a 15 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 85 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK. Now please check for San Francisco.
There a 12 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 93 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK. Now let's search for three hotel rooms there in a hotel that provides wifi access.
There are 10 hotels matching your criteria out of which I recommend Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco, a very nice 1 star location.
Sounds good to me.
Do you want me to place a reservation for you?
Yes, please do.
Will you be checking in on March 10th.
No, I want to check in on the 7th.
How many days will you be staying?
I need the reservation for 2 days.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book 3 rooms for you at Amsterdam Hostel San Francisco in San Francisco, checking in on March 7th and staying for 2 days?
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
Thanks. That will be all for now!
Have a nice day!
I want to check the weather condition in Atlanta on March 7th for which I need your help.
The average temperature level will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 26 % for rain fall there on that day.
Thanks for that information. I want to stay there for a while and I need your help to search for the Hotel there.
I found 10 hotels that suit your requirements. What about the one at Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Buckhead At Phipps Plaza with 4 stars?
What is the cost per night in that hotel and let me know their address for my reference.
The cost is $108 and the address is 3600 Wieuca Road Northeast. Do you need any other information .
Not for this hotel. Can you check for something else based on my requirements?
Yes what about a hotel named Ac Hotel By Marriott Atlanta Downtown with 3 stars?
Hotel with two stars is enough, search for something else.
Found 8 and the one is Aloft Atlanta Downtown with 2 stars. Hope you will like it.
Yes, I like the same.
How can I help you further.
Please help me to make a reservation in this hotel.
Shall I go with check-in date as March 7th?
No, book it from the 4th.
to which date you want to book the hotel?
I want to book it for four days.
Need your confirmation to book 1 room in the hotel Aloft Atlanta Downtown in Atlanta for 4 days from March 4th.
Make it for two rooms.
Please confirm to book 2 rooms from March 4th.
That is confirmed to proceed and also let me know whether they have wifi connection there.
I have reserved your required rooms successfully and the hotel has wifi.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a great day.
Hello! On March 11th, please may I know how the weather will be?
To which location you wish to know the weather forecast?
Please check for SD.
Sure. It's mostly sunny and there is a less chance of 5 percent rain and the average temperature of the day will be around 88 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thank you so much for the information you provided.
Do you need any other details?
Yup! I wish to book a room in some good hotels there? Can you help me on this?
Sure, I have found 10 hotels that suits your need. There is a 3 star hotel with a good rating named Bahia Resort Hotel. Do you wish to stay here?
Do they have internet or wifi connection available?
Yup! They do have wifi.
Is there any other good hotels available nearby for I'm looking to book one room.
Yup, there are 9 hotels available in total. One among them is a 2 star hotel named Best Western Mission Bay. Do you wish to stay here?
Any other hotels which costs economical?
Yup, there is a 3 star hotel, Best Western Plus Bayside Inn which provides all amenities. Do you wish to stay here?
Please can I have their contact number? Is wifi included in the package?
Yup, its included and you can reach them at +1 619-233-7500.
Yup! Sounds great. Please can you reserve a room for one day in this hotel?
Sure! When will be your check in? Is it on March 11th?
By Tuesday next week, I will check in.
Please confirm me that you wish to reserve 1 room for 1 day at hotel Best Western Plus Bayside Inn located in San Diego on March 5th. Is that right?
Yup, you're correct. Please can I have their address as well how much they charge per night?
They are located at 555 West Ash Street and it costs $168 per night. Your reservation for the room is successful.
Thanks a bunch. I'm all set.
Have a wonderful day.
Please check the weather in LA for me
Current weather in LA is 76 degree with 28 percent chance of raining
ok, please also find me a hotel
I found 10 hotels. What about 2 star hotel by ac hotel by marriott beverly hills
ok, perfect
do you want me to reserve a room for you
yes please book two rooms for me for one day checking in today
please confirm your booking for 2 rooms for 1 day with ac hotel by marriott beverly hills in los angeles on march 1st
yes that works, what is their phone number
Your room is booked. their number is +1 323-852-7000
How much does it cost and do they have wifi
The hotel does have wifi and it will be $116 per night
Thank you
anything else i can do for you
no that's it
have a nice day
Hello! Can you tell me the weather forecast for SD on March 4th, for I've to travel for a trip?
Yup, the probability of raining is 7 percent and the average temperature would be 75 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is the day going to be windy or sunny or cloudy?
There will be an average wind speed of 9 miles per hour for the day.
What will be the expected humidity on March 4th?
It would be around 18 percent.
Thanks for the information. Please I wish to book 2 rooms in a good 2 star hotel. Can you help me?
Yup. There is a 2 star hotel with good rating named Bahia Resort Hotel. Do you wish to stay here?
Do they have contact number?
Yup, you can reach them at +1 858-539-8666.
Sounds good. Please can you reserve rooms in this hotel?
sure. How long you wish to stay here? When will be your check in? Is it on March 4th?
Nope, I would check in on 1st of this month and want room for 1 day.
Please can you confirm the booking details. I've booked a hotel Bahia Resort Hotel in San Diego for 1 day and your check in date will be on March 1st and 2 of you would stay there. Is that right?
Yup, you're right.
Okay! I've made the reservation successfully for you.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything to assist with?
Nope, thanks much.
Have a wonderful day.
What will the weather be like in Toronto, Canada on 1st of March?
The average daytime temperature should be around 58 degrees and there is a 13 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed will be around 9 miles per hour.
Okay great. I'd like to find one room in a 2 star hotel to stay in while im there.
There are 10 hotels that meet your criteria. There is a nice 2 star hotel called Best Western Plus Toronto North York Hotel & Suites.
Ok great. I'd like to reserve a room for one day only.
Will you be checking in on march 1st?
Yes that's perfect.
Okay so you would like to make a reservation for 1 room at the Best Western Plus Toronto North York Hotel & Suites in Toronto on March 1st and you will be staying for 1 day.
That's correct. What is the address and phone number of the hotel?
Your reservation has been confirmed. Their address is 50 Norfinch Drive and their phone number is +1 416-663-9500.
Thanks for your help. I don't need anything else right now.
Enjoy your day.
Tell me what the weather's like in Long Beach, CA.
The average temperature for the day will be around 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid is it going to be?
The humidity should be around 40 percent with wind speeds around 2 miles per hour.
Okay thanks. Can you find me a hotel out there? I'd like to 3 rooms at a hotel with at least 1 star. They must have wifi.
I've found 10 hotels matching your search. How about the best Western Of Long beach? It's a nice 1 star hotel.
Okay, that sounds good to me.
Can I help you with anything else?
Yes please. I'd like to make a hotel reservation for the 1st of March.
How many days will you be staying?
I need the room for two days.
Alright, please confirm the following details: Booking 3 rooms at the Best Western Of Long Beach in Long Beach for 2 days on March 1st. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right. How much will it cost per night?
The rooms are $138 a night. Your reservation has been completed. Enjoy your stay!
Okay, what's the address and phone number?
The address is 1725 Long Beach Boulevard and the number is +1 562-599-5555.
Okay, thank you very much! That's all for now.
Have a great day!
Can you check the weather in Portland on March 11th for me?
There is a 42 percent chance of rain with average temperature of 63 degrees.
Does it give the expected humidity and wind speed?
Humidity is only around 38 percent. Wind speed forecast at 7 mph
Thank you for your help
Is there anything else I can do?
Can you help me find a room at a 3 star hotel there.
There are 10 hotels. Aloft Portland Airport At Cascade Station is a highly recommended hotel and has a 3 star rating.
Can you tell me some others please?
Canopy By Hilton Portland Pearl District is also a 3 star hotel in the area.
Do they have wifi available? What is the cost per night?
Yes wifi is available in all rooms. Rooms are $84 per night
Yes that one sounds good. Can you make a reservation for me? I need 1 room and will check in on the 7th of March.
How many days will be staying?
I will stay for 2 days/
To confirm: You wish to reserve 1 room, for 2 days at Canopy By Hilton Portland Pearl District, in Portland, check in date of March 7th. Is this correct?
Yes it is
Your reservation is confirmed
Thanks for your help
Is there anything else I can do?
No thank you, that is all
Have a wonderful day
I'd like to check the New York weather for the 11th of March.
That day we'll have an average temperature of 65 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain will be 34 percent.
Sounds good. I'd like to find a hotel to stay at.
You might enjoy 1 Hotel Brooklyn Bridge, which is rated 4 stars.
Could you tell me their telephone number?
Of course, it's +1 833-625-6111
What other hotels could you recommend? I'd like something that has Wi-Fi and a 1 star rating.
There are 9 possibilities. You might like 1 Hotel Central Park, which is rated with 1 star.
And the telephone number?
Sure, their number is +1 212-703-2001.
Anything else that you can recommend?
Another good 1 star hotel is 11 Howard.
That should work. Let's book a room there please.
Is that for a March 11th check in? And for how many days?
I plan to check in on the 3rd and stay for 3 days.
Confirming a 3 day reservation for 1 room at the 11 Howard hotel in New York, checking in on March 3rd.
Great, thanks. What is the room charge per night and also the address of the hotel?
The hotel is located at 11 Howard Street and the room costs $192 per night. I have successfully reserved your room.
Thanks for all your help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I think you've done everything.
I'm happy to help.
I'd like to check the weather please.
What city would you like to check the weather for?
Please can you tell me the weather in Long Beach.
The average daytime temperature is around 80 degrees and there is a 17 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy there?
The average wind speed is likely to be 2 miles per hour.
Okay thanks. I'd like to book a two star hotel with wifi while I'm there.
There are 10 hotels that meet your criteria. The Best Western Of Long Beach is nice and it has a 2 star rating.
Can you give me their phone number and address?
Their address is 1725 Long Beach Boulevard and their number is +1 562-599-5555
Okay that sounds perfect. I'd like to book two rooms for check in on March 1st. This will be for one day only.
Okay sure so to confirm: You would like to book 2 rooms at the Best Western Of Long Beach in Long Beach on March 1st and you will be staying for 1 day only.
That's perfect.
Your booking has been confirmed.
Thank you, that's all for now.
Enjoy your day.
I need to check the March 1st for weather please.
Which city are you looking in?
The San Carlos weather.
The average temp is 90 degrees and there is an 8 percent chance of percipitation.
How about in LAX
The average temp is 76 degrees with a 28 percent chance of percipitation.
Okay, I need a house to stay in there.
I found 10. One is located at 1020 South Figueroa Street and is rated 4.2.
That sounds great.
Would you like to reserve it?
Yes please make a reservation.
How many people? Will you check in on March 1st? Which date will you check out?
Perfect, I will check out on the 2nd of march and there is 1 person.
Okay I have a house for 1 from March 1st to March 2nd in Los Angeles, correct?
Yes that sounds good.
Your house has been booked.
Thanks, that's all I need.
It was my pleasure, enjoy!
I would like to know something about the weather
Where do you want me to look?
The place is nairobi, kenya
Well then. The temperature is around 105 degrees fahrenheit and the probability of rain is 0 percent
It's fine with me so please, look for a house there
The results tell me that there are 10 possibilities. I've found a house located at 14 riverside westlands at 4.5
do they offer laundry service?
Yes, they do
Tell me about the other houses. We're in 2 people
I've found another 9 options. One is rated 4.5 and it is situated at 9042/1044 tower avenue jomo kenyatta intl airport
Look further for a 4.5 rating or even higher
I've found 8 options, one of them is at chiromo road and the rating is 4.5
this one can work for me, check out is on 5th of march
is check in on march 1st?
yes, exactly
Confirm me the acquired data before I go on. You're looking for a house for 2 in nairobi and you will check it on march 1st and check out on march 5th
No, check out date is wrong, the right one is march 8th
confirm again please. Check in date is march 1st and check out date is march 8th
yes, you can proceed now
Everything's fine, you got what you asked
I'm happy to know that, just tell me the price and the phone number.
the total is $2,030 and the number is +254 703 049000
thank you, I can't wait to see it
Glad I could have helped you, take care.
I want to check the weather on the March 13th in SD.
on that day the average temperature will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit there is a 19 percent chance of rain.
OK great I want to find a house to stay there.
There's a nice house located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, la Jolla California 92037, United States which is rated 4.6.
That sounds really good.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I want to book this house and I want to check out on 13th of March 2019.
When would you like to check in is it on the March 13th and how many people will be staying in your group?
I was checking on the 6th of this month and there will be 2 people.
Ok let's confirm the details, the location is San Diego there are 2 people in your group. The check-in date is March 6th and the checkout date is March 13th.
Ok great can you just tell me the total price and does this place have a laundry service?
Your reservation was successful. There is a laundry service and the total price is $2,520.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can do?
No that will be all.
Thank you have a nice day.
I need to check the weather for 3rd of this month.
What city should I check?
Newark.
The temperature should be 87 degrees with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about Anaheim on the March 14th?
The temperature should be 88 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The average wind speed should be about 6 miles per hour and the humidity is around 44 %.
Thanks. I want to find a house to stay at.
There are 10 houses available. There is a nice one with a 4.2 rating at 1050 West Ball Road.
This is a great house!
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes please, there will be four people. I want it from March 10th to the 14th of March 2019.
Please confirm the following reservation: 4 people renting the house in Anaheim from March 10th to March 14th.
Awesome, yes.
Your reservation is complete!
Thank you for everything.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No thank you.
My pleasure. Bye!
I need the weather for San Diego on March 3rd.
It will be 82 degrees with a 7 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed is 11 miles per hour.
How about Portland on March 4th?
The temperature will be 68 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain.
I also need a house for 2 with a 3.8 rating and laundry.
I have a 3.8 at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street.
What is the phone?
The phone is +1 503-281-6111.
Do you have another?
I have a 3.8 at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue.
I want that house.
Do you want to book it?
Yes go ahead and book.
What is the check out date?
Check out is the 5th.
Is check in March 4th?
Yes that is correct.
Confirm Portland for 2 for March 4th to March 5th.
Yes, can I get phone?
You are confirmed and phone is +1 503-220-1339.
Thank you for everything.
Is there anything else?
That is all I need.
Thanks for using us, goodbye.
I want to know how the weather will be on 9th of March.
Can you tell me the city where you want to check the weather?
I want to check the weather in ATL.
The average temperature in ATL for the day is expected to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 18 percent chance of rain.
Alright, fine. I need also a place to stay there, so I want to find a house.
There are 10 houses which you might consider staying. One of the good houses with a rating of 4.3 is at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest.
Can you suggest some other houses?
Another house I can suggest has a rating of 4.5 and is located at 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast.
This house seems as what I want.
Do you want to book this house?
Yes, I want to make a reservation for this house. I will go there on next Friday, and I will need the house till the 11th.
Can you tell me how many people are in your group?
It's just 1 person. I will be leaving on 12th of this month.
Can you please confirm that you want a house for 1 person in Atlanta, and you will go there on March 8th, and will be needing the house till March 12th.
That seems right.
Your house has been booked.
Can you check if the house has laundry service? How much will this house cost me?
I can confirm that the house has laundry service, and it will cost you $576.
I appreciate your help. That would be all.
I enjoy helping you. Good bye!
What's the weather like in Portland?
75 degree average temps with a 9 percent chance of showers.
Noted. Locate a house there.
Here are the first 10, 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street it has a 4.2.
Do they offer a way to wash clothes there? Is there a number I can get?
They do provide a laundry service and can be reached at +1 503-281-6111.
That's the house I want make it so.
May I assume you are checking in March 1st? How many will be staying there and for how long?
Yes you can and the two of us will be staying unitl the 3rd of this month.
In summation the 2 of you will arrive in Portland. March 1st and leave March 3rd, yes?
You got it.
The mission accomplished.
Appreciate it, I won't be needing anything else.
I was happy to be of service. Good day.
I need to find out the weather in Bodega Bay for the 9th.
The average temperature for Bodega Bay that day should be 74 degrees F with a 14 % chance of rain.
What is the humidity expected to be?
The humidity should be around 16 percent.
OK, what about the weather for Paris on the 11th of this month?
The average temp in Paris that day should be 93 degrees F with a 24 % chance of rain.
Sure, that sounds right. I'd like to find a house to stay there.
I found a nice house for you at 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005 with a 4.5 rating.
Did this place have a contact number and does it have laundry service?
Their number is +33 1 46 34 14 80 and they do have laundry service.
This house sounds great. I'd like to book a house for one checking in next Thursday.
On which day were you planning to check out?
I'd like to check out on 13th of March.
Please confirm location of Paris for 1 person checking in March 7th and checking out March 13th.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thank you for your assistance.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thank you again.
It has been my pleasure. Goodbye.
I would like information on the weather
In which city?
I need information about Atlanta, GA
Average temperature: 86 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 28 percent
Ok, good. I need a house with laundry service, a house with rating 2.8 or higer to stay there
I found a house at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest with rating 2.8
Can you tell me the phone number?
Sure! +1 404-524-5555
This house is fine for me.
Do you want to book this house?
Yes, I want, thanks!
Is the arrival date March 1st?
Yes, It is.
How long will you stay in the house?
Until this Sunday
For how many people?
For two people
A house for 2 people in Atlanta, from March 1st to March 3rd. Do you confirm?
No, I need for 1 people, until 5th of March
A house for 1 people until March 5th. Is it correct?
Yes, now It is correct
Your house is booked!
Thanks for helping, It's all
Have a good day
I'd like to check the weather.
Sure thing. In which city would you like to check the weather?
Tell me the weather in Atlanta, GA.
Okay. The average temperature for the day is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
Okay, that's not bad. Can you help me find a house to stay in out there?
No problem. I found 10 houses that match your search. How about 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest. It's a really nice house rated at 4.3 stars.
That house sounds great to me! Go ahead and book it for me. I need to check in 1 person for today and I'd like to check out on the 5th of this month.
Okay. Please confirm the following for me: Book a stay for 1 person at a house located in Atlanta from March 1st until March 5th. Correct?
No, I need rooms for three people and i'm checking out on the 4th of March.
Okay sorry about that. Please confirm the following: There are 3 people in your group and you will be checking out on March 4th. Correct?
Yes, that's right.
Okay, your reservation is a success.
Alright, thanks for your help. That's all I need.
It was my pleasure. Have a great day!
Get me the weather for March 12th.
For what city?
For SD.
The weather shows an average temperature of 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Okay, can you find me a house in SD? I need something for 2 people with a rating of 4.1 or higher.
There is a nice house at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States. It has a rating of 4.1.
This house sounds great.
Do you want to book a reservation?
Yes. I want to check in on the 6th of this month and check out on the 13th of this month.
Please confirm that you are booking a house for 2 people in San Diego. You will be checking in on March 6th and checking out on March 13th. Is this correct?
No, change that check in date to the 8th.
Confirming that you will be checking into the house in San Diego on March 8th?
Yes, great. Can you give me the total? Also, get me the phone number.
Your total will be $2,200. The phone number you requested is +1 855-287-2682. Your reservation is successful.
Thanks. That's all for now.
My pleasure. Goodbye.
Please check the weather on March 2nd at Pinole
There is a 14 % rain chance and the temperature will be 74 degrees
ok, how about on March 4th in SD
There is a 7 % rain chance and the temperature will be 75 degrees
ok, find me a house there to stay
There is a 4.6 rated property at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United states
sounds great
Should i reserve it for you?
Yes please, book it for 3 people with checkin on Sunday this week and we will leave on Friday next week
Please confirm: Booking a house in San Diego for 3 people with checkin on March 3rd and checkout on March 8th
That is right
Your booking is done
thanks, thats all
Have a good day! bye
I would like the forecast in Kuala Lumpur for March 12th please.
It will be around 98 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent possibility of precipitation that day.
All right. Can you help me locate a place to stay?
I found a house located at 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan with a 3.8 rating.
Great. Can I book that please with a check in next Friday?
And when would you like to check out?
That will be on the 14th.
For how many guests?
Just one please.
Confirminf a March 8th check in in Kuala Lumpur for 1 guest, checking out on March 14th.
Actually let's change the check in to March 11th.
Please confirm your check in date of March 11th and your check out date of March 14th.
That's fine, thanks. What's the price please?
It's $378 total and the reservation was successful.
Great, I'm all set.
Thank you so much.
What will the weather be on the next Monday in Vancouver?
It will be 58 degrees with a 49 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the humidity and wind speed?
Humidity will be 54 per cent and the wind will gust at 8 miles per hour.
I see. Find me a house to stay in there.
Search revealed 10 results for you. 1018 Granville Street has a 4.2 rating.
What else do you have?
1025 Granville Street has a 3.9 rating.
That works for me.
Shall I reserve a room for you?
Yes, reserve a room for me.
How many people will there be? Will you be arriving March 4th and what date are you departing the house?
There is one person that is arriving March 4th and leaving next Thursday.
You want a room for 1 person in Vancouver from March 4th to March 7th. Is that right?
No, change that to 4 people.
There will be a total of 4 people checking in on March 4th. Is that right?
No, check in is on the 3rd of March and the departure date is the 10th of March.
You want to arrive March 3rd and depart March 10th. Is that right?
Yes, that is right.
Your order is complete.
Thanks a lot. That is all for now.
I'm glad to help. Bye for now.
I want to check the weather condition for the date 3rd of March. Can you help me to check the same.
In which Area, I have to check the weather condition on that day.
Check it in Paris.
please note that the average temperature level will be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 6 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about Humidity and Wind Speed level there on that day?
Humidity is around 18 % and the wind speed will be 4 miles per hour in average.
Thanks for that information on weather. Now, I have a plan to stay there for a while for which I need your help to find a house with 4.3 or higher rating also with laundry Service. Do you search for the one as per my request?
I have searched and found a nice house at 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005 with rating 4.3? What about your suggestion on this house?
Do you have any different houses in your list?
Yes, another one at 1 Rue de Libourne, 75012 with rating 4.3. What do you think on this house, whether this will work or not?
I need some time to decide and please get the contact number of this place for my reference.
It is +33 1 44 67 34 00.
Do you have some other houses?
How about a house at 10 Rue De Passy, 75016 with rating 4.3?
That sounds good. Thanks.
How can I help you further?
Please make a booking of this house for 1 person.
What is the check-out date?
It is March 10th.
Shall I go with the check-in date as March 3rd?
Yes book it from that date.
Please confirm to book a House for 1 person in Paris from March 3rd to March 10th.
That is correct, please go ahead.
I have booked the house successfully.
Thank you and that's all for now.
Have a good day.
Tell me what the weather will be on the March 1st.
What city do you want to know the weather in?
I want to know the weather in the District of Columbia.
The temperature will be 75 degrees with a 13 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the humidity level?
Humidity will hover around 36 percent.
I see. I need a house for 2 people with a rating of 4.0 near there.
Search revealed 10 results. I found a house at 1 Washington Circle Northwest, Washington, District of Columbia 20037, United States that has a 4.0 rating.
What is their phone number?
You can reach them at +1 202-872-1680.
That works for me.
Shall I reserve the house for you?
Yes, reserve the house for me.
Are you arriving there on March 1st?
Yes, I will be arriving then.
What date are you departing the rented house?
I will departing the rented house on the 4th of this month.
You want a house for 2 people in Washington D.C. from March 1st to March 4th. Is that right?
Yes, that is right. What is the final cost and do they offer laundry service?
Your house has been booked. They do have laundry service and the final price is $900.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
It was great helping you. Bye for now.
What's the weather going to be like Delhi on March 12th?
It'll be around 96 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy or humid?
Wind speeds will be around only 1 mile per hour, and the humidity is going to be about 15 percent.
Got it. I'd like to find a house there that has laundry service.
I found a nice house at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi that has a rating of 4.5 stars.
Is anything else available? Only 1 person will be living there.
I found another house at 12, Mangalam Place, Sector 3, Rohini, New Delhi. This one has a rating of 4.3 stars.
Okay, that one sounds great! I'd like to book it from the 5th to March 12th.
Okay, so just to confirm: you'd like to book this house in Delhi for 1 person from March 5th to March 12th. Is that right?
Right. What's their phone number? And what will the price be?
Your reservation has been confirmed! Their phone number is +91 11 4340 0000. It is going to cost $1,680.
Great, thank you! That's all I needed.
Enjoy your stay!
what's the weather gonna be like in sydney on march 5th?
the temperature should be 96 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
how humid and windy will it be?
the humidity will be around 21 percent and the wind should be 11 miles per hour.
okay, can you find me a place to stay there for 4 people with laundry service?
i found a house with a 4.1 rating over on 1 columbia court, baulkham hills new south wales 2153, australia.
is there anything else?
there's another house that got rated a 3.6 over on 1 hosking place.
what's their number?
the number is +61 1300 633 462.
that'll work. can you book for the 1st of march until march 5th?
you want me to book a room for 4 in sydney from march 1st to march 5th?
yes
it's been booked.
thanks.
is there anything else?
no that's it, thank you.
you're welcome, bye.
What is the weather forecast for New York on the March 6th?
The average temperature is forecasted to be 64 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain that day.
OK. I need to find a house there.
I found a house at 100 Greenwich Street that is rated 4.4.
Do they offer laundry service there?
Yes, laundry service is available.
Sounds good.
Would you like me to reserve the house for you?
Yes, please make a reservation.
Do you plan on checking in on March 6th? Also, please let me know when you will be checking out.
I will check in next Tuesday and leave on the 12th of this month.
How many people will be staying at the house?
Two of us will stay there.
You would like to reserve a house for 2 people in New York from March 5th to March 12th, is that correct?
Yes. How mnuch will it cost in total?
Your reservation has been confirmed and the total cost is $2,604.
Can you give me their phone number?
Sure, their contact number is +1 917-409-0800.
Thanks. I'm done for now.
Happy to help! Have a great day.
Can you check the weather for me?
Which city do you want me to check for?
I would like to know the weather in Paris.
The expected average temperature will be 77 degree Fahrenheit with 26 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you help me in finding a house there to stay?
I found a nice house located at 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005 with 4.5 ratings.
Can you look for any other house?
I found a nice house located at 1 Rue Daunou, 75002 with 4.2 ratings.
Can you look for any other house?
I found a nice house located at 1 Rue de Libourne, 75012 with 4.4 ratings.
Can you check whether they have laundry service?
Yes, They have laundry service.
Okay. This house sounds great to me.
Do you want me to make a reservation for this house?
Yes, Please reserve the house for one people with the check in date as later today and check out date as March 3rd.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a house for 1 people in Paris with the check in date as March 1st and check out date as March 3rd.
Yes, That is correct. Can you tell me the total price and their contact number?
The total price is $720 and the contact number is +33 1 44 67 34 00.
That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day. Bye!
I'd like to check the weather for March 5th.
In which city should I check the weather in on that date?
Check Seattle, please.
The average temperature in Seattle on that day will be 61 degrees with a 18 percent chance of rain.
How windy do you think it'll be?
Wind speed is at an average of 15 miles per hour.
Great. I'd like to find a house to stay in with laundry service.
I was able to locate 10 houses for you. One of which is located at 1000 1st Avenue with a rating of 4.5.
What is their contact number?
The number is +1 206-957-1000.
Sound great. I'd like to reserve the house, please.
Would you like to check-in on March 5th? And which day would you like to check-out?
I'd like to check-in on the 4th and check-out on the 6th of March, please.
How many people will be with you?
There will be 3 people with me, and we'd like to check-out on March 11th.
To confirm: You'd like to check-in on March 4th with 3 people in Seattle and check-out on March 11th, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
You reservation has been confirmed.
Thank you so much for all of your help.
Is there anything else you'd like me to help you with?
No, that'll be all. Thank you.
My pleasure. Enjoy your day.
I need to check the Vancouver weather on the 5th of March please.
The average temperature is 62 and there will be a 56 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks. I need to find a house to stay in.
There are 10 available. The first is located at 1018 Granville Street and is rated 4.2.
Can you get me a contact number for that house please?
Their number is +1 877-972-6378.
The house is perfect.
Would you like me to reserve it for you?
Yes please, for one person. I need to check in today.
Which day will you be checking out?
On the 7th.
Okay you need the house for 1 from March 1st through March 7th in Vancouver, correct?
Yes that is correct.
Your reservation has been made.
Thank you for your assistance.
Can I help with anything else?
No that will be all thanks.
My pleasure, have a fabulous day.
I want to check the weather condition particularly on March 7th. Can you check it for me?
Yes, I can. Is there any particular City in your mind to search for the weather condition?
Yes, check it in Nairobi, Kenya.
Temperature level will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there will be 8 % chances for rain fall on that day.
What about humidity?
It will be around 23 %.
Thanks for all the information. Now I want to book a house there to stay for a while and it is for 3 people. In need one with laundry service and the rating should be 4.4.
Found 10 results. How about an house at 14 Riverside Westlands and their rating is 4.4?
Sounds nice. Book it for me.
Do you want to book the house from the date March 7th? and what is your Check-out date?
Book it from this Sunday to the 10th.
I need your confirmation to book a house in Nairobi for 3 people from March 3rd to March 10th.
Please change the booking from March 4th to March 11th.
Need your final confirmation to book the house from March 4th to March 11th.
confirmed. Please continue. What is the total cost and their contact number?
Their contact number is +254 787 657000 and t he total price is $3,640. Your booking of house was confirmed.
Thank you for your help
Anything else you need?
No, thanks and that's all.
Have a nice day.
I'd like check the weather for 14th of this month.
In what city?
Portland, make it for the March 3rd.
The temperature should average 70 degrees with a 22 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Wind speed should average 5 miles per hour.
What about the humidity?
Around 10 percent.
Good. I'd like to find a house to stay in there.
There are 10 houses available for your search. 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street is nice. It has a 4.2 rating.
What is the phone number?
+1 503-281-6111.
Sounds great. I'd like to reserve it.
How many in your group? What day would you want to check out>
It's just for one. I'd like to check out March 8th.
And is the check in date March 3rd?
That is correct.
To confirm: You would like to rent the house in Portland for 1 person from March 3rd through March 8th.
Yes, that's right.
I have confirmed your reservation.
Does it have laundry service? What will be the total price?
It does have laundry service. The cost will be $1,740.
Thank you. That's all I need.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
Verify weather conditions for Long Beach, CA on the March 2nd.
Sure, average temperature will be around 77 degrees that day. Be advised there will be a 15 percent chance of rain.
Alright, let's search for houses for rent in the area.
I found a house available with a 4.0 rating located at 1133 Atlantic Avenue.
Find the telephone number for me. Also inquire if there is a laundry service available.
Great news, this place has a laundry service. The telephone number there is +1 562-590-8858.
Are there more options? I would prefer houses with a rating of 4.5 or higher.
I located one with a 4.5 rating located at 285 Bay Street.
Give me more options please.
3771 North Lakewood Boulevard has a 4.5 rating.
This sounds great!
Awesome, would you like to reserve this house?
Yeah, let's book it.
Would you like to check in on March 2nd? How many people will be checking in with you? Do you know how long you would like to stay for?
Just 2 people in my group! Let's check in on March 1st and stay until next Friday.
Alright, just confirm a reservation being made in Long Beach for 2 people. Check in will be March 1st and check out on March 8th. Is this correct?
Yes, that's right. I will require a telephone number and find out if there is a laundry service available.
Great news, I was a able to successfully create your reservation. The telephone number is +1 562-425-0010. There is a laundry service available.
Thank you, that will be all.
Ok, It was my pleasure to help. Have a wonderful day.
What is the weather on March 10th in Gilroy
The average temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit and 18 percent chance of rain
What about the wind and humidity?
The average wind speed is 1 miles per hour and humidity around 28 percent
What about in London, England?
the average temperature is 92 degrees Fahrenheit and 6 percent chance of rain
What about Saturday this week
the average temperature is 80 degrees Fahrenheit and 18 percent chance of rain
Okay. Now find me an house to stay there
I found 10 houses. How about 1 Addington Street and it's rating is 4.3
Is there any other houses?
How about 1 Baffin Way and it's rating is 4.1
That's perfect
Do you want to reserve that
Yes please reserve the house
Do you check in on March 2nd? When do you want to check-out?
No I want to check in today and check-out on next Monday
What is the number of people in your group
I want for 2 people
Please confirm this: The location is London. There are 2 people in your group. The check-in date is March 1st and check-out on March 4th
No please book for 1 person and check in on 2nd of March 2019
Please confirm this: There are 1 people and check in date is on March 2nd
That's perfect.What is the total cost?
Reservation successful. The cost is $528
Thank you so much. That's all for now
You are welcome.
Could you tell me the weather in Paris please?
Today's average temperature in Paris is 77 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 26 percent.
What's the humidity and how windy will it get?
It is 32 percent humidity with a wind speed averaging 7 miles per hour.
Thank you. Could you help me find a place to stay with a 4.2 rating or above?
I have 10 options for you. A nice possibility is 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005, which is rated 4.2.
Okay, I'd like to reserve that please for one person.
Is that for a March 1st check in? And when would you like to check out?
Yes, March 1st check in and check out on the 8th please.
Confirming a check in for 1 person on March 1st in Paris with a March 8th check out.
I think I should change that to 2 people and let me move it to next Thursday please.
Confirming 2 guests for a March 7th check out.
That sounds perfect.
The booking is complete.
Thank you so much, I am all set.
Have a great day, thank you.
Get the current weather please.
I would love to. Which city should I check?
New Delhi please.
Sure thing, Average daily temperature in New Delhi is 99 degrees. Please be advised there is a 4 percent chance of rain.
Find out wind factor.
you should expect about 8 miles per hour.
Alright, What about on the March 11th.
Average temperature is 103 degrees. There is a 7 percent chance of rain.
Locate a house for rent for me there.
Sure thing, I found one available at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, new Delhi. This unit has a rating of 4.5.
This house sounds wonderful.
Can I assist you with anything else?
Of course, I would like to book this rental. I would have a check out on March 13th.
Would your check in date be March 11th? How many people will be with your group?
Just for two people. check in would be on the 9th.
Could I have you confirm you would like to book a reservation for 2 on March 9th through March 13th in Delhi. Is this correct?
Yeah, go ahead. this is great. Please get me the number for this place and what would the total for my stay be?
Great news, I was able to successfully complete your reservation. the phone number is +91 11 3955 5000. The total would be $1,120.
Thanks,that will be all for now.
My pleasure. Enjoy your day.
I want to verify the weather condition on the 5th.
In which city do you need to check the weather?
Weather at Vancouver, BC on March 8th.
The average temperature is 64 degree Fahrenheit. 24 percentage of possibility of rain.
What is the humid is expected? How windy it is?
The average wind speed is 9 miles per hour and the humidity is around 8 percent.
Thank you. I wish to search for a house to stay there for two persons. The required rating is 4.0 or higher. I need the laundry service there.
I searched and found 10 houses. The one great house is situated at 1100 Granville Street with the rating 4.0
What is their contact phone number?
The contact number is +1 604-669-7070
Whether do you have some other houses?
The one great house is situated at 111 Robson Street Street with the rating 4.0
It is a great house.
Shall I make a booking for this house?
yes.I am interested in booking a house.
When will you check out?
I wish to check our on 8th of March 2019.
Are you willing to check in on March 8th?
I wish to check in on 5th of March 2019.
Kindly ensure that, on March 5th, room is booked at Vancouver for 2 persons are in your group and in your check out date is March 8th.
Yes. It will be good. What is the total cost and shall I have their contact number?
Your booking is successful. The total cost is $1,575 and the contact number is +1 604-602-1008
Thank you so much for your help.
Shall I do anything else for you?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
It's my pleasure to help you. Take care. bye.
I would like to know what's the weather like
Where do you want me to look?
The city is Phoenix
The temperature is 89 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 15 percent
Got it. Now I need you to do something else for me, I need you to look for a house over there
You have 10 options, one of them is a lovely house situated at 10 east thomas road, it has been rated 4.6
Tell me about the other options, look for 4.4 rating or even higher
Antoher option is a house located at 132 south central avenue, the rating is 4.4 as you asked.
Look again for a different options.
I've found this place at 15620 north clubgate drive, scottsdale arizona 85254, united states. They rated it 4.4
It must be a really awesome house
I can book a visit for you if you want it.
Yes, that would be great.
Is March 1st a good day for you?
Yes, the visit is for one person only.
Do you know the check out date?
Yes, it's tuesday next week
Confirm me the acquired data. You want to book a visit for 1 person to see a house in Phoenix. You will check in on March 1st and check out on March 5th
Yes, that's what I wish to do. One last thing, can you tell me the price for it and if laundry service is available?
Your visit has been scheduled. I can confirm you that the place has laundry service and the price is $736
That's all for now, bye bye
It has been an honor to help you, enjoy the rest of your day
I want to check the weather condition in particular area like San Rafael. Can you check it for me?
The average temperature level will be 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 2 % for rain fall there on that day.
Also check the Weather condition in Nairobi, Kenya on Saturday this week.
please note that the average temperature level will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 6 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about the Humidity level in that area on that day?
The Humidity is around 20 %.
What will be the Wind speed on that day.
The average wind speed will be around 2 miles per hour.
Thanks for this information. I have a plan to stay there for a short period and I need to book a house for me. Can you search for comfortable one.
Found 10 results and the one is located at 14 Riverside Westlands with rating 4.5. Hope this house is convenient to you.
Do they have laundry service in their place? check it for me.
Yes, they have Laundry services are per your requirement. Shall I book this house
Before that please get me the contact number for my reference. Check the same.
The contact number is +254 787 657000. Any more information you need about this house?
That's enough and I want to book this house for one person for the check-out date on Thursday next week.
Shall I go with the check-in date as March 2nd?
No, please book this house from later today.
Need your confirmation to book a house at Nairobi for 1 person from March 1st to March 7th.
That is great help and thanks for the same.
Your booking of house was confirmed successfully.
That's all for now. thanks.
Have a nice day.
Whats the weather like in London, UK
The temperature is expected to be 81 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain
What about wind and humidity?
Wind speed is expected at 10 miles per hour with 35 percent humidity
Find me a house to stay there.
I have a 4.3 rated house at 1 addington street
That sounds great
Should I book the house for you?
Yes please. The check in is on 1st of march
What is the check out date and number of people?
Just one, checking out on 2nd of march
Booking the house in london for 1. Check in on march 1st and checking out on march 2nd
Yes, sounds perfect.
Booking is confirmed
Thanks a lot. That would be all.
Have a great trip!
Can you tell me the weather?
For what city?
I need the weather for San Fran.
The temperature is suppose to be 91 degrees with a 29 percent chance for rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
The wind speeds will get up to 2 miles per hour and th humidity is 49 percent.
Okay. Can you find me a house for one person with a 4.3 or higher rating that provided laundry service in San Fran?
1100 Market Street Hotel Entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street has a 4.3 rating.
What else do you have?
I have a house located at 138 King street that has a 4.3 rating.
What else do you have?
How about 2222 Market street, it has a 4.3 rating.
Yes, please reserve that one.
When would you like to check out?
Can you schedule check out for next Friday?
Did you want me to make your check in date March 1st?
Yes, that is fine.
Okay, so I have you down for a house for 1 person in San Francisco. You will check in March 1st and check out March 8th, correct?
Yes ma'am that is correct.
Great! Your reservation has been completed successfully.
Thank you so much.
Do you need anything else?
No that's it for me.
Enjoy your trip.
Can you help me check the weather in DC as I will be travelling there?
The temperature for the day is 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Sure, could you help me find a house to stay there please?
There is a nice house located at 1 Washington Circle Northwest, Washington, District of Columbia 20037, United States with a 4.3 rating.
Any alternatives? I would prefer a 4.4 rating and above and the reservation is for one person.
Sure, there are 9 available houses, one of which is 1201 K Street Northwest, Washington, District of Columbia 20005, United States with a 4.4 rating.
That sounds great! Does this place have laundry service and how do I contact them?
You can contact them at +1 202-289-7600, and unfortunately, this place do not provide laundry services.
I see, could you find one with such a service and a rating of 4.5 or higher then?
Sure, there are 8 houses available, one of which is 1331 Pennsylvania Avenue Northwest, Washington, District of Columbia 20004, United States with a 4.5 rating.
This is perfect for me.
Any further assistance?
Could you also help me book this house?
Sure, will you be checking in on March 1st and when will you be checking out?
I will be checking in on March 1st and checking out on March 2nd.
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 for the house at Washington D.C. from March 1st to March 2nd.
May I know the total cost and their contact number? This reservation is fine with me.
Your reservation has been made. You can call them at +1 800-228-9290 and this will set you back at $384.
Sure, that is all the help I need.
No worries, enjoy your stay!
Can you check the weather.
For which city?
Please check Delhi.
The average temperature will be 99 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you find me a house nearby?
12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi is a nice home with a 4.5 rating.
Are there other options?
12, Mangalam Place, Sector 3, Rohini, New Delhi has a 4.3 rating.
Sounds great. I would like to book it.
How many people are in your party? Will you be checking in on March 1st and when will you check out?
Please check on March 5th for 3 people.
Please confirm you want me to book for 3 people in Delhi on March 1st through March 5th.
Okay. That works.
Your reservation was a success.
Thanks. That's all for now.
You're welcome. Goodbye.
Could you please check the weather forecast in Toronto, Ontario.
There is a 13 % chance of rain and the average temp will be 58 degrees fahrenheit.
Will it be windy or humid?
about 25 % humidity and the ave wind speed will be 9 mph.
right fine. Now I want to find a house there.
There is a good on at 108 Chestnut Street with at 4.2 rating.
Any other options, needs to be at least 3.8.
There is one with a 3.8 rating at 111 Lombard Street.
Does it have a laundry service?
Yes it does.
This house is fab.
Would you like to book it?
Yes I would like to book this house?
Which day are you checking out?
I want to check in later today and check out on Tuesday next week.
How many people will be staying with you?
three in total.
To confirm then that is a booking for 3 people in Toronto from March 1st to March 5th.
Yes that is perfect. How much is it in total?
Your booking is confirmed and all in it costs $1,344.
Thanks so much.
Anything else you need?
No thank you.
You are very welcome. Goodbye.
Will you be my weather checker, please?
Sure, what city's weather do you want to know about?
New York City is where it's at!
Okay. The weather is forecasted as 37 percent rain and 66 degrees for the temperature average during the day.
Yay, I love that kind of weather. Let's see if I can rent a house there for a few days.
Certainly. Among the 10 options available, I show a house address of 100 Greenwich Street that you may want to consider. The house is scored at 4.4.
Do you have the phone number to that house?
Yes. The number there is +1 917-409-0800.
Okay. Now, what about a house with laundry service. I'm just realizing I'll need that for sure.
All right. Of the 9 available houses, do you think you might like this one, rated 4.2, at the address 100-15 Ditmars Boulevard, East Elmhurst, NY 11369, USA?
Well, you hit a winner there, I believe.
Are you ready to reserve that house?
Indeed, I am. Let's set that up now, please.
I'm on it, and give me your check-out date.
I have to be leaving out of there on March 6th.
Are you planning to check in on March 1st, and what's the number of guests?
That date works fine and reserve the house for just me, 1 person, please.
Got it. Do you want to confirm a reservation for 1 person at the home in New York, checking in on March 1st and checking out on March 6th?
Correct-O. Let's set it up.
Your reservation for the house rental is confirmed.
Very good. Now give me the phone number there and the amount I have to pay, please.
The listed phone humber is +1 718-512-0248, and your rental total is $750.
Your efficiency is so appreciated.
Would you like any other assistance?
That's all for now. Can't thank you enough.
No worries. Take care.
I need to check the weather.
What city should i check?
San fran.
it looks like it'll be 91 degrees with a 29 % chance of rain.
Okay, thanks.
Do you need anything else?
I need to find a house there for three people with at least a 4.2 rating.
I found one with a 4.2 rating at 1100 market street hotel entrance is at 45 mcallister street.
That's great.
Would you like a reservation?
Yes please.
What day are you checking out, and would you like to check in at march 1st?
Yes. I'd like to check out next thursday.
Please confirm: You want a house for 3 in san francisco from march 1st to march 7th.
Yes, exactly. What's the price and their contact number?
The price is $2,448, and the number is +1 415-735-7777
Thank you for the help
My pleasure, have a great day!.
What the weather like in Philadelphia, on March 1st?
81 degrees is the average. You have only an 8 percent chance of rain.
Will my new hairdo survive the conditions.
Well, the wind will be blowing at only 4 mph.
But humidity affect this do too.
That will come in at 23 percent.
Well, get me a house to stay in there first.
I suggest 1 logan Square. It has a 4.4 rating.
What else do you have?
100 North Christopher Columbus Boulevard. 4.1 rating.
What is the number there. Do they do laundry for you?
+1 215-627-7900. No laundry service.
Well then find something else.
1001 Intrepid Avenue. A 4.5.
This is a hell of a crib.
Should I book it?
Yes. From March 1st 2019 to the 5th. Just for me, 1 person.
OK. 1 person for the Philadelphia house from March 1st until March 5th. Correct?
Yes, thats right.
You got yourself a pad.
They have laundry service right?
That is right.
And how many bucks is this? Also, get me the digits.
$372. +1 215-644-9200.
Thanks a lot.
You're welcome. I'm ready to go again.
Rest up. I'm set.
Will do. Thanks.
My trip is coming up soon. Can you check the weather for me in Portland, OR?
Sure - looks like the average will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
That's pretty good. Can you look up houses to stay around there also?
Sure - I found 10 available in the area currently. There's one at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street with a 4.2 rating. How about that?
What else is there? I forgot to mention it needs to have laundry service and a 4.0 rating or higher.
I also found a place at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue, which has a 4.0 rating.
What's the number for that place?
Their number is +1 503-220-1339.
What are some other houses you found?
There's also a nice looking one at 11550 Northeast Airport Way with a 4.0 rating.
That one sounds perfect, actually.
Ok, do you want to make a reservation?
Yes, please do.
Are you checking in on March 1st? And when are you checking out?
Yeah, we'll be checking in March 1st and leaving on March 8th. Also, make it for 2 people.
Ok. Just to confirm, you want to reserve this house in Portland for 2 people from March 1st to March 8th. Is that right?
Yes, that's perfect.
Ok, your reservation went through.
Great, thank you!
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all. Thanks.
No problem. Have a good day.
Can you tell how the weather is going to be on the March 2nd in Fresno, CA?
The temperature wll reach 85 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it going to be?
The wind speeds will reach 11 miles per hour with the humidity level at 25 percent.
Okay, now I need you to find me a house there to stay.
How about 1055 Van Ness Avenue. It has a 3.8 approval rating.
What is the phone number?
The number that is listed is +1 559-233-6650..
Do they provide laundry services?
Yes they do.
Okay, this house will be good.
You want me to reserve this house for you?
Yes please and thank you.
When would you need to check out?
I will be leaving Thursday next week.
Did you want to check in March 2nd? Would this reservation be just for you?
Yes the reservation is just for one and I need to check in March 1st.
okay, that would be a room for 1 in Fresno. You will check in March 1st and check out March 7th, right?
No, I am sorry can you change the check in day back to the 2nd of March 2019 and it will be for four people.
Okay, you want this reservation for 4 people to check in on MArch 2nd?
Yes, that is correct.
Great you are all confirmed.
Thank you so much for all of your help.
The pleasure was all mine.
Can you check weather for the March 12th?
What city do you want?
The city is Portland, OR.
The temp is 72 degrees and 16 percent chance of rain.
How windy and how humid?
The wind is 11 miles per hour and the humidity is 30 %.
I want a house there for two.
I have one at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street rated 4.2
Do you have others?
I have a 4.5 at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue.
I like that one.
Do you want to reserve?
Yes, check in is March 6th and check out is March 13th.
Confirm location in Portland for 2 for March 6th and check out is March 13th.
Yes and does it have laundry service?
You are confirmed and it does have laundry.
What is the phone?
The phone is +1 503-220-1339.
That is all I need.
Thanks for using our service.
I want to know how the weather will be on the 8th in Nairobi.
From what I can see the weather in Nairobi for your requested date should be 100 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 2 percent chance of raining.
Alright, fine. Though I will need a place to sleep, so find me a house there. I need the house for three people, and I also need to have landry service. Keep in mind that the house I am looking for should have a rating of 4.4.
From the results I can see that there is a good house at 14 Riverside Westlands with a 4.4 rating.
This house seems as what I want. I would like to book this house.
Can you tell me the day when you will leave, and can you confirm that you will go there on March 8th?
I would like to go there on Wednesday next week, and I will be leaving on the 11th.
Can you please confirm that you want a house for 3 people in Nairobi, and that you will go there on March 6th, and you will leave the house on March 11th?
That's right. Can you please give me their phone number? Please tell me how much it will cost me.
Your request for a booking of the house has been been made. If you want to call them you can at +254 787 657000, and it will cost you $1,650.
I appreciate your help. That would be all.
I take joy in helping you. Good bye.
What are the weather conditions in SD on 7th of March?
The temp will be about 90 degrees and there's only a 17 % chance of rain.
What do you think the humidity will be there?
It'll be normal, around 36 percent.
Great weather right? Get me a house to stay in there. Only for one.
You have 10 options. One of the best is 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States. Their rating is 4.6.
Wow, so cool.
What will you need next?
Let's book a house.
Which date do you want to check out? What about March 7th?
Fine, I want that until the 10th of March.
To confirm, 1 checking in on March 7th, leaving on March 10th in San Diego?
Yes, I think that's cool.
You're reservation is set.
What will my total bill be? What is the contact number, so I have it for my records?
Your total will be $552 and the phone to contact is +1 855-287-2682.
Perfectly marvelous, thanks.
Will you need more help today?
No, I'm good thanks.
I live to serve you, and only that.
What's the weather like in London?
The average temperature today is 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain
Will it be humid?
Today's humidity is about 35 percent
Will it be windy?
The forecast is for an average wind speed of 10 miles per house
Ok good. Find me a house to stay there
I found 10 houses for you. The one at 1 Addington Street looks nice, with a 4.3 rating
Anything else available?
There's a good one at 1 Baffin Way with a 4.1 rating
Ok. Book that one please
You'll check in on March 1st? Checking out when?
Yes, arriving on the 1st and checking out on the 4th
And for how many people?
Just one person
Please confirm: a stay for 1 person in London, arriving March 1st and departing March 4th
Yes that's right
I've confirmed your reservation
Thanks so much
Anything else I can do to help?
Nope. That's all thanks
Always happy to help. Take care.
Please check the weather in New York.
Todays average temperature is 66 degrees faranheit and there is 37 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected humidity and will it be windy?
Winds average 12 miles per hour and there is 41 percent humidity.
Okay. Now I would like to find a house there that offers laundry service.
I found 10 houses. One house, with a 4.4 rating and located at 100 greenwich Street seems nice.
Please provide with the contact number.
Their phone number is +1 917-409-0800.
What a great house!
Do you need further help?
I would like to reserve this house.
Will you be arriving March 1st. What day are leaving and how many in your party?
Yes, there will be two people and we will be leaving on March 6th.
Please confirm there will be 2 people arriving March 1st and leaving March 6th in New York.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Thank you for your assistance and that is all I need right now.
It's been my pleasure! Bye!
Could you check the weather forecast for 5th of this month?
Which city's weather forecast would you like?
Santa Clara, on 13th of March.
The expected average temperature is 78 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 3 percent chance of rain.
All right, thanks. What about in Chicago?
The expected average temperature is 65 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 37 percent chance of rain.
How about the wind speed?
The expected average wind speed is 5 miles per hour.
Cool, okay. Please find me a house to stay in over there. It should have a 4.5 or higher rating, and offer laundry service.
I found one nice house with 4.5 rating, located at 1 West Wacker Drive.
I love the house and would like to reserve it for 1 person, checking in on March 12th.
When would you like to check out?
I'd like to check out on 14th of this month.
Let me see if I got everything correctly: 1 person would like to check into the location in Chicago on March 12th, and check out on March 14th.
No, there's been a change of plans. I'd like to check in on March 10th, then check out on 13th of March 2019.
Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'll be checking on March 10th and checking out on March 13th.
That's correct. May I have this place's phone number?
I have successfully made your reservation. Their contact number is +1 800-468-3571.
Thanks a lot for your help.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Glad I could be of help. Bye.
What is the weather in NYC on March 9th.
The average temperature is 70 degrees and there is a 38 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I want to find a house for 1 person with laundry service and the rating should be 3.7 or more.
There is a house at 100 Greenwich Street with a rating of 3.7.
That sounds good.
Would you like to book it?
Yes, I would.
Will you be arriving on March 9th?
No, make it the 7th of this month.
When will you be checking out?
I will leave on the 13th.
Please confirm the reservation in New York for 1 person from March 7th until March 13th.
Yes, that's perfect.
The reservation is confirmed.
What is the total proce and phone number?
The total is $2,250 and the number is +1 917-409-0800.
Thanks a lot.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, I am good.
have a nice day.
Tell me what the weather is right now.
What city shall I look in?
Tell me the weather in New York City.
It is 66 degrees with a 37 percent chance of rain.
I see. Find me a house to stay in there.
I found a house at 100 Greenwich Street with a 4.4 rating.
That is perfect. Book the house for 2 people.
What day are you departing
I will be departing next Wednesday.
Are you arriving March 1st?
Yes, I am arriving March 1st.
You want a reservation for 2 people in New York City on March 1st with a departure date of March 6th. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your booking is now complete.
How much does this cost?
The total bill is $1,200.
What is their phone number and do they offer laundry service?
You can contact them at +1 917-409-0800 and they do offer laundry service.
Thanks a lot. That is all.
I am proud to serve you. Bye for now.
The last thing I have to do for my wedding is make the honeymoon reservations. Can you tell me what the weather is going to be like on March 5th in Delhi.
As of right now the radar says that it will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Do you know if there will be high winds?
Currently the wind is predicted to be only 4 miles per hour.
What about the humidity?
Currently the expected humidity is 21 percent.
That sounds like the perfect weather. Let's find a house to stay in while we are there.
Of the 10 houses I was able to find for you, the first has a great 4.5 star rating located at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi.
That sounds nice. What is the phone number?
The phone number listed for that house is +91 11 3955 5000.
What else do you have? I want a house that has a rating of 3.9 and up with a laundry service.
I have 9 houses matching that criteria. The first has a 3.9 star rating and is located at 12, Mangalam Place, Sector 3, Rohini, New Delhi.
I will need something else that is big enough for 4 people.
Now there are 8 houses that match your criteris. How about 13A, District Centre, Mayur Vihar, New Delhi with a 3.9 star rating.
That sounds promising. Can I have the phone number for this house?
You can contact someone about this house at +91 11 4110 5555.
I love it, it's perfect.
Should I go ahead and make the reservation for you?
Yes, that is the one I want.
Is the check in date March 5th and when would you like to check out?
I will be staying from Monday next week until March 8th.
Now that I have all of the information I need, let's just make sure it is correct. You are interested in the house in Delhi, for 4 people, checking in on March 4th and Checking out on March 8th.
Yes, that's perfect!
I was successfully able to reserve that for you.
Can you also tell me what the total cost of the stay is?
The total cost for that house comes to $2,800.
Thank you so much, that will be all.
Any time, have a nice time.
Can you tell me the weather?
What city would you like to hear the weather for?
I want to know how the weather will be in Atlanta on the March 10th.
I am showing the temperature will be 88 degrees with a 19 percent chance for rain that day in Atlanta.
Can you tell me how windy and humid it will be there that day?
The wind speed will only be 9 milers per hour and the humidity will be 27 percent.
Okay, now can you help me find a house for one person that is atleast a 4.2 customer rating or higher that provide laundry services.
There is a really nice house located at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest that you may like with a 4.2 customer rating.
No on second thought can you find me something with a 4.7 or higher rating?
How about 1414 West Peachtree Street Northwest, it has a 4.7 rating.
What is the phone number?
The number I have is +1 404-685-1677.
That house sounds perfect.
Would you like for me to make your reservation?
Yes, can you schedule it for MArch 9th and I will check out on the 10th of MArch 2019.
Okay you would like a house for 1 person in Atlanta. You will check in March 9th and check out MArch 10th, correct?
Yes that is right, can you tell me how much this is going to cost?
I have successfully completed your reservations and your total charge today was $228.
Cool, thank you.
Did you need anything else?
No that's it, thanks.
You are welcome. Goodbye!
I need weather for Novato on March 5th.
It's going to be about 79 degrees. There is a small chance, 11 %, of rain.
Well, what about the 8th in New Delhi.
The average temp there is usually 98 Degrees for that day and a small 6 percent chance of rain.
Fine, get me a house to stay there.
What about 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi. They have a good 4.5 rating.
That's great, thanks.
How about we jump on this and reserve it for you?
Great, please do.
Do you want to check in on March 8th? How many in your group?
Only one, just me. I want to check in March 5th.
When will you leave?
Check out should be 9th of March.
Ok, I have: 1 checking in March 5th, staying until March 9th in Delhi?
Fine, I agree. Get me a contact number there?
Sure, you are set up. Phone them at +91 11 3955 5000.
Thank you so much.
Anything more?
I'm good thanks.
It's been a real treat for me.
Will you check the weather in Chicago?
Average temperature is 73 degrees with 29 percent chance of rain.
Great. Will you find a house to stay there?
1 South Franklin Street with a 4.4 rating.
That's fine.
You want to make a reservation?
Yes. Will you make a reservation for one with check in on March 1st and check out on 8th of March?
Please confirm a reservation for 1 in Chicago with check in March 1st and check out March 8th.
Great. Total price?
I've completed your reservation. Total is $399.
What's their number?
+1 312-558-1020.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a great day.
Tell me what the weather is like on the March 12th.
What city would you like to check the weather in?
I want to check the weather in New Delhi, and it's actually for March 3rd.
The temperature will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit as an average for the day and there will be a 2 percent chance of rain.
Alright, what about the weather in Atlanta, GA?
The temperature will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit as an average for the day and there will be a 9 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the humidity and wind will be like?
Wind will average 9 miles per hour and humidity will be around 27 percent.
Alright. Help me look for a house to stay in around there.
There's a nice house at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest with a rating of 4.3.
That sound quite excellent.
Do you want me to book the house?
Absolutely book the house. I'll be checking in on March 3rd 2019 and checking out the 7th of March.
How many people will be staying at the house?
Two people will be staying there.
Please make sure this is correct, you will be checking in on March 3rd, checking out on March 7th in Atlanta for 2 people?
Yeah, that's right. Is there laundry service at the house?
I've booked the house, there is laundry service.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything else?
No, thanks again for the help.
The pleasure is mine, take care.
Hey! Please can you tell me what's the present weather condition?
Sure! Give me your zip code or otherwise give me the city name?
Please can you check how the weather is in Toronto.
Here is the details - There is a probability of 13 % rain and the average temperature for the normal day will be 58 degrees Fahrenheit
Thanks for the information. Please can you help me to find an apartment there.
Sure! I've a list of 10 houses and the house located at 108 Chestnut Street is a nice one and its rating is 4.2. Do you like this house?
Do you have any other property?
Ofcourse, there is a house with a slightly lower rating of 3.0 at 111 Carlton Street. Do you wish to see this one.
Seems good to me.
So, do you want me to book a reservation to this house?
Yup! Please reserve it so that I will be able to check in on later today.
How many members will be staying there?
Only one, that's me will be staying there.
Okay! When do you wish to check out?
Sorry, we, three people will stay there and we will check out on March 5th.
Please confirm me that you wish to book a house for 3 people in Toronto and you wish to stay there from March 1st to March 5th. Is that right?
Yup, that's great. What's the total cost for the accommodation?
The total cost for your stay will be $1,632 and your reservation is successfully done.
Thanks a lot for your help.
Do you need anything else to be assisted with?
Nope, thanks a lot for your help.
Welcome. Good Bye.
Check the weather in Phoenix, AZ.
The temp is 89 F and there is a 15 % chance of rain.
Thank for the info.
Is there anything else?
I would like to find a house there with laundry service.
I have a 4.6 rated house at 10 East Thomas Road.
I like that house.
Do you want to reserve?
Yes I want to reserve.
Is March 1st check in ok and how many?
Yes, and I have 4 people.
What is check out?
Check out is the 4th.
Confirm March 1st check in and March 4th check out in Phoenix for 4.
Yes, what is price and number?
You are confirmed. The number is +1 602-222-1111 for $1,305.
Thank for the help.
Is there anything else?
No that is all today.
It was nice doing business.
I will be meeting a friend in Seattle on March 10th, please check the weather for me.
There's a 39 percent chance of rain that day and the average temperature is 69 degrees. I may suggest for you and your friend to bring an umbrella.
Alright, thanks. Please help me to find a house for one person, rating should be 4.4 or higher.
I found 1 house with 4.4 rating that is located at 1000 1st Avenue. Would you like this one?
I think that would be great. I know that place.
Oh, nice, Would you want to make a reservation on this house?
Yes, please. It is also near the place I would be visiting.
Okay, when do you plan to check out?
I will stay there until March 10th 2019.
And you would also check in on March 10th?
No, no. I will be meeting a friend on March 10th but I will be there starting 6th of this month.
Oh, I thought you will just stay for a day. Is this correct? Book a house for 1 person at Seattle on March 6th and check out date is March 10th.
Yes, everything is correct.
Book is confirmed.
Yey! Thank you so much.
You're welcome. Do you need help with anything else?
No,that would be all. Thanks again!
My pleasure to always help you. Goodbye!
I would like to check the weather for March 1st.
What city would you like to check the weahter forecast for?
Check Seattle.
The average temperature for March 1st will be around 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 32 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I would like to find a house to stay in Seattle.
There is a nice house with a 4.5 star rating at 1000 1st Avenue.
Are there any other houses available?
How about this 3.9 rated one at 1006 Spring Street?
Is laundry service available? Could I get a contact number for this place?
The phone number is +1 206-583-6453. There is no laundry service.
This house sounds fantastic.
Do you want to make a reservation for this house?
Yes, let's book this house.
What day will you check out and how large is your group?
There is one person in my group and I will check out next Thursday.
Do you want to check in on March 1st?
Sounds great, thanks.
Please confirm that you want to stay from March 1st to March 7th in Seattle and that there is 1 person in your group.
That sounds amazing. How much is the price in total?
Your reservation was a success. The price is $1,224 in total.
Thank you for helping.
Do you have anything else I could help out with?
No, that is it. Thank you for helping.
It has been my pleasure. Goodbye.
Can you tell me what the weather is in New York City?
The average temperature should be 66 degrees Fahrenheit with a 37 percent chance of rain.
Sounds good, can you find me a house to stay at?
There is a house with a 4.4 rating located at 100 Greenwich Street you might like.
Does it have laundry service?
Yes, fortunately it does have laundry service.
Can you give me the phone number for them?
Yes, the phone number is +1 917-409-0800.
Are there any other houses with a rating of 3.8 or higher?
Yes, there are 9 houses available. There is one with a 3.8 rating which is located at 100-15 Ditmars Boulevard, East Elmhurst, NY 11369, USA.
Wow, what a great house!
Do you want to reserve it?
Yes, I would like to book it for 2 people on the 5th of this month.
Are you checking in on March 1st?
Yes, that date will work fine!
Please confirm you would like to reserve a house in New York for 2 people checking in on March 1st and checking out on March 5th.
Yes, that's perfect! Can you tell me the total price and if the place has laundry service?
I have made your reservation. The total will be $1,680 and it does have laundry service.
Great! Thank you so much for your help!
Can I do anything else for you?
No thank you, that will be all for now! Thanks for all your help!
It was my pleasure! Bye bye!
Please check weather for March 2nd.
What city do you want?
The city is Toronto.
The temperature is 60 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
I need a house rated 3.7 or higher.
I have a 3.7 at 108 Chestnut Street.
I like that house.
Did you want to reserve?
Yes go ahead and reserve.
Confirm March 2nd check in and how many?
Yes and it is for 4 people.
What is check out date?
Check out is next Friday.
Confirm March 2nd check in and March 8th check out in Toronto for 4.
No there is only 1 person.
Confirm change to 1 for Toronto.
Yes I confirm all.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Do they have Laundry service?
Yes it does have it.
That is all I need.
Thanks for using us and goodbye.
what is the weather
what city are you looking
search in vancouver, bc
it is currently 75 degree with 15 % chance of rain in vancouver, bc
ok can you find me a place to stay
what about 1018 granville street with 4.2 rating
can you give me their number and do they provide laundry service
their number is +1 877-972-6378. they do not have laundry service
the house is perfect
what else can i do for you
please book the house for me check in on 1st of this month and check out on 3rd of this month
how many people in your group
there are three
please confirm your booking for a house for 3 people in vancouver check in on march 1st and check out on march 3rd
yes please. what is the total cost
it will be $690
thanks
what else can i do for you
no that's it
have a nice day
Can you check the weather for me for March 5th.
Sure, for which city?
For London, please.
There's a 28 percent chance of rain with and expected average of around 94 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK. Can you find a house to stay there for me?
There are 10 houses that match your criteria, out of which I'd recommend 1 Addington Street, rated at 4.3.
Do you have their phone number?
Sure. You can reach them at +44 333 400 6116.
Sounds Perfect. Can you please book the house for me to check into this Sunday?
Please tell me the number of persons checking in as well as the check out date.
There will be 3 persons and we will be checking out on March 5th.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book a house for 3 persons for you in London from March 3rd to March 5th?
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me the total price?
I've successfully placed your reservation which costs $896.
Do you know if they have laundry service?
Yes, they do provide laundry service.
Perfect. Thanks a lot!
Is there anything else I could do for you?
No, not at the moment. Thanks again.
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
Will you check the weather on March 7th in Portland?
Average temperature is 72 degrees with 32 percent chance of rain.
Great. Will you find a house for 2 with laundry service and 4.5 or higher rating?
1150 Northwest 9th Avenue with rating of 4.5.
Great.
Anything else?
Will you reserve the house?
Want to check in on March 7th and check out when?
March 10th.
Please confirm reservation for 2 in Portland with check in on March 7th and check out on March 10th.
Great.
I've completed your reservation.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a great day.
I want to check the weather for March 11th.
In what city?
Nairobi, Kenya please.
The average temperature for that day is 89 degrees and there is a 3 percent chance of rain.
Alright, and can you find me a house to stay at?
There are 10 houses that are available. One house has a rating of 4.5 and is located on 14 Riverside Westlands.
Yes, book it for me please. It's for 1 person and I want to check in on the 10th.
When are you checking out?
On the 12th.
Please confirm the following: Booking a house for 1 in Nairobi. Check in is March 10th and you will check out on March 12th.
Yes, that's great. What's the number and does have a laundry service?
Your reservation is confirmed! The number is +254 787 657000 and it has laundry service.
Thank you!
May I assist you further?
No, thanks for the help!
Have a wonderful day!
what is the weather in washington on Friday next week
weather on March 8th 2019 is 84 degrees with 4 percent chance of rain
ok, can you find me a house to stay
there are 10 houses. This one is 4.3 rating at 1 washington circle northwest, washington, district of columbia 20037, united states
perfect, please book this house
Are you checking in on March 8th? When are you checking out
I like to check in on 6th of march and check out on 11th of march
how many people are coming with you
there are 2 total
Please confirm your booking for 2 people in your group in washington d.c. checking in on march 6th and check out on march 11th
yes thats perfect
your room is booked
thank you, thats all i need
have a nice day
Can you check the weather in Kuala Lumpur on the March 13th?
The average for the day should be 97 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Okay can you find me a house to stay there for one person. The rating should be 3.9 or higher.
I have found 10 houses.There is on located at 1, Jalan Pantai Baharu, Jaya Tower 3, 59200 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan with a rating of 3.9.
That house looks great.
Would you like me to reserve it?
Yes. I would like to reserve it from the 7th to March 14th.
You would like me to reserve the house in Kuala Lumpur for 1 person starting March 7th to March 14th. Is this correct?
Yes. What will the cost be? Is there a phone number I can call for the house?
I have placed your reservation for $5,600. The phone number is +60 3-2298 1888.
Thank you for helping me.
Is there anything else you need?
No that is all.
Okay. Have a good day.
I would like to see what the weather will be like in March 14th.
What location are you looking for the weather forecast in?
Check Paris.
The temperature that day should be 76 degrees Fahrenheit on average. There is a 14 percent chance that it will rain.
Okay. I would like to find a house to stay there.
There is a nice house located at 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005. This house is rated 4.5.
Is there laundry service there?
Yes, there is laundry service.
What's the phone number?
Their phone number is +33 1 46 34 14 80.
That house is perfect.
Do you want a reservation to be made?
Yes, please. I'm booking for 3 people.
Do you want your check in date to be March 14th?
No, make the check in on the 9th.
Tell me what day you will check out.
I would like to check out on March 14th.
Could you confirm that you want to check in on March 9th and check in on March 14th in Paris for 3 people?
Yes, sounds good. What is the price in total?
Your reservation was made and the total price is $1,740.
Thank you for helping.
Could I help with something else?
No,but thank you.
I have been happy to asst you. Goodbye.
Hello! Please can you check the weather forecast?
For which city, you wish to know?
Please check for Philly.
There is a probability of 8 % rain and the average temperature will be 81 degrees Fahrenheit for the normal day.
Thanks. I wish to search for a house for one people with laundry service whose rating will be 4.3 or higher. Please can you find me one?
Yup! there are 8 houses available and the best one is located at 1 Logan Square whose rating is 4.3.
Please can I have their contact number?
sure, you can reach them at +1 215-963-1500.
This house looks good.
So, do you want me to make reservation for this house?
Yup, please book this house and I will check out on 6th of this month.
So, you would like to check in on March 1st, right?
Yup, you're right
Yup! The house location is in Philadelphia and you wish to book the house for 1 and your check in date will be on March 1st and check out date will be on March 6th. Is that right?
Yup, great. What's the cost for the stay?
The cost for your stay will be $2,000. Your reservation is made successfully.
Thanks a lot for your help and I'm done with.
My Pleasure. Good bye.
Whats the weather like in Las Vegas?
Its 84 degrees on average. Chance of rain is 18 percent.
Can you check out hoses to rent there?
I see one at 1215 South Las Vegas Boulevard. It has a 3.7 rating.
That might be the one.
Do you want to book it?
Yeah. For March 1st. There are four of us.
Until when do you need it?
Until the 7th of this month.
4 people in Las Vegas from March 1st to March 7th?
You got it.
And you have a house to stay in.
Nice job buddy. I'm set.
Glad I could be of help.
Can you please check the weather for me in Fresno, CA on 1st of this month?
There's a 2 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 72 degrees Fahrenheit.
Perfect, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you please find me a house to stay there?
There's 1055 Van Ness Avenue rated at 3.8.
Anything else available?
There also 2233 Ventura Street rated at 4.3.
Anything else available? Also, please consider that there will be 3 people.
There are 3 houses meeting your requirements, out of which I recommend 2926 Tulare Street, rated at 3.7.
Do you know if they provide laundry service?
Unfortunately they do not.
Can you please tell me their phone number?
You can reach them at +1 559-442-1110.
Sounds perfect to me.
Do you want me to place a reservation for you>
Yes, please do.
Can you please tell me if you will be checking in on March 1st and also when do you plan on checking out.
You are correct with the check in date. I plan to check out on the 6th.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book you the house in Fresno for 3 people from March 1st to March 6th.
On second thought, I want to check out next Thursday.
Can you please confirm that you want me to book the house for 3 persons, checking out on March 7th.
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me the total price?
I've successfully placed your reservation. Your total cost for the booking si $1,224.
Thanks a lot.
Anything else I could do for you?
No, thanks again.
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
What's the weather going to be on next Tuesday?
For which city?
Check the weather in LAX
The average temperature there will be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain
Ok good. Find me a house there for the three of us
1020 South Figueroa Street looks nice with a 4.2 rating?
What's the phone number? Is laundry available there?
You can reach them at +1 213-748-1291. Yes, there's laundry service at the house
Anything else?
10320 West Olympic Boulevard also has a 4.2 rating
I like that on
Would you like to book it?
Yes. I'll depart on the 11th
And you'll check in on March 5th right?
Checking in next Monday and leaving on the 10th actually
Ok. Please confirm: a house for 3 people in Los Angeles. Arriving March 4th and departing March 10th
Yes that's right. Can I get the cost? Is there laundry available there too?
I've confirmed your reservation. They do have laundry service and your reservation costs $3,240.
Thanks so much
Anything else you need?
Nope I'm good
Always here to help.
I need to find out the weather in Toronto, Ontario.
The average temperature in Toronto for the day should be 58 degrees F with a 13 % chance of rain.
Sure, sounds right. I'd like to find a house to stay there.
I found 10 houses available for you. One nice house is at 108 Chestnut Street with a 4.2 rating.
This house looks great. I'd like to book a house.
On which day were you planning to check out?
I'd like to check out next Friday.
How many people did you have in your group?
There is 1 person.
Were you looking to check in on March 1st?
Yes, that sounds great.
Please confirm 1 person in Toronto is checking in March 1st and checking out March 8th.
Yes, that sounds great. Does this place have a contact number and does it have laundry service?
Your reservation has been confirmed. The number is +1 416-977-5000 and yes this place does have laundry service.
Thank you for your assistance.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thank you again.
It has been my pleasure. Goodbye.
What's the weather in LA like on the March 14th?
It should be around 86 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 17 percent chance it rains.
How humid will it be?
Humidity will be around 29 percent.
What about on the 1st of March?
It will be around 76 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 28 percent chance it rains.
How windy will it be? How humid will it be?
Wind speed should be around 4 miles an hour. Humidity will be around 75 percent.
I'd like a house for there.
There is a house at 1020 South Figueroa Street with a 4.2 rating.
That's good. I'd like to book it.
How many people are you with? Do you want to check in on March 1st? What day will you check in.
That's fine. It's just one person. I'll check out tomorrow.
Booking a house in Los Angeles for 1 person on March 1st and checking out on March 2nd. Is this correct?
Yes, that's it.
Your house has been booked.
Thank you.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a nice day.
Hey, can you tell me the weather on the March 4th?
Sure, what city is that for?
For Sydney, NSW. Actually please change the date to March 10th.
Sure, the average temperature will be around 92 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
Great, how windy and humid will it be?
The wind speed will sit at around 1 mile per hour, while the humidity will be roughly 20 percent.
Thanks. Can you find me a house to stay there with a rating of 3.6 or higher?
Of course. How about 1 Columbia Court, Baulkham Hills New South Wales 2153, Australia? It has a 3.6 rating.
Will they do my laundry? How can I contact them?
Yes, they have a laundry service. You can call them on +61 2 9634 9634.
Thanks, is there anything else?
Yes, there's 1 Hosking Place - it's also a 3.6 rated property.
That's perfect, thanks.
Should I make a reservation for you?
Yes please. From next Tuesday until March 10th, 2019.
Okay, for how many people?
For four people thanks.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like to book the house in Sydney for 4 people from March 5th until March 10th.
Yes, do they have a laundry service?
Your booking is complete. Yes, they do have a laundry service.
Thanks, how can I contact them?
Their phone number is +61 1300 633 462.
Okay, thanks so much. That'll be all.
No worries, see you.
I want to check the weather condition in Washington for the date 1st of March. Can you help me to check the same?
Yes, please note that the average temperature level will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 13 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about the Humidity in that area?
Humidity will be around 36 %. What else you want to know about the weather?
Let me know about the Wind speed on that date in that area.
The wind speed will be around 6 miles per hour in average.
Thanks for all your information. I want to stay there for a while and for which I need your help to find one house for me.
I got 10 results for the house and found the one at 1 Washington Circle Northwest, Washington, District of Columbia 20037, United States with rating 4.3. Is this comfortable to you?
I need them to offer Laundry Service there. Can you check it for me to decide.
Yes, they have laundry service in their place. Hope this house is liked by you.
Yes, I like this house very much.
shall I reserve this house for you now?
Yes, do it for me.
I want to know the Check-out date and number of person in you team so that I can book the house accordingly to your need.
Please book the house for check-out on 8th of this month and it is for only one person.
What about the check-in date, shall I proceed with March 1st?
yes, you can book it from March 1st to 8th of this month.
Please confirm to book a hose at Washington D.C. for 1 person from March 1st to March 8th.
This is correct and I want you to proceed further. Also get me their contact number for my reference.
I have successfully booked the house as per your requirements and note their contact number is +1 202-872-1680. What else you want to know about this house?
What would be the total cost for that booking.
It is $2,016. Anything else?
Nothing for today, thank you very much for your help.
Have a nice day.
I need to know what the weather is like.
For which city?
For Las Vegas.
It is 84 degrees Fahrenheit with 18 percent chance of rain.
What about Portland, OR?
It is 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rainfall.
Ok, that's not too bad.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I need a house to stay in when I get there.
There is a wonderful one on 1000 northeast multnomah street. It has a rating of 4.2
What is the contact number for there?
The number is +1 503-281-6111
Is there a laundry service available?
Yes, there is.
That house is just what I am looking for.
You would like to reserve it?
Yes, I want to book it for 2 people and I will be checking out on the 5th.
You will be checking in on March 1st?
Yes, why not.
You want to book the hotel in Portland for 2 persons from March 1st to March 5th?
Yes, that is correct.
The reservation is complete.
Thanks a lot.
Anything else I can do for you?
No. Thank you.
At your service. Take care!
Here's something for you to look up. What's the weather going to be in Nairobi on March 1st, I'd be pleased to know?
I'm showing 0 percent rain forecasted with an average temperature of 105 degree during the day.
Okay, and what's the wind going to be like?
There's a 7 mile per hour wind speed forecasted.
Nice, and what's the humidity going to be?
There is a 15 percent humidity forecast.
Well done. I'd like to rent a house with laundry service there for two persons. Please look for a house with at least 4.4 stars or more.
Will do. Would you be interested in a 4.4 rated house at the street address 14 Riverside Westlands? That's one of 10 available houses.
Maybe. How can I contact someone about the house?
The listing shows a phone number of +254 787 657000.
Do you recommend any other house location?
I'm showing a house at 9042/1044 Tower Avenue Jomo Kenyatta Intl Airport with a 4.4 score.
Okay, and what's the phone number there, please?
The contact number is listed as +254 709 760000.
Hmm, anything else you can suggest?
You might like the house on Chiromo Road, rated 4.4.
I do like that.
Is this the house you want to reserve for your trip?
It is. Let's make a move on that one, please.
What's your check-out day?
The 5th is when I want to check out.
And, for checking in, is March 1st correct?
It certainly is.
Are you ready to confirm your house reservation for 2 persons in Nairobi, checking in on March 1st and checking out on March 5th?
I'm so ready. Let's do it, and give me the total I'll have to pay plus the house phone number, please?
Your house reservation is confirmed for a payment of $1,520. Your can call the house at +254 703 049000.
Great. Thanks for setting that up.
Do you need something else done?
That's a wrap on this set up. Thanks so much.
Of course. Have a pleasant day.
Check for me the weather on March 5th in Phoenix.
For the day the average temperature should be 73 degrees Fahrenheit and a 12 percent chance of rain.
Humidity how will be?
Will be around 31 percent.
Sure is good.
Anything else I can do?
Find me a house for four people with rating 4.4 or higher.
10 option I have for you.A nice house with rating 4.4 is at 10 East Thomas Road.
Other option you have?
With rating 4.4 is a nice property located at 132 South Central Avenue.
Great.I want to check in on Sunday this week and check out on 5th of March 2019.
In Phoenix you want for a group of 4 people with check in date in March 3rd and check out on March 5th.Is that correct?
No.Change the check in date on 5th of March 2019 and check out date on next Thursday.
Check in date is March 5th and check out date on March 7th.Is that okay?
Perfect.I also want to know if they have laundry services and the total cost.
Reservation was made.Laundry service is available and total price is $630.
Thank you for all.
May I help you with anything else?
No.Thank you very much.
It is a pleasure.Bye!
I will be travelling soon, I need to know how the weather will be.
In which city do you want to check the weather?
Please check in Paris, France.
The temperature should be around 77 degree Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of rain.
That sounds delightful. I need to find a house there.
There is a 4.5 rating house at 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005.
Does the house include laundry service? And how can I contact the place?
Their phone number is +33 1 46 34 14 80 and it does have laundry service.
I would like to book the house.
How many people will be staying there? Do you want to check in on March 1st? When do you want to check out.
Yes, make the check in on March 1st and the check out next Friday. There will be two people staying in the house.
Please confirm: Booking house for 2 people in Paris. From March 1st until March 8th.
Yes, that is correct.
The reservation has been done.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all. Thank you.
Have a great day.
I would like weather information in Sydney
Average temperature: 94 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 4 percent
Will it be a wet day?
Expected humidity: about 15 percent
Seems good. I need a house to stay there. I need a house for one people, with laundry service and I'd like a 4.3 rating or higher.
There's 1 Salisbury Road, Castle Hill New South Wales 2154, Australia, with rating 4.3
Are there other houses for 4 people?
There's 10 Atchison Street, St Leonards New South Wales 2065, Australia, with rating 4.3
Any other proposals for me?
I propose 11 Hickson Road Walsh Bay, with rating 4.3
Ok, tell me the phone number, please
Sure! +61 2 8298 9999
It's fine for me!
Do you want to book this house?
Yes, please! I want to book the house until the 8th
Starting March 1st?
Yes, It's correct
A house in Sydney for 4 people, from March 1st to March 8th. Do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. Thanks!
Your house is booked!
Thanks a lot!
Do you need anything else?
No, It's all. Thank you for helping
It's a pleasure. Bye!
Give me the weather report for March 6th please.
What city should I find out?
I want you to look in Phoenix
It will average a temperature of 88 degrees Fahrenheit in the day and it has a 29 percent chance of raining.
What is the wind like?
The wind speed will average on 3 miles an hour.
What is the humidity going to be?
It will be 43 percent humid.
Fine. Find me a house to accommodate me there.
Out of 10 houses I found you, there is a nice house at 10 East Thomas Road. It is rated at 4.6.
That is a fantastic house.
Shall I book the house for you?
Go right ahead and reserve that house.
Should I check you in on March 6th? What date will you check out and how many people in all are you?
That is correct and we are two people in all and check me out on March 11th.
So you want to be in Phoenix and you are 2 people in the group. You check in on March 6th and leave on March 11th. Is that correct?
Sure that is all correct.
I made your reservation.
Thanks a lot.
What else would you like from me?
That will be all. Thank you.
Glad to help. Take care.
What's it like outside in LA?
Well, around 76 degrees, and there is only a 28 percent chance of rain, so pretty neat.
What's the humidity like though?
It's around 75 %.
Fine, get me a house to stay in there, you've sold me.
would you like to stay in 1020 South Figueroa Street. It has a 4.2 star rating?
That's fine, I think there's really no choice though? I want to leave there this Saturday.
Fine, how many in your group? Will you still check in on March 1st?
Yes, there is just me, so 1.
To be clear, 1 person in Los Angeles on March 1st. Departing march 2nd?
Yes, good enouh.
You have the house booked for yourself.
Good, that's it then.
It is my pleasure to serve you master.
I would like to check the weather on Saturday this week in San Francisco.
The temperature should be 72 degrees and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
I would like to find a house.
There is one located at 1095 Market Street and the rating is 3.7
That house sounds good.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, I would like to book a house.
When are you checking out?
I will be checking on on March 3rd.
How many people are in the group and do you want to check in on March 2nd?
It's only for 1 person and check in will be on March 1st.
1 person going to San Francisco on March 1st to March 3rd.
Yes, that is correct. What is their phone number?
Their phone number is +1 415-829-0000.
Does this place have laundry service and what is the cost?
Yes, it has laundry service and the price is $378.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help you with something else?
No, thank you for your help.
Have a good day.
I would like the weather report.
What city would you like?
The city is New Delhi.
The average temperature is 99 F and 4 percent rain chance.
I want to find a house there.
I found 10. I have 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi rated at 4.5.
What is contact and does it have laundry service?
The phone is +91 11 3955 5000.
I need it today for two and check out March 6th.
Confirm March 1st check in and March 6th check out for 2 in Delhi.
I confirm that all.
You have been confirmed.
That is all I need.
It has been nice, have a good time.
Tell me what the weather will be in Paris on March 1st.
There is an average temperature of 77 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity and wind speed?
The humidity is 32 percent and the wind is at 7 miles per hour.
I see. Find me a house to stay in.
I found 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005 and it has a 4.5 rating.
What is their phone number and can you tell me if they have laundry service?
You can contact them at +33 1 46 34 14 80 and they do have laundry service.
That is perfect.
Shall I make a reservation for you?
Yes, reserve this house for me.
Are you checking in March 1st and if so, what day are you leaving and how many people are with you?
I am leaving March 3rd and there are 2 people.
You want a reservation for 2 people in Paris from March 1st to March 3rd. Is that right?
No, I want to leave on the 7th of March and there are three people.
You want a reservation for 3 people with a departure date of March 7th. Is that right?
Yes, that is right. Can you tell me the total bill?
Your booking is complete. The total cost is $3,360.
Thanks a lot. That is everything for now.
It has been an honor to help you. Bye for now.
I want to check the weather on March 10th.
What city are you checking for?
I want to check this Sunday in Sausalito.
The average for the day is 90 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
What about in LA?
The average temperature for the day is 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be humid or windy?
The wind speed will be about 8 miles per hour and the humidity around 15 percent.
Okay. I want to find a house to stay at there.
There's a house at 1020 South Figueroa Street with a 4.2 rating.
Any other houses with laundry service?
I found 9 houses. 10320 West Olympic Boulevard has a 4.2 rating.
That house sounds good. Can I book it?
How many people?
Just 1 person.
Do you want to check in on March 3rd?
Yes, that's fine.
When are you checking out?
I want to check out on March 10th 2019.
Please confirm: 1 person in Los Angeles checking in March 3rd and checking out March 10th.
Yes, that's correct. What's the price?
Your reservation was made. The price is $2,520.
Thanks, that's all.
My pleasure, goodbye.
I would like to know how the weather will be.
Can you tell me the city where I should check the weather?
I want to know how the weather will be in Paris.
The average temperature for the day in Paris is expected to be 77 degrees Fahrenheit, with a chance of 26 percent of raining.
Alright, fine. I need a place to sleep, so find me a house there.
There are 10 houses which match what you want. A good house that I can suggest, and has a rating of 4.5 is located at 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005.
Can you tell me if this place has laundry service? Can you also please give me their phone number?
If you want to call them you can at +33 1 46 34 14 80. I can confirm that this place does have laundry service.
Are there other houses you can suggest? I need the house for 4 people.
From the results there are 9 houses which match what you want. A nice house with a rating of 4.2 is located at 1 Rue Daunou, 75002.
This house seems as a good choice.
Do you want to make a reservation for this specific house?
Yes, I would like to have a reservation for this house. I will need the house till 7th of March.
Will you be going at the house on March 1st?
Yes, that seems right, and as what I want.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a house in Paris for 4 people and that you will go there on March 1st, and will need the house till March 7th?
Yes, that suits me well.
Your request for a house reservation has been made.
Can you tell me if this hosue has laundry service? Can you also give me the phone number that I can use to call them?
If you want to call them you can at +33 1 42 61 70 41. I can confirm that the house has laundry service.
I appreciate your help.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided.
I enjoy helping you. Good bye!
Can you help me check the weather please
What city are you looking at?
How about in LA
It's gonna be 76 degrees with a 28 % chance of rain
How humid is it gonna be?
Around 75 %, pretty high!
OK, cool then find me a house to stay there
There are 10 spots that work, what about this place at 1020 South Figueroa Street that has a 4.2 rating
That's great then
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, please do
Are you checking in on March 1st? And how many are you?
Yes that date is right, and just for 1
When are you leaving?
I wanna check out next day, on the 2nd of March
So booking it in that spot in Los Angeles for 1 from March 1st to March 2nd
Yes, that's right
It is reserved!
Do they have laundry service? And can I get their number?
They do! And you can reach them at +1 213-748-1291
Cool, thanks for all your help
My pleasure, see ya!
What will the weather be like in Philly on the 5th of this month?
The temperature should be 76 degrees with a 29 % chance of rain.
Okay I want to find a house there to stay.
I found a nice house with 4.4 rating at 1 Logan Square.
What's the phone number?
+1 215-963-1500.
Is there laundry service here?
Yes, this house has laundry service.
This is a nice house.
Would you like to make a reservation for the house?
Yes, I want to check in on March 1st.
When are you checking out?
On the 6th of March.
How many people in your group?
Three.
Please confirm the following reservation: Your are renting one house for 3 people in Philadelphia from March 1st to March 6th.
Yes, what is the total price?
Your reservation is all set. The total price will be $2,000.
Thank you so much.
Is there anything else?
No that will be all.
Have a good day!
I need to check the weather for March 2nd
In which city would you like to check weather in?
In Washington please.
The average temperature that day is 82 degrees Fahrenheit and has a 1 percent chance for rain.
How windy will it be? Also, how humid will it be?
The average wind speed should be 6 miles per hour and humidity is about 16 percent.
Alright. I would like to find a house to stay there.
There is a nice house located at 1 Washington Circle Northwest, Washington, District of Columbia 20037, United States. It has a rating of 4.3.
That house is a great choice.
Would you like to make a reservation for the house?
Yes, please book the house.
How many people will be in your group? Would you like to check in on March 2nd and which day would you like to check out?
Yes, that would be good. There are four people in our group. I would like to check out on the 7th.
Please confirm these details: Booking for 4 people. It will be in Washington D.C. The check in date is March 2nd and check out is March 7th.
Yes, that would be fine.
Your reservation is set.
Thank you for the help.
May I help with anything else?
No, thank you for the help.
My pleasure. Goodbye.
I need the weather for the Tuesday next week please.
In which city?
I need the Seattle, WA weather.
The average temperature for the day will be 61 degrees and there will be an 18 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I need a house to stay in there as well please.
I found a 4.5 rated house at 1000 1st Avenue.
Sounds good to me.
Should I resserve it for you?
Yes please do.
Will you be checking in on March 5th? And on which day would you like to check out? How many are staying?
Only one from the day after tomorrow till Thursday next week.
Okay I have a house in Seattle for 1 from March 3rd till March 7th.
Actually I need it for three on next Monday.
You need it for 3 on March 4th, correct?
Yes perfect. Do they have laundry and what is thte total?
Yes they have laundry. Your reservation has been made and the total is $1,320.
Thank you, that's all I need.
My pleasure, enjoy!
I want to check the weather condition on the a particular date that is March 9th for which I need your help.
Do you have any particular city in you mind to search for the weather condition?
Yes, search it in Sausalito.
please note that the average temperature level will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 11 % for rain fall there on that day.
Check it on March 5th in Sydney, Australia.
the average temperature level will be 96 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 5 % for rain fall there on that day.
That will be find and thanks. I also need one more help from you. I want to stay there for a while for which I need to find a house. Can you help me?
Yes, I got 10 house details. What about your opinion on a house located at 1 Columbia court, Baulkham Hills New South Wales 2153, Australia with rating 4.1?
This seems to be a good one. Can you check whether they have Laundry service in the house? Also I need their contact number for my reference.
Yes, they have laundry service and their phone number is +61 2 9634 9634. Is that okay to you.
Yes, I confirm to book this house.
For how many persons?
Make it for 1.
What is the Checkout date to book the house for?
Check-out date will be March 7th.
Shall I proceed with the check-in date as March 5th?
Yes, proceed as you said.
Please confirm to book a hose for 1 from March 5th to March 7th in Sydney.
That is correct. Please go ahead. What is the cost for that booking?
It costs $528 and your booking of house was confirmed.
Thank you for your help and that's all for now.
Have a good day.
I would like to find out the weather on March 10th.
What city would you like to know the weather for?
San Fran, please.
The average temperature will be 93 degrees and there's a 12 percent chance of rain.
Awesome. How about on Saturday this week in Sydney?
The average temperature for that day will be 101 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 2 percent chance of rain.
Awesome. I would like to find a house for 2 people to stay at that's a 4.1 or higher in terms of rating.
There's a nice house at 1 Columbia Court, Baulkham Hills New South Wales 2153, Australia. Its rating is 4.1
Are there any other houses to look at?
There's one at 1 Kensington Street, Chippendale New South Wales 2008, Australia. It has a 4.1 rating.
Are there any other options?
There's another nice one at 1 Salisbury Road, Castle Hill New South Wales 2154, Australia. It has a 4.1 rating.
Does it have laundry service? And can I have the phone number to contact them?
Their number is +61 2 9680 3800 and they do have laundry service.
This place sounds great. I'd like to book the house for the 2nd of March 2019 and check out next Thursday.
Please confirm the following: The location is in Sydney, you have 2 people in the group, you want to check in on March 2nd and check out on March 7th.
That sounds great.
The reservation has been made successfully.
Thanks for everything. That's all for now!
It's been my pleasure assisting you. Bye for now!
I need to check the weather in Portland, OR.
Okay no problem. The average temperature in Portland for the day should be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Cool, thanks. I'm looking for a house to stay in out there.
Okay. I found 10 houses available that match your search. There is a nice house located at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street that's rated at 4.2.
Cool, what's the number?
The number is +1 503-281-6111.
This house sounds great. Go ahead and book it for me. I need a reservation for 1 person for the 1st of March until next Friday.
Ok got it. Please confirm the following for me: Reserve a house stay for 1 person in Portland for March 1st through March 8th. Correct?
Yes, that's perfect.
Your reservation is a success. Enjoy your stay!
Thanks. What's the total price come to? Do they have a laundry service?
The total price is $756 and yes they do have laundry service.
Cool, thanks for the help. That's all I need.
It was my pleasure to help. Goodbye.
Can you check weather in Seattle, WA?
The temperature is 74 degrees with a 32 percent chance of rain.
Thanks for the info.
Is there anything else?
I need a 4.4 rated house for 1.
I found 10. I have a 4.4 at 1000 1st Avenue.
Can I have the number?
The numberis +1 206-957-1000
Are there others for 3?
I found 9. I have a 4.4 at 1101 4th Avenue.
I want that house.
Do you want to book it?
Yes book that house.
When is check out and are you checking in March 1st?
Yes, check out is March 8th.
Confirm check in March 1st and check out March 8th for 3 people in Seattle?
Yes, what is the price?
Your are confirmed and cost is $3920.
What is the phone?
Phone is +1 206-621-1770.
Thank for the assistance.
Is there anything else?
That is all I need.
Thank for using us and goodbye.
I want to know how the weather will be in Nairobi.
The average temperature for the day in Nairobi should be 105 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 0 percent chance of raining.
Alright, fine. I need a place to sleep there, so find me a house with laundry service.
I would recommend a good house at 14 Riverside Westlands, with a rating of 4.5.
Can you give me their phone number?
If you want to call them you can at +254 787 657000.
Is there some other house you can suggest, which has a rating of 4.6 or higher?
Another good house located at Chiromo Road has a rating of 4.6.
Are there some other alternatives?
You can also consider the house at Elgon Road, which has a rating of 4.6.
This house seems as the one I want. I would like to book this house.
For how many people you need the house? Will you be going there on March 1st? When will you be leaving the house?
That's right. It's just for one person, and I will be leaving the house next Friday.
Can you please confirm that you want to book the house in Nairobi for 1 person, and that you will go there on March 1st, and you will leave the house on March 8th?
That's what I want. Can you tell me the total price? What phone number can I use to call them?
Your house has been booked. If you want to call them, you can at +254 709 810000. This house will cost you $3,675.
I appreciate your help. That would be all.
I enjoy helping you. Good bye!
Can you get me the weather for New York for 5th of this month?
The weather shows an average temperature of 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 51 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I want to find a house to stay in in New York.
I found you 10 houses. You might like 100 Greenwich Street. It has a rating of 4.4.
Did you find anything else?
You might also like 100-15 Ditmars Boulevard, East Elmhurst, NY 11369, USA. It has a rating of 4.2.
Can you find me something with laundry service?
I found 8 houses that you might like. How about 102 West 57th Street? The rating is 4.5.
Can I get a contact number?
The phone number is +1 212-379-0103.
Sounds great. I want to book this house. I'll be checking out on March 5th 2019.
Are you checking in on March 5th? How many people are in your group?
I have a group of 2 and will be checking in on the 4th of March.
Please confirm that your party of 2 will be checking in to a house in New York on March 4th and checking out on March 5th.
Yes, great.
Your reservation is successful.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, thank you.
It was my pleasure. Goodbye.
What's the weather forecast for March 6th?
Which city's weather forecast would you like to know?
Please check the weather forecast for Vancouver, BC
The expected average temperature for the day is 70 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 27 percent chance of rain.
Great, thanks. Please find a house to stay over there.
There's a nice 4.2 star rated house at 1018 Granville Street.
Please get me the contact number for the place and find out if it has laundry service.
The place can be contacted on +1 877-972-6378, and does not offer laundry service
This house is very good.
Should I go ahead and reserve this house?
Yes, please reserve the house for three people.
Will you be checking in on March 6th? When will you be checking out?
The check-in date is Saturday this week, and the check-out date is next Thursday.
Okay, no problem. Please confirm that your group of 3 would like to check in in Vancouver on is March 2nd and check out on March 7th.
That sounds perfect.
I have successfully made your reservation.
Please let me know the total cost.
The total cost is $2,250.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. That will be all.
Glad I could be of help. Bye.
Can you look up the weather for Phoenix, AZ on March 10th?
The temperature will be 80 degrees with a 19 percent chance for rain.
Okay, can you look up houses to stay for 1 person with a 4.2 or higher customer rating.
I have a house located at 10 East Thomas Road that has a 4.2 rating.
What is the phone number?
I have the number listed as +1 602-222-1111.
What other houses do you see?
I have another house with a 4.2 rating located at 10601 North 56th Street, Scottsdale, AZ 85254, USA.
That will work!
Did you want me to make your reservations?
Yes, please can you schedule my check in date for the 6th of this month.
When did you want to check out?
I will be leaving March 10th 2019.
okay that will be 1 oom in Phoenix. You will check in March 6th and check out March 10th?
No I need to check in Friday next week actually and check out the 11th of March. I am sorry about that.
That is okay. So I have your new chec in date as MArch 8th and your check out date is now March 11th?
Yes, that is right.
Okay your reservation is complete.
I forgot to ask, do they have laundry services?
Yes they do.
Great, that will be all.
enjoy your stay.
I need the weather for March 14th.
What city do you want?
The city is Geyserville.
The temperature will be 77 and there is a 23 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
Wind is 1 mile per hour and humidity is 27 percent.
How about the March 5th?
The temperature will be 76 and there is a 1 percent chance of rain.
How about in ATL?
The temperature will be 82 and there is an 18 percent chance of rain.
I want to find a house there with a 4.2 or higher rating.
I found 10. I have a 4.2 rating at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest.
This house is what I want.
Is the anything else?
I want book the house.
What is check out?
Check our is March 8th.
How many people are in group?
There is 1 person.
Are you checking in March 5th?
Yes that is correct.
Confirm location in Atlanta for 1 for March 5th to March 8th.
Change to 4 people an check out on 10th of March.
Confirm change to 4 people an check out on March 10th.
That is right can I get contact and price?
You are confirmed. Phone is +1 404-524-5555 for $1620.
Thanks for the help
Is there anything else?
No that is all.
It was my pleasure and thank you.
What's the weather going to be like on the March 4th?
Where do you want the weather for?
I want the weather for the next Friday in Sacramento, CA.
The forecast is for an average temperature of 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
Alright, I'd like to search for a house to stay at there.
I found 10 houses you might like. There is one with a 4.4 rating located at 100 Capitol Mall.
Is there anything else? I only need it for one person.
Sure, I found 9 more possibilities. There is a house with a 4.3 rating located at 1100 H Street.
Are there laundry facilities there? What is their phone number?
They do not have laundry facilities. You can reach them at +1 916-441-1314.
Is there anything else available?
There is another nice place with a 4.4 rating located at 1121 15th Street.
That one sounds great.
Should I make a reservation for that house?
Yeah, I'd like to reserve that place.
Are you planning to check in March 8th? How about your check out date?
I'm looking to check in on March 5th and check out on the 12th.
So you would like to reserve this house for 1 person in Sacramento, checking in on March 5th, and checking out on March 12th. Is that correct?
Yes, that sounds good to me. Are there laundry facilities there? What is the phone number for this place?
Your reservation was successful. They do have laundry facilities there. You can reach them at +1 916-443-0500.
Great, thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all thank you.
No problem. Have a nice day!
What is the weather like in Portland?
It is 75 degrees Fahrenheit with 9 percent chance of rain.
Great. I need a house to stay in when I get there.
There are 10 houses available. 1000 northeast multnomah street is an exceptional hotel with a 4.2 rating.
That seems like a wonderful choice.
Would you like to reserve the house?
Yes, I would.
For how many persons? Would you like to check in on March 1st? When would you like to check out?
I want to check out on the 5th of this month. There is just four of us.
You would like a house in Portland for 4 from March 1st to March 5th?
That would be awesome. May I have a phone number?
The number is +1 503-281-6111.
What is the total cost and is laundry service offered?
There is a laundry service and the total cost is $1,104
Thanks very much.
Is there anything else you would like me to do for you?
No. I am grateful for your assistance.
I enjoy assisting you. Take care.
Hi, I'd like to know the weather in Chi-town.
The temperature should be around 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Okay, what will the humidity be like?
It will be about 29 percent.
Great, I'd like to find a house there for three people. It needs to have laundry service and a rating of at least 4.0.
Okay, I found 10 houses for you. There's a good one at 1 West Wacker Drive that's rated 4.0.
Anything else? I just need a place for one person. I need it to be rated at least 4.1.
There are 9 houses that match your criteria. One nice house is located at 10 East Grand Avenue, and it's rated 4.1.
That sounds lovely, I'd like to book it.
Amazing, which day would you like to check out?
I want to arrive on March 1st and check out on the 2nd of March.
Great, please confirm: 1 person for the house in Chicago, checking in March 1st and leaving on March 2nd.
Yep, that's perfect for me.
The reservation has been a success.
How much will it cost in total? And can I get a phone number for the house?
The total comes to $186 and you may reach them at +1 312-595-0000.
Thanks so much for helping.
Anything else that you need right now?
No, thank you very much.
No problem, goodbye!
Please tell me the weather in Portland, OR.
There is a 9 percent chance of rain, with an average temp of 75 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thanks, I would like to find a house to stay with laundry service.
I have found one with a 4.2 rating that is located at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street.
Please tell me the phone number for this place.
You can reach them at +1 503-281-6111.
Do you have any other locations?
There is a location with a 4.5 rating located at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue.
Do you have any others for 1 person with a rating of 4.3 or higher?
I have found 9 houses with that critera that are availble. I have one with a 4.3 rating located at 11936 Northeast Glenn Widing Drive.
That house would be good.
Do you need me to book that house?
I do want you to book that location for me.
Would a March 1st booking be okay?
Yes, I would.
When would you be leaving?
I would be leaving on the 7th of March.
So you want me to book a house in Portland on March 1st with a checkout on March 7th for 1 person?
Yes, I do.
Your reservation is all set.
Thanks, that is all I need.
Thanks, my pleasure, Have a great day.
I want to see the weather in Phoenix on the day of 11th of March.
The average temperature should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit. There is an 8 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I need a house there.
There are 10 houses which match your selection. There is a nice one at 10 East Thomas Road and the rating is 4.6
Okay, this one looks good.
Would you like to make a reservation?
Yes, I need one. I want it on Tuesday next week. I want to check out on March 11th 2019.
How many people are in your party?
There is one person.
Please confirm the following details: The location is in Phoenix and there is 1 person in your group. The check-in date is March 5th and the check out date is March 11th.
Sounds good, what is the price?
Your reservation is successful and the total price is $396
Thank you for the help
Is there anything else you would like?
No, thank you.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
please check the weather in sacramento for me
it is currently 82 degrees with 26 percent chance of rain
ok, find me a house there
house located at 100 capitol mall is very nice. it has rating of 4.4
what is their number
their number is +1 916-326-5000
perfect, please book it for me
when are you checking out
i will check out on 7th of this month
how many people are coming with you
there are only two people
are you checking in on march 1st
yes please
please confirm your booking for a room for 2 people in sacramento check in on march 1st and check out on march 7th
ok perfect
your room is booked
thank you
what else can i do for you
no that's it
have a nice day
Please check the weather for me.
Which city's weather should I check?
Please check Anaheim on March 5th .
The expected average temperature for the day is 75 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 4 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected wind speed?
An average wind speed of 10 miles per hour is expected.
Cool, okay. Please find me a house to stay there.
I've found a nice house with a 4.2 rating, located at 1050 West Ball Road.
Please get me the phone number and find out if there's laundry service.
The contact number is +1 714-860-4660, and laundry service is available.
Okay, thanks. Could you find more houses, please?
I've found a nice house with a 4.0 rating, located at 1057 West Ball Road.
Please suggest more houses.
What about a nice 4.3 rated house at 1110 West Katella Avenue?
I love this house.
Should I go ahead and reserve this house?
Yes, please go ahead and reserve the house.
Will you be checking in on March 5th?
No, I'd like to check in on the 3rd of this month.
How large is your group, and when will you be checking out?
A party of two, checking out on March 5th 2019.
Okay. Let me see if I got everything correctly: Your party of 2 will be in Anaheim, checking in on March 3rd and checking out on March 5th.
That is correct. Please find out whether laundry service is available and the the total cost.
I have successfully made your reservation. Laundry service is available and the total cost is $228.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. That will be all.
Glad to have been of help. Bye.
I need to make some last minute plans for my trip. Can you check the weather real quick?
Sure, in what city?
I'm going to London, England.
The average temperature will be 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Ok, great. I also need to rent a house to stay in. Can you see what's available?
There's one at 1 Addington Street with a 4.3 rating.
Do they have laundry service, and what's their number?
They do have laundry service. You can call them at +44 333 400 6116.
Great, that sounds perfect. Can you book that house for 3 people from March 1st until Sunday this week?
Sure. To confirm, you want to book that house in London for 3 people from March 1st to March 3rd. Is that right?
Yes, sounds good.
Ok, your reservation went through.
Great, thanks. That's all for now.
Ok, have a good day.
What will the weather be like in Toronto, Canada on the 11th of March?
59 degrees on average with only a 28 percent chance of rain.
And the humidity?
Around 9 percent.
Will it be windy?
Wind speed is usually around 11 mph.
What about MArch 12th.
We're talking 64 degrees on average then. Don't worry about rain. Only 1 percent chance.
Great. I need a house to stay in if I go.
I got one for you at 108 Chestnut Street. 4.2 rating.
Great. Book it. I have 3 in my group. We'll be there from the 11th of March 2019 to the 14th.
Ok. 3 in Toronto from March 11th until March 14th. Right?
No. One person on the 9th.
OK. 1 person starting on March 9th?
Yes. What is the number there? And what will this run me?
You are booked. You can reach the house at +1 416-977-5000. This comes out to $460.
Great. Thank you.
I'm ready to go again.
Just relax. I'm all set.
Ok. You know where to find me.
What's the forecast for March 6th?
In which city?
Washington D.C.
Average of 80 degrees and 29 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Find a house for two there, 4.3 or higher rating with laundry service.
I found 10 places. 1011 L Street Northwest, Washington, District of Columbia 20001, United States is rated 4.3.
What's their number?
+1 202-898-1200.
Any others? 4.1 stars or higher.
There's 1 Washington Circle Northwest, Washington, District of Columbia 20037, United States at 4.1 stars.
Any others? For four people.
I found 8 places. 1075 Thomas Jefferson Street Northwest, Washington, District of Columbia 20007, United States is rated 4.1.
Great, book it from March 3rd to March 6th.
Please confirm: house for 4 in Washington D.C. from March 3rd to March 6th.
Yes.
Your house is reserved.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, thanks.
You're welcome, bye.
Check the weather on March 13th
Which city should I search for?
Check it in DC
The temperature would be around 79 degrees with 28 percent chance of rain
Okay, find me a house there with 4.4 rating or higher with laundry services
There are 8 houses that I found. There is one at 1331 pennsylvania avenue northwest, washington, district of columbia, 20004, united states with a 4.4 rating
This sounds great.
Should I make a reservation for it?
Yes, book a slot
are you checking in on march 13th? what is your check out date?
The check in is march 9th and check out is 14th of march
How many people should I book for?
Just one person
Booking the location for 1 in washington D.C. from march 9th to march 14th
what is the price and contact number?
The price is $640 and the number is +1 800-228-9290
thanks a lot
Can I help with anything else?
No, thanks again.
Have a great trip
What's the weather?
What city do you want weather details for?
Weather in Fresno, please.
The average temperature will be 72 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 2 percent.
Okay. Please find me a house to stay in there.
I have 5 houses you might consider. There's a nice one with a 3.8 rating at 1055 Van Ness Avenue.
That sounds excellent. I need to book it for 2 people, checking in on the 1st of March and leaving on the 7th of March.
Please confirm your request: you are reserving accommodation for 2 people at the house in Fresno. You'll check in on March 1st, and check out on March 7th.
Yes, that will be great. What's the phone number there? Do they have laundry service?
Your reservation has been made. Yes, they do have laundry service. Their phone number is +1 559-233-6650.
Thanks, that was all I needed today.
Glad to be of service. Bye!
What will the weather be like in Vegas on the 13th?
Average temperature: 73 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 14 percent
Ok, thanks. What will the weather be like on Monday next week?
Average temperature: 77 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 15 percent
Good. I need a house to stay there
I found 6 houses. At 1215 South Las Vegas Boulevard there's a house with rating 3.7
I need a house for 2 people
I found 5 houses. One of these is at 217 Las Vegas Boulevard North, its rating is 3.5
There's a laundry service? What's the telephone number?
No, there isn't a laundry service. Phone number is +1 702-768-9823
Can you suggest other solutions?
A nice house at 2219 North Rancho Drive, with rating 3.4
Oh, that's perfect!
Do you want to book this house?
Yes, please! I need it from March 4th 2019 to March 9th
A house for 2 people in Las Vegas from March 4th to March 9th: do you confirm?
Yes, I confirm. Thanks!
The house has been booked!
Thanks a lot! It's all
Have a good day!
What is the weather in Sacramento?
The temperature will average 82 degrees Farenheit and there is a 26 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected humidity and wind speeds?
The wind will average 7 miles per hour and the humidity will be 27 percent.
Thank you. I also would like to find a house there for one person.
There is a nice house with a 4.4 rating located at 100 Capitol Mall.
Is laundry service available and may I have their contact number?
Laundry service is available and their phone number is +1 916-326-5000.
The house sounds perfect. Please book it!
Will your arrival date be March 1st and when will you be checking-out?
Yes, and I will be cehcking-out on Thursday, next week.
Please confirm a reervation for 1 in Sacramento arriving on March 1st and leaving on March 7th.
yes, that is correct.
Reservation is confirmed.
Thank you for your assistance. I am done for the moment.
It's been my pleasure! Bye now!
Phoenix forecast.
Average of 89 F and 15 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Look up a house for one there with laundry service.
I found 10 places. 10 East Thomas Road is rated 4.6.
What else?
10601 North 56th Street, Scottsdale, AZ 85254, USA is rated 4.3.
What's the number?
+1 480-948-6100.
Good. Book it starting today and checking out Tuesday next week.
Please confirm: book for 1 in Phoenix from March 1st to March 5th.
Yes.
Your house is booked.
Thanks, that's all.
You're welcome, bye.
Can you help me check the weather?
In what city do you want to check the weather?
I would like to know the weather in Vancouver, BC for the today.
The temperature is expected to be 75 degrees, however there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The humidity is low at 19 percent and winds are light at 8 miles per hour.
Okay, thanks. I need to find a house to stay there for three people, and I would like the rating to be at least 4.3 or higher. I'd like it to include a laundry service.
I located 10 houses for you. The first one is on 111 Robson Street and has a rating of 4.3.
That house sounds good. Can you please book it for me? I will be checking in on the 1st of March 2019 and checking out on the 4th of March.
Please confirm the following details: Booking a house for 3 people in Vancouver on March 1st and checking out on March 4th.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation is confirmed.
Thank you for your help, that is all I need for now.
It has been my pleasure. Goodbye.
Can you check the weather on March 1st in Fresno?
It should be 72 degrees and there is a 2 percent chance of rain.
How windy will the day be?
The wind should be around 10 miles per hour.
I would like to find a house to stay.
There are 5 houses available. There is one located at 1055 Van Ness Avenue and the rating is 3.8.
Does this place have laundry service?
This place does have laundry service.
Can I have their phone number?
Their phone number is +1 559-233-6650.
I would like to book a house for two people on March 1st.
When will you be checking out?
I will be checking out on the 7th of March.
2 people going to Fresno check in is March 1st and check out is March 7th.
Yes, that is good, what is the cost?
The cost is $1,620.
Thank you that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I'd like to check the weather forecast for March 6th in Phoenix, AZ.
It is predicted to be 88 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the humidity and wind will be?
Humidity is projected to be 43 percent with an average wind speed of 3 miles per hour.
Great. I need a round trip flight there.
When do you expect to return?
I will need to be back on Friday next week.
Where are you departing from? Will you be starting your travels on March 6th?
Yes, I will be leaving CDMX.
There are 2 flights that match your criteria. I have found an American Airlines flight for $250 that leaves at 8:05 am and returns at 7:35 am.
That will work for me. Can you help me find a house to stay at?
I have one available at 10 East Thomas Road that has a solid 4.6 rating.
Perfect. Thank you.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
What is he weather like on March 9th?
In which city should I search?
I would like to know the weather in Vegas.
The weather should be 86 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
How humid is the day like and is it windy?
It's 20 percent humidity and the wind is 6 miles per hour.
Can you find me a round trip flight?
Would you like to leave on March 9th? When is your return?
I would like to leave SFO on the 6th of March and return on the 10th.
There is a flight with American Airlines that leaves at 5:30 pm and returns at 5:30 am the price is $105.
Is the ticket refundable and does the flight have stops?
There is 0 stop and the ticket is not refundable.
That flight sounds good to me.
Should I book a ticket?
No, I just wanted the information.
Can I help with something else?
I would like to rent a house for 2 people with a rating of 3.5 or more.
There is a house at 1215 South Las Vegas Boulevard that has a 3.5 rating.
That house sounds great.
Have a good day.
Can you check the weather for me?
Yes. In which city?
Please check KL on March 11th.
There is a 2 percent chance of rain. Tempertaure for the day is 99 degrees!
What about humidity?
It appears the humidity will be baout 16 percent.
Ok. Can you get me a round trip flight heading there? I need to leave on Thursday next week.
What city are you departing from and what date will you return?
I have to get back March 11th. I will depart from San Francisco.
American Airlines has a flight leaving at 5:20 am. The return flights departs at 5:05 am. Tickets are $409 each.
That sounds great. Can you find me a house to stay at there?
There are 10 houses available. A highly recommended one is 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan. They have a 3.8 rtaing.
Could you check for others? I'd like a rating of 4.3 or above.
There is one with a 4.3 rating located at 1020, Jalan Sultan Ismail, 50250.
That sounds great.
Shall I make a reservation for you?
No, not at this time.
Is there anything else I can do?
No, thats all for now.
Have a nice day.
What's the weather going to be like in Portland, OR on March 12th?
It'll be around 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy or humdid at all?
Humidity levels will be about 30 percent, and wind speeds are going to be about 11 miles per hour.
Got it. Could you find me a round trip to Portland?
Sure. Will you be leaving on March 12th? And where would you be leaving from? Also, what day would you like to come back?
I'd like to leave on the 9th of this month from Los Angeles. and get back on the 13th.
I've found 5 flights for you. Alaska Airlines has an outbound flight that leaves at 7:25 am and a return flight that leaves at 1:55 pm. A ticket costs $186. How does that sound?
What else is available?
American Airlines has an outbound flight that leaves at 11:15 pm and a return flight that leaves at 6 am. One ticket would cost you $170.
Is there anything else? I want to travel Economy.
How about Delta Airlines? The outbound flight leaves at 9:50 pm and the return flight leaves at 3:20 pm. Tickets costs $172 per.
Does it have 0 stops?
This flight has 1 stop.
Which airport will it leave from?
This flight is going to leave from LAX International Airport.
Okay, that sounds good. I'm also going to need a house for two in Portland. I'd like it to have a rating of at least 4.1 please.
How about the house at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street? It has a rating of 4.1 stars.
Sounds great. Thanks, that's all I needed.
You're welcome! Enjoy your trip!
I might be going to NYC soon, can you check the weather?
The temperature is 66 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 37 percent chance of rain.
How will the humidity be?
It will be around 41 percent.
That sounds good enough. Can you find a round trip flight?
From where are you leaving? Do you want to depart on March 1st?
Yes, make the departure on March 1st and look flights from Chicago
When do you want to return?
Make the return flight on March 8th.t
There are 3 possible flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight, the onward flight departs at 12:30 pm and the return departs at 5:25 am. It has a price of $138.
At what time does the onward flight arrives and does it have 1 stop?
No, the flight has 0 stops and it arrives at 3:49 pm.
That is perfect.
Do you want to buy ticketse?
Not for now, but I would like to find a house there.
There are 10 possible houses you might like. There is a house at 100 Greenwich Street with a 4.4 rating.
Does it have laundry service?
Yes, the house has laundry service.
That sounds great. That would be all for now.
Have a great day.
What will the weather be like in Kuala Lumpur on March 3rd?
The average temperature for the day is forecast to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Will it be very windy?
The forecast wind speed is 9 miles per hour.
Okay thanks. Can you help me find a round trip flight from San Fran to there? I want to return by Friday next week.
Do you plan to leave on March 3rd?
No, I want to leave on the 2nd.
I have an American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:20 am for $402. The return flight leaves at 5:05 am.
How many stops on that flight? 1 stop?
Yes, there is 1 stop on that flight.
That one sounds good. Can you also find a house for me to stay in? I will need laundry service. I want something with at least a 4.4 rating.
I have a nice house at 1020, Jalan Sultan Ismail, 50250 with a rating of 4.4.
That one will work. That's all.
I'm glad I could be of service. Bye.
Hi, I need to see what the weather is like in Mountain View.
In Mountain View it will be about 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of precipitation.
Great, can you check the weather in SD on March 5th?
In SD it will be 84 degrees fahrenheit with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how windy will it be there?
The wind will average about 4 miles per hour.
Great, will it be humid?
The humidity is expected to be 21 percent.
Great, can you help me find a flight there that leaves on March 5th?
Of course, where will you depart from?
I need to leave from SF.
Okay, and when will you be back?
I want to return on the 12th of this month.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight for $107 that leaves at 6:10 am. The return flight will depart at 11:10 am.
That sounds nice. I need to find a house to stay in with laundry service for 1 person.
I found 10 houses for you. A nice one is located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States. It's rated 4.6.
That sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to make a reservation for it?
No thanks, that's it for now.
It was a joy to assist you, goodbye.
I need to check the weather on the March 8th.
In which city?
In Atlanta, GA please.
The average temperature will be 79 degrees with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks.
Can I do anything else for you?
I also need a round trip flight for 4 people on Sunday this week.
When do you want to return?
I need to return on March 13th.
Where will you depart from?
I will be departing from NY.
I found an American Airlines flight at 11:20 am which returns at 6:25 am for $122.
How many stops does it have, is it refundable?
The ticket is refundable and has 0 stops.
Sounds good, I also need a house to stay in while there.
I found one at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest which has a rating of 4.3.
Perfect, that's all I need.
It was my pleasure, have a great day.
Hi, I'd like to check the weather in Portland, OR on March 6th.
Sure, the average temperature that day is 73 degrees Fahreneheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Great, can you find me a round trip flight to go there? I'm leaving from LA and prefer American Airlines.
Would you like to leave on March 6th?
Yeah, that's great. I'd like to return the 13th.
Okay, I found 1 flight for you on American Airlines. It leaves at 11:15 pm and and the return flight takes off at 6 am. It will cost $171.
Okay, that sounds great.
Would you like to get tickets for it?
No thanks. I need to find a house to stay in while I'm there.
There are 10 possible houses for you. There's a nice one rated 4.2 that's located at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street.
Okay, can you give me their number?
You can reach them at +1 503-281-6111.
Is there anything else? I need a house with laundry service.
There's one rated 4.5 located at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue.
Great, can I get their number?
You can contact them at +1 503-220-1339.
Thanks, this house is perfect. That's all for now.
It's been a pleasure, goodbye!
I want to know how the weather will be in LAX on March 1st.
From what I can see the temperature for your requested day will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 28 percent chance that it will rain.
Can you tell me how windy is going to be there? Also please tell me the humidity level.
The humidity level is expected to be around 75 percent, and the wind speed should average at about 4 miles per hour.
Alright, fine. I need you to help me find a round trip flight to go there.
Will you be leaving on March 1st? Can you tell me when you will be coming back?
That seems nice. I would like to go back on the 9th.
Can you please tell me from where you will depart?
I will be departing from SFO.
There are 4 flights which suits what you want. You might consider the Alaska Airlines flight which departs at 7:10 pm and returns at 5:50 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $97.
This flights seems as what I want.
Is there something else I can help you with?
I also need a place to sleep, so I want you to help me find a house there.
There are 10 houses which you might consider having. One of the nice houses is at 1020 South Figueroa Street, and has a 4.2 rating.
This house seems as what I want. That would be all.
I enjoy helping you. Good bye!
What will the weather in London be on March 4th?
The average temperature will be 87 degree Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
What about on March 2nd?
The average temperature will be 80 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind and humidity be like?
The humidity will be 28 percent and the wind speed will be 6 miles per hour.
I will need a round trip flight there as well.
Would you be leaving on March 2nd?
Yes. That's right.
Where will you leave from and when will you come back?
I will be leaving from Atlanta, GA on the 14th of March.
There are 3 options. American Airlines has a flight leaving at 8:40 pm and returning at 2:05 pm. The total is $296.
Sounds great. Is there a house nearby?
1 Addington Street has a 4.3 rating and is one of 10 There are 10 options.
Sounds awesome. That's all for now.
Okay. It was a pleasure assisting you.
I would like to check the weather forecast for March 7th in San Francisco.
There is a 9 % chance of rain and the ave temp will be 74 degrees fahrenheit.
Will it be humid?
About 17 % humidity.
right fine. Can you search for flights there and back?
When will you be returning.
Friday next week.
Will you be flying out on March 7th?
I am leaving on Tuesday next week.
Where are you leaving from?
From Phoenix, AZ.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 7:35 am and returning at 8:10 am costing $203 in total.
Are there any other options?
There is a Delta airlines flight leaving at 11:55 am and returning at 5:50 am costing $116.
That sounds great. Now could you also help me source a house to stay in while I am there?
There is a good one with a 3.7 rating at 1095 Market Street.
Do you have any other options?
There is another good one with a 4.4 rating at 1100 Market Street Hotel Entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street.
Is there a laundry service there and do you have their telephone number?
Yes there is a laundry service and you can contact them on +1 415-735-7777.
This house is just brilliant.
Would you like me to book it for you?
No not right now. That is everything.
I am glad to help goodbye.
What is the weather?
What city?
Sydney, NSW, Australia
The average temperature is 94 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Ok, I need a round trip flight there.
Where are you leaving from?
I leaving from Chi-Town. Find economy seats.
Are you leaving March 1st? When are you coming back?
Yes, and I am coming back March 6th.
I found 2 options including Delta Airlines leaving at 10:40 am. The return flight leaves at 5:50 pm. The ticket is $375.
Sounds good. I also need a house for 3 people with a rating of 4.3 or higher.
I found 1 Salisbury Road, Castle Hill New South Wales 2154, Australia. The rating is 4.3.
That is perfect.
Is there anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a nice time down under.
I want to check the weather condition on March 13th and I need your help in this regard.
Do you have any particular city in your mind to check for weather?
Yes, I need to search it in Kuala Lumpur.
The level of temperature will be 97 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there will be 1 % chance for rain fall there on that day.
Thanks for that information. I want to search for a round trip flight to that place on 4th of this month and please search for the flight with American Airlines.
From which place do you want the flight to leave?
I am planning to leave from Seattle and search for the flight from this place.
What is your return date?
will be back on 13th of March 2019.
Found an American Airlines outbound flight which leaves at 4:55 am and the return flight will leave at 5:05 am for which the ticket cost is $383. What is your opinion on this flight?
Yes, that will work perfect to me.
Shall I book the tickets to this flight now?
No, thanks for the information.
How can I help you further?
I want to stay there for a while for which I need to find a nice house. Can you search it for me?
Yes, found one house at 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan and its rating is 3.8. What is your opinion?
That is perfect and that's all I want.
Have a good day.
What will the weather be like in Atherton on 3rd of March?
It will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain that day.
Will there be any humidity that day?
There will be 24 percent humidity.
Will it be windy at all on that day?
12 miles per hour will be the average wind speed for that day.
What will the weather be like on March 4th in Delhi, India?
It will be 97 degrees Fahrenheit with an 8 percent chance of rain on that day.
Can you find a round trip flight for me on that day?
Sure I am looking for something for a March 4th departure, and where will you be departing from?
Yes, that date is good, I will be departing from Atlanta.
And when are you returning?
I am returning on the 10th of this month.
Ok, I found 2 flights. One is an American Airlines flight for $446 that departs at 2:30 pm and the return leaves at 1:45 pm. Will that one do?
Can you tell me if it's a refundable ticket?
No, unfortunately it is not refundable.
Is there any other flights that are available?
Yes, there is a United Airlines flight for $377 that departs at 6:15 am and the return leaves at 12:35 pm.
Does the flight have stops?
Yes, the flight has 1 stop.
That flight sounds perfect!
Would you like to purchase the tickets?
No thank you! Can you find me a house there for 1 person?
There is a nice house with a 4.5 rating located at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi.
Are there any other houses available to stay at?
Yes, I found one with a 4.3 rating located at 12, Mangalam Place, Sector 3, Rohini, New Delhi.
That one sounds wonderful. Thanks, that's all I'll need for now.
It was my pleasure, have a nice day!
What will the weather be Tuesday next week?
For what city?
For ATL!
The temperature will be 82 degree with a 18 perent chance for rain.
Okay can you find me a round trip flight for four people on the 2nd of MArch with Delta Airlines.
Where will you be traveling from and what day would you to come back?
I flying out of NY and back March 5th 2019.
I have a flight with Delta Airlines that cost $137. The flight departs 7:20 am and the return flight departs at 9:20 am.
When does the return flight arrival time?
The flight arrival time is 11:42 am.
That sounds good. Now I need t search houses for one person with laundry.
I have 10 homes you may like. How about 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest with a 4.3 rating.
What else do you have?
How about 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast with a 4.5 rating?
What is the phone number?
The number is +1 404-745-5000.
What houses do you have with a 2.8 rating?
How about 111 Cone Street Northwest with a rating of 2.8?
What is the phone number?
The number is +1 404-524-7000.
Great, that will be all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I want to check the weather condition in New York on March 13th for which I need your help.
Temperature level will be 59 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there may be a chance of 33 % for rain fall.
Thanks. I need a round trip flight to go there. Search for the convenient one.
What is your departure date? Is that for March 13th and what is your return date and from which place are you leaving form?
I need the flight from Seattle on 4th of this month and will return on March 13th. Search accordingly.
How about a Delta Airlines Flight? found an outbound flight at 8:45 am under the cost $313 and the leaving time of return flight will be at 7:30 am.
That is okay for me. Thanks.
Do you want me to book the tickets now?
No, not now. Thanks.
Any more help you need?
Yes, I need one house there to stay for a while.
What about the one located at 100 Greenwich Street with rating 4.4.
That is nice to me and thanks for your help.
Have a good day.
How will the weather be in District of Columbia on March 3rd?
The temperature will be 76 degrees with a 8 percent chance of rain.
How will the weather be in Delhi, India on the tomorrow?
The temperature will be 95 degrees with 0 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind speed be?
The wind speed is expected to reach 5 miles per hour.
What will be the humidity?
The humidity level is expected to reach 15 percent.
Cool. Can you look up round trip flight to Delhi, India for the 1st of this month?
Where would you be departing from and when would you like to return home?
I need to be back in SD on the 4th of this month.
I have 2 flights that you may like. I have a flight with American Airlines that costs $352. Your departure time will be 9:50 am and your return flight departure time is 3 pm.
What is the other flight you have?
I have a ticket with United Airlines for $368. Your departure time for this flight is 7:20 am and your return flight departure time is 1:10 am.
Okay, cool. Now if you don't mind can you look up houses nearby that offer laundry services.
I have located 10 homes you mae like. How about 12, Doctor APJ ABdul Kalam Road, New Delhi, it has a 4.5 rating.
What is the phone number?
The number I have listed is +91 11 3955 5000.
Great, I might go with that one.
Do you need anything else.
No. thank you for the help.
You are welcome, goodbye.
Could you possibly check what the weather is going to be like on today?
Which city will I check?
in KL please.
There is an 8 % chance of rain and the ave temp will be 102 degrees fahrenheit.
ok fine. Can you find me flights there and back for 3 people? I have no preference over the airlines but need to be back on the 9th.
Will you be flying out on March 1st and from which city?
yes and I will be leaving from SFO.
There is 1 flight option with American Airlines leaving at 5:20 am and returning at 5:05 am with a ticket price of $432.
That flight sounds perfect.
Will I purchase the tickets for you now?
no that is okay.
Would you like assistance with anything else?
I would like to find a house to stay in while I am there.
There are 10 possible options for you. One has a 3.8 rating and is at 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan.
Is there a laundry service available?
yes there is a laundry service.
Are there other options?
There is one with a 4.2 rating at 1, Jalan Pantai Baharu, Jaya Tower 3, 59200 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan.
Is there a laundry service there and do you have the contact number?
yes there is a laundry service and the number is +60 3-2298 1888.
This is a fab house.
Would you like me to reserve this?
no not right now.
it was great to help you goodbye.
I will be visiting my sister on Portland on March 4th, can you please check the weather for me?
Sure. Upon checking, it says that there is an 18 percent chance of rain and the average temperature is 68 degrees on that day.
Alright, thanks! Can you also help me to find a flight going there? I will be bringing my parents with me, so there's gonna be 3 people in my group.
Not a problem. When will you guys come back?
I need to be back on March 11th because I need to meet our boss.
Okay, and you will be leaving here on March 4th, right?
Yes, we will be leaving here at Atlanta, GA on March 4th.
Cool. There's 3 flights available, and the best of it is from American Airlines that leaves at 2:30 pm. It's not that early for you guys to have time to prepare. And the return flight leaves at 7:20 am. It costs $333.
Is that an economy ticket?
Yes, it is. It is 1 of the 2 other flight I mentioned earlier, maybe you prefer this one? It costs $310, flight is from Southwest Airlines that leaves at 1:30 pm and the return flight will leave at 3:15 pm.
I think it sounds good. Which airport will it depart by the way?
It will depart from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. Just 20 minute drive away from you.
Yes, that's good to hear. When does the onward flight arrives at Portland?
It arrives at 7 pm at Portland. You can have your dinner at the airport.
Yeah, you're right. It all sounds good.
Would you like to buy these tickets?
I will consult my parents first. Please don't buy it yet.
Okay. Do you need help with anything else?
Just one more thing, please. I need to look for a place where we could stay there.
Sure. There are 10 houses that are available within the vicinity. Would you like a house with 4.2 rating that is located at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street?
Do you have their phone number? I think I shall call them first.
+1 503-281-6111 is their phone number.
Do you know if they have laundry service?
Yes, it was mentioned here that they do have laundry service.
Thanks. May I have an option?
Yeah, sure. How about this house with 4.5 rating located at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue.
What else do we have there? I am not really familiar with that street.
How about this one at 11550 Northeast Airport Way with a 4.2 rating?
That sounds good. That's all I need. Thank you so much!
You're welcome. It is my pleasure to help you. Bye!
check weather march 7th
what city for weather?
in seattle for me
temperature is 69 degrees and 16 percent rain
how humid though?
is is around 20 percent
sure then that works
where are you heading from and will you leave march 7th?
I wil leave on the 1st and from new york and be back the 12th of this month
American airlines outgoing is 3:40 pm and return is 4 pm and price is $315
what airport does it arrive at?
destination seattle-tacoma international airport
I will leave from atlanta, ga and united airlines
there is one united airlines flight leaving at 10:55 am and returns 4:55 pm and price is $190
what airport from?
it goes from hartsfield-jackson international airport
flight sounds good to me
should I get tickets for it?
no In am good and wanna find a house there
10 houses and one at 1000 1st avenue with 4.5 rating
house is awesome
wanna make a reservation for the house?
no thanks. that is all
it has been my pleasure. good day
Get me a detailed weather report please.
Sure, for what city?
What's going on in London UK?
It's 81 degrees there and there is a 23 % chance of rain.
Fine, get a round trip ticket for March 1st leaving ATL?
When will you return?
I'm needed back next friday.
Well, there is an American Airlines flight leaving at 8:40 pm the return flight departs at 2:05 pm. It will cost $321.
When does the initial flight arrive?
It lands around 10:44 am.
That ticket will do.
Should I buy it now?
Not now. I want a house while I'm there. There is just 1 (Me). I need laundry service available, I'm messy.
Well, there are 10 choices. How about 1 Addington Street. It's rated 4.3 stars.
That's great. thanks.
I live to serve you, enjoy.
I wanna see the weather in Olema, California please
It should be 91 degrees today with a pretty high 21 percent chance of rain
OK, what about the weather in Toronto on March 3rd?
It's 65 degrees with an even higher 58 percent chance of rain
Isi it gonna be windy and humid there?
It's around 61 percent humidity and 11 mile per hour wind speeds
OK, can you help me find a round trip to Toronto from Chicago?
You want to leave on March 3rd?
Yes that's right
And when do you wanna come back?
I wanna be back home by next Friday
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:20 pm and leaves at 10:05 am which will cost you $119
When does that fight arrive?
It arrives at 6:58 pm
Any other flights?
How bout a United Airlines flight that leaves at 2:30 pm and a return flight at 5:35 pm that's cheaper at $115
OK, great, I like that. Find me a house at my destination to stay in
OK, I found 10 that might work. How about this 4.2 rated place along 108 Chestnut Street
What else do you have?
There's a 3.0 rated place at 111 Carlton Street
OK that works for me
Do you want to make reservations for it?
No, not this second, maybe later. That's all for now
Great, just let me know.
Hi, can you tell me how the weather is in Sydney?
The current temperature is 94 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me what the humidity will be?
The humidity index is 15 percent.
Great! Now I need your help finding round trip flight tickets.
Where are you traveling from?
I am coming from SD.
Are you interested in leaving March 1st? If so, when do you want to return to SD?
Yes March 1st will be fine and I will be returning on the 14th.
I have located 2 flights for you. Would you be interested in a $300 round trip ticket from Delta Airlines? Your outbound departure time would be 11:05 am and your return departure flight would be 5:50 pm.
What airport would I be flying out form, and does this flight have any stops?
You will fly out of Kingsford Smith International Airport and it only has 1 stop.
What is the other flight information?
The other flight is a $293 round trip ticket with United Airlines. Your outbound departure time will be 7:20 am and your return flight would depart at 10:05 pm.
Great, that one may work.
Did you want me to reserve that ticket for you?
No, I have to talk to my husband first.
No problem, did you need anything else?
Yes, Can you help me find a house to stay in while I am there.
I have 10 available houses. How about 1 Columbia Court, Baulkham Hills new South Wales 2153, Australia? It has a 4.1 star rating.
Do you have any houses that include laundy service, and it will only be for one person.
I have 9 houses that match that description. How about 1 Hosking Place. It has a 3.6 star rating.
What is the phone number there?
The number I have listed is +61 1300 633 462.
Cool, that house sounds great.
Did you want me to make the reservations for you?
No, I have to talk to my husband first. Thank you for all of your help.
It was my pleasure.
I need to check the weather in Atlanta for the March 8th.
Sure thing. The average temperature in Atlanta should be 79 degrees Fahrenheit for the day. There is a 12 percent chance of rain.
Okay thanks. How about the weather for March 11th?
The average temperature in Atlanta for the day should be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. Can you also find me a round trip flight headed out there?
Would you like to leave on March 11th?
I am headed out on the 6th of March. I need seats for 2 on American Airlines.
Okay no problem. When are you coming back?
I'll be heading out of London, England and coming back on March 14th.
I found 1 convenient flight for your trip. There is an outbound American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:05 pm. The return flight will leave at 3:25 pm. The ticket price is $372.
Okay, that flight sounds good to me. Could you also find a house for me out there? I need something for 3 people rated at least 4.1 or higher.
I found 10 houses for you. There is a really nice one located at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest with a rating of 4.1.
Awesome! That house looks great. Thanks a lot.
My pleasure. Bye for now.
Tell me what the weather is like
Which city should I check for?
Check for Chicago
The temperature is expected to be 73 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I also need a round trip flight going there.
Would you be traveling on March 1st?
Yes, that is correct
What is your departure station?
We are 3 people leaving from Paris, France
When would you be returning?
I would be returning on 11th of this month. Is there a delta airlines flight available?
I found 1 delta airlines flight that leaves at 11:20 pm. Its return flight leaves at 6:40 pm and costs $237
Sounds good to me.
Should I book the tickets?
No, will do that later. I also want to find a house to stay there.
There are 10 houses available. There is a 4.4 rated house at 1 south franklin street
Show me other options, it needs to have laundry service. I want to book one for two people.
There is a 4.5 rated house at 1 west wacker drive
Anything else you have?
How about a 4.2 rated place at 10 east grand avenue?
that sounds good
Should I make the booking?
No, will do that later as well.
Can I help with anything else?
No, thanks anyway.
Have a great day today
Tell me the weather in NYC please.
A 37 percent chance of it raining and temperatures around 66 Fahrenheit.
Is there anything about the wind there?
Yes, 12 miles per hour average winds.
Alright, thank you.
Can I be of any further assistance?
Yes, I need a round trip flight there on the 1st of March. I'd like to use American Airlines, if possible.
Where do you need to catch that flight from. How long do you anticipate being gone?
I need to catch the plane in London. I am hoping to return on the 12th of this month.
I was able to find you one with American Airlines. The departure time is 2:05 pm and you would catch your flight back at 6:15 pm and a seat will cost you $295.
Excellent work, now I need a place to stay, find a house there please.
There is a house with a 4.4 rating, its supposed to be quite nice, the address is 100 Greenwich Street.
Perfect house, dismissed.
I have enjoyed the opportunity to assist you. Goodbye.
What is the weather like?
In which city?
New York City
The temperature is 66 degrees Fahrenheit, with 37 percent chance of rain.
Great. I want a round trip flight heading there.
Where would you be leaving from and when would you like to return? You are planning to leave on March 1st?
That would be fine. I will be leaving Seattle, WA and returning on March 3rd.
There are 3 suitable flights. Delta Airlines has an outbound fight at 3:15 pm which returns at 6 am. The cost of the ticket is $301.
Is there anything else?
There is a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 5:25 am and returns at 8:40 am. The cost is $356
Is there anything else? I would like an economy seat when I return on the 13th of this month.
There are 2 suitable options. American Airlines has a flight that leaves at 4 pm and returns at 6:05 am. The cost of the ticket is $297
What airport would it be leaving from and is it a refundable ticket?
The flight would be leaving Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and the ticket is not refundable.
That fight seems great. I would also need to find a house there.
There is a nice one located on 100 Greenwich street with a rating of 4.4
That would work.
Would you like to reserve the house?
Not now. That"s all for now?
No problem. Bye
I'm on my way to the family reunion. Would you use your great mind to tell me the weather in Atlanta on March 7th?
Sure. Besides showing a 26 percent rain forecast, it looks like the temperature during the day will average 83 degrees.
I see. I'll go ahead and check out flight reservations now. Would you look up a round-trip flight for me to get there, please?
I'll be happy to, and when do you want to return?
I'll be returning here on the 10th of March.
So, would you like to fly out on March 7th?
That's a good time.
What's the airport you want for your departure?
Let's fly out of New York.
I can take care of that. Do you want a ticket for an American Airlines flight, leaving at 11:20 am and returning at 6:25 am, costing $140?
That seems like the flight for me, thanks.
Do you want to get your ticket now?
Nope, I'll chill on that for a bit.
Do you need more information?
I do. I need to find a house for my stay there?
Okay. We have a house with a 4.3 rating located at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest. That's one option among 10 available houses.
Hmm, that's a good choice.
Do you want to set up a reservation at that house?
I think I'll wait on that, too. That's all for now. Appreciate that.
Of course. Enjoy your day.
I want to know how the weather is going to be in LAX on March 5th.
The average temperature in your requested location should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit, with a chance of raining at 12 percent.
Alright, fine. I would like for you to find a round trip flight to go there.
Can you tell me, from where you will depart? Are you willing to depart on March 5th?
I will be departing this Sunday from Atlanta, and I want to fly with Delta Airlines.
Can you tell me when will you be returning?
I want to return on 7th of March, and I do not mind which class the ticket will be.
There is 1 convenient flight for the journey you want to have. The flight is with Delta Airlines and it leaves at 5:40 pm, and when it returns it departs at 8:40 pm. The ticket for this flight costs $190.
This flight seems nice to me.
Do you want to book tickets for this flight?
No, I don't want to buy tickets for this flight.
Is there something else I can do for you?
I would like to have a place to sleep there, so I need to find a house.
There are 10 houses which you can choose from. One of the houses has a rating of 4.2 and is located at 1020 South Figueroa Street.
Can you check if the house has laundry service? Can you give me the phone number, I can use to call them?
I can confirm that the house has laundry service. If you want to call them you can at +1 213-748-1291.
This house seems nice. That would be all.
I enjoy helping you. Good bye!
What's the weather for Sydney please.
Average temperature in Sydney is 94 degrees. I show a 4 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity expected to be?
Humidity is going to be around 15 percent.
Dang, let's go ahead and search round trip flights there.
Great, would you please confirm if you wanted to leave on March 1st and for how long you would like to stay? Do you know where you would like to depart from?
I would like to fly out of Phoenix and stay until the 7th of March.
I found 2 flight options for you. Delta Airlines has an outbound flight at 11:55 am and a return flight departing at 5:50 pm. Ticket is $312.
That will do just fine.
Should I proceed and purchase this ticket?
No, don't.
No problem. Could you use my assistance with anything else?
Locate a rental house there with laundry service available. Please ensure the ratings are 4.5 or higher.
I did locate one unit at 110 Cumberland Street, The Rocks New South Wales 2000, Australia with a rating of 4.5
Can you find other options please.
How about 12 Darling Drive with a rating 4.5.
This will do.
Should we reserve this?
No, not yet. Good bye.
Alright, Have a wonderful day. Bye.
I want to check the weather for March 12th.
Where should I check the weather?
Check the weather in Chicago on March 5th.
The average temperature will be 71 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 28 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be? And how humid?
The humidity is around 40 percent while the average wind speed will be around 5 miles per hour.
Oh, okay. Could you find a round trip flight that is going there? I'd like to leave on the 1st. There are three people total in my group.
Where do you want to leave from?
I'm leaving from Seattle, WA.
When would you like to return?
I'd like to return on the 14th of March.
I have found 4 flights that would work for you. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4 pm and returns at 2:50 pm. It costs $258.
Are there any other flights available?
There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 11:50 pm and returns at 3:35 pm. The ticket costs $207.
That sounds great.
Should I buy tickets for it?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I can help with?
I'd like to find a house to stay at there. I want one that has a 4.5 rating or higher. There are four people total.
There are 10 houses available. One nice option is located at 1 West Wacker Drive and has a rating of 4.5
This would work great.
Would you like to make the reservation?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Nope, that'll be all. Thanks so much!
It was my pleasure. Bye for now!
I would like information on the weather
Which city do you want information for?
I would like to know the weather in New York City
Average temperature: 66 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 37 percent
What percentage of humidity is expected?
Around 41 percent
Ok. I need a round trip flight to go there for one people, any class should be fine. The city of departure is Paris.
What is the return date?
I want to come back on March 14th
Is the departure date March 1st?
Yes, it is.
There are 2 flights. Delta Airlines flight leaves at 10 am. The return flight is at 10:50 pm. Ticket costs $276
Ok, It's nice for me! I need a house to stay there, with laundry service.
I found a house at 100 Greenwich Street with rating 4.4
Ok, It's good!
Do you want to reserve this house?
Not now, thanks
Do you need anything else?
No, It's all. Thanks!
Have a good day!
What's the weather like on March 10th?
In what city, exactly?
Specifically in CDMX.
It should be about 96 degrees Fahrenheit there, with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. How about the weather in Atlanta, GA?
Atlanta? It should be about 88 degrees Fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. Can you get a round trip flight there for me?
When will you be back?
My group of one returns on the 12th of this month.
Will you head out on March 10th?
No. The 5th.
What place will you leave from?
I'll be leaving Chicago.
I found 3 flights that suit your needs. One of them is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:40 pm and returns at 9:15 pm. A ticket costs $129.
Sounds good! I also want to find a house in the area.
You might like the house at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest, which has a rating of 4.3.
Great! That's all I need from you.
Glad to help you out. Goodbye.
Please check the weather.
What city?
San Fran.
The average is 91 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
How humid?
The humidity is about 49 percent.
Ok, I also need a round trip flight there.
When are you coming back? Where are you leaving from? Are you leaving on March 1st?
Yes. I am leaving from Phoenix, AZ and coming back on the 14th.
I found 4 options, first is American Airlines that leaves at 7:35 am and the return flight arrives at 8:10 am. The ticket price is $182.
Sounds good.
Are you ready to buy tickets?
No, not yet. I need a house for 1 person.
I found 10 homes including 1095 Market Street with a rating on 3.7.
That is cool. That it it.
Have a nice day.
Can you get me the weather forecast for New Delhi on March 13th?
There is a 0 percent chance of rain with a high temperature of 100 degrees!
Thanks. Can you check American Airlines for a round trip flight to New Delhi? I'd like to return on the 14th of this month.
Will you be leaving March 13th? What is your departure city?
I will leaving from Atlanta, GA on March 3rd.
American Airlines has a flight departing Atlanta at 2:30 pm. The return flight departs New Delhi at 9:20 am. Tickets are $431.
What time does the onward flight arrive? Does the flight depart from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport?
Yes the flight departs from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. Onward flight arrives at 8:39 pm.
That sounds very good. Can you find a house for me to stay in?
I found 10 houses. There is one with a 4.5 rating at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi.
That sounds perfect to me
Shall I make a reservation?
Not now. Thanks but thats all I need
Have a nice day.
Give me a weather report.
What city shall I search?
Give me ATL.
Well, high will be 86 F. There is only a 28 % chance.
How windy is it there?
Not too, about 11 MPH.
Fine, go ahead and get me a round trip ticket. I want to return on the 6th.
Do you want to leave on March 1st? Where ware you leaving from?
That's great, I'm leaving from Vancouver.
Delta Airlines has a flight leaving at 3:20 am. It comes back at 3:20 pm. It's going to cost you $268.
Are there any more reasonably timed ones?
Well, how about United Airlines, leaving at 3:15 am. It's return is 6:15 am. The cost is $230.
When will it leave? Can I get a refund if I oversleep?
No refunds. The onward flight arrives around 11:56 am.
The times are better. I need a place to stay.
I suggest one of these 10. Try 101 Andrew young International Boulevard Northwest. The rating is 4.3
That's great, that's all.
I have pleasure in assisting you.
What's the weather for NYC on March 2nd?
The temperature should be around 57 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 29 percent.
How windy will it be? How humid will it be?
Humidity will be around 26 percent. Wind should be around 6 miles per hour.
Thank you.
Would you like anything else?
I'd like a round trip flight for there.
When will you be back? Where are you departing from?
I'm departing from Vancouver, BC and I wanna come back on March 13th.
Would you like to leave on March 2nd?
Yes, that's fine.
A Delta Airlines flight is available. The outbound flight takes off at 2:50 am and the return flight takes off at 6 am. The cost is $315.
That seems fine. I'd also like a place to stay that has laundry services. The place should have at least a 4.6 rating.
I found 10 houses for you. There's a house at 120 West 41st Street with a 4.6 raing.
That's a good one. That is all.
I appreciate you. Goodbye.
Can you check the weather on March 2nd in KL for me?
I can do that - it will be 101 Fahrenheit with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Oh, that's hot. How windy?
It will be at 3 miles per hour.
Alright - can you get me a round trip flight for March 2nd 2019? I'm alone, so 1 person traveling.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from SF - can you get me refundable tickets? I don't have everything hammered out yet.
What day are you returning?
I'm coming back on the 8th of March.
Alright, I've got 1 possibility here: American Airlines has an outbound flight at 5:20 am, returning 5:05 am for $402.
Where does it leave from?
It leaves from SFO International Airport.
When does the other flight arrive?
It will arrive at 5:08 pm.
Can you also find me a house to stay at while I'm there?
Sure: I've got 10 houses here, how about 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan? It has a 3.8 rating.
That sounds good.
Would you like to book this house?
No thanks, not right now.
Can I help you with anything else?
That's it for now.
Have a great trip.
I need to check the weather for the March 3rd in Phoenix.
The temperature will be 94 degrees and there is a 10 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it going to be, and will it be windy?
The humidity is low, around 27 percent and the winds will be light at 4 mph.
Okay. Can you help me find a round trip flight there?
Are you leaving on March 3rd, and when are you planning to return?
I am leaving this Saturday and returning on Monday next week.
Where do you want to leave from?
I am leaving from ATL.
I found 2 flights on Southwest Airlines for you. The first outbound flight leaves at 12:05 pm and the return flight departs at 10:55 pm. The cost is $198 per ticket.
Are there any other flights available?
There is one on United Airlines that departs at 9:40 am and the return flight leaves at 7:15 am. The cost is $311 per ticket.
How many stops does it have and what airport does it arrive at?
It has 1 stop and it arrives at Sky Harbor International Airport.
That flight sounds good to me.
Should I purchase tickets for it?
No thank you. I do want to find a house to stay there. I want it to have a rating of 4.3 or higher.
I found 10 houses for you. The first is located at 10 East Thomas Road and has a rating of 4.3.
This house sounds great.
Would you like a reservation for this house?
No thank you.That is all I need.
Okay, have a great day.
Find out what the weather will be like in NYC on March 2nd.
On that day the average temperature will be 57 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be around 26 percent.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed should be about 6 miles per hour.
Okay, would you look for a round trip flight going there?
When will you come back? I want to leave March 2nd.
I will leave on 1st of March and want to return on 7th of March.
When will you leave?
I will leave from Seattle, WA in economy.
I have 4 convenient flights for you. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4 pm. The return flight leaves at 3:40 pm. This ticket costs $311.
That flight sounds good. I will need a house to stay in there. I need laundry service and this rating should be about 4.3 or higher.
I have 10 houses for you. There is a nice one at 100 Greenwich Street with a 4.3 rting.
That sounds good but that is all I need for now.
It was a pleasure to assist you. Goodbye.
Tell me about the weather in San Francisco on March 7th
The temperature is expected to be around 74 degrees with a 9 percent chance of rain.
What about humidity and wind?
The humidity is expected to be 17 percent with a wind speed of 7 miles per hour
What is the status of new york city on March 13th?
The temperature is expected around 59 degrees with a 33 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I also need a round trip flight for four people on march 11th leaving from Vancouver, BC
What is your return date?
I hope to get back by 14th of march.
There is a delta airlines flight that leaves at 3:20 am. It's return flight leaves at 6 am and the ticket cost is $333
Which is the departure airport?
It departs from YVR international airport.
Can you show me some more flights?
Sorry, I couldn;t find other flights.
Try searching again, in premium economy this time
I found 1 united airlines flight that leaves at 3:15 am. The return flight departs at 8:20 am and the ticket costs $491.
Is it a refundable flight?
No, that is non refundable.
Okay, it still works
Should I purchase tickets.
No, I would do that later.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Sure, I also need a house to stay there.
There are 10 houses I could find. There's a good place with 4.4 rating at 100 greenwich street
Sounds perfect. That's all I need. Thanks!
Pleasure, Have a great trip. Enjoy!
What is the weather forecast for the March 1st?
What city do you want the forecast for?
I want to check the weather in San Diego.
It is forecasted to be 90 degrees that day with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. I need to book a roundtrip flight there.
When will you be returning?
I need to return on March 6th.
Where do you want to depart from?
I will be leaving from Vegas.
Is March 1st the day you would like to leave?
Yes, that's right.
There are 3 flights avaiable that day. American Airlines has a flight for $96 that departs at 7:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 4:40 pm.
How many layovers are there and is this a refundable ticket?
Yes, the ticket is refundable and has 0 stops.
That flight will work. Next I need to find a vacation house to rent.
I found a house with a 4.6 rating at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States.
What other houses are available?
Yiu might like 10044 Pacific Mesa Boulevard. It has a 4.5 star rating
Did yu find any others?
Yes, a nice house with a 4.4 star rating is available at 1047 Fifth Avenue.
That one sounds good. That's all I needed to do for now.
I'm happy to help. Have a nice day!
Hello! Can you tell me what the weather forecast is for Portland, OR today?
Hello, I'd be happy to help. It is predicted to be 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Nice! Can you help me find a round trip flight to get there?
Will you be leaving on March 1st?
Yes, that's when I want to go.
When will you be returning?
I need to be back home by the 9th of this month.
Which city are you departing from?
I will be flying out of SD.
I have 3 options that might interest you. The first is an Alaska Airlines flight for $155 that leaves at 1:20 pm and returns at 5:40 pm.
I'd like to hear some other options.
If you prefer Delta Airlines, there is a flight for $148 that leaves at 9:20 pm and returns at 4:40 pm.
This one will work better for me. Can you help me find a house to stay at?
I have located a rental at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street with a 4.2 average rating.
That will be perfect.
Do you wish to make your reservation at this time?
No, I need to check with a few people first.
What else can I assist you with?
I think that will be all. Thank you.
You're welcome. Enjoy your night.
I am planning for an outing. Do you have information about weather?
Which city's weather report do you want?
I would like to get weather status of Redwood City on March 7th.
The average temperature is reported to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit and only 1 percent chance of rain.
Nice, What is the status of weather in Atlanta, on March 12th?
There 19 percent chance for shower is reported with average temperature of 78 degrees Fahrenheit.
What will be condition of humidity?
18 percent humidity is forecast.
Great. Is there any trip flight on 2nd of March with Economy class. I would like to return on March 12th 2019.
Where is embarkation location?
We 4 people will embark from LAX.
There is one flight of American Airlines at 5:25 pm which returns at 2:30 pm. You will cost $168 as fare.
What is the time when the return flight arriving? Does it have zero layovers.
It will arrive at 4:29 pm with 0 stops.
That sounds good.
Shall I ensure your seats now?
No, not needed. Try to find a house for me to stay there.
You can choose from 10 houses available there. One is at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest with 4.3 rating.
Do you have any contact number? Do they provide laundry service?
You can ring them on +1 404-524-5555. You will get laundry service.
What about other houses?
Another suitable one is at 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast with rating of 4.5
I think I can choose that one.
Then can I proceed with reserving it for you?
No, Not now.thank you.
Welcome, have a great day.
Can you please check the weather for me in Delhi on March 3rd?
There's a 2 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 92 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be humid or windy?
The average wind speed will be 7 mph and humidity will be around 16 percent.
OK, can you please find me a round trip flight to there?
You're flying out on March 3rd, right. Please tell me when do you plan to come back and where are you flying out of.
I plan to fly out of Atlanta later today, returning on the 10th of this month.
There's an American Airlines flight at 2:30 pm priced at $415 which takes of to return at 1:45 pm.
Please tell me if the flight has 1 stop and also when does the return flight land.
The flight has 1 stop and the return flight lands at 8:21 pm.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to get tickets for you?
No, thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Please find me a house there rated 4.1 or higher for 4 persons.
There are 10 houses meeting your criteria, out of which I recommend 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi rated at 4.1
Do you know if they provide laundry service?
Yes, they do have laundry service.
Anything else available.
There's also the nice 12, Mangalam Place, Sector 3, Rohini, New Delhi rated at 4.1
Sounds awesome. That will be all for now!
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
What is the weather going to be like on March 14th?
What city do you want to check the weather for?
Portland.
The average temperature should be 57 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it going to be?
The humidity is expected to be around 20 percent with a wind speed around 6 miles per hour.
Can you find me a round trip flight there? I'd prefer to travel in Economy.
When do you plan to come back? Do you plan to leave on March 14th?
I am leaving on the 9th and want to return on March 14th.
Where will you be leaving from?
I'm leaving from SD.
I found 3 possible flights for you. Would you like to fly with Alaska Airlines? It departs at 1:20 pm and returns at 5:40 pm and the price per ticket is $128.
That sounds good. Can you help me find a house to stay at while I'm there?
There's a house located at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street that is rated 4.2 stars.
Are there any other houses available?
There's a house located at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue that is rated 4.5 stars.
That house is great, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
Can you check the weather in San Francisco for March 1st?
It will be 91 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it?
Humidity is 49 percent.
How about March 9th?
It is 70 degrees with a 2 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it?
Humidity is 16 percent.
Thanks, I need a round trip flight to there.
What are your dates and departure city?
I leave London, UK and arrive back March 11th.
Is your departure March 9th.
Departure is 6th of this month.
I have an American Airlines flight that leaves at 3:05 pm and returns at 7:05 am for $399.
I like that and need a house too.
I have a 3.7 rated house at 1095 Market Street.
Does it have laundry and phone number?
Yes it has laundry and phone is +1 415-829-0000.
That is all I need.
Nice to help and enjoy.
I need to check the weather in Vancouver on the the 10th.
Okay. The average temperature that day will be around 68 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind and humidity going to be like?
There will be around 26 percent humidity with an average wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
Okay thanks for the info. Can you help me find a round trip flight headed out that way? I'd prefer to fly with Delta Airlines.
No problem. Where will you be departing from and when do you want to return?
I'll be flying out of NYC and want to leave on the 10th of March 2019.
Just to be clear, you want to leave on March 10th correct?
I'm leaving the day after tomorrow.
Okay, I found 1 convenient flight for you. There is a Delta Airlines flight departing at 6 am with a return flight departing at 2:50 am. The tickets are $301.
Which airport will is the flight taking off from? When does the onward flight arrive?
The flight departs from JFK International Airport and the onward flight arrives at 11:11 am.
Okay, that flight sounds good to me.
Should I go ahead and order your tickets?
No, I'm good for now. You can help me find a house to stay in though. Find me something for one person with a rating of around 3.7 or higher.
Okay, there is one nice house located at 1018 Granville Street with a 3.7 star rating.
Okay, that house sounds great.
Want to make a reservation?
No not right. That'll be all for today. Thanks for the info.
It was my pleasure. Goodbye.
Check the weather on March 2nd
Which place should i check
Check in Phoenix, AZ
the average temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit and 11 percent chance of rain
What about the wind and humidity?
The humidity is around 31 percent and average wind speed is 9 miles per hour
Okay good.
Do you need anything else?
Find a round trip flight to there from Seattle
Are you leaving on March 2nd? When will you come back?
No. I am leaving on 1st of March and returning on the 10th
There are 3 flights. How about American Airlines leaving at 8:15 am and returning at 6:15 am. The cost is $240
What is the arrival time of return flight?
The arrival time is 10:36 am
What is the arrival time of onward flight?
It is 1:38 pm
That's good
Do you want to book ticket?
No Thanks. Find a house to stay there
There are 10 houses. How about 10 east Thomas Road which has 4.6 rating
that's great
do you want to reserve?
No Not now
Do you need anything else?
No. thank you
You are welcome
Ah, I forgot I'm going to San Fran on March 5th. Can you check the weather that day for me?
Sure, looks like it will be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Sounds good. I still need to book my flight - can you find a round trip ticket for me?
Sure, from March 5th until when? Also, where will you be flying out from?
I'd be flying out Saturday this week from Toronto, Canada, and returning next Thursday.
Ok, there's 2 flights that might work for you. I found an American Airlines flight for $313 that leaves at 5:55 am and returns at 7:05 am.
What else is there? I usually fly United Airlines and I might come back on the 14th of March instead.
Ok, I found 1 United Airlines flight for $302 leaving at 5:35 pm and returning at 5:35 am.
That one sounds good. I also need to find a rental house to stay while I'm there.
Ok, I found 10 available for the dates of your trips. There's one on 1095 Market Street that's 3.7 stars.
Are there other ones 3.7 stars or higher?
Yes, there are 10 options. How about 1100 Market Street Hotel Entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street? It has 3.7 stars also.
That sounds perfect. I'll book it later. That's all for now.
No problem. Have a good day.
What is the weather supppose to be in Kuala Lumpur on March 10th?
It is suppose to be 90 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
How windy?
11 MPH.
How humid?
Around 22 percent.
Ok, I need a round trip flight there.
When are you coming back?
I am coming home March 10th 2019.
Do you want to leave on March 10th?
I am leaving from San Fran next Thursday.
I found an American Airlines flight leaving from 5:20 am the return flight leaves at 5:05 am. The cost is $448.
Cool, I'll also need a home.
I found 10 options including 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan is rated 3.8.
That is perfect.
Have a nice day.
I want to know how the weather is in Portland, OR.
From what I can see the average temperature in your requested location should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Alright, fine. I also need you to find me a round trip flight going there. I will be returning on March 5th.
From where you will depart?
I will be departing for my trip from Seattle, WA.
Would you be willing to leave on March 1st?
Alright, that seems right.
There are 2 convenient flights for the trip you want to have. There is one flight with the American Airlines which departs at 8:05 am, and the return flight leaves at 6 am. The ticket for this flight is $78.
Can you check if there are some other flights which you can suggest?
There is also an United Airlines flight with the outbound flight departing at 4:15 am, and with the return flight leaving at 7:15 am. The flight ticket will cost you $77.
This flight seems good to me. Though now I need to find a place to sleep there, so I want you to find me a house there.
There are 10 houses which match what you want. One good house with a rating of 4.2 is located at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street.
Can you suggest some other houses? I am looking for a house with a rating of 4.6 or higher.
There are 6 houses which match what you requested. A nice house with a rating of 4.6 is located at 2025 Northwest Northrup Street.
This house seems nice.
Do you want to book this house now?
No, I do not want to make a reservation at this moment. That would be all.
I enjoy helping you. Good bye!
I would like information on the weather
Which city do you want the information for?
For Sydney, Australia. What will the weather be like on March 7th?
Average temperature: 89 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 4 percent
Ok, thank you! I need a round trip flight to go there
For March 7th? What is the city of departure? What is the return date?
I'm leaving on next Tuesday from SFO. The return date is 14th of March
There's 1 convenient United Airlines flight at 1:25 pm. The return flight is at 6:10 am. The ticket costs $233
What is the destination airport? What time the next arrive?
Kingsford Smith International Airport. It arrives at 1:06 pm
Ok, It's good for me. I need a house to stay there
What about 1 Columbia Court, Baulkham Hills New South Wales 2153, Australia? Its rating is 4.1
Yes, It's nice!
Do you want to book this home?
Not now, please. That's all
It's a pleasure!
What is the weather like on next Tuesday?
In which city should I check?
The Seattle, WA weather please.
The average temperature is 61 degrees and there is an 18 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The average wind will be 15 mph.
Okay, I also need a round trip flight.
Do you leave on March 5th?
I am leaving on March 3rd and returning on the 11th of March. Any airline is fine.
Where will you depart from?
I will be departing from Atlanta.
I found 4 flights. How about American Airlines which leaves at 11:40 am and returns at 9:45 pm. The total is $259.
What else did you find?
Delta Airlines has an outbound flight at 4:20 pm which returns at 11:50 pm and costs $192.
When are the arrival times for both flights?
The return flight will be arriving at 8:22 am and the departing flight arrives at 6:52 pm.
What else do you have available?
How about Southwest Airlines? They have a departing flight at 7:20 pm and returning flight at 5:40 am for $188.
That sounds great thanks.
Should I reserve tickets?
No not right now thanks.
Can I help with anything else?
I need a house with laundry service that is rated at least 4.4 for 2 people.
How about 1000 1st Avenue which has a 4.4 rating?
That's good, thank you.
My pleasure, enjoy your trip.
Please check the weather on March 6th.
Which city?
Dublin.
It's going to be 92 degrees Fahrenheit with 7 percent chance of rain.
How about in Philadelphia on March 11th?
It's going to be 72 degrees Fahrenheit with 10 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy it's gonna be?
Humidity is around 33 percent and wind speed should be 11 miles per hour.
Okay, please help me find a round trip going there.
Will you leave on March 11th until what date? And where you are coming from?
I want to leave on 3rd of March from New Delhi until March 11th. I want United Airlines.
I got 1 trip with United Airlines and the price is $316. Outbound flight leaves at 12:35 pm and returns at 4:45 am.
Does it have 1 stops?
Yes, 1 stops.
That's great.Please find a house for 1 people there with 4.0 rating.
I found 10 houses available and one is 1 Logan Square with 4.0 rating.
That's excellent!
Will I reserve you this house?
Not for now.
Okay, bye.
I'd like to check the weather on the March 14th.
For which city please?
I'd like to check Philadelphia.
Philadelphia will have an average temperature of 84 degrees Fahrenheit that day with an 8 percent possibility of precipitation.
Thank you. I'm going to need a round trip flight to Philadelphia with a return on the 14th of March 2019. I don't care which class I'm flying in.
You'd like a March 14th return? Where are you departing from?
I'll be leaving from Washington on the 8th of this month.
There's a slight on American Airlines leaving at 5:10 PM and returning at 9:45 AM which costs $151.
I think that will work.
What else may I help you with?
I need to find a house where I can stay.
I've got 10 possibilities that you might like. There's a house at 1 Logan Square which is rated 4.4.
What else is there?
There's a house at 100 North Christopher Columbus Boulevard with a 4.1 rating.
I'd like to stick with 4.4 rating or above and I also need laundry service. What else is there?
I've got 4 possibilities, one of them a very nice house located at 1001 Intrepid Avenue with a 4.4 rating.
May I have the phone number?
Absolutely, it's +1 215-644-9200.
I think that will be great.
Should I reserve that for you?
Not at the moment. I think I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
What is the weather in Kuala Lumpur on March 3rd?
It is suppose to be 93 degrees with a 8 percent chance of rain.
I need a round trip flight for four people leaving from Seattle on American Airlines.
When are you returning? Are you leaving on March 3rd?
Yes, I want to return next Thursday.
I found American Airlines flight leaving at 4:55 am and the return flight leaves at 5:05 am. The ticket price is $355.
Sounds good! We also need a house to stay at.
I found 10 options including 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan. It is rating 3.8.
That sounds perfect, that is all I need for now.
Have a nice day.
Can you check the weather in Chi-town for March 3rd?
The weather should be 67 degrees with a 36 percent chance of rain.
Can you find me a round trip flight?
Do you want to leave on March 3rd?
Yes, I would like to leave on that day.
When are you coming back and where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Ciudad de Mexico and would like to go on Wednesday next week.
There are 3 flights. One is American Airlines that leave at 8:05 am and returns at 5:20 pm for the cost of $300.
That flight sounds good to me.
Would you like to purchase a ticket?
No, I just wanted the information.
Can I help with anything else?
I would like to find a house for one person.
There are 10 houses. There is one at 1 South Franklin Street with a rating of 4.4.
This house sounds great.
Would you like to reserve this house?
No, I just wanted the information.
Have a good day.
What's it like outside? In Anaheim, CA.
It's 78 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
And the humidity?
45 percent humidity.
Lets check NY for 1st of March.
It averages 66 degrees there with a 37 percent rain probability.
What about wind and humidity.
Humidity? 41 percent. Wind speed should be around 12 mph.
Great. Can you check round trip flights there for March 1st 2019?
And what return date?
Make it the 6th.
You'll be taking off from where?
That'll be From LA.
So, I see 3 flights. There's a 6:20 pm American Airlines flight for $253. It takes-off at 7:45 pm for the flight back.
How many stops? One? Two?
Just 1 stop.
Can I return the ticket? And where does it leave from?
No refunds. It takes-off from LAX International Airport.
This sounds like a winner.
Should I grab it for you?
No yet. Find me a crib to crash in.
I see 10 houses. 100 Greenwich Street looks nice. Its rated at 4.4.
What else? Make sure its a 4.1 or higher.
How about 100-15 Ditmars Boulevard, East Elmhurst, NY 11369, USA? 4.1 on the rating scale.
Yeah, I like this one.
So, book it?
No. Hold on.
OK. wWat's up?
Nothing. Just chill. I'm set for now.
Great. I'll be over here chilling if you need me.
Please check the weather in Phoenix, AZ for March 9th
There is a 21 percent chance of rain with average temperature of 76 degrees.
Will it be windy?
Forecast for wind speed is 6 miles per hour.
What about humidity?
Humidity is at 31 percent.
Thanks. Can you find me a round trip flight to Phoenix, AZ ? I need to be back home on March 9th.
What city will you depart from?
I will be departing from SF
If you need to return March 9th, what day do you wish to leave?
On the 5th of this month.
I located 4 flights. American Airlines has a flight to Phoenix, AZ departing at 8:10 am. The return flight departs at 6:15 am. Tickets are $167 each
That flight will work.
Is there anything else I can help with?
Yes. I need to find a house in to Phoenix, AZ for my visit.
There are 10 homes available. A very nice house, with a 4.6 rtaing, is located at 10 East Thomas Road.
Do you have a contact number? Does it say if they offer laundry service?
Yes, laundry service is available. Their telephone is +1 602-222-1111.
Are there other houses/
Yes. There is one at 10210 North 26th Drive. with a 3.8 rating.
That one will work better. That is all I need for now.
Have a nice day
I'd like to check the weather for 7th of March.
For which city?
In New York city.
The average temperature seems to be 65 degrees fahrenheit. There is a 15 % chance of rain.
Could you find me a flight for there on delta airlines?
Where will you leave from, and do you want to leave on march 7th?
I am leaving monday next week from LA.
When are you coming back/
Friday next week
I found 1 flight for your trip. It's a delta airlines lfight leaving at 1:40 pm and returning at 7:30 am, costing $259.
That sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy tickets?
No thanks. I want to find a house to stay there.
There are 10 houses available. How about 100 greenwich street, rated 4.4
Sounds good to me.
Would you like a reservation?
No thanks.
Do you need anything else?
No, thanks for the help.
It's my pleasure. Bye.
I want you to check the Phoenix weather.
The temperature for the day will be around 89 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay, great. Could you look for a round trip flight going there?
Where will you leave from? Is March 1st the day you are leaving? When will you come back?
That sounds great. I am leaving from Las Vegas and want to return on the 14th of this month.
How about this Delta Airlines flight? The outbound flight departs at 4:45 pm and the return leaves at 12:15 pm. It costs $98.
That sounds amazing. I want to find a house to stay in there.
There are 10 suitable houses. There is one nice house at 10 East Thomas Road that has a 4.6 rating.
That house sounds perfect.
Do you need a reservation for this house?
No, not right now.
Anything else I can assist with?
No, thank you for helping.
It was my pleasure. Goodbye.
What will the weather be like in LAX on March 3rd?
Average temperature: 89 degrees Fahrenheit. Chance of rain: 0 percent
It's fantastic! I need a round trip flight to go there. The return is scheduled for the 9th of this month
Is the departure date March 3rd?
I want to leave today
What is the city of departure?
The city of departure is New York
There are 4 flights. The American Airlines flight leaves at 3:40 pm. The return flights is at 6:20 pm. The ticket costs $242
It's perfect for me! I need a house to stay there
I found a house at 1020 South Figueroa Street with a rating 4.2
There's a laundry service? What's the phone number?
Yes, there's a laundry service. The number is +1 213-748-1291
I like this house
Do you want to book this house?
Not now, thanks! It's all for now!
It's a pleasure helping you.
Find out what the weather is like in Toronto, Ontario.
It will be averaging a temperature of about 58 degrees Fahrenheit and the possibility of rain is at 13 percent.
All good. Find me a round trip flight to that place. I will be on vacation.
Will you leave on March 1st? What place will you be departing from?
Yeah that will work. I am taking off from Atlanta, GA.
When do you plan on returning?
I will be returning on the 14th.
So I found you 3 flights that are good. You have an American Airlines plane that is outbound at 3:25 pm. The return plane will take off at 10:05 am. You can pay $226 for the ticket.
What time does the onward flight land?
The landing time of the onward flight will be at 8:28 pm.
Will I be able to refund the ticket? What airport will the flight take off from?
The ticket isn't for refunding. The plane will leave from Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
This flight will do for me. I need a house to stay in that place. I am only one person.
Out of the 10 houses I found you, can I suggest the nice one at 108 Chestnut Street which has a rating of 4.2?
Get me the phone number of this property.
Their contact number is +1 416-977-5000.
Can you find me other houses?
I found a nice house at 111 Carlton Street and is rated 3.0.
Look for another house.
How do you like this nice house at 111 Lombard Street with a rating of 3.9?
Get me the phone number of this property.
Their contact number is +1 416-367-5555.
I really like this house. That will do.
Glad to help out. Take care.
Would you mind checking the LA weather for me?
Of course. LA temperatures will average 76 degrees Fahrenheit with the chance of rain coming in at 28 percent.
What does the humidity look like?
Approximately 75 percent.
What about the forecast for the March 8th?
Temperatures that day are going to be 81 degrees Fahrenheit on average and the possibility of precipitation will be 21 percent.
And the humidity?
34 percent or thereabouts.
Thank you. I'm going to need a roundtrip flight there please.
Departing from where and when will you be returning? And is that a March 8th departure?
I plan to depart from Chi-town on Sunday this week and return on the 11th.
You have 3 flights to choose from. One of them is a 9:35 PM American Airlines flight which comes back at 8:30 AM and costs $183.
What else is available?
There's an 11:15 PM Delta Airlines flight which comes back at 1:40 PM and costs $147.
Can that ticket be refunded if necessary?
It is a nonrefundable ticket.
Are there any good economy flights available? It's just for one person.
There's a Southwest Airlines flight leaving at 2:50 PM which comes back at 6:45 PM and costs $209.
I think I like that one. I also need to find a house to stay in, again just for one person.
I've found 10 possibilities. There's a house with a 4.2 rating located at 1020 South Figueroa Street.
Great choice. I guess I'm good to go.
I appreciate the opportunity to help you.
Can you check the forecast for Seattle on March 7th?
There is a 16 percent chance of rain with average temperature of 69 degrees.
What about windy speed?
The average wind will be 8 mph.
How about humidity?
The humidity will be around 20 percent.
OK. Can you find an economy round trip flight for 3 people departing Toronto, Canada?
Do you plan to leave on March 7th? What date will you be returning?
Yes and I'd like to be back on the 12th of March.
American Airlines has a flight that departs at 10:05 am and returning flight departs at 8:15 am. Tickets are $303
Are there any others?
Delta Airlines has a flight that departs at 7:15 am and returning flight departs at 7:40 am. Tickets are $306
That one sounds perfect. I also need a house to stay in there.
There is a 4.5 star rated house located at 1000 1st Avenue. Any interest?
Does it have laundry service?
Yes it does.
Thanks. That is all I need
Your welcome. Have a nice day.
Can you please check the weather for me on March 7th in Nairobi, Kenya.
There's a 8 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be humid?
There's a forecasted humidity of 23 percent.
OK, please get me a round trip flight to there.
Please tell me if you plan on flying on March 7th and out of which city. Also, please tell me the date for your return flight.
I plan to fly out of SFO on the 2nd of March, returning March 13th.
There's 1 flight meeting your criteria - American Airlines, taking off at 7:05 am and returning at 5:35 am. The total cost is $489.
Do you know if it's refundable?
No, unfortunately not.
Please tell me the destination airport for this flight.
The flight lands at Jomo Kenyatta International Airport.
Sounds perfect for me.
Do you want me to buy tickets for you?
No, not at the moment.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
Please find me a house to stay there.
I recommend 14 Riverside Westlands rated at 4.5.
Do you know if they provide laundry service?
Yes, they do have laundry service.
Please give me their phone number.
You can reach them at +254 787 657000.
Sounds great. That will be all for now.
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
I need to go if a should get a coat. What's the weather gonna be on March 6th?
In which city?
In Vancouver, BC please.
The temperature should be 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a a 27 percent chance of rain.
And how humid will it be?
Around 25 percent.
And how windy?
The wind speed should be at an average of 13 miles per hour.
Good to know. Can you help me a book a round trip flight there for the 1st?
Where will you be leaving from? When do you plan to return?
I'm leaving from Vegas and want to return on March 10th.
I found 2. There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 12:20 pm and returns at 12:55 pm with a $205 ticket.
When does the onward flight arrives there? Do they have more than one stop?
The onward flight arrives at 7:49 pm and they it's a 1 stop only flight.
Any other available? I'll want 2 tickets.
There's 1 United Airlines flight that leaves at 12:05 pm and returns at 6:05 pm with a $227 ticket.
I want it.
Should i buy the tickets?
No, thanks. Help me find a house to stay there, it has to have laundry service. It's also for 2 so get me something with a 4.0 rating or higher please.
I found 10. There's a great one at 1100 Granville Street with a 4.0 rating.
That works. That's all I need. The house is great.
Pleased to help you. Goodbye.
Please check the weather on 1st of March
Where should i search in
please search in new delhi
The average temperature in new delhi is 99 degree with 4 percent chance of rain
how windy is it
the wind is about 8 miles per hour
can you also find me a round trip flight
Where are you traveling from? Are you leaving on march 1st
Yes, i will travel from washington
when are you traveling back
I will be back on 12th of march
I found 1 american airlines for $332 with outbound flight leaves at 6:05 am and return flight depart at 9:20 am
Perfect. please also find me 4.3 rating house with laundry service
There are 10 houses in the area. Do you want a hotel of 4.3 rating located at 12, doctor apj abdul kalam road, new delhi
Perfect, thats all i need
its good to help you
I'd like to check the weather for March 9th.
Where would you like to know the weather for?
I'd like to find out the weather for Seattle on the the 4th.
The average temperature will be 69 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 43 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be around 69 percent.
That sounds great. Could you find me a round trip flight there? I'm leaving from San Diego on the 2nd of this month.
When would you like to return?
I'd like to return on the 11th of this month.
I have found 4 flights that might work for you. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:10 am and returns at 8:15 am. The ticket costs $206.
Are there any other options available?
There's a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 5 pm and returns at 7:45 am. The ticket costs $219.
Are there any other choices?
There's a Southwest Airlines flight that leaves at 7 am and returns at 6:50 pm. The ticket costs $220.
That sounds great to me. I'd like to find a house with laundry service and a rating of 4.5 or higher to stay at.
There's a great choice located at 1000 1st Avenue. It has a 4.5 rating.
Could I get the phone number?
The number is +1 206-957-1000.
Are there any other choices?
There's one at 1101 4th Avenue. It has a 4.5 rating.
That would be great.
Would you like to reserve the house?
No, I don't want to right now.
Is there anything else?
No, thanks for everything.
It's always my pleasure. Bye for now!
Tell me what the weather is.
What city do you want me to check?
Check the weather in New York City for March 2nd.
The temperature will be 57 degrees with a 29 percent chance of precipitation.
I see. I need three tickets for a round trip flight to there.
What is your departing destination?
I am departing out of Atlanta, GA.
What day are you returning and are you departing March 2nd?
I will be departing March 1st and leaving March 9th.
Search revealed 4 flights. There is an American Airlines flight that departs at 6:25 am and starts the return trip at 9:45 pm. The cost is $133 total.
That works for me.
Do you need something more?
I need a house to stay in.
Search revealed 10 results. 100 Greenwich Street has a 4.4 rating.
Do they offer laundry service.
The house does offer laundry service.
That is perfect.
Do you want me to book your stay there?
No, not right now.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
I've enjoyed helping you. Bye for now.
Hey! please can you tell me what's the weather forecast on 13th of March?
Please can I have the zipcode or city name?
Please find for Atlanta? how is the precipitation?
There is only 2 percent chance of rain and the average temperature for the normal day is 80 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thanks for the information. Please can you find me a round trip flight flying to Atlanta?
So, when do you wish to fly? Is it on March 13th? From where you will fly?
I wish to fly from Vegas on the 1st.
When is your return?
I will be returning by March 14th.
Okay! I've come up with 2 flights for your travel. The Southwest Airlines flight will leave at 2:35 pm and the return flight would leave at 12:05 pm and the travel cost would be around $250. Is that ok for you?
Are there any other flights on the same day for I would prefer Economy class and will be leaving from NYC.
Yup, there are 3 flights available. The American Airlines flight will leave at 11:20 am and the return flight will leave at 6:25 am and the price of the ticket is $126. Do you prefer this one?
Is it a non-stop flight or it has atleast one stops? Which is the destination airport of the flight?
The destination airport is Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and it has 0 stops.
Looks good, but still do you have any other options?
Yup, the Delta Airlines outbound flight leaves at 11:25 am and the return flight leaves at 3:40 pm and the cost of the travel would be $140. Do you wish to book tickets for this one?
Yup! it sounds good to me.
So, you want me to buy tickets for your trip in this flight?
Nope, not right now. Please can you help me to get a house to stay over there.
Yup! I can find 10 houses there and the nice one is located at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest and its rating is around 4.3. Do you like this one?
Do you have any other options?
At 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast there is a nice house and the rating of the property is around 4.5. Would you prefer this one?
Do they have contact number for this property? Do they have laundry service?
Yup, the property has laundry service and you can reach them at +1 404-745-5000.
This house seems to be good.
So, do you want to reserve this house?
Nope, not right now. I just need the information.
That's fine. It's my pleasure to fetch you the details. Good Bye.
What is the weather going to be on March 8th?
In what city would you like to know the weather?
I need to know the weather in Vegas.
There is a 17 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 76 degrees Fahrenheit.
What is the wind factor expected to be.
7 miles per hour is the average wind speed.
What is the humidity level expected to be?
The humidity is expected to be 36 percent.
Thanks, Can you find me a round trip flight there?
Where would you be departing from and when would you be coming back? Is March 8th a good day to depart?
I would like to leave from NY on the 7th of this month and return on the 10th of March.
I have found a total of 2 flights. There is an American Airlines flight with an outbound flight that leaves at 4:45 pm and the return flight leaves at 5:30 am. The total cost of the ticket is $302.
Are the tickets refundable?
No, they are not.
Do you have any other refundable flights?
Yes there is an outbound flight with United Airlines at 6:05 am with a return flight that leaves at 12:05 pm. The total flight costs $300.
That flight sounds great.
Would you like me to make your reservations?
No. I am all set. Can you find me a house to stay there?
Yes. There is a house at 1215 South Las Vegas Boulevard with a rating of 3.7.
That sounds great, I am all set.
Thanks, it was great to be of help. Goodbye.
What will the weather be like in Atlanta, GA?
The average temperature is 86 degrees. There will be a 28 percent chance of rain.
How about the March 6th.
The average temperature will be 87 degrees and the chance of rain will decrease slightly to 25 percent.
What will the humidity be like.
Around 49 percent.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed will be minimal at around 2 miles per hour.
Thanks for the info.
May I help you with something else?
Can you find me a round trip flight.
Where are leaving from and when are you returning?
I want to return on the 10th of March and I will be leaving from NY.
Are you leaving on March 6th?
On the 2nd.
An American Airlines flight leaves from NY at 11:20 am. The return flight is scheduled for 6:25 am. It costs $137.
What else is there? I just want 1 economy ticket.
I found 3 flights that may work. There is a Delta Airlines flight that departs from NY at 7:20 am. The return flight is at 3:40 pm and costs $141.
Sounds great. I want to stay at a house with a rating of at least 4.4.
There are 6 houses that match your request. A house at 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast has a 4.4 rating.
Can I have the phone number? Does it have laundry service?
It has laundry service and the number is +1 404-745-5000.
The house sounds killer!
Do you want a reservation?
No, not now. Goodbye!
Have a wonderful day!
please check the weather in sydney on 9th of this month
The weather on march 9th 2019 is around 93 degree with 6 % chanec of rain
ok, can you find me a two round trip ticket flying on economy
ok, are you leaving on march 9th? where are you leaving from ?
i will leave on 5th of this month on premium economy traveling from san francisco
when are your flying back
i will be back on 11th of march
I found 1 united airlines for $375 depart at 1:25 pm with return flight depart at 5:25 am
what airport does this arrive at
you will arrive at kingsford smith international airport arrive at 1:06 pm
perfect, please also find me a house to stay for one peopl
there is a 4.1 rating house at 1 columbia court, baulkham hills new south wales 2153, australia
any other houses with laundry service
I located 9 houses. I recommend 1 hosking place with 3.6 rating
ok thats perfect
i am happy to help you, bye bye
Hi there, could you help me check the weather at Albany on March 2nd please?
The temperature will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit on that day, with a 14 percent chance of rain.
I see, how about for Philadelphia instead?
The temperature will be 71 degrees Fahrenheit on that day, with a 3 percent chance of rain.
I see, what is the expected humidity and windiness then?
The humidity should be around 16 percent and the average wind speed should be 8 miles per hour.
Sure, how about?
Sorry, I could not comprehend you. Do you require further assistance?
Could you help me check the weather again on the March 12th?
The average temperature for that day is 83 degress Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
I see, thank you!
Do you need any further assistance?
Yes please, could you help me find a round trip there?
Will you be departing on March 12th and when will you be returning? Where would you prefer to depart from?
I will be departing from New York on March 10th and returning on the 13th of March.
There is an American Airlines flight which departs at 3:45 pm and returns at 4:45 pm which will cost you $69.
I see, are there alternative flights? I have 3 people travelling and would prefer taking a Southwest Airlines flight.
There is 1 convenient Southwest Airlines flight for you, which departs at 4:55 am, returns at 7:45 am and will cost you $59.
This sounds great to me!
Would you require me to purchase tickets for you?
No, that is fine. Could you instead help me search for a house to stay in there?
Sure, there are 10 houses available, one of which is located at 1 Logan Square with a 4.4 rating.
This sounds great!
Would you like me to make a reservation for you?
No, that is not necessary. Thanks a lot though!
No worries, it is my pleasure to assist you. Have a great day ahead!
I want to check the weather for Portland, OR on March 2nd.
The average temperature for that of year is 65 degrees. There will be a 15 percent chance of rain.
Great. Can you find round trip flights going there from Los Angeles. I like Economy tickets.
Do you want to depart on March 2nd?
Yes, I do.
When are you returning?
I want to return on the 5th and there are two people in my group.
An Alaska Airlines flight is leaving at 7:25 am. The return flight will leave at 1:55 pm. A ticket is $169.
When does the outbound flight arrive? And when does my return flight land in Los Angeles?
The onward flight arrives at 9:55 am and the return flight lands in LA at 5:54 pm.
Are there other flights available?
Yes, an American Airlines flight leaves LA at 11:15 pm and the return flight leaves Portland at 6 am. It costs $180.
What else is there?
A Delta Airlines flight departs from LA at 9:50 pm and the return flight leaves Portland at 3:20 pm. A ticket costs $164.
The flight sounds great to me. I want to find a house to stay at. The rating should be at least 4.4. I want laundry service and my group will be 4 people.
There are 10 houses available. One house with a rating of 4.4 i at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue.
What's their phone number?
It's +1 503-220-1339.
Great, that's I need for now.
Have a wonderful day!
I wish to check out the weather on March 10th.
In which city do you want to check out the weather?
I wish to check it in New Delhi.
The average temperature is 102 degree Fahrenheit and 4 percent of chance of rain.
Sure. could you please search a round trip flight to go there? I wish to get back on March 13th.
Are you leaving on March 10th?
I wish to leave on Tuesday next week.
From which place will you leave from?
I will leave from San Francisco.
I searched and found 2 convenient flights for you. It is an American Airlines flight which leaves at 1:15 pm and the return flight leaves at 1:45 pm. The cost of the ticket is $356.
It is good to me.
Shall I book tickets for it?
Nope. I am fine.
Shall I do anything for you?
I wish to search for a house to stay there.
There is one beautiful house situated at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi with the rating 4.5
Is there any other houses?
There is one beautiful house situated at 12, Mangalam Place, Sector 3, Rohini, New Delhi with the rating 4.3.
It is a great house.
Are you interested in reserving this house?
Nope. it can be later, not now.
Do you need any other help?
Nope. Thank you so much.
It's my previlage to help you. Bye. Thank you.
I want to find out what the weather will be like on March 4th.
What city do you want to check the weather in?
Check Sydney, NSW.
The average temperature on that day should be around 96 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Would you look for a round trip flight going there?
Where do you want to leave from and when are you coming back?
I will leave from SFO and want to get back on 7th of March.
Would you like to leave on March 4th?
No, I will leave on the 1st of this month.
There is a United Airlines flight which has an outbound flight leaving at 1:25 pm and a return flight leaving at 5:25 am. This costs $235.
That flight sounds great.
Should I buy tickets for it?
No, not right now. Could you find me a house to stay there that has laundry service?
There is a nice house at 1 Columbia Court, Baulkham Hills New South Wales 2153, Australia. It has a 4.1 rating.
That sounds great.
Do you want to make a reservation?
Not at the moment.
Anything else I could assist you with?
No, but thank you for helping.
It was my pleasure. Goodbye.
Check the weather for me.
Which city should I check it for?
Check it in Philly
The temperature is expected to be around 81 degrees with a 8 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I also need round trip economy flights going there, preferably delta airlines. I would be leaving from Paris.
Are you leaving on march 1st?
That is correct
When do you plan to return?
I get back on 5th of this month
I have found a delta airlines flights that leaves at 5:35 pm. Its return flight leaves at 12:20 pm and costs $368
Which is the departure and arrival airport?
The flight takes off from charles de gaulle international airport and lands at PHL international airport
Sounds good. I also need a house to stay while there.
There is a 4.4 rated house at 1 logan square.
Give me the contact number
The number is +1 215-963-1500
Do you any other options
There is a 4.1 rated place at 100 north christopher columbus boulevard.
This sounds perfect.
Should I make the booking?
No, I will do that later. This would be all for now.
Have a great day. Bye.
Hello! Please can you check the weather in Chicago, IL on March 12th. Is there any scattered Thunderstorms?
Yup, there are scattered thunderstorms and there is a 26 percent probability of raining and the average temperature for the normal day will be 61 degrees Fahrenheit.
What is the humidity and the wind speed on that day?
The average wind speed on that day will be around 12 miles per hour and it will be around 4 percent humidity.
Okay! thanks for the information. Do you have any flight with a round trip flying to Chicago?
When is your onward and return journey? Will you be leaving by March 12th? Which is your source airport from where you wish to start your journey?
I will be starting from Ciudad de Mexico on the 8th and will be returning on March 12th.
I can find 3 flights matching your trip. The American Airlines outbound flight leaves the airport at 8:05 am and the return flight leaves at 12:30 pm. The cost of the travel is around $313.
Please may I know when is the arrival of the onward flight?
Sure! It arrives at 8:12 pm.
To which airport, the flight arrives?
The destination airport will be O'Hare International Airport.
Everything sounds good.
So, do you wish to book tickets for this flight?
Nope, not right now.
Do you want me to help on anything else?
Yup! Please can you find me a house to stay with laundry service.
Sure! I've 10 houses for you and the nice one is located at 1 West Wacker Drive whose rating is around 4.5.
Do you have any other property?
Yup, the one located at 10 East Grand Avenue is a good one and its rating is around 4.2.
Please can I have the property phone number?
Sure, please note it down. It's +1 312-595-0000
Good house choice. I'm all set. Thanks for finding me a good house.
My Pleasure. Have a wonderful day. Bye.
I'm going to be visiting friends in Nairobi fairly soon. What's the weather like there on March 3rd?
It'll average at a sizzling 103 degrees Fahrenheit, with just a 2 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Good to know. I want to get a round trip flight there.
Will you be leaving March 3rd? On what day will you return, and from what city will you depart?
Yeah, I'm leaving from Atlanta on that day. I will return on the 12th of March.
I found 1 flight that suits your criteria. How does a $431 American Airlines sound? It leaves at 6:45 am, and will return at 5:35 am.
That's good. I also need to find a house for 1 that has laundry service and a rating of at least 4.6.
I found a house at Chiromo Road with a 4.6 star rating.
That's a great house! That's all I'll need.
It's a pleasure to help you out. I hope Nairobi is a great time for you. Goodbye.
Hi there, could you help me check the weather in LAX?
The average temperature there is 76 degrees Fahrenheit with 28 percent chance of rain.
I see, thanks!
Could I further assist you?
Could you help me get a round trip flight there? Would prefer flying with Southwest Airlines.
When will you be returning?
I will be returning on the 11th of March.
Then will you being leaving on the March 1st?
Yes, that is true.
Sure, which city would you be departing from then?
I will be departing from Washington, and would prefer an Economy class ticket please.
Sure, would you like to fly with Southwest Airlines? They currently have a flight which departs at 2:50 pm and returns at 7:05 am which will cost you $254.
Sure, could you also help me search for a house to stay for one person? Would prefer one with a 4.1 rating or higher.
Sure, there are 10 houses available, one of which is 1020 South Figueroa Street with a 4.1 rating.
I see, are there any alternative housing available?
There is a house you might like located at 10320 West Olympic Boulevard with a 4.1 rating.
Any alternatives? Would prefer one which can accommodate 2 people and has laundry service.
Yes, there is one with a 4.1 rating located at 10740 Wilshire Boulevard.
That sounds great to me!
Would you like me to make a reservation?
No, that is not necessary. Thanks!
Sure, it is my pleasure to help you. Have a great day ahead!
Can you please check the weather?
In which city do you want the search?
What is the weather like in Cupertino?
The weather is 92 degrees and there is a 13 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it supposed to be?
The humidity will be around 22 percent and the wind is 2 miles per hour.
How is the weather in Delhi on March 4th?
The weather should be around 97 degrees and there is a 8 percent chance of rain.
Can you get me one ticket for a flight from San Fran?
Are you leaving on March 4th? When is your return date?
I will be leaving on the 1st of March and returning on the 10th of March.
There is a flight with American Airlines that leaves at 1:15 pm and returns at 1:45 pm the cost is $353.
I would like to find a house to stay in.
There are 10 houses. There is a house at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi with a rating of 4.5.
That house sounds great.
Would you like to make a reservation for this house?
No, I just wanted the information.
Have a good day.
What is the weather in New York City on 10th of March?
The temperature is 59 degrees with 0 percent chance of rain.
Is it humid or windy?
The wind is 5 miles per hour and the humidity is about 15 percent.
I would like a round trip flight on Monday next week from Los Angeles for two people.
When would you like to return?
On the 11th.
There are 4 flights. One is with American Airlines departing at 6:20 pm and returning at 7:45 pm costing $250.
Are there there other options?
There is a Delta Airlines flight leaving at 1:40 pm and returning at 7:30 am for $256.
Anything else?
Southwest Airlines has a flight leaving at 7:20 am and returning at 6:50 am for $249.
I also need a house.
There are 10 options. One has a rating of 4.4 at 100 Greenwich Street.
Is there a number and does it offer laundry service?
Yes, there is laundry and the number is +1 917-409-0800.
That is great.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a nice time.
Can I get the weather?
Sure, for which city
The weather in Chicago please
Today will have an average temperature of 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of precipitation
Will it be humid?
The humidity should be about 29 percent
Ok good
Anything else I can do?
Yes, book me a round trip flight to Chicago
Ok, departing from where? What day will you be coming back?
I'll leave from Philly and need to return next Thursday
And you'd like to depart March 1st?
Yes please
I found 4 flights for you. How about an American Airlines flight departing at 10:10 am, with the return at 6:40 pm. It's a $120 trip
Ok good. Any houses where I can stay there?
1 South Franklin Street is a nice looking place with a 4.4 rating
That sounds interesting
Would you like to book it?
Not right now. Thanks for the help.
Always happy to help. Take care.
Hey, I want you to tell me about the weather.
What city weather shall I tell you about?
I am interested in Chi-town.
It will be 73 degrees Fahrenheit average temperature for the day with a 29 percentage possibility for rain.
What is the wind like and what will the humidity be?
It will be approximately 29 percent humid with wind speed averaging about 15 miles an hour.
Alright. I would go ahead with the visit. Find me a round trip flight starting from the 1st of this month.
What day are you boarding the return flight and what city will you be leaving from?
Find me planes from LA. I will get back on 11th of March.
Should I check out American Airlines for you. It leaves at 3:05 pm. The return flight will leave at 4:30 am. The overall cost of the ticket will be $242.
Can you find me something else?
What do you think of flying Delta Airlines. It leaves at 7:15 pm and the return flight goes off at 11:15 pm. I can buy you tickets for $177.
In what airport does the plane land?
The plane will go to O'Hare International Airport.
Will the tickets be economy or business class?
I found you an Economy seat.
All good. I would you to find me a house for one person with laundry service. Please find something with 4.4 rating or more.
I have found you a nice house at 1 West Wacker Drive with a 4.4 rating.
Find me another house.
1118 North State Street has a nice house with 4.4 rating.
Find me some other house. We are 2 people in all and I could use a 4.3 rating or greater.
You can choose from 8 houses. I can suggest a nice house at 100 West Monroe Street with a rating of 4.3.
Oh! I like this house. That will be all.
Glad to be of help. See you!
What's the weather forecast in KL on March 9th?
The temperature will average around 92 degrees Fahrenheit, and the chance of rain is 0 percent.
Thanks. Can you find me a round trip to that area?
What city would you be departing from?
Find a flight taking off from Seattle.
Do you want to leave on March 9th? What day will you fly back on?
I want to fly out next Monday, and I'll be there until the 11th of this month.
There's an American Airlines flight for $371. The flight out is at 4:55 am, and you'll head back at 5:05 am. How does that sound?
That sounds fine. Are there any houses I could stay at in the area? I'd like on with a rating of 3.5 or above and laundry service. Oh, it's just the one person by the way.
I've found 10 houses at 3.5 or above that might work for you. There's one option at 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan.
Give me their phone number.
The number is +60 3-9100 1133.
That house is a good choice.
Do you want me to make a reservation there now?
No, I don't need to at the moment. I'm done for now.
Glad I could help. Enjoy the rest of your day.
How is the weather on March 5th?
What city's weather should I tell you about?
Vancouver, BC of course. How it is on March 12th?
It says the average temperature is about 59 degrees Fahrenheit with a 10 percent possibility of rain.
What is the humidity?
Humidity could be about 15 percent.
What about how windy it will be?
11 miles a hour should be the average speed of wind.
Alright. Search for round trip flight to visit there.
When would you board the returning flight and will you leave on March 12th?
I will go on the 5th of March 2019 and travel back on March 14th.
What city are you leaving?
I want to board flight from Vegas.
There are 2 flights that will fit you. Delta Airlines flight takes off at 12:20 pm and return flight departs at 3:20 am costing you $229.
Find me other ones please.
Might you like United Airlines flight that takes off at 12:05 pm? The return flight leaves at 6:05 pm costing you $238?
Will this flight be redeye and where is it landing?
The plane lands in YVR International Airport and it won't be an overnight journey.
I need a house with laundry service when I am there. We will be two people in all.
I have found 10 houses. One is located at 1041 Southwest Marine Drive and is rated 3.5. It is quite nice.
Get me their phone number.
Their contact number is +1 604-263-1555.
I like this house.
Shall I get you anything else?
Nope. Thank you!
Glad to help you. Have a nice day!
I would like to check out the weather in LA on March 10th.
The average temperature on that day should be around 91 degrees fahrenheit. There is a 10 percent chance of rain.
That souns good. Find me a round trip economy flight to get there. I want to travel on the 3rd.
Which day do you want to take the return flight on? What city do you want to leave from?
Find flights from Portland returning on 14th of March.
I have 5 flights that are good. Do you want to fly with Alaska Airlines? This flight takes off at 10:10 am and the return flight takes off at 5:40 pm. This ticket costs $150.
Do you have something else?
How about flying with American Airlines? This flight takes off at 6 am and the return flight takes off at 11:15 pm. This ticket costs $181.
Is there something else available?
Would you like to fly with Delta Airlines? This flight takes off at 9:35 am and the return takes off at 6:50 am. The ticket is $208.
Would this be a redeye?
No, it isn't an overnight flight.
Okay. I'd like to find a house to stay there.
There is a nice house at 1020 South Figueroa Street with a 4.2 rating.
That house is nice. That is all I need for now, though.
It was my pleasure to help you. Goodbye.
I need to check the weather for the March 9th.
Sure thing. Which city would you like me to check the weather for?
Check the weather in NY for me please.
The average temperature in New York will be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit for the day. There is a 38 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thank you. Can you help me find a round trip flight headed out there?
Yes I can. I just need to know what city you are departing from and what day you'd like to book a return flight.
Look for flights headed out of San Fran. I'll be returning on March 11th
Are you leaving on March 9th?
I want to head out on the day after tomorrow.
I found 4 flights for you. Would you like to fly with American Airlines? They have a flight departing at 8:30 pm and a return flight scheduled for 4:45 pm. The total cost will be $219.
How many stops will they have to make?
The flight is scheduled for 0 stops.
Okay, that works. I'd also like to find a house out there to rent.
Sure thing. I found 10 houses for you. How about this nice one located at 100 Greenwich Street. It's rated at 4.4.
That house sounds great. Thanks a lot. That's all for now.
My pleasure. Enjoy your trip. Bye!
I need more updates about the weather in stanford on March 14th
Yes. The temperature will be around 82 degrees fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 5 percent
What about the wind?
The wind speed will be 5 miles per hour
Now tell me more about humidity
it will be around 19 percent
Got it. Now look the same thing in vegas on March 11th
the temperature will be around 81 degrees fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 3 percent
Now, all I need is a round trip flight to reach the place, look for premium economy tickets please
Is departure day march 11th?
Departure is scheduled to happen on march 9th and the required tickets are 2
what about the return flight? Where are you leaving from?
The city is vancouver and I will be back on march 14th 2019
do you like united airlines? takes off is 6:05 pm and you will be back at 3:05 pm. you will pay $370
What is the name of the landing airport? Can you tell me if it is a redeye flight?
No, it isn't. The name of the airport is mccarran international airport
Great, now look for a place to stay
I've found 6 houses, one is loated at 1215 south las vegas boulevard and it has been rated 3.7
I like it
I can book it for you, if you need it
No, I'm fine, bye for now
have a wonderful day
I want to see what the weather conditions are like in Paris, France.
The average temperature is 77 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 26 percent chance rain.
That sounds good, so I'd like to book a round trip flight there.
So will you leave on March 1st? Where will you depart from? When do you want to take a return flight?
Yes, I'll fly out from Chicago on March 1st, returning on March 13th.
You could take an American Airlines departure flight at 5:10 am, with a return flight at 4:05 am, at a cost of $350.
That's fine. I'll need to find a house for one person to stay at, one with a 4.4 rating or higher.
I found 10 houses like that- you could stay at 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005. It has a 4.4 rating.
What else is available?
There is also 11 Rue des Gravilliers, 75003, another 4.4 rated property.
I'll stay there. Thanks for that, I don't require anything else for now.
My pleasure. Ciao for now!
Could you look at the weather forecast for March 2nd in Toronto, Ontario.
There is a 20 % chance of rain and an ave temp of 60 degrees fahrenheit.
Will it be humid?
About a 28 & chance of that.
Fine ok.
Would you like help with anything more?
I would like two Economy tickets there and back.
Will you be leaving on March 2nd?
No I want to go on March 1st.
What is your return date?
It is the 8th of this month.
Which city will you be leaving from?
From Seattle, WA.
There are 3 flight options. There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 8:15 am and returning at 10:05 am costing $312 in total.
fine now I need to find accommodation, a house with a rating of at least 4.1.
There is a good one with a 4.1 rating at 108 Chestnut Street.
Is there any other options? There needs to be a laundry service.
There are 9 available options, one in particular is nice and has a 4.1 rating at 118 Yorkville Avenue.
What is their telephone number?
it is +1 416-963-6300.
This house is perfect thanks that is everything for now.
Your are very welcome. Goodbye for now.
I need to find out the weather in Sydney on March 14th.
The average temp for Sydney that day should be 100 degrees F with a 2 % chance of rain.
How windy is it likely to be?
The average wind speed is looking like 8 mph.
Sure, sounds right. I want to find a round trip flight to get there from Chicago.
On which day did you want to take the return flight and are you leaving on March 14th?
I'd like to start my trip on 2nd of this month and come back on 14th of March 2019.
I found a flight on Delta Airlines taking off at 10:40 am with the return flight at 5:50 pm for $394.
Did you have anything else? Any airline is fine with me.
I found a flight on United Airlines taking off at 10:35 am. The return flight takes off at 10:05 pm and it costs $372.
Ok, sounds good. I'd like to find a house to stay there for two people.
I found a nice house for you at 1 Columbia Court, Baulkham Hills New South Wales 2153, Australia with a 4.1 rating.
Did you have a contact number for this location?
The number is +61 2 9634 9634.
This house sounds great.
Did you want to make a reservation for this house?
No, not right now.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thank you.
It has been my pleasure. Goodbye.
Could you assist me in checking the weather forecast for March 5th in Portland, OR.
There is a 12 % chance of rain with the temp around 56 degrees fahrenheit.
sounds fine. Now I need an economy flight there and back, departing on March 1st.
What is your return date?
It is 13th of March.
Which city will you be departing from?
from LAX please.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight which takes off at 5:15 am returning at 5:40 pm costing $179 all in
I prefer American Airlines if possible.
There is 1 American Airlines flight taking off at 11:15 pm and returning at 6 am costing $174 altogether.
When does the return flight arrive and how many passengers did you search for?
it arrives at 11:32 am and it is 1 traveller.
fine and could you help me search for a house also.
There are 10 available houses, one with a 4.2 ratig is located at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street.
That is a perfect house. That is eveything for now.
You are very welcome goodbye.
Can you check the weather?
What city do you want?
Check the weather in Philly.
It will be 81 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is 23 percent.
I also need a round trip flight for any class.
What city is departure and is March 1st ok?
Yes, and I am leaving from New York.
What day is return?
I am returning March 6th.
I found 4. I have an American Airlines flight leaving 7:55 am with return flight at 5:35 pm for $64.
Do you have others?
I have a Delta Airlines departing at 11:10 am and return flight at 7:25 pm for $69.
Is this a redeye with 0 stops?
The flight has 0 stops and is not overnight.
I want to find a house too.
I have one at 1 Logan Square rated 4.4.
Do you have something else for three?
I have 9. I have one at 100 North Christopher Columbus Boulevard rated at 4.1.
This house is what I want.
Would you like to book?
No, not for now.
Is there anything else?
No that is all.
Thanks for letting us help.
Check the weather in London, England.
The average temperature is about 81 degrees fahrenheit for the day, with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind and humidity levels be like?
The humidity level is about 35 percent and wind speed around 10 miles per hour.
Okay. I need a round trip flight to get there and I will return on 9th of March.
What city do you want to leave from? Will you leave on March 1st?
Yeah, that sounds good. Check out flights from ATL.
Do you want to fly on American Airlines? The flight leaves at 8:40 pm and the return takes off at 2:05 pm. This ticket is $300.
Yeah, find me a house to stay there for 1. I want a house with a 4.4 or higher.
There is a nice house at 1 Ham Yard with a 4.4 rating.
Is anything else available?
There is on at 1 Seething Lane with a 4.4 rating.
That sounds perfect.
Would you like to make a reservation here?
No, not right now. That is all I need.
I was happy to help. Goodbye.
What is the weather in Los Altos on March 13th?
The average temperature should be 94 degrees with a 3 percent chance of rain.
What about Chi-Town on March 1st.
The average temperature should be 73 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
How windy will is be?
About 15 miles per hour.
What about the humidity?
The humidity is about 29 percent.
Oh, okay then.
Would you like anything else?
I would like a round trip flight from SD.
Will you be leaving on March 1st and when would you like to return?
Yes, and returning Friday next week.
There is 1 flight on American Airlines leaving at 12:05 pm and returning at 4:30 am for a cost of $272.
How many passengers and stops?
This is for 1 person and 1 stop.
OK, I need a house, too.
There are 10 available. One has a 4.4 rating on 1 South Franklin Street.
That sounds nice.
Have a nice trip.
Can you get me the weather on March 7th.
What city is this weather check for?
It's for Atlanta, GA.
The average day temperature is 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of precipitation.
Alright. I need to get a round trip flight to there. I'll be traveling on the 5th of this month. And it's just one ticket.
Where will you be departing from?
I'll be departing from San Fran.
And what day will you be returning?
I'll return on the 11th.
There are 4 flights that match. Is American Airlines okay? They have a flight with departure take off at 3:50 pm and return take off at 11:40 am. The ticket is $229.
Does the flight have any stops? And what's my arrival time at the destination?
There is 1 stop. And the destination arrival time is 1:24 am.
Alright. I also need to find a house to stay at there.
There are 10 houses that match. There's a nice house at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest with a rating of 4.3.
That sounds like exactly what I want.
Do you want me to book the house?
No, that won't be necessary right now.
Do you need any further help?
No. Thanks for helping me.
The pleasure is mine, take care.
Can you show me the weather?
Which city should I be searching for
Search for it in Phoenix
The average temperature is predicted to be at 89 degrees with a 15 percent chance of rain
Okay. I need a round trip flight to there
What is your city of departure and when do you plan to take the return flight?
Leaving from CDMX and returning the next friday
Do you leave on March 1st?
Yes, I want to book 4 tickets
There is an american airlines flight that takes off at 8:05 am and costs $239. the return flight leaves at 7:35 am
okay. I would also need a house there
I have a 4.6 rated house at 10 east thomas road
What's their number? Do they offer laundry service?
They do offer laundry service. Their number is +1 602-222-1111
That's perfect. That's all I need.
have a great trip
I'd like to find out the weather.
For what city did you want to find the weather for?
I'd like to know the weather in Valley Ford.
The average temperature in Valley Ford should be 72 degrees F and there is a 6 % chance of rain.
OK, what about the weather in Phoenix, AZ on March 4th?
The average temperature in Phoenix for that day should be 90 degrees F with a 29 % chance of rain.
Sure, sounds right. I'm looking for a round trip flight there.
Which city did you want to leave from and on which day did you want to take the return flight? Are you leaving on March 4th?
I'd like to start my trip this Sunday and return on 11th of March. Can you help me find flights from Seattle?
I found 4 flights. One flight on American Airlines is taking off at 8:15 am with the return flight at 8:40 am with a cost of $230.
Sounds about right. I'd like to find a house to stay there for 2 people.
I found a nice house at 10 East Thomas Road with a 4.6 rating.
That sounds great.
Was there anything else I could do for you?
No, but thank you for your help.
It's been my pleasure. Have a nice day.
What's the weather like in London?
The average temperature in London should be 81 degrees fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I want to find a round trip flight there that returns on the 9th of March.
Do you want to leave March 1st? Where will you be departing from?
Yeah that's fine. I want to leave from Chicago.
Is American Airlines okay? They have a flight departing at 4:30 am. The return flight departs at 2:05 pm and the ticket costs $348.
Are there any other options? I'll need 4 tickets.
I found 1 other flight for you, with Delta Airlines. The flight departs at 9:15 am. The return flight departs at 8 am and the ticket is $301.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
I need to find a house to stay at there for 2 people. I want something rated at least 2.6.
I found one with a 2.6 rating located at 1 Addington Street.
Okay, that's perfect.
Should I make the reservation for you?
No, not right now.
Do you need anything else?
Nope, that's all, thanks.
Alright, enjoy your day!
Can you give me the weather forecast for Chi-town?
It is predicted to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit wit ha 29 percent chance of rain.
Sounds beautiful. I'd like to find three round trip flights there.
Where will you be departing from?
I'm looking for flights out of Philly.
When will you be returning?
I need to be back by March 12th.
Do you plan to start your trip on March 1st?
Yes, that is when I'd like to leave.
I have found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:10 am and returns at 6:40 pm for $122 per ticket.
Can you check for United Airlines flights out of Atlanta, GA instead?
There is 1 flight that matches your criteria. It is a United Airlines flight that departs at 6:15 am and returns at 9:50 pm at the rate of $123 per ticket.
That sounds good. I need to find accommodations for one there. I prefer a house.
There are 10 properties that you may like. There is one at 1 South Franklin Street with a solid 4.4 rating.
Do they offer laundry services? What is the phone number?
Unfortunately, they do not offer laundry service. The contact number is +1 312-558-1020.
That's okay. It seems nice.
Do you want to make a reservation now?
No, not at this time. Thank you for your help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day!
Check the weather in San Diego for March 1st please.
Sure thing. The average temperature for that day will be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it gonna be? What type of humidity are we looking at?
The humidity will be around 16 percent and the average wind speed should be about 1 mile per hour.
Okay, thanks. Can you find any round trip flights headed out there for me?
No problem. Would you like to leave on March 1st? Please tell me which city you wish to depart from and what date you'd like to return.
Yes, that all sounds good. Find flights out of Seattle, WA. I'll be returning on the 12th.
I found 3 flights for you. Would you like to fly with American Airlines? There is a flight departing at 8:15 am with the return flight leaving at 4:10 am. The total ticket price is $204.
Okay, that sounds right. I'd also like to find a house to stay in.
Sure thing. I've found 10 houses available for you. There is a really nice house located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United states. It's rated at 4.6 stars.
Does it have laundry service? What's the phone number?
Yes, they do have laundry service. The phone number is +1 855-287-2682.
Awesome, this house sounds great. That's all I need for now.
My pleasure. Please enjoy your trip. Goodbye.
What will the weather be like on March 2nd?
What city do you want me to check?
San Fran.
The temperature should be 72 degrees with a 15 % chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed should be 8 miles per hour.
Okay I want to book a round trip flight there.
What date do you wish to return. What city do you want to leave from?
I am leaving from Vegas and returning on the 9th.
Are you leaving on March 2nd?
Yes.
I found 4 flights for you. I found an American Airlines flight that takes off at 5:30 am and the returning flight takes off at 5:30 pm. The ticket costs $114.
Is this a redeye flight?
No, it is not an overnight flight.
Okay cool I need to find a house to stay there too.
I found a nice house at 1095 Market Street with a rating at 3.7.
That house will work.
Would you like to make the reservation?
Not right now. That is all I need right now.
Have a great day!
What's the wether forecast for March 7th?
For what city?
Las Vegas, Nevada.
The forecast for Las Vegas on March 7th calls for a daytime high of 86 degrees with a 22 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Then how about KL on the March 1st.
The forecast for KL on March 7th calls for a daytime high of 102 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Will there be any wind to speak of?
Expected winds are a mild 12 miles per hour.
How about humidity?
Expect about 23 percent humidity.
Sounds good. I'll need plane tickets then.
Departing from what city or airport?
Departing from SFO. Look for something in Premium Economy class.
Leaving on March 1st and returing on what date?
Returning on March 11th.
I found 1 flight. American Airlines has a flight at 5:20 am. The return flight leaves at 5:05 am. The fare for this flight is $663.
Ok. I'll think about that.
Do you require anything else?
I'll need someplace to stay while I'm there. Find a house for two people, preferably with laundry service.
There is a house located at 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan with a rating of 3.8.
Anything else? At least a 3.7.
There is a house located at 1, Jalan Pantai Baharu, Jaya Tower 3, 59200 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan with a rating of 3.7.
Ok. That sounds awesome.
Would you liek me to make a reservation for that house?
Not right now. That's all I wnated to know.
Let me know if I can be of any further assistance.
What's the weather forecast for Philly on March 14th?
The expected average temperature for the day is 84 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Great, thanks. Please find me a round trip flight to get there.
Please let me know your departure city, your return date, and whether you'll be leaving on March 14th.
I'll be leaving from NY on 10th of March, and returning on 14th of March 2019.
I found 4 suitable flights. Would you be interested in leaving on a 3:45 pm American Airlines flight? The return flight will be at 4:45 pm and the ticket will cost $67.
What are the other options?
Delta Airlines has an 11:10 am flight and a 7:25 pm return flight at a cost of $66 per ticket.
What's the flight's destination?
The flight will land at PHL International Airport.
What is the flight's departure airport? Did you find this for 1 passenger?
It is for 1 traveler. The flight's origin airport is JFK International Airport.
Great. Please find me a house to stay while over there.
Your search yielded 10 results, among them one nice, 4.4 star rated house, located at 1 Logan Square.
This house sounds great!
Should I go ahead and make a reservation for this house?
No, I'm not interested in doing that now.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Happy to have been of help. Bye.
Can you check the weather in Paris on March 7th?
The temperature should be around 87 degrees and there is a 12 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it going to be?
The average wind speed should be 6 miles per hour.
How humid will the day be?
The humidity will be around 22 percent.
Can I find a round trip flight to go there?
You are leaving on March 7th, where are you departing from?
I will departing from Portland and would like to travel from the 4th to the 11th of this month.
There is 1 flight with Delta Airlines that takes off at 8 pm and returns at 11:20 am the cost is $386.
I will need to find a house and the rating should be 4.4 or more
There are 10 houses. There is 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005 and the rating is 4.4.
We are two people, is there another house?
There is one on 11 Rue des Gravilliers, 75003 and the rating is 4.4
Are there another house with a rating of 4.5 or more?
There is a house at 12 Rue de Marignan, 75008 and the rating is 4.5.
Thank you for the information.
Have a good day.
Hi there, could you help me check the weather on March 13th?
For which location are you interested in?
In London, UK please.
Sure, the temperature then is 94 degress Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
I see, what is the humidity and windiness on that day?
The humidity is around 18 percent and the average wind speed is 5 miles per hour.
I see, thanks!
Do you require further assistance?
Could you get me 1 ticket for an Economy flight from Philly?
Will you be leaving on March 13th and when will you be returning from?
I will be travelling from March 1st and returning on 14th of March.
I see, there are 3 flights available, one of which is an American Airlines flight which will depart at 4:45 pm and return at 2:05 pm which will cost you $306.
May I know which airport does the flight arrive at?
You will arrive at Heathrow International Airport.
Sure, then when does the returning flight arrive and how many stops does this flight route have?
The return flight arrives at 0:16 am and this flight has 1 intermediate stop.
Sure, could you also help me find a house to stay there please?
There is a nice house at 1 Addington Street with a 4.3 rating.
That sounds great!
Would you like to make a reservation there?
That is not necessary, thanks though!
Do you require further assistance?
No, that is all I need, thank you!
No worries, it is my pleasure to assist you. Enjoy your trip!
What is the weather in Las Vegas on March 11th
The average temperature is 81 degrees Fahrenheit and 3 percent chance of rain
What about the wind speed and humidity?
Around 19 percent humidity and 10 miles per hour is the wind speed
Okay. Find me a round trip flight to there
When is your return?
On the 13th
From where are you departing? Will you leave on March 11th?
Look for flights from Seattle, WA on 6th of March
There are 2 flights. How about Southwest Airlines that takes off at 6:50 pm and returning takes off at 9:55 am. The total cost for ticket is $219
What is the arrival time? From where does flight leaves?
The arrival time is 10:40 pm from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport
Do you have anything else?
What about United Airlines? It takes off at 10:10 am and returning flight takes off at 1:40 pm. The cost is $221
Fine. Look for a house there
How about 1215 South Las Vegas Boulevard? It's rating is 3.7
Is there any other house?
How about 217 Las Vegas Boulevard North which has a rating of 3.5
That's perfect
Do you want to make a reservation
No Not now
Do you need anything else?
No Thank you
You are welcome
What's the weather going to be like in Chi-town on 3rd of March?
I don't have the specific temperature forecast for that day, but the average temperature for that day is 67 degrees. There is a small chance of rain, about 36 percent.
That sounds good. I guess I'll schedule a round trip flight. I prefer to fly with Southwest Airlines. I have their frequent flyer card.
So you will be leaving on March 3rd from which city?
Yes, that's right. I'll be leaving from from Los Angeles.
Alright, what day will you be returning to Los Angeles?
I'm going to stay for about a week. The 10th of this month will be good.
Sure, Southwest Airlines has 1 flight costing $250 that departs at 7:20 am from LA. The return flight departs at 6:45 am.
Those times will work fine for me. Can you help me find a house to stay at while I am there?
Yes, there is a really nice house close to many attractions with a rating of 4.4. It is located at 1 South Franklin Street.
Ummm, are there any others. I prefer more luxurious accommodations. I need laundry service also. I would prefer something with a rating higher than 4.4.
Well, there is another house located at 1 West Wacker Drive. But it also has a 4.4 rating.
I guess that will work, with a name like West Wacker it has to be good!
Haha, it's been a pleasure helping you! Goodbye.
I want to find out what the weather will be like in Paris, France on March 3rd.
The temperature on that day should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
All right. Find me a round trip flight to get there on economy class. I need 2 tickets from ATL.
Will you leave on March 3rd? When will you return?
That sounds great to me. I will return on Tuesday next week.
Do you want to fly with American Airlines? The flight takes off at 3:25 pm and the return flight takes off at 4:05 am. This ticket costs $373.
Do you have something else available?
I have a Delta Airlines flight available that takes off at 3:40 pm and that has a return flight taking off at 5:35 pm. This ticket is $376.
Okay, could you find me a house in Paris to stay in for 2?
There are 10 houses that are available. One nice house is located at 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005, and it has a 4.5 rating.
Do you have something else available?
There is one nice house at 1 Rue Daunou, 75002. It is rated 4.2.
That house sounds great.
Would you like a reservation for the house?
No, not right now.
Could I do something else for you?
No, but thanks for helping.
It was great assisting you. Goodbye.
Please help me check the weather in Ny on this Sunday.
It's 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Okay, please find a round trip flight for one.
Are you going to leave on March 3rd? And which city you want to depart from?
I want to travel today and flights from Atlanta GA.
When will you come back?
On March 6th.
Do you like to fly with American Airlines? It takes off at 6:25 am and returns at 11:20 am. Ticket costs $133.
How many stops?
0 stops.
Which airport does it leave from?
From Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Okay, please find me a house to stay there.
I found a nice house at 100 Greenwich Street with a 4.4 rating.
Any other else?
How about 100-15 Ditmars Boulevard East Elmhurst NY 11369 USA with a 4.2 rating?
That one is good!
Will I reserve you the house?
Not now.
Anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
You are welcome.
I need to check out the weather on March 11th.
What city are you looking for the weather in?
Kuala Lumpur.
The average temperature for that day should be 99 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 2 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I'd like to get a round trip flight there.
What day do you want to take the return flight? WOuld you like to leave on March 11th? What city will you leave from?
I want to start traveling next Monday. Find flights from Seattle, WA that return on 13th of March.
How about flying with American Airlines? The flight leaves at 4:55 am and return flight takes off at 5:05 am. This ticket costs $383.
How many stops does the flight have? Is it a redeye?
It has 1 stop and it is an overnight flight.
I'd like to find a house to stay in with a 4.2 rating and it needs to have laundry service for 1 person.
There are 10 houses available for this search. There is one house at 1, Jalan Pantai Baharu, Jaya Tower 3, 59200 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan. It has a 4.2 rating.
That sounds great.
Do youw ant to make a reservation?
No, not right now.
Could I do something else for you?
No, thank you for helping.
It was my pleasure. Goodbye.
I need to finish making plans for my upcoming trip. Can you check the weather for me?
Sure, where are you going?
I'll be in New York.
Ok, looks like it'll be an average of 66 degrees with a 37 percent chance of rain.
Great, that's perfect.
Anything else I can do?
Yeah, I still need to book my flight. Can you find me a flight out of ATL on the 1st? Any airline is fine.
Sure, when are you returning?
I want to fly back Friday next week.
Ok, I found 3 possible flights. There's an American Airlines flight for $139 at 6:25 am that comes back at 11:20 am.
Ok, perfect. Can you also find a house I can rent there?
Sure, there's a nice one at 100 Greenwich Street with a 4.4 rating on the dates of your trip.
That sounds perfect.
Do you want to make a reservation?
No, I'll do that later. That's all.
Ok, have a good day.
Please check the weather.
What city do you want?
Check the weather in Paris.
The average temperature is 77 degrees F and 26 % chance of rain.
Thank you for the info.
Is there anything else?
I also need a flight for the 1st of March.
What is departure day and city?
Depart city is Los Angeles and returns on the day after tomorrow.
I found 2. I have an American Airlines that departs at 9:40 am and return flight departing at 4:05 am for $392.
I need a house for 1 with a 3.9 or higher rating.
I have 1 Place de la Sorbonne 75005 rated at 3.9.
Do you have others?
I have one at 1 Rue Daunou, 75002 rated 3.9.
I accept this, that is all I need.
It was nice helping you and have a good day.
Can you help me look up the weather for San Diego on March 13th?
It should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit on average with a 19 percent chance it will rain.
Alright. Now I need a round trip flight to get there. And I'll be traveling from San Fran.
Will you be departing on March 13th? And when will you be returning?
I'll be departing on the 11th of March and I want to return on March 13th.
Are you okay with Alaska Airlines? There's a flight that departs at 6:10 am with the return flight taking off at 5:10 pm. It will cost $110 per ticket.
What else is there? And how about flights from Portland, OR?
There are 2 flights that match. Are you okay with American Airlines? There's a flight that departs at 7:20 am with the return flight taking off at 7:30 am. It will cost $183 per ticket.
Alright. And I also need to get a house when I'm there.
There's a house you might enjoy at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States. It has a rating of 4.6.
Do they have laundry service?
Yes, they have laundry service.
What other house are available?
There's a house you might enjoy at 10044 Pacific Mesa Boulevard. It has a rating of 4.5
Let's keep looking for houses.
There's a house you might enjoy at 1047 Fifth Avenue. It has a rating of 4.4.
That seems like it would be great.
Do you want me to book the house?
No, I don't need to book it right now. That's all the help I need.
It's been a pleasure helping you. Take care.
Hello. What is the weather going to be like in SD on the March 12th?
The weather is expected to be 90 oF with a 10 % chance of rain.
What's the humidity supposed to be?
The humidity is expected to be around 27 %.
How windy will it be?
Not very windy; only about 5 mph.
Okay, great. I'd like to book a round-trip flight to San Diego. Could you get me premium economy tickets on United Airlines. I'll be going to Vegas.
No problem! What day would you like to return to San Diego?
On the 14th.
Great! And you're leaving on March 12th, is that right?
No, I plan on leaving on the 9th.
Okay, thanks! Can you confirm the following details, please? You're booking 1 seat on a United Airlines flight the leaves at 9:35 am. The returning flight leaves at 2:20 pm. The total cost of tickets will be $167.
Wait, where does the flight land?
The flight will arrive at SAN International Airport.
What time will the flight arrive in Vegas?
The flight will land at 10:49 am.
Okay, that's all good. I need to find a house to stay in in San Diego, for two people. It must have laundry service and have a rating of 4.2 or higher.
Okay! I found one house at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States. It has a rating of 4.2.
I'd like a house actually in San Diego.
No problem! How about a house at 10044 Pacific Mesa Boulevard? It has a rating of 4.2.
Okay, that should be fun. That's all for today.
Bye!
I need to check the weather in Phoenix, AZ on March 5th
The average day temperature is running at 73 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 12 percent.
Okay and i wanted to find a round trip flight to get there
Which city are you leaving from and are you leaving on March 5th? which day you are coming back?
I will be departing on 2nd of this month. Please look for flights from SF.I will be returning on the 9th
I have short listed 4 flights of your likings. One among them is American Airlines which takes off at 8:10 am and returning at 6:15 am with total cost $169
What is the number of stops of flight and is this a redeye flight?
The flight has just 1 stop and it is not an overnight flight
Anything else?
What is your opinion on Delta Airlines which takes off at 5:50 am and returns at 11:55 am with ticket costing $120
Fine and i need to search for a staying house
I have short listed 10 houses of your likings. One among them isat 10 East Thomas Road with rating 4.6
This house is perfect for me
You want to make booking for this house?
No, not now
Anything else you need
no, thnak you
it is my pleasure.bye
What's the weather going to be like on March 10th?
What city do you want me to check the weather in?
Toronto, Canada please.
The average temperature should be 73 degree Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks. I'd like to buy 3 round trip flight tickets to get there.
Okay, what day are you returning and are you departing on March 10th? Also, what city are you departing from?
I'm departing on March 4th from Atlanta and returning on the 12th.
Okay, there is an American Airlines flight departing at 3:25 pm and the return flight departs at 10:05 am for $225.
Okay, thanks. I also need a house for two people in Toronto with laundry service.
There's a house at 108 Chestnut Street with a 4.2 rating.
What other houses are there?
There's another house at 111 Carlton Street with a 3.0 rating.
What is the phone number for this house?
The phone number is +1 800-780-7234.
I'd like a different house with at least a 3.4 rating.
What about a house at 111 Lombard Street? It has a 3.4 rating.
That house is great, that is all I needed.
Have a great day!
Could you check what the weather will be like on March 11th?
Which city are you interested in?
In KL please.
It says that there is a 2 percent chance of rain with a temp of 99 degrees Fahrenheit.
that is fine. Could you help me book round trip flights there.
From which city and what are you departure and return dates? Will you be returning on March 11th?
I will be leaving from SFO on March 1st and yes I will return on 11th of March 2019.
There is an American Airlines flight leaving at 5:20 am returning at 5:05 am costing $405 altogether.
Is this an economy ticket?
Yes it is economy.
fine I also want to find accommodation there.
There is a place at 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan with a rating of 3.8.
That is perfect thanks that is everything for today.
Your very welcome goodbye.
I'm doing a bit of traveling in the next few days. Can you check the weather in Rohnert Park for me?
Sure, looks like the average is 84 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
How about the wind and humidity?
It will be about 35 percent humidity and an average wind speed of 7 miles per hour.
Great. Can you also check the weather for LA on March 10th?
Sure. The average will be 91 degrees Fahrenheit there with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Ok, that's fine. I still need to book my flight from Paris. Can you find me tickets with a return flight on March 11th?
Sure - will you be leaving March 10th?
No, I want to fly out on the 6th of this month and preferably with Delta Airlines if possible.
Ok, I found 1 flight that might work for you. There's a Delta Airlines flight for $335 that takes off at 5:35 pm and comes back at 8:25 am. How about that?
That sounds fine. Can you also find me a house to stay in?
Sure, there are 10 that came up in my search. There's a nice one with a 4.2 rating at 1020 South Figueroa Street. How about that?
What other ones did you find? I forgot to mention it's for one person only and I want a 3.7 rating or higher.
I found 9 options that look pretty nice. There's one on 10320 West Olympic Boulevard with a 3.7 rating. How about that?
What else came up? It needs to have laundry service, and just in case I decide to bring a friend, I realized I should book it for 2 people.
Ok, looks like there's 8 houses that fit your criteria. There's one on 10740 Wilshire Boulevard with a 3.7 rating.
What's their phone number?
It's +1 310-475-8711.
I just looked up that house and it looks great.
Good to hear - want to make a reservation?
No, not yet. That's all for now.
Ok, happy to help. See you.
Tell me what the weather will be on the 6th of this month in Delhi, India.
There is a 0 percent chance of precipitation with an average temperature of 93 degrees.
Find me a round trip flight to get there and I want to return on March 14th.
Will you be departing on March 6th?
I will be departing on the 3rd.
What city are you flying out of?
I am departing from Seattle, WA.
Search revealed 1 flight. It is a United Airlines flight that departs at 12:30 pm and the return flight departs at 1:10 am. The total cost is $400.
I see. I need a house to stay in.
12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi has a 4.5 rating.
That works for me.
Do you want me to make a booking for you?
No, not right now. That is all.
It was enjoyable to help. Bye for now.
I will be travelling soon and I would like to know the weather.
Where do you want to check the weather?
Check the weather in Phoenix, AZ on March 8th.
The temperature will be around 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
That sounds delightful. I will need a round trip flight for Phoenix, AZ.
Where do you want to leave from?
Find departures from Ciudad de Mexico.
When do you want to return?
Make the return flight on the 10th of this month.
Do you want to leave on March 8th or when?
No, I want the departure for tomorrow.
There is an American Airlines flight that the onward flight departs at 8:05 am and the returning flight departs at 6:15 am. It has a cost of $262.
What type of ticket is it? And when does the onward flight arrives?
It is an Economy class ticket and the flight arrives at 1:38 pm.
Ok, I also need to find a house there.
There are 10 houses you might like. There is a house with a 4.6 rating at 10 East Thomas Road.
That sounds good enough.
Do you want to book the house?
Not right now, that would be all for now.
Have a great day.
What will the weather be on March 1st in Atlanta, GA?
The average temperature is forecasted to be 86 degrees and there is a 28 percent change of rain.
Will it be very humid or windy?
Winds are expected to average 11 miles and hour and the humidity will be about 45 percent.
Thanks. Now I need to book a round trip flight there.
I have you leaving on March 1st, is that correct? Also, what day will you be returning?
Yes, I'm leaving then and want to travel to NY. I need to return on March 9th.
There are 4 flights available. American Airlines has a flight that leaves at 11:20 am and the return flight departs at 6:25 am. The ticket price is $126.
What other flights are available? I'm interested in an economy ticket.
Delta Airlines has a flight for $140 that leaves at 11:25 am. The flight back departs at 3:40 pm.
Is this a flight with 0 stops?
Yes, there are 0 stops on this flight.
What airport does the flight depart from and when will I land at my destination?
Your flight woud leave from JFK International Airport and lands at 1:47 pm.
What other flights did you find?
There is a flight departing at 9:50 pm on Southwest Airlines. The return flight leaves at 9:20 am and the price is $163.
Thanks. Now I need to look for a house there to stay in. Please look for ones with laundry service.
I found 10 houses you may like. There is a home with a 4.3 star rating at 101 Andrew Young International Boulevard Northwest.
What other houses are there with atleast a 2.8 star rating?
There are 9 homes I can suggestion. The first is 1065 Peachtree Street Northeast. It has a 2.8 rating.
Sounds good, thanks. I'm done now.
Happy to help! Goodbye.
Can you tell me the weather of KL on the March 4th?
Sure. The average for March 4th is 87 degrees and the probability of rain is 8 percent.
Sounds fine. Can you find me a plane that goes there from San Francisco? I'm leaving this Saturday and would prefer a round trip and economy seats.
Sure. When would you like to come back?
I need to be back on March 13th.
There is 1 American Airlines flight which leaves at 5:20 am and has a returning flight which departs at 5:05 am. It costs $415.
Wait, did I say I needed 4 tickets? I actually only need 1. And what time does the returning flight land?
No worries, I'm just looking for 1 seat. And the flight lands at 9:56 am.
Great. Can you look for a house for me to use there?
Sure. I see 10 houses you might like. One of them has a 3.8 rating and is at 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan.
Okay. Do you have its phone number?
Its number is +60 3-9100 1133.
Perfect. Thank you for your help.
No problem. See you later.
What is the weather suppose to be in Paris, France on March 3rd?
The average temperature is 93 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
How humid? How windy?
The humidity is expected to be around 18 percent. The wind should be 4 mph.
Ok, I need a round trip flight to get there.
Re you leaving on March 3rd?
Yes, I am.
What day are you coming back? What city are you leaving from?
I want an economy ticket leaving from Chicago on March 14th.
I found 1 flight with Delta Airlines that leaves at 6:40 pm. The returning flight leaves at 11:20 pm. The ticket cost is $238.
I need a house to stay in.
I found a home at 1 Place de la Sorbonne, 75005. The rating is 4.5.
The house is perfect.
Are you ready to make a reservation?
No, not now.
Is there anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
What's the weather forecast to be like on the 9th?
Whereabouts do you want to check?
I want to go to NYC.
In NYC the average temperature will be 70 degrees Fahrenheit, and there will be a 38 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity levels and winds?
Humidity is forecast to be around 47 percent, and there will be wind speeds of 7 miles an hour.
Well, that's reasonable. So I'd like to make a round flight trip there, starting on 2nd of this month.
Where will you depart from?
From London, England.
When will you take the return flight?
On March 14th.
You could fly with Delta Airlines, departing at 3:35 pm, returning at 6:20 pm, at a total cost of $247.
Right ho. And I'll also need to find somewhere to stay, preferably a house with a 4.4 rating or higher. It'll just be for one person, but I'd like laundry service available.
Well, there are 10 houses that match your expectations. You could stay at 102 West 57th Street, it has a 4.4 rating.
Excellent! That's all I need then.
I'm happy to help! Bye for now.
I want to know how the weather will be on the 9th.
Can you tell me for which city should I check the weather for?
I want to know the weather in LAX.
The average temperature in LAX for the day should be 94 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of 13 percent of rain.
Alright, can you check the weather for March 1st?
For your requested date the average temperature should be 76 degrees Fahrenheit, and the chance of raining is 28 percent.
Can you tell me how windy is it going to be?
The average speed of the wind is expected to be 4 miles per hours.
Alright, fine. I need to have a round trip flight to go there. I want you to look for flights departing from New York City.
Can you tell me the day when you will have the return flight?
I will depart for my flight on March 1st, and I will have my return flight on March 13th.
Would you like flying with American Airlines? This flight will depart at 3:40 pm, and when it returns it will leave at 6:20 pm. The price for the ticket of this flight is $245.
Okay. I will also need a place to sleep there, so find me a house, which has a laundry service. I will need the house for one person.
There are 10 houses which match what you want. One of the good houses with a rating of 4.2 is located at 1020 South Figueroa Street.
This house seems as what I want. That would be all.
I enjoy helping you. Good bye!
I would like to check out the weather in Toronto, Ontario on March 4th.
The average temperature for the day will be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 38 percent chance of rain.
Will it be humid?
The humidity will be around 33 percent.
How windy will it be?
It should be around 13 miles per hour on average.
Okay. I need to find a round trip flight starting on March 4th 2019 and returning on the 11th.
What city will you leave from?
Find flights in Atlanta, GA.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? This flight leaves at 3:25 pm and return leaves at 12:50 pm. This ticket is $229.
Is this flight a redeye?
No, it isn't an overnight.
Okay. Find me a house to stay there for one person. The rating should be 4.1 or higher.
There are 10 houses available. There is a nice one at 108 Chestnut Street and it has a 4.1 rating.
That house is great.
Do you want to make a reservation at this house?
No, not now. That's all for now.
It was great assisting you. Bye.
I need to see what the weather is in Portland, OR on the 12th of this month.
The average temperature is 72 degrees with a 16 percent chance of rain.
How windy?
It should be averaging 11 MPH.
How humid?
Around 30 percent.
I need a round trip flight there from Atlanta.
Are you leaving March 12th?
I am leaving March 4th and returning on the 12th of March 2019. I want economy seats.
There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2:30 pm and the return flight leaves at 7:20 am. The cost is $333.
Ok, I also need a house with laundry service.
I found 10 homes including 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street. Is has a 4.2 rating.
That is perfect.
Are you ready to make a reservation?
No, not yet. That is all.
Have a nice day.
Can I get the weather for March 2nd?
Of course. What city?
For SF
The average temperature will be 72 degrees Fahrenheit with just a 15 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Book me a round trip flight to go
Departing from where? You'll arrive March 2nd?
No, I'll go on the 1st of this month from Seattle
And returning when?
I need to come back on the 4th of March
How about an Alaska Airlines flight? Departing at 12 pm with the return at 2:55 pm. The trip costs $137
What time will I get in?
The arrival time is 2:11 pm
Ok. Find me a house while I'm there for the 2 of us. It has to have laundry available
1095 Market Street is a nice house with a 3.7 rating
Can I get their phone number?
You can reach them at +1 415-829-0000.
Anything else? I need at least a 3.8 rating
1100 Market Street Hotel Entrance is at, 45 McAllister Street is also nice, with a 3.8 rating
Can I get their number?
You can call them at +1 415-735-7777.
Ok great
Would you like to book a reservation there?
No, I'm good for now thanks.
Always happy to help. Take care.
What's the weather forecast?
What city do you want weather for?
Give me weather for Portland, OR on March 8th.
The forecast calls for an average temperature of 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 50 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. What's the forecast for March 4th?
The average temperature for the day is forecast to be 68 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 18 percent.
Good. Please help me find round-trip flights to that city.
Will you be leaving on March 4th? When do you want to return? What city will you be leaving from?
Yes, that's when I'll leave. I need a flight from New York City that returns on the 12th.
There is an American Airlines flight for $313. It takes off at 4:45 pm, and the return flight leaves at 5 am.
When does the return leg get in?
The returning flight will arrive at 6:01 pm.
Is anything else available? I will need two tickets.
Southwest Airlines also flies that route. That flight is $338 and takes off at 5:55 pm. The return flight departs at 4:55 pm.
Sounds good. I will also need a house to stay in there.
I have 10 houses for you to consider. I recommend a nice house at 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street that has a 4.2 rating.
Do they offer laundry service? What's the phone number there?
Yes, they do have laundry service. Their number is +1 503-281-6111.
What else is available for houses? I want a 4.4 rating or better.
I have 10 houses for your review. First up is a house rated 4.4, which is located at 1150 Northwest 9th Avenue.
That one sounds great.
Do you want to make reservation now?
No, not yet. That's all I needed.
I'm glad to assist. Bye!
I want to check the weather condition on 9th of this month for which I need your help.
In which area do you want to check for the weather condition?
Check it in Kuala Lumpur.
please note that the average temperature level will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 0 % for rain fall there on that day.
What about the Wind Speed on that day?
It will be around 8 miles per hour in average on that day.
And what will be the Humidity level in the mentioned area?
Humidity will be around 15 %. Any more information you need?
That is enough and thanks. Can you search for a round trip flight to go there and I prefer American Airlines.
When is your planned date of return to search for a round trip flight?
I have planned to return on March 13th.
Where are you leaving from and do you want me to book the flight which leaves on March 9th?
Search for the round trip flight from Seattle on 6th of March and I need one ticket.
Got 1 flight with American Airlines which takes off at 4:55 am and the return flight will take off at 5:05 am for which the ticket cost is $375. What about your comments on this.
What is the arrival time of the flight to its destination and please confirm whether it is a redeye flight?
This flight will arrive at 7:42 pm and it is an overnight flight. Hope this information was useful.
Yes. I need your help to find a House there to stay for a while.
What about a house located at 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan with rating 3.8?
Any other houses that you have in your searched list?
Yes how about a house located at 1, Jalan Pantai Baharu, Jaya Tower 3, 59200 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan with rating 4.2?
That is the one I want to find. Thanks for your help. That's all for now.
Have a good day.
i want to check weather in seattle on march 6th
The average temperature for the day is 64 degrees fahrenheit and there is 27 percent chance to rain
how about wind?
The average wind speed is 4 miles per hour
how much humid will it be?
its around 29 percent
okay. I would like to find round trip flight to get there
on which date you want to take return flight
Return on friday next week
Which city do you wanna depart from and are you leabing on march 6th
Yes. Thats great. Look for flights from portland
I have 2 flights for you. Would youlike to fly with American airlines which takes off at 6 am and takes off at 8:05 am costs $66
Is there anything else? I wanna fly with united airlines
WOuld you like to fly with united airlines which takes off at 7:15 am and return takes off at 4:15 am and costs $79
DOes the flight have one stops?
The flight has 0 stops
Oaky
Can i help you more?
I want to find a house to stay there.
There's one good house located at 1000 1st avenue rated 4.5
This one is great. Thats all I need.
Its my pleasure to assist you. Bye
What'll the weather be like in Vegas on March 11th?
The average will be 81 degrees with a 3 percent chance of rian.
Sounds good, can you get me a round trip flight there?
Will you be leaving March 11th and where will you be leaving from? When will you be returning?
I'll leave on the 10th of March from Vancouver and return on March 13th.
I found 2 flights that might work. There's a Delta Airlines flight for $221 that departs at 12:55 pm and returns at 12:20 pm.
What are the origin and destination airports?
It leaves from YVR International Airport and arrives in McCarran International Airport.
Any other flights?
There's a United Airlines flight for $234 that takes off at 6:05 pm and returns at 12:05 pm.
Can you also book me a stay at a house with laundry service? It'll just be for one.
There's one with a rating of 3.7 at 1215 South Las Vegas Boulevard.
What's the phone number?
They're at +1 702-489-7500.
That's great. Thanks, that's all I need at the moment.
My pleasure, bye.
Can you tell me the weather in NYC for Wednesday next week?
Sure, the average temprature is expected to be around 64 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain.
Cool, I also need a round trip flight to get there.
What is your city of departure? Would you be leaving on march 6th and when are you planning to take the return flight?
I would be traveling tomorrow from vancouver and would return on 12th of this month.
I have found 1 delta airlines flight for you that takes off at 2:50 am. Return flight takes off at 6 am and the total cost is $309
What time does the returning flight arrive? is it a business class ticket?
No, the seat is economy. The flight arrives at 11:11 am
Okay, also find me a place to stay for one person with a 3.6 rating or higher
I have found 10 houses with a minimum rating of 3.6. There's a nice one located at 100 greenwich street
Does it offer laundry services?
Yes, it does have laundry service
The place sounds great
Should I make the reservation for the place?
No, I would do that later. That's all for now.
Have a great time!
I want to know the weather in Phoenix, AZ.
The average temperature in Phoenix, AZ for the day is expected to be 89 degrees Fahrenheit. Also there is a 15 percent chance that it will rain.
Alright fine. I want you to find me a round trip flight to go there. I would like for the flight ticket to be an Economy class one.
Can you tell me the day when you will be having your return flight? Will you be departing on March 1st?
That suits me well. I will be returning on 4th of this month.
Can you tell me from which city you will leave?
I will be departing for my flight from SFO.
Would you like flying with Delta Airlines, with the flight which leaves at 5:50 am and when it returns it leaves at 11:55 am. The price for this flight ticket is $118.
Is there something else you can suggest?
How would you consider flying with Southwest Airlines, with the flight which leaves at 6:15 pm, and when it returns it leaves at 6 am. The price for this flight ticket is $125.
Are there some other flights which you can suggest? I am interested in buying three tickets, and I want to fly with the United Airlines.
There is 1 flight which matches what you want. How would you consider to fly with United Airlines, with the outbound flight leaving at 2:15 pm, and with the return flight leaving at 11:50 pm? The price for this ticket is $135.
Can you check if this is a redeye flight?
From what I can see this is an overnight flight.
Alright. I need to find a house where I can stay there.
There are 10 houses which match what you want. A good house which I can suggest that has a rating of 4.6 is located at 10 East Thomas Road.
Are there some other houses which you can recommend?
Another good house with a 3.8 rating can be found at 10210 North 26th Drive.
Can you find some other houses for me? More specifically I would like for the house to have a 4.5 rating or higher.
There are 9 houses which you might like. A good house with a rating of 4.5 can be found at 132 South Central Avenue.
Can you check if this house has laundry service?
I can confirm that the house has laundry service.
This house seems as what I want. That would be all.
I enjoy helping you. Good bye!
I want to know the weather for March 11th.
Can you tell me the city where I should check the weather?
I want to know the weather in NY.
The average temperature for the day in NY should be 65 degrees Fahrenheit, and the chance of rain is 34 percent.
Alright, that is fine.
Do you want me to help you with something else?
I also am in need of finding a round trip flight to go there. I will be returning on 11th of March 2019.
Can you tell me from which city you will leave?
I want to leave for my flight from Atlanta.
Can you tell me if you will be leaving on March 11th?
I would like for my flight to start on 6th of this month.
How would you consider flying with American Airlines, with the flight that departs at 6:25 am, and when it returns it leave at 11:20 am. The price for the ticket of this flight is $128.
Alright. Now I need to find a house to stay there.
A good house with a rating of 4.4 which I can suggest is located at 100 Greenwich Street.
Is there some other house you can suggest? The rating of the house I am looking for should be 4.7 or higher.
I have found 3 houses which match what you want. A good house with a rating of 4.7 is located at 153 West 57th Street.
Can you give me the phone number for this house? Also can you check if the have laundry service?
Unfortunately this place does not have laundry service. If you want to call them you can at +1 646-774-1234.
This house seems as good choice.
Do you want to have a reservation be made for this house?
No, I do not want to make a reservation at this this moment.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I appreciate your help.
I enjoy helping you. Good bye!
What is the weather in New Delhi on 9th of this month?
The temperature for March 9th will be 91 degrees Fahrenheit with 3 percent chance of raining.
How will the humidity be?
It will be around 18 percent.
How about the wind?
It is going to be around 2 miles per hour.
Sounds great. I need to find a round trip flight for four. Departing from SFO, if possible from American Airlines.
Do you wnt to leave on March 9th? When do you want to return?
I want to leave on the 5th of March and return on March 9th 2019.
There is an American Airlines flight that departs at 1:15 pm and returns at 9:20 am. It has a cost of $352.
To what airport does it land and when does it arrive?
It arrives at 4:07 pm and lands to Indira Gandhi International Airport.
Perfect, I will also need housing for one person.
There are 10 possible options. There is a house with a 4.5 rating at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi.
That sounds great, that would be all.
Have a great day.
can you check the weather on 4th of this month?
Can you tell me which city should I look into?
I want to the weather in Sunol.
The expected average temperature for the day is 93 degrees Fahrenheit with 14 percent chance of rain.
can you tell me the expected humidity and wind speed?
The expected humidity is 17 percent and the expected wind speed is 12 mph.
Okay. Can you check the weather on March 7th?
The expected average temperature for the day is 72 degrees Fahrenheit with 14 percent chance of rain.
Okay, Can you check the weather in Chi-town?
The expected average temperature for the day is 74 degrees Fahrenheit with 23 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you find me one ticket in any class in a round trip flight returning on 9th of March?
What will be your boarding point?
I will be leaving from LAX.
Is the date of departure March 7th?
The date of departure is the 2nd.
There are 3 flights suitable to you. One is an American Airlines flight taking of at 8:30 am and the returning flight takes off at 4:30 am. The ticket is priced at $164.
What is the destination of the flight?
The destination is O'Hare International Airport.
Can you search for any other flights?
How about Delta Airlines? The flight takes off at 7:15 pm and returns at 5:25 pm. Thee ticket is priced at $167.
Can you check how many stops does the flight have?
The flight has 0 stop around the journey.
Okay. Can you find me a house to stay there?
I found 10 houses suitable to you. One house is located at 1 South Franklin Street with 4.4 ratings.
This house sounds great to me.
can I help you with anything else?
No. That will be all. Thank you
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
What will the weather be like on March 6th?
Where would you like to check?
Please check Chi-town.
Okay, the average temperature will be around 69 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
Great, thanks. Can you get me a return flight there?
Certainly, where will you depart from?
I'm leaving from San Fran.
Okay, would you like to leave on March 6th? When will you return?
No, I'd like to leave a little earlier. I'll depart on the 5th of March and return on the 11th.
Okay great. I found 3 flights for you. How about American Airlines? You can depart at 4:25 pm, with the return flight departing at 7:05 am. The total cost in $227.
Is it economy or business class? When does the return flight arrive?
It's an economy seat. The return flight arrives in San Fran at 9:52 am.
Okay, that sounds good. Can you find me a house to stay at?
Sure, how about 1 South Franklin Street? It has a 4.4 rating.
Is there anything else? I just need it for 1 person.
There are 9 available houses. How about 1 West Wacker Drive? It's 4.5 rated.
That sounds perfect.
Should I reserve it for you?
No, that'll be all thanks.
Okay, have a nice day.
What is the weather like in Nairobi, Kenya?
The average daytime temperature should be around 105 degrees and there is a 0 percent chance of rain.
Okay thanks. I'd like to find a round trip flight to that destination.
Where will you be departing from? Will you be leaving on March 1st? Also, when would you like to take the return flight?
I'd like flights from San Fran leaving on March 9th.
There is 1 flight with American Airlines leaving at 7:05 am. The return flight leaves at 5:35 am and the total cost for a ticket is $503.
What time does the flight arrive at my destination and where will it be leaving from?
The flight will arrive at 5:57 pm and it leaves from SFO International Airport.
Ok great. While I'm there I'd like to find a house for two people to stay in with a rating of at least 4.6.
I have found a nice place on Chiromo Road with a rating of 4.6.
What is the telephone number?
Their phone number is +254 703 049000.
That house seems perfect for my needs.
Would you like to reserve this house now?
Not right now thanks. I don't need help with anything else.
Ok no problem. Goodbye.
What will the weather in LA be like on March 13th?
The average temperature will be 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind speed be?
5 miles per hour.
Okay. Can you help me with 3 round trip tickets to go there leaving the 5th and returning the 14th of March.
What is your departure city?
Departing from New York City.
There is a flight on American Airlines departing at 7:45 pm and returning at 6:20 pm for a total of $276.
What is the departing airport and is this a redeye flight?
It is an overnight flight taking off from JFK International Airport.
Okay. I also need lodging there.
1020 South Figueroa Street is a nice 4.2 rated house.
Sounds really great. That's all.
Okay. Please call again.
Could you find out what the weataher will be like in Atherton on March 2nd?
It will be 93 degrees fahrenheit on average that day with a 17 percent chance of rain.
Check the weather on March 4th for SF.
The temperature will be 71 degrees fahrenheit on average with a 16 percent change of rain.
Will it be humid or windy?
The humidity will be around 19 percent and there will be a wind speed of 8 miles an hour.
Okay. I need to find a round trip flight to get there.
What city will you leave from and which day will you return? Will you leave on March 4th?
I would like to leave later today from Atlanta, Ga. I will return on the 13th of March.
How about flying with American Airlines? The flight takes off at 11:40 am and return flight takes off at 3:50 pm. The ticket will be $233.
Do you need something else?
Would you like to fly on Delta Airlines? The flight leaves at 12:50 pm and return flight takes off 5:25 pm. The ticket will be $189.
Great. Find me a house with a 4.4 rating or higher to stay at for two people. I need laundry service.
There is a house at 138 King Street with a rating of 4.4.
Could I get a contact number for the house?
The phone number is +1 415-200-4977.
Could you find me another house?
There is one nice house at 440 Post Street with a 4.4 rating.
That house sounds good. That is all the info I needed.
I enjoyed helping you. Goodbye.
I'd like to check the weather on March 14th.
Where would you like to find out the weather?
I want to know the weather in San Diego.
The average temperature will be 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 2 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how is the weather on March 9th?
The average temperature will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 25 percent chance of rain.
That sounds fine. I'd like to get a round trip flight there.
Are you wanting to leave on March 9th? And when do you want to return?
I'd like to leave on the 6th of March and return on March 9th 2019.
Where would you like to leave from?
I'd like to leave from Los Angeles.
I have found 1 flight for you. It's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:20 am and returns at 7:30 pm. It costs $69.
Is it a redeye?
It is not.
Is it economy or business class?
It's an Economy seat.
Okay, I'd like to find a house to stay at there.
There are 10 houses that could work. One nice option is 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States. It has a rating of 4.6.
Does it have laundry service? And what's the phone number?
It does have laundry service and the phone number is +1 855-287-2682.
This sounds great.
Would you like a reservation for it?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else?
Nope, thanks for everything.
It was my pleasure. Bye for now!
Tell me the weather for March 6th.
I can do that for you. Which city do you want the forecast for?
Give me the details about the weather in Sydney, Australia.
There is only a 9 percent chance of rain with a temperature of 89 degrees Fahrenheit.
Will it be windy that day? That makes a difference for me. Also tell me about the humidity.
It will not be too windy with a wind speed of 8 miles per hour. The humidity will hover around 22 percent.
I want to leave San Fran to head to Sydney, Australia. Please find me an affordable round trip flight to that location.
Will the departure date by March 6th? If so, what is the date you wish to return?
I will be leaving San Fran on the 5th of March and returning on the 7th of March.
United Airlines has a flight that leaves at 1:25 pm and has a return departure time of 5:25 am. The flight will cost $238.
I'll need somewhere to stay while I'm there. I'm not looking for a hotel though. Find me a house for four people with a rating of 4.2 or higher.
There are 10 housing options for you while you are on your trip. There's a lovely house located at 1 Kensington Street, Chippendale New South Wales 2008, Australia The rating is 4.2
That house will work just fine. That's all the assistance I require for now. Thank you!
You are very welcome. Please let me know if you need more assistance. Have a good day.
Can you check the weather in New Delhi for the March 6th.
There temperature should be around 93 degrees with 0 percent chance of rain.
Can you find a Premium Economy flight with United Airlines for the 5th of March?
In which city are you departing from?
I will be leaving from Atlanta, Ga.
When would you like to return from this flight?
I will be returning on next Thursday.
I found 1 flight with United Airlines that leaves at 6:50 am and returns at 12:35 pm for $597.
I would like to find a house in that area for 2 people with a rating of 4.3 or more.
There is a house located at 12, Doctor APJ Abdul Kalam Road, New Delhi and the rating is 4.3.
That house sounds great.
Would you like to make a reservation for this house?
No, I just wanted the information.
Have a good day.
Could you tell me the weather forecast for March 2nd.
Which city will I check?
In Chi-town please.
There is a 33 percent chance of rain but the avg temp will be 61 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be windy?
Wind speed will be around 6 miles per hour.
Fine now I would like a round trip fight to go there.
Are you leaving on March 2nd and from where? Also what is your return flight date?
I will leave from LAX on 1st of this month returning on March 4th.
There is an American Airlines flight departing at 3:05 pm and returning at 4:30 am costing $250 altogether.
When will the returning flight arrive?
It arrives at 7:02 am.
fine now could you search for a house for me.
There are 10 possibilities, one has a 4.4 rating and is located at 1 South Franklin Street.
This house is fantastic, that is all thanks.
It was great to be able to help you, goodbye.
Can you tell me what the weather is suppose to me in SD on March 13th.
The average temperature should be 75 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
I'd like to get an economy round trip flight to SD. I plan to leave on the 5th of this month.
What city are you leaving from and when do you want to return?
I'm leaving from Los Angeles and returning March 13th 2019.
I found 1 flight. It's on American Airlines leaving at 7:20 am and the return flight leaves at 9:50 am. The cost is $62.
Good. I'd also like to find a house to stay in while there.
There's one located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States. It has a 4.6 rating.
Sounds good. That's all I need for now.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
Can you tell me how's the weather gonna be like on the March 2nd in Nairobi?
There will be a 6 percent chance of rain with an average of 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
Perfect. Can you find a round trip flight to there for me?
Sure. Please tell me where are you flying out of and also if you plan on travelling on March 2nd?
I'll be flying out of Philadelphia today.
OK. When do you plan on returning?
I'll be returning on March 7th.
There's an American Airlines flight costing $383 which takes of at 4:45 pm. The return flight leaves at 5:35 am.
Perfect. Can you please find me a house to stay at destination, for one person, with laundry service, rated 4.4 or higher.
There are 10 houses which match your criteria out of which I recommend 14 Riverside Westlands rated at 4.4.
This sounds awesome.
Do you want me to place a reservation for you?
No, not at the moment. This will be all for now!
My pleasure. Have a nice day!
I wanna see the weather in KL on March 5th
The average temperature needs to be 100 degrees fahrenheit and there will be a 5 percent chance of rain
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed is gonna be 6 miles per hour
How humid will it be?
Humidity is 18 percent
Okay, I want a round trip flight there
are you heading out March 5th?
I wanna travel on the 1st of this month
what city are you leaving from and what day do you wanna take the return flight?
get me economy class tickets and flights coming back from SF and coming back the 13th
wanna fly with american airlines. There is 1 flight leaving at 5:20 am and it comes back at 5:05 am and it is $429
How many stops are there?
there is 1 stop and it arrives at 5:08 pm
I want a house there
10 houses and one is at 1, Jalan 2/142a, Taman Len Seng, 56000 Kuala Lumpur, Wilayah Persekutuan and it has a rating of 3.8
The house is good
It was nice speaking to you
Can you tell me the weather for Delhi on March 2nd?
The temperature will reach 95 degrees with 0 percent chance for rain.
Can you find me a round trip flight to delhi that will retun back on the 13th?
Where are you leaving form and did you want to leave on MArch 2nd?
I am flying from San Fran on the 1st of this month.
Okay, I have located 2 flights. American Airlines have a flight for $342, that departs at 1:15 pm and the return flight departs at 1:45 pm.
What flights do you have leaving from Seattle?
United Airlines has a flight that departs at 12:30 pm, the return flight departs at 1:10 am and the cost is $394.
Which airport will i fly out of and where will i get land?
You will dpart from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and land at Indira Gandhi International Airport.
I also need a house nearby.
How about 12, Doctor APJ ABdul Kalam Road, New Delhi with a 4.5 approval rating.
I will need a house for two people wth laundry services included.
I have 9 houses you may like. How abouw 12, Mangalam Place, Sector 3, Rohini, New Delhi with a 4.3 rating?
What is the phone number?
The contact number is +91 11 4340 0000.
What else do you have?
I have a house available with a 4.3 rating located at 13A, District Centre, Mayur Vihar, New Delhi.
That house may do.
Did you want to reserve it?
No not today.
Do you need anything else?
No that is it.
Okay, enjoy your day.
What's the weather in Toronto, Ontario like?
58 degrees with 13 % chance of rain
Thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I need a flight from Atlanta Ga to Delta Airlines
Will this be for March 1st and which day are you planning a return flight?
Yes, and March 5th
There's 1 flight you might like with Delta Airlines. It's at 7:50 am and returns 7:15 am for $209.
Great, now I need to book a hotel.
There's 10 available houses. How about a 4.2 rated house located at 108 Chestnut Street.
Perfect
Shall I make a reservation for this house?
Nope, that's all for now.
You're very welcome. Have a great day.
Can you please check the weather in Toronto, Ontario for the March 4th?
There is a average temperature of 70 degrees and there is a 38 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I need to get a flight to Toronto on United Airlines.
From what city are you departing from?
I am leaving from Atlanta, GA and I would like the seats to be in economy please.
What day would you like to return?
I would like to leave on the 4th of March 2019 and return on the 8th of this month.
I found a flight on United Airlines that departs on 6:15 am and the return flight departs at 5:35 pm. The cost is $237 per ticket.
Is this for two passengers?
No, this is for 1 passenger.
Okay. Can you find a house to stay at?
There is a nice house located at 108 Chestnut Street that has a rating of 4.2.
That house sounds great. That is all I need for now, thank you.
You are welcome. Goodbye.
I need to know what the weather is like.
For which city?
For Nairobi, Kenya.
The temperature is 105 degrees Fahrenheit with 0 percent chance of rain.
I want a premium economy class tickets for a round trip flight.
Would you like to leave on March 1st from which city?
That day would be great. I want to leave from Philly.
When would you like to come back?
On March 5th.
There is 1 flight. There is an American Airlines flight that costs $555. The flight leaves at 4:45 pm and returns at 5:35 am.
I need to find a house with laundry service.
There are 10 suitable houses. There is a nice house in 14 Riverside Westlands with a rating of 4.5.
That would be nice. Thanks a lot.
Thanks a lot. Take care.
I will be travelling to San Diego. What is the weather like there?
The average temperature for San Diego is around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
That weather sounds nice. Can you help me find a round trip flight there?
Which airport would you like to depart from? Would you like to schedule the departure date for March 1st? When would you like to return?
Please find flights departing from Seattle, WA and returning on the 12th of this month.
There are 3 flights I have found. There is one with American Airlines for $204 that departs at 8:15 am. The return flight takes off at 4:10 am.
Ok. I would like to stay at a house there with a rating of 4.5 or higher.
I found a house rated 4.5 located at 1003 Coast Boulevard, La Jolla, California 92037, United States.
Are there any other houses? There are three people and I would like it to have a rating of 4.2 or higher.
I have found 9 houses in my search. Rated a 4.2, there is a nice house located at 10044 Pacific Mesa Boulevard.
That house is great. Thank you.
No problem. Goodbye.
I have to check the weather in London, England on March 10th
Chance of rain is 6 percent there with average day temperature at 92 degrees Fahrenheit
What is the wind condition there?
The average wind speed is around 5 miles per hour
Fine. I need to find a round trip flight to go there and i need 3 tickets. Can you please flights fro Philly?
Are you moving on March 10th?
I need to travel on 8th of this month
What is your returning flight day?
I will be returning on 14th of March
I have short listed 3 flights of your likings. How about flying in American Airlines? It takes off at 10:10 am and flight returning time is at 2:05 pm with ticket costing $336
Which airport is the flight starting from and which place it lands?
The flight starts from PHL International Airport and is moving to Heathrow International Airport
I wanted Economy class tickets, anything else?
I have short listed 2 flights of your likings. One among them Delta Airlines which takes off at 2:20 pm and returns at 8 am with ticket costing $371
I need a staying house there and also i need laundry service
I have short listed 10 houses of your likings. One among them is located at 1 Addington Street with rating 4.3
Can i have their phone number?
Their contact number is +44 333 400 6116
That is perfect
It was my pleasure.Bye
What would the weather be like on March 6th?
In which city?
In London, Uk.
The temperature would be 85 degrees fahrenheit with a 27 percent chance of rain.
That would be fine. I need a round trip flight to get there.
From where would you like to leave?
I will be leaving from Atlanta.
Would you be leaving on March 6th? When would you like to return?
I will be leaving on the 4th and returning on the 9th of this month.
There are 3 suitable flights. There is an American airlines flight that leaves at 3:30 pm and returns at 8:35 pm. The price is $349. Would you be interested in that?
Where does it land?
at Heathrow International airport.
Sure. I would need a house to stay in when I get there.
There is a lovely house on 1 addington street and it has a rating of 4.3
Is there a number I can reach them at? Do they have laundry service?
Yes, there is laundry service. The number is +44 333 400 6116
Is there anything else? I need a house with a 3.0 rating for two people.
There are 9 available. There is 1 baffin way. It is lovely and has a rating of 3.0
That place sounds ideal.
Would you like to reserve the house?
Not right now. That would be all.
It has been a pleasure. Take care.
Can you please check the weather in Vancouver, BC for March 12th?
The temperature is expected to reach 59 degrees and there is only a 10 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you help me find a flight there? Please look for flights from Vegas on Delta Airlines.
Are you leaving on March 12th and what day do you want to return?
I am leaving on the 7th and returning on March 13th.
I have found a flight on Delta Airlines that departs at 12:20 pm and returns at 3:20 am. Each ticket costs $226.
Okay. Can you help me find a house to stay in?
I located one on 1018 Granville Street that has a rating of 4.2.
Can I get a phone number for the house? Does it have laundry service?
It does not have laundry service and the phone number is +1 877-972-6378.
The house is perfect.
Would you like to make a reservation?
No thank you. That is all I need for now.
Okay, have a good day.
What's the weather going to be like on the March 2nd
For which city?
Check it for Toronto, Canada
That day should have an average temperature of about 60 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain
Will it be humid or windy?
The humidity is expected to be 28 percent with an average wind speed of 5 miles per hour
That's good
Anything else I can do?
Yes, get me a round trip flight there. I need one ticket leaving on the 2nd of March 2019. Premium economy class please.
Departing from where? When would you like to return?
I'll leave from San Fran. I need to come back on the 6th
I have 1 flight option. It's on American Airlines departing at 7:05 am, with the return taking off at 5:55 am. It costs $475 for the trip
What airports does it use?
Departure is from SFO International Airport and the arrival is at Toronto Pearson International Airport
Ok. Find me a house there too
I found 10 houses for you. 108 Chestnut Street looks nice, with a 4.2 rating
Anything else. I need at least a 3.6 rating or I'm not interested
111 Lombard Street has a 3.6 rating
Is laundry available there?
Yes, they have laundry service
What other choices are there?
118 Yorkville Avenue also looks nice. There's a 3.6 rating there too
Thanks. That looks good. I'm fine for now
Happy to help. Take care.
What's the weather forecast for Portland, OR on 8th of this month?
The average temperature is forecast to be 70 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 50 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy at all?
The average wind speed is forecast at 7 miles per hour.
Okay, good. Please find me a round trip flight to go there.
What city will you be leaving from?
I need a flight from Ciudad de Mexico on this Saturday.
When do you plan to return?
I'll return on March 8th 2019.
I have an American Airlines flight for $294 that takes off at 7:25 pm. The return flight takes off at 7:20 am.
Good. Also, I need a house to stay in while I'm there. What do you have with at least a 4.2 rating?
I have 10 houses for you to consider. First up is 1000 Northeast Multnomah Street. It has a 4.2 rating.
That sounds wonderful.
Do you want to make a reservation now?
No, not now. Thanks, that's all.
I'm happy to have helped. Bye.
I'd like to check the weather on March 6th.
Which city would you like a weather report for?
Please could you tell me the weather for Toronto, Ontario.
The average daytime temperature should be around 62 degrees and there is a 45 percent chance of rain.
Okay thanks. I'd like to travel there and need to find a round trip flight. I'll be travelling from SF on March 6th 2019.
What day will you be returning on?
I'm planning to return on March 10th.
I have found an American Airlines flight that leaves at 7:05 am. The return flight leaves at 10:05 am and a ticket is priced at $286.
Can you help me find something else returning on the 12th of March.
How about a United Airlines flight leaving at 5:35 am and returning at 5:35 pm. Tickets for this flight cost $298 in total?
Ok great. I'd like to find a house to stay in while I'm there.
I have found a house with a rating of 4.2 at 108 Chestnut Street.
Can you look for a different house?
How about a house with a rating of 3.0 at 111 Carlton Street?
This house is perfect. I don't need anything else.
That's no problem. Goodbye.
How will be the weather in SD on March 7th?
90 degree Fahrenheit average temperature with 17 percent chance of rain.
Are there any natural spot there especially children are fond of?
Birch Aquarium at Scripps Institution of Oceanography is one among 3 there, which is a Nature Preserve.
Can I contact them via phone?
Yes, you can make ring at 858-534-3474
Can you arrange a Pool ride cab for me?
How many persons?
Just for one person.
Ok, you demanded 1 seat in Pool ride to Birch Aquarium at Scripps Institution of Oceanography, correct?
please change it to Regular ride for three persons.
Please verify, 3 seats in Regular ride.
Great, how much should I pay?
It will cost $40.05 and the cab is arriving in short time.
Great, thanks for the help.
Great day, sir.
What's the weather going to be in San Pablo on the 6th of March?
The temperature should be about 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. What's the weather going to be in Seattle, WA on March 12th?
The temperature should be about 66 degrees with a 34 percent chance of rain in Seattle.
Great! What are some things to do in Seattle? I like child-friendly things, like a museum.
Burke Museum of Natural History and Culture is in Seattle.
Okay, great. How much is it? What's the phone number there?
The entrance fee is free. Their phone number is 206-543-7907.
Okay great. What are any other things to do that are free? Maybe a park?
There's a park called Gas Works Park.
Awesome, could I get a cab to go there?
Would you prefer a regular or luxury ride to Gas Works Park? How many seats would you need?
I'd like a pool ride, just for one seat.
Okay, you want 1 seat for a pool ride to Gas Works Park. Is this okay?
Yup, that's good! How much will the ride be?
Okay, I booked your ride and its on the way. It'll cost about $7.29.
How long will it take to get here?
The cab should be there in about 6 minutes.
Thanks a bunch. That's all.
You're welcome. Have a great day!
I want to check the weather
In which city's weather do you want to search?
In district of columbia
The average temperature for the day is 75 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 13 percent chance to rain.
whats the expected humid?
The humid is around 36 percent
Okay. Can you find me attraction there? Im looking for Nature Preserve
There is 56 Signers of the declaration of Independence Memorial which is a Nature Preserve.
Okay perfect. Can you find a cab to there?
DO you have any preference type of ride? How many seat you need?
I prefer Luxury ride for 1
Please confirm this : You want to ride to 56 Signers of the Declaration of Independence Memorial for 1 seats in Luxury ride
Yes thats right. How long before the cab reached here?
Your cab is booked and its on its way. The cab is expected in 10 min
How about total cost?
The costs is $26.56
Thanks a lot for the help
can i assist you on anything else?
No Thanks a lot for it
Have a good day
I'd like to check the weather
Which city would you like to check the weather for?
Check it in phoenix please
The average temperature should be 89 F with a 15 % chance of rain
How humid is it expected to be
The humidity is expected to be 23 %
Perfect, thanks. Could you also show me some child friendly attractions there?
Arizona science center is a museum that you should check out
What's the telephone?
The phone is 602-716-2000
Is the entrance free?
No, it's not free entrance
Good. Could you book me a regular cab ride for one to get there, please?
Please confirm the following details: 1 seat in regular for Arizona science center
Yes, that's it. How long before the cab reaches here?
The ride has been booked, and it's on its way. It should arrive in 4 minutes
Thank you so much
Is there anything else I can do for you ?
no thanks, that was all
Have a good day
I wonder if its a good day to go outside. What is the weather like?
In what city do you want to check the weather?
I am in Sacramento, CA of course.
82 degress Fahrenheit is the average temperature today and there is a 26 percentage possibility of raining.
Fine. What attractions are in the area?
There is the California Automobile Museum. You might like this Museum.
Is the attraction kid-friendly and does it have free entrance?
This might not be great for the kids and entry is not free either.
Alright. What other attractions can you find me? I want a natural spot, you know?
You have 2 attractions that might be to your taste. What do you think of Sacramento Zoo which is a Nature Preserve?
That is excellent. Book me a cab to the place.
What number of seats shall I book and what kind of ride do you want?
Make it a luxury ride for two people.
Verify these details. You want a cab ride with 2 seats in a Luxury vehicle to the Sacramento Zoo.
Yeah that is true.
Your cab is booked and it is getting here.
Thank you very much.
Do you want any other help?
Nope. That is it really. Thanks.
Have a nice day!
What is the weather?
Which city should I check for you?
What's the weather in Phoenix?
The average temperature for today is 89 degrees. The chance of rain is 15 percent.
Okay. Can you show me some attractions in the area?
The Arizona Capitol Museum is a popular Museum.
Sounds great! Can you find me a cab to get there?
Would you prefer a pool or regular ride? And how many seats do you need?
I would like two seats in a Luxury ride.
To confirm, you would like 2 seats in a Luxury ride heading to the Arizona Capitol Museum, correct?
Yes, that is correct. How long before the cab gets here?
I booked your cab and they are in the way. It should arrive in 11 minutes.
Thank you for all your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all. Thanks!
No problem! Have a great day.
How's the weather in San Francisco on March 13th?
There's a 9 percent chance of rain and it'll be about 94 degrees.
How about Vegas on March 14th?
There's a 15 percent chance of rain and it'll be 71 degrees.
Can you show me attractions there?
How about the Discovery Children's Museum?
Anything else?
How about Floyd Lamb Park?
How about a museum?
Check out Las Vegas Natural History Museum.
Is it child-friendly and free?
It's not free but it is child friendly.
Can you get me a regular cab for two?
To confirm, you'd like a regular ride for 2 to Las Vegas Natural History Museum?
Yes please.
Your cab is on the way.
Thanks. That'll be all.
Have a good day.
Please tell me the weather forecast for March 5th, in Vancouver.
The expected average temperature for the day is 62 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 56 percent chance of rain.
Cool, thanks. Please find me some outdoor attractions over there.
Your search yielded 10 attractions that might interest you. May I suggest Bloedel Conservatory Park?
That sounds nice. What about the 9 other attractions you mentioned? Is there a garden that doesn't charge an entry fee?
You must absolutely check out the Park called Dr. Sun Yat-Sen Classical Chinese Garden.
All right, that's nice. Please find me a Regular cab to get there.
Please let me know the number of seats you'll be needing.
I'll be by myself, so please find just 1 seat.
Sure, no problem. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like 1 Regular cab ride to Dr. Sun Yat-Sen Classical Chinese Garden.
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully booked your ride and the cab is on its way.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. That will be all.
Thank you, and have a lovely day!
Can you check the weather in London on 12th of March?
The expected average temperature through the day is 87 degree Fahrenheit with 21 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy is it expected to be?
The expected humidity is 32 percent and average wind speed will be 2 miles per hour.
Okay. Can you show me some tourist spots there?
I found 10 attractions as per your choice. There is a Historical landmark called 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin).
Can you check the contact number and the entry fee for this attraction?
The contact number is 20 7071 5029 and there is no entry fee.
Okay. Can you find any other attractions?
There is a Performing Arts venue called Alexandra Palace.
Okay. Can you find any other attractions?
There is a Sports venue called Alexandra Palace Ice Rink.
OKay. Can you book a Luxury ride in a cab for me to there?
For how many people should I book the cab?
Please book the cab for 1 people only.
Please confirm: You want me to book a Luxury ride for 1 people in a cab to Alexandra Palace Ice Rink.
Yes, That is correct. Can you find me the cost and the expected time of arrival?
Your ride has been booked for the price of $23.92 and it will arrive in 14 minutes.
That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
Please help me to check the weather condition in KL.
Yes, please note that the average temperature should be 102 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 8 %
That is okay, please check for some interesting places there to visit.
Found 10 attractive places there and the park at 99 Wonderland Park is the best one.
Let me know the contact number of that place. Also please check whether the entrance is free there or not?
Entrance is free and the contact number is 12-559 9034. Is this information useful?
Yes, but I need to search for something else.
Found 9 attractive places. What about Aquaria KLCC, Kuala Lumpur. This is a place of Nature Preserve and very interesting one.
That is good to me also. Please search for a cab to go there and I am the only 1 person to travel.
What type of ride will be okay for you?
Pool ride will be okay for me.
Please confirm to book a Pool ride Cab for 1 person to Aquaria KLCC, Kuala Lumpur.
Yes, check with the cost.
$12.09 is the cost for that ride. I have booked the Cab and it will reach you soon.
When will I expect the Cab at my place?
It will reach you in 6 minutes.
Thanks for that help.
Anything else?
No, that's all I want.
Have a great day.
I want to check the weather in Lagunitas.
It's 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 18 percent chance of rain.
What about on March 3rd?
It'll be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain.
And how about on March 12th in Anaheim?
It'll be 71 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Awesome. Could you show me some attractions there?
There's a Sports Venue called Angel Stadium of Anaheim you could check out.
Awesome. Get me a cab for 4 please.
What kind would you like? Luxury, Regular or another choice?
I would prefer a Regular ride.
Please confirm the following: You want a ride to Angel Stadium of Anaheim for 4 people in a Regular ride.
Yup, that's great.
I have booked the cab and it's on its way.
Thanks so much!
Is there anything else?
Nope, thanks again.
Have a great day.
What's the weather in Saratoga?
It's 78 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
How about Sydney Australia for March 10th?
Average temp should be 92 degrees with a 5 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy?
Only 1 mile per hour.
What's the humidity going to be like?
Expect the humidity to be about 20 percent.
What about on March 12th?
Average temps for that day is about 101 degrees with a 2 percent chance of rain.
What are some attractions over there?
There's a great Sports Venue, ANZ Stadium.
Is it kid-friendly?
I'd say it's a pretty good place to take the kids to.
Sounds good, thanks.
Anything else you need help with?
I'll need a cab there.
How many seats and what type of ride?
A Pool ride for one.
Just to make sure, you want a Pool ride for 1 to ANZ Stadium.
That's perfect, thanks.
You're all set!
Thanks a lot.
Can I help with anything else?
Not right now, thanks though.
Have a good one!
Hey, what's the weather gonna be in Sacramento on the 1st of March. I need to know if I should buy a coat.
The weather is expected to be 82 degrees Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. Can you show me some attractions around there?
The California Automobile Museum is definitely something you should check out.
Cool. Any other attractions?
The California Museum is also real good.
Cool, any other attractions? I want something child-friendly without an entry fee.
I found 3 of those. The California State Capitol Museum is one of the good ones that meet your requirements.
What's their number?
916-445-2841.
Okay, good to know.
Can I assist you in anything else?
Can you get me a cab to get there?
Do you prefer any type of ride?
A Luxury ride is what I enjoy.
How many people will be going?
Just one please.
So 1 seat on a Luxury ride to California State Capitol Museum?
Yes, that's it. How much will it cost? Is it a long drive?
Your cab is booked and on the way. It's a 13 minutes ride that will cost you $19.81.
Thanks for the help.
Can I assist you further?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have an amazing day.
What's the weather forecast for Anaheim on March 5th?
The average temperature for the day will be 75 degrees, with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Okay. What's there to do in Anaheim? I'd like something child-friendly. I am interested in a stadium.
I have 1 attraction you may like. The Honda Center is a sports venue in Anaheim.
Okay, good. Can you get me a cab there?
How many seats do you need? Do you have a ride preference? You can give me a keyword such as luxury or regular.
I prefer a regular ride. All I need is a ride for 1 person.
Please confirm: you need a ride for 1 person to Honda Center. You prefer a regular ride.
Yes, that's good.
I have booked your ride. The cab is on its way.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
What will theweather be like in Seattle on March 5th?
The temp should be 61 degrees Fahrenheit and there is an 18 percent chance of rain.
Okay, can you find me some attractions?
I found 10. The first is Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's grave site, which is a tourist attraction.
Is this place child friendly?
Yes, it is. The number is 206-322-1582.
Cool, I need to find a shopping district too.
I found 2. Columbia Center is a nice shopping area.
Great, can you get me a cab for 1?
Do you prefer a certain type?
Luxury if you can find it please.
Columbia Center for 1, Luxury. Is that correct.
No make it a pool.
A pool ride to Columbia Center, correct?
Yes that is perfect, how much?
$7.04, your ride has been booked.
When does it arrive?
It arrives in 6 minutes.
Thank you that is all for now.
Have a great day.
I want to know if I should buy a coat. How's the weather gonna be in San Rafael on Wednesday next week?
The average temperature should be 76 degrees Fahrenheit with a 14 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. How about in Vancouver, BC on March 5th?
The average temperature should be 62 degrees Fahrenheit with a 56 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy? How humid is it expected to be?
The humidity should be around 43 percent with a 12 miles per hour average wind.
Okay, good. Can you show me some attractions there? I'm looking for a Park without an entry fee.
There's the Bloedel Conservatory. It's a very good park.
What's their phone number? Is it kid friendly?
It's not really child-friendly. Their number is 604-257-8584.
Any other place available? I want something child-friendly.
There's the Dr. Sun Yat-Sen Classical Chinese Garden. It's a good park.
Can you get me a cab there? I want a regular ride for two.
Please confirm: you want 2 seats on a regular ride cab drive to Dr. Sun Yat-Sen Classical Chinese Garden. Is that correct?
Yes, that's it.
I booked your ride and your cab is on the way.
Thanks a lot. That's all I need.
Have an amazing day.
Please tell me what the weather will be on this Saturday in San Fran.
There is a 15 percent chance of rain on that and the average temperature should be 72.
Will it be very humid?
The humidity is forecasted to be about 30 percent.
Ok. Can you search for childp-friendly attractions in the area?
I found 10 attractions you may like. A good Historical Landmark to visit is Alcatraz Island.
Yes, that sounds good. I will need to cab to get there.
How many people will be traveling in the cab?
There are three of us.
Would you prefer a Luxury ride, Regular ride, or something else?
I actually would like a Pool ride.
Ok, you would like a Pool ride for 3 people to Alcatraz Island. Is that right?
Yes, that is correct. How much is the cab fare and when will the cab arrive?
Your cab in on the way and should be there in 3 minutes. The cost will be $29.83
Perfect! Thanks so much!
Have a nice day.
Tell me the weather on March 8th for Vegas.
It average 76 degrees with a 17 percent chance of rain.
What about humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be around 36 percent with a 7 mile per hour wind.
Can you find stuff for me to do there?
Search revealed 9 events there. There is the DISCOVERY Children's Museum under the Museum category.
What else do you have?
I found Floyd Lamb Park under the Park category.
What else do you have?
There is the Fremont Street Experience which is a Shopping Area.
Can you give me their contact number?
702-678-5600 is how you get in contact with them.
I also need a cab for 4 people.
What type of cab do you want?
I want a Regular ride for three people.
You want a Regular cab ride for 3 people to the Fremont Street Experience. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your cab is now coming for you.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
i need to know about the weather condition on March 3rd , will you find the weather on that day?
In which city i need to check the weather for?
In the city San Diego.
the average temperature for the day be 82 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
ok .thanks. Please tell me about some interesting places to visit over there. I like museum .
there are 10 attractions according to your interest. One is Fleet Science Center which is a museum.
okay great. will you get me a cab there?
How many seats do you prefer?
I need 2 seater.
Which type of ride would you prefer, whether pool or luxury or any other thing.
I prefer a Regular ride
Ok please check and confirm the following details: A car ride to Fleet Science Center and need 2 seats .it is a regular ride.
ok that's good.
Ride is confirmed and the cab is on its way.
Thanks a lot for your immense help
whether i need to help you with any other thing?
No. thanks a lot for your immense help
take care have a wonderful day.
I wanna see what the weather is gonna be like.
Which city would you like to check?
Kuala Lumpur please.
There is an 8 percent chance of rain but the average temp for the day will be a toasty 102 degrees.
Okay, are there some attractions there, something child-friendly?
I found 10 attractions that might interest you, there is a park calls 99 wonderland park.
Cool, any others you can think of? I'm also looking for a mall.
There is 1 attraction in a Shopping Area called ICC Pudu.
Great, can you get me a ride there?
How many seats are you wanting?
I will need 2 seats please.
Any preference for the ride type?
Actually, I would prefer a pool ride, I am in a group of 1.
You would like a 1 seat pool ride to ICC pudu, correct?
Yup! When will the cab be here and how much will this cost?
Alright, I booked the ride for you. The cab will be arriving in 6 minutes and will cost $13.77.
Thanks a bunch!
Anything else I can help you with today?
Nope, Thanks!
Have a great day!
I want to check the weather!
In which city?
In Ciudad de Mexico.
The average temperature is about 102 degrees with a 0 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed will around 12 miles per hour.
Thanks, what attractions are in Ciudad de Mexico?
You may like Acuario Inbursa; it's a Nature Preserve.
What other attractions are available?
There is a nice Museum called the Arte Carrillo Gil Museum.
Good, can you find me a cab.
What type of cab would you like? Regular, Luxury, or something else?
I want a Pool ride.
For how many people?
Just 1.
Please confirm the following details: 1 seat for a Pool ride to the Arte Carrillo Gil Museum.
No, make it a Luxury ride and I have a group of three.
Please confirm the following details: you want 3 seats for a Luxury ride.
Yes, that works.
Your luxury ride is booked.
Thanks a bunch!
May I help you further?
No, I am good.
Have a great day!
I'm going on a little day trip. Can you check the weather for me in Nairobi on March 13th?
Sure. Looks like the average temperature is 89 degrees Fahrenheit that day, and there's a 1 percent chance of rain.
How about the humidity?
It will be around 15 percent.
Ok, that's pretty good. Can you see what there is to do there?
Sure, I found 3 possible attractions you might like. The Giraffe Centre is a Nature Preserve - how about that?
That sounds great. Can you book me a cab there for 1 person?
Sure, what's your preferred ride type?
A Pool ride is fine.
Ok. To confirm, you're booking 1 seat in a Pool ride to the Giraffe Centre. Is that right?
Yeah, that's fine. What's the cost and when will it be here?
It will be $10.03 and it's arriving in about 9 minutes.
Great, thanks for your help.
Anything else I can do?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
I want to check the weather condition, need your help.
In which City, do I need to check it? Any preferred area?
Check it in Philadelphia.
Checked and found that average temperature will be 81 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a chance of 8 % for rain.
What abut the Wind speed? Is that high or normal?
Average Wind speed will be 4 miles per hour. Any other information you need?
Thanks. Yes, I also need to search some nice places for my visit. Can you check something interesting?
I found 10 attractive places for you. I suggest one place which is a Tourist Attraction and the name of the place is Art Museum Steps. Hope this will be very good place for you.
That sounds good to me. Can I get a Cab to go there?
Yes, How many persons are in your group?
Book it for 2 persons.
Tell me which type of ride you need whether it is Pool or Regular or any other?
I like to go with Regular one.
Please confirm to book a Cab with regular ride for 2 persons to Art Museum Steps.
Confirmed, please proceed. Also let me know the time will be taken by the Cab to reach my place.
I have booked the Cab and it will reach you in 2 minutes.
Thank you for the work.
Any other help you need from me?
No, that's all I want.
Have a great day.
I want to check the weather in Atlanta.
The temperature is 86 degrees F with a 28 % chance of rain.
Can you tell me about child-friendly attractions there?
I see 10 attractions of interest including Atlanta Botanical Garden which is a park.
That would be great to get a cab there. I like a luxury ride for 4.
I would like to rid to Atlanta Botanical Garden with a 4 seat luxury ride.
No, I want a group of 1.
Please let me know if you need a 1 seat luxury ride.
Yes, that would be great. How much time before the cab comes?
I booked a cab ride for 12 minutes from now.
Thanks so much for your help. That will be all.
Have a great day.
Check the weather for Sydney for the March 2nd please.
One moment. The average temperature for that day should be 101 degrees Fahrenheit. Be advised there is a 2 percent chance of rain.
Wow, ok. Bring up local attractions there please.
Sure thing. I have found 10 attractions that may be of interest to you. Let's start with ANZ Stadium, this is a Sports Venue.
Oh, that sounds good. Go ahead and get a luxury ride set up for 3 people please.
Sure thing, please confirm you want a Luxury ride to ANZ Stadium for 3 people. Is this correct?
No, make it a Pool ride, for two people.
Ok, please confirm adjustment, 2 people requesting a Pool ride. Is that right?
Yep, that's right. How much will that cost me? How long of a wait for the ride?
Great, your ride is booked and in route. The ride will be $11.14 and should arrive within 4 minutes.
Perfect, thanks for that.
your welcome, anytime. Can I help with anything else?
Nope, that's it.
Ok, Have a great time.
I'm going on a trip soon. What's the weather like in London, England on the the 11th?
London temperatures on that day should average 71 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 15 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. Can you look up some relevant attractions in the area?
The historical landmark 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin) is a good one.
Nice. What other attractions can you tell me about?
There's a performing arts venue called Alexandra Palace.
Good to know. Can you fetch a cab for me? I'm the only one in the group.
What type of ride do you want? Regular, luxury, or something else?
Luxury would be good.
Got it. You want a 1 seat luxury ride to Alexandra Palace?
Okay. How much longer until the cab is here, and what's the price?
I have booked your ride. The cab should be here in about 12 minutes, and will cost $17.63.
Thanks for helping me out.
Can I help you out with anything else right now?
Not now. Thanks for the help.
Have a wonderful time in London!
What will the weather be like at Half Moon bay on March 11th?
88 degrees Fahrenheit we be the average for the day along with a 6 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be on that day?
There is an average wind speed of 10 miles an hour with 20 percent humidity.
Great, and about
I'm sorry, was there something else you'd like me to help you with?
I'd like to check the weather in ATL for March 8th.
79 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Excellent. Can you help me find some local attractions? I'm looking for a Park.
You should stop by the Atlanta Botanical Garden, a park in the area.
Great. Are there any other attractions you can recommend?
You can also stop by Chastain Memorial Park, another Park in the area.
Awesome. Can you schedule a cab for me there?
How many passengers will be riding?
There will be two of us.
Would you prefer a Regular or Luxury ride?
A Regular ride will be fine, please.
To confirm: You'd like a Regular ride for 2 passengers to Chastain Memorial Park, correct?
Yes, that's be great. What's the total cost?
Your cab is on its way. The ride came to $28.24.
Thank you so much. That'll be all.
Enjoy your day.
Hey, I wanna know the weather in Castro Valley
It's gonna be 91 degrees and an 18% chance of rain
It is gonna be windy and humid?
It's 16% humidity and about 9 mph wind speed
Okay, how about in Ciudad de Mexico on March 12th?
89 degrees over there with a 6% chance of rain
Cool, show me attractions in that area.
How about a cool Nature Preserve like Acuario Inbursa?
What else do you think I'd like?
What about the Arte Carrillo Gil Museum?
What's their number? And is it free entrance?
No, you have to pay to get in. You can reach them at 55 8647 5450
OK cool. Get me a cab there, pool is fine
For how many people?
Just 1 please
Confirming a pool ride for 1 to Arte Carrillo Gil Museum?
Yes please. How much is it and how long till the cab reaches me?
It's booked and should be three in 5 minutes and will cost you $11.45
Thanks for your help
Sure, what else can I do?
No, thanks a lot for your help though
No problem, have a good one!
Can you check the weather in Seattle, WA for March 8th?
The weather on March 8th will be 65 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 21% chance of rain.
What about the humidity, and the wind conditions?
Humidity will be around 16%, and the wind speed is expected to be on average 7 mph.
Great, thanks for that, can you tell me any notable attractions in that city, preferably something child-friendly like a park.
One good park I can recommend is Gas Works Park.
Sounds cool, any other attractions, something like a tourist attraction?
One tourist attraction you can check out is Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site.
Great, thanks for the help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
For a group 1, can you reserve me a cab?
Do you have a preference in what kind of ride you will like?
A luxury ride would be ideal.
You wish to ride a luxury ride for 1 to Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site, correct?
That's right, however how much does the cab cost and what is the expected waiting time?
The cab has been booked and is on-route, it will cost $18.76 and will arrive in 8 minutes.
That will be all, thanks so much for all the help.
No problem, have a wonderful day.
What's the weather going to be on the 5th of March?
Where would you like me to look?
For Anaheim, CA.
It should be about 75 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Okay, what are some things to do there?
There's 10 attractions that might be of interest to you. There's a sports venue Angel Stadium of Anaheim.
Is this child-friendly? Does it have an entrance fee?
This place isn't the best for kids. The entry requires a fee.
Okay, sounds good. Could I get a cab there?
How many seats you need?
Just for 1.
Would you like a regular or pool ride?
Regular ride is good.
Okay, please confirm the following: 1 seat for a regular cab ride to the Angel Stadium of Anaheim.
Yup, that works.
Your ride has been booked and on its way to you now.
Thanks so much. That's it for now.
You're welcome, have a good day.
What's the weather in Chi-town for 14th of March?
The average temperature for the day will be 68 degrees, with a 24 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy or humid?
The humidity forecast is around 26 percent, with an average wind speed of 12 miles per hour.
Okay. What attractions do you have there?
I have 10 attractions you may like. How about 360 CHICAGO? That's a tourist attraction.
Okay, that sounds good. Can you get me a cab?
How many seats do you need? What type of ride do you prefer? As in, pool, or regular, or something else.
I prefer a regular ride. There's just 1 person in my party.
Please confirm: I am booking a ride to 360 CHICAGO for 1 person. You prefer a regular ride.
Yes, that's good.
I have booked your ride and the cab is on its way.
How much will that cost? When will the cab arrive?
The ride will cost $10.21 and the cab should arrive in 6 minutes.
Thanks very much.
Can I help you with anything else today?
No, that's all. Thanks very much.
Have a great day.
I'd like to know the weather at Point Reyes Station on the 9th of this month.
The temperature will be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Great, what about the weather in Atlanta on March 5th?
On that day the average temperature will be 82 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be then?
The humidity will be about 29 percent.
How windy will it be?
The wind will be about 5 miles per hour on the 5th.
Great. What about the attractions there? I want to find a natural spot of some sort.
You could try Georgia Aquarium, which is a nature preserve.
Is the place good for kids?
Yes, it's a great place to take the kids.
Perfect, are there any other attractions I might enjoy?
You should also try Zoo Atlanta, it's a nature preserve as well.
Is the entry free for the zoo? Also, will the kids have a good time there?
Yes, there is no cost to enter and the kids will have a great time there.
That sounds wonderful.
Is there anything more I can help with?
Could you book me a cab to get there?
What type of ride would you like and how many seats?
I only need 1 seat and I'd like a regular ride.
Okay, please confirm: 1 seat in a regular ride to Zoo Atlanta.
Yes, that's perfect.
I booked the cab and it's on its way.
Thanks so much for helping.
Anything more I can do for you?
No thanks, I appreciate it.
Have a good day then!
I like to visit the place Philly on March 1st. I need to check about the weather condition there on that day. Can you help me to check it?
Yes, please note that the average temperature should be 81 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain will be 8 % there.
Check with the level of Humidity and Wind there.
Average wind speed will be 4 miles per hour and the humidity will be around 23 %. Is that information useful to you.
yes. thanks. And please check out some interesting places to visit.
Found 10 attractive places. Art Museum Steps is the best one and which is also a Tourist Attraction.
That is fine. But I need to search for some places like Museum which is also be a safe place to the Children. Can you find the one for me?
Yes, found a Museum named Barnes Foundation. How about that?
That is okay to me. I need to go there with another person on a Cab. please check for a Pool Ride cab for 2 persons.
I need your confirmation to book a Pool ride cab for 2 persons to Barnes Foundation.
I have changed the plan. Please search for the cab with regular ride for only one person.
Okay, confirm to proceed with the booking of a Cab with regular ride for 1 person
That is correct. Let me know the cost for that ride.
Ride cost is $13.81. I have booked the cab and it will reach you soon.
Thank you for your help in this plan.
Anything else?
No, thank you. That's all for now.
Have a great day.
What is the weather going to be like in Chicago on this Sunday?
The temperature will average around 67 degrees and there will be a 36 percent chance of it raining.
Sounds good. What kind of attractions can I visit there?
I've found 10 attractions that may interest you. First on the list is the 360 CHICAGO. It's a popular Tourist Attraction.
Okay, that sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, could you book me a cab to get there?
Sure. How many will be traveling? Do you have a preference, such as a Pool ride or a Regular ride?
I'd like a Regular ride for just a group of one.
To confirm, you want a Regular ride to 360 CHICAGO for just 1 seat.
Yeah. That is correct.
I have ordered your ride and it should be on the way.
Thank you so much for the help.
Have a great day!
Tell me what the weather will be on March 6th.
What city shall I look in?
Look in Portland for March 9th.
The normal temperature is 67 degrees with a 44 percent chance of rain.
I see. Thanks.
Do you want anything more?
What attractions can you find there?
Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden is a Park that you should see.
That works. Can you find me a Luxury cab for one person?
You want a Luxury cab for 1 person to Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your ride is coming for you now.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
Whats the weather going to be like in SD on March 5th?
It averages 84 degrees at that time with an 8 percent chance of rain.
What is there to do? Like maybe a Museum. Something free and where you can bring the kids.
You should check out the Fleet Science Center. Great Museum.
Nice. Can you get me a cab for one there?
Luxury? Regular?
Regular is fine.
1 regular to Fleet Science Center. Right?
That is right.
The car is on the way.
Excellent. Tahnk you.
You are welcome.
Can you tell me what the weather is like?
Sure, what city?
Can you look in Toronto on 12th of March?
It's going to be a mild 64 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain
Can you tell me how humid and windy it's gonna be?
Humidity will be around 15 percent and wind speeds of around 12 miles per hour.
Cool. What attractions are there? Something where I don't have to pay.
I've 10 - what about BAPS Shri Swaminarayan Mandir? It's a Place of Worship.
Is it child friendly do you know? And can you get me the phone number please?
Sure, phone number is 416-798-2277. I've had a look and it seems like a lovely place to take the kids to.
Cool. Can you book me a cab to get there please? Just the 1 person and a luxury ride if possible
Sure, just to confirm that I'll book a luxury cab for 1 person to the BAPS Shri Swaminarayan Mandir?
Yes perfect. Can you let me know how much it will cost and when it will get here?
Cab is booked - it costs $31.57 and should be with you in about 10 minutes.
Lovely, thanks so much
Can I do anything else for you?
No thanks
Okay, enjoy your trip out.
Check the weather for 10th of this month.
For what city?
Los Angeles
There's a 10 percent chance of rain and it should be around 91 degrees.
How about humidity and wind?
Humidity should be about 19 percent with wind speed approximatey 8 mile per hour.
Can you show me attractions there, preferably a park?
How about Exposition Park.
Is it free and child-friendly?
Yes, its both free and child-friendly.
Awesome. Can you get me a cab please?
Do you have a ride preference?
A regular ride for three is fine.
To confirm, you'd like a regular ride for 3 to Exposition Park?
Perfect
Your cab is on the way.
How much is it and when will it arrive?
It will be $29.05 and should be there in 3 minutes.
Thanks. That'll be all.
Have a great day.
Check the weather.
For what city?
Sacramento, CA
There's a 26 percent chance of rain and it should be about 82 degrees.
Can you show me child-friendly attractions, preferably a museum?
How about the California Museum?
Cool, anything else?
How about the California State Capitol Museum?
That sounds great. Can you get me a cab for 1?
What type?
A luxury ride please.
To confirm, you'd like a luxury ride for 1 to California State Capitol Museum?
Yes. When will it be here and how much will it be?
Your ride is on the way. It should be there in 13 minutes and costs $19.81.
Thank you.
Anything else I can help with?
No thanks.
Have a great day.
Please check the weather in Muir Beach
Its average temperature is 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 % chance of rain
ok, and in Seattle, WA on March 11th
Its average temperature is 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 % chance of rain
ok, any attractions here?
There is a tourist attraction, Brandon Lee and Bruce lee's grave site.
Any thing else?
There is a Museum also, the Burke Museum of Natural History and culture
Is it a child-friendly place?
Yes, very much so
ok, Any thing else?
There is another Museum, the Chihuly Garden and Glass
Is the entrance free?
yes, it is
ok, Get me a regular cab for 2 people
Please confirm: Book a ride to the Chihuly Garden and Glass for 2 regular seats
Yes, thats right. what the ETA to me and the cost?
Its booked. The ETA is 3 minutes and costs $31.52
Thanks for your help
anything else for today?
No, that would be it
have a good day!
What will the weather in Ciudad de Mexico be on the the 7th.
The temperature on that day will be 93 Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
What will the humidity be like?
The humidity will be 24 percent.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed will be an average of 5 miles per hour.
Ok. And what are some nearby attractions?
Acuario Inbursa is a nearby Nature Preserve.
Can I have their direct line?
Their number is 55 5395 4586.
Great. I will also need a cab to go there.
Would you like a pool or luxury ride or something else?
A regular ride is fine.
How many seats do you need?
There will be 2 in our group.
Please confirm you want a regular cab ride to Acuario Inbursa for 2.
Actually a pool ride will be fine.
Please confirm you request a pool ride for 2.
Yes. How long before the cab gets here and how much is the total?
The cab is on its way and will arrive in 9 minutes. The total is $16.05.
Great. Thanks. That's all.
Please enjoy your day.
What is the weather forecast March 1st?
Where are you checking?
Seattle.
Seattle has a 32 percent chance of showers with an average temperature of 74.
Nice, what are local attractions.
One of 10 found is a Tourist Attraction known as the Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site.
Would this place be acceptable for children and if so what is the phone number.
It is safe for young ones. You can reach them at 206-322-1582.
I would like a cab ride there.
How many people for the ride?
Just one.
Do you have a ride type preference?
Just a regular ride is fine.
I understand I am booking a Regular ride for 1 to Brandon Lee and Bruce Lee's Grave Site.
That's right. What is the ride charge? How much time do I have.
You have 5 minutes. Th ride charge is $14.77.
Thank you very much.
Do you need further assistance?
I'm all set, thanks.
My pleasure. Have a good one.
Can you check the weather of San Francisco on March 14th?
The expected average temperature is 93 degrees Fahrenheit for the day with 12 percent chances of rain,
Okay. Can you find me some tourist spots there?
There is a Historical Landmark called Alcatraz.
Okay. Can you find me a cab to there?
Which type of ride like Pool or Luxury or anything else do you prefer?
Find me a luxury ride for 2 people.
Please confirm: You want me to book a luxury ride for 2 people to Alcatraz.
Yes, That is correct.
Your ride has been booked successfully and the cab is on the way.
Thank you for all your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
NO. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
I need to check the weather.
In which city?
Check Phoenix, AZ please.
The average temperature for today is 89 degrees Farenheit and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay, Find me some attractions please.
I found 10, the first is Arizona Capitol Museum.
Great can you find me a cab for one?
Pool or regular?
I want a regular please.
Arizona Capitol Museum for 1, regular. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct. How much?
I booked your ride, it is $12.75.
Thank you for your help.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, that's all thanks.
Have a great day.
We friends are planning for a outing in Philadelphia. Is the weather there is suitable?
Average temperature there is 81 degree fahrenheit and there is 8 percent chance of shower.
Ok, is there any apt places to visit?
Art Museum Steps is a great Tourist attraction there.
Will children enjoy the place? Is there any entry fee?
You will have free entry and place is child-friendly.
I need a cab to reach there for 1 person.
What ride are you looking for Regular or Pool
I need a Luxury ride.
Ok, You demanded 1 seat at Art Museum Steps on Luxury ride. right.
No, make it for 2 people.
Ok, please verify, you need 2 seats in Luxury ride.
Yes, that's right.
Your cab is read and will be there in short time.
Great, thank you.
Any other help you need?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
I'm going on a trip to Washington on 1st of March. Can you check what the weather is that day?
Looks like the average will be 75 degree Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Cool. Can you look up some child-friendly attractions there, like a museum perhaps?
Sure, I found 10 attractions you might like. There is a museum called Dumbarton Oaks Museum.
What's their phone number and is it free?
No, it's not free. You can call them at 202-339-6401.
Ok, what else did you find? I'd like to see a historical spot, and preferably something that is free.
There is a Historical Landmark called National Academy of Sciences. How about that?
What else is there?
Petersen House is another Historical Landmark you might like.
Ok, I'll go for that one. Can you book me a cab there?
Sure, with how many seats?
Just 1 person, me. I'd prefer a car pool ride if possible.
Sure. To confirm, you'd like to book 1 seat on a Pool cab to Petersen House. Is that right?
Yes, that's fine. What's the cost and when will it be here?
I've booked your cab ride. It'll cost $16.95 and it will be here in 3 minutes.
Great, thank you.
Anything else I can do?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
Check for me please the weather in Nairobi on March 14th
For the day the average temperature should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and 0 percent of rain.
I see!Thanks.
Something else would you like to know?
Find me some attractions that is child-friendly.A wildlife spot will be good.
A Nature Preserve is Giraffe Centre you should check.
Is the entry here free? Tell me their contact number.
No is not free.20 891078 is the phone contact number.
Great.Get me a cab there if you can please.
Tell me the type of ride.You want to be a Regular or Luxury or something else?
I am in a group of 1 and I would like to be a Regular ride.
You want a ride to Giraffe Centre and you need 1 seats.Your preference is to be a regular ride.Is that okay?
Yes,good.Tell me how much will cost.
Your ride is booked and the cab is on its way.The ride is cost $13.62.
Thank you for everything. That's what I needed!
Have a great day!
What is the weather like in New York City today?
The forecast for today is an average temperature of 66 degrees Fahrenheit with a 37 percent chance of rain showers.
Okay. What are some attractions in New York City?
I have a list of 10 attractions that you might be interested in. The first is a Performing Arts Venue. It is the 92nd Street Y.
That sounds interesting. What about a park or a garden?
There is a nice park, Astoria Park.
That sounds good. I need a cab to Astoria Park.
How many people will be in the cab?
There are 3 of us and we would like a Luxury ride if it's available.
Please confirm the following: You need a luxury cab for 3 people, going to Astoria Park.
Yes, that's what we need.
The cab has been reserved and is on it's way. It should be arriving within 35 minutes.
Great. That sounds perfect. Thanks.
May I help you find anything else?
No, not right now. Thanks.
Enjoy your visit to Astoria Park.
I need to know what the weather will be like on March 6th.
What city should I check?
Delhi, India.
The average temperature should be 93 degrees with a 0% chance of rain.
Thanks, can you show me some attractions there.
I found 10 attractions. Adventure Island is a Theme Park, you should check it out!
Great, Can you get me a pool cab there for 2 people?
Please confirm the following: Pool ride to adventure island for 2 people.
Actually I would prefer a regular ride.
Please confirm the following: Regular Ride to Adventure Island for 2 people.
Yes, how long until the ride gets here.
Your ride is confirmed. The cab is expected in 6 minutes.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a great day!
What will the weather be like in Vacaville on the March 10th?
The average temperature will be around 89 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 26 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be around 36 percent.
Thanks, how about the weather in New York City on March 4th?
It'll be around 59 degrees with a 22 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed in predicted to be 8 miles per hour.
Thanks a lot.
No worries, anything else?
Can you find me some child-friendly attractions there?
Sure, there are 10 attractions that you might like. I recommend the American Folk Art Museum.
Thanks, is there anything else?
There's also the American Museum of Natural History.
Cool, what's their phone number?
It's (212) 769-5100.
Thanks, any other attractions?
There's Apollo Theater, it's a performing arts venue.
Thanks! Can you get me a cab there?
Sure. What kind of ride would you like, Pool, Luxury, or something else? How many seats do you need?
I need four seats, I'd like a pool ride thanks.
Great, please confirm that you'd like 4 seats in a pool ride to Apollo Theater.
No, actually, a Luxury ride for one would be better.
Okay, 1 seat in a Luxury ride.
Yes, that's correct. How much will it cost? How long should I wait for the cab to get here?
It'll cost $15.96 and it'll be there in around 10 minutes.
Thanks so much.
That's okay, anything else?
No, that's all thanks.
Okay, see you.
What is the weather like in San Diego?
An average temperature of 90 degrees Fahrenheit is expected today, with a 1 percent change of rain
Very good. I would like to find an attraction there
There is a Park, Balboa Park
Oh, I like it! I want a cab to go there, a Pool ride for a group of one
1 seats on a Pool ride to Balboa Park: is it correct?
Yes, It's correct, thanks
Your ride is booked, the cab is coming!
Thank you so much!
Do you need anything else?
No, It's all for now. Thanks
Have a nice day
I'd like to know the weather in Nairobi.
There is an average of 105 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 chance of rain.
How humid will it be? And is it going to be windy at all?
There is 15 percent humidity and the wind speed is 7 miles per hour.
I see. And what about the March 10th?
There is an average temperature of 95 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Excellent. Are there any attractions you can recommend to me?
There are 3 attractions I think you might be interested in. One of which is the Giraffe Centre, which is a local Nature Preserve.
Can you tell me the phone number? And is there an entrance fee?
The phone number is 20 891078, and there is no entrance fee.
Great. Are there any other attractions that you can recommend? Perhaps something child-friendly.
I was able to locate 2 attractions that you might enjoy. There is the Karura Forest, which is a Nature Preserve.
Excellent. I'd like a cab there for one person. Preferably a Pool ride.
To confirm: You like a cab for 1 person to the Karura Forest and prefer a Pool ride, correct?
Yes, that's perfect
You cab is confirmed and on its way.
Thank you so much for all of your help.
Enjoy your day.
Can you please tell me the weather in Mexico City?
The average temperature today should be around 102 degrees Fahrenheit. There is 0 chance of rain.
Okay, thanks a lot.
Is there anything else?
Yeah, can you tell me about some child-friendly attractions there?
There's the famous nature preserve, Acuario Inbursa.
Okay fantastic, can you book me a cab there?
Do you have a preferred type of ride?
I'd like a luxury car to take me there, thanks.
Okay, how many seats?
Just 1, thanks.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like to book 1 seat in a luxury vehicle to Acuario Inbursa.
No, actually, I'm in a group of four.
Okay, you'd like 4 seats to Acuario Inbursa.
Yes, that's correct.
Okay, I've booked your cab and it's on the way.
Okay, thanks.
Is there anything else?
No, that's all thanks.
Okay, see you.
I would like to check the weather.
Which city would you like a forecast for?
I need the weather for Anaheim, CA.
The average temperature for the day should be around 78 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Okay, can you show me some attractions there? I would like something that is child-friendly.
Cars Land is a tourist attraction that lines up with what you are looking for.
Is entry to this attractions free? Can I get their phone number?
Unfortunately, entry is not free. Their phone number is 714-781-4565.
Okay, great. Can I get a cab to take me there?
Certainly, how many seats do you need?
I am with a group of 3 people.
Do you have a preference on the type of ride?
I would prefer a pool ride.
Please confirm: You would like a pool ride for 3 to Cars Land. Is that correct?
No. I actually only need seats for two.
Please confirm your revised details: You would like a ride to Cars Land and you need 2 seats.
Yes that works great for me. How long until the cab will arrive?
Your ride has been booked and the cab is on its way. You can expect it to arrive in 9 minutes.
Great, thank you for your help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that will be all. Thanks again for your help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day.
I would like to check the weather in Phoenix on March 8th.
The average temperature for that day should be 77 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you show me the attractions there?
There are 10 attractions that may interest you. You could check out a Museum like the Arizona Capitol Museum.
Is the entrance to this attraction free?
No, entry is not free.
Is this place child-friendly and what is their phone number?
No, this place is not good for kids. Their phone number is 602-926-3620.
Nice, are there any other attractions you found?
You could check another Museum called the Arizona Science Center.
Cool, is there anything else? Something without an entry fee.
There are 6 attractions that suit your preferences. You could check out the Theme Park called Castles N' Coasters.
Okay, sounds good Can you get me a cab there?
Do you have any preferred type of ride? How many seats will you need?
I want the Luxury ride for a group of 1.
Please confirm these details: You want a Luxury ride for 1 seat to Castles N' Coasters.
No, I want a Regular ride for a group of three.
Please confirm these details: You need a Regular ride for 3 seats.
Yes, that is perfect.
I have booked your ride and the cab is coming.
Thank you for the help.
May I help with anything else?
No, thank you very much for the help.
Have a great day!
Can you tell me the weather forecast in Delhi, India on the Monday next week?
The temperature for that day is expected to be 97 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind is expected to be around 3 miles per hour.
How humid will it be?
The humidity will be about 18 percent.
Okay, can you tell me some attractions there?
You might like Adventure Island which is a theme park.
Okay great. Any other attractions?
There is also Akshardham which is a place of worship.
What's their phone number? Is it free to get in?
Yes, there's no fee to get in. The phone number is 11 4344 2344.
Okay that sounds good. Can you find me a cab to get there? There's four of us and we'd like a luxury ride.
Let's confirm the details: You are booking a luxury ride for 4 to Akshardham.
Yes, that's it. How much will it cost?
The cab is booked and on its way. The ride is $43.64.
Thanks for your help. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
What is the forecast for the weather?
Can you be more specific? Which city do you want the forecast for?
Please tell me the weather for Eldridge on the March 12th.
On March 12th 2019, the average temperature will be 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 14 percent change of rain.
What will the humidity be like that day?
The humidity for the 12th will hover around 17 percent.
What about the wind? Will it be breezy on that day?
The average speed for the wind should be around 3 miles per hour.
Okay enough about that city. Tell me the forecast for Toronto, Ontario for March 9th.
It will be 67 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain in Toronto on March the 9th.
Seems like the weather will be nice. Can you tell me about some attractions in Toronto?
Would you be interested in the Tourist Attraction known as 3D Toronto sign?
Yes I certainly would be interested in that.
How else can I assist you today?
I need a ride there. Please make sure that it is Luxury transportation.
What number of seats will you require for your transportation?
It will be just 2 of us.
You wish to ride to the 3D Toronto sign in Luxury transportation for 2 people. Is this correct? If so, please confirm now.
That's exactly right. When will the cab be here and how much will it cost?
The cab is on the way now and should arrive in approximately 8 minutes. The transportation to your destination will total $48.62.
That sounds like everything is set up then. That's all the help I need.
Enjoy your trip and have a wonderful day.
I need to check on the weather in London on the the 9th.
The average temperature for the day should be 90 degrees Fahrenheit. There will be a 5 percent chance of rain.
Sure, alright. Can you show me any attractions there?
There are 10 attractions that may interest you. You should visit 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin). This is a Historical Landmark.
Okay, sounds good. Can you find be a cab to get me there?
What type of ride do you prefer? You can choose from Luxury, Regular, or anything else. How many seats do you need?
I would prefer a Pool ride for a group of 1.
Please confirm the details: You want a Pool ride for 1 that will go to 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin).
Yes, that seems good to me.
I have book the ride and the cab is on the way.
How much does it cost and how long before the cab reaches here?
The ride will cost $6.74. It will take 4 minutes.
Thank you very much for the help.
May I help with anything else?
No, thank you for the help.
Have a great day.
I would like to check the weather at NYC on March 9th.
The average temperature for the day should be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit. There is 38 percent chance for rain.
Yeah, sure. Can you help me to find any kind of attraction that would be cool there?
Yeah, sure. How about Performing Arts Venue check out at 92nd street Y.
Is there entrance is free?
No, the entry fee is applicable.
Okay, fine.
Anything else I could assist you with?
Can You get a cab to take me there?
Sure, What kind of ride would prefer to have and for how many peoples? You can take Luxury or Regular or anything else which you preferred.
I would like to have Regular ride with one seat.
Please confirm the following details for the reservation of the Regular with 1 seat to 92nd Street Y.
Yeah, that's works for me. Can you send the details of the cab arrival time and cost for the ride?
I ride is booked successfully and the cab is on its way. It is expected to be arrive in 2 minutes and the cost of the ride is $16.45.
Thanks a lot for your help, that's all I need.
Have a wonderful day.
What's the weather forecast in Delhi for the March 11th?
The average temperature for the day will be 103 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 7 percent chance of rain.
Okay. What attractions are in Delhi? I'd like to visit a museum.
I have 3 places you might like. You might try Gandhi Smriti. That's a museum.
Okay. Sounds good. Can you get me a cab? There are 2 of us and we prefer a pool ride.
Please confirm: You would like 2 seats on a ride to Gandhi Smriti. You prefer a pool ride.
Actually, change that. There's just one person and I prefer a luxury ride.
Okay, please confirm this change: you are seeking 1 seat on a luxury ride.
Yes, that's correct.
I have booked your ride. The cab is on its way.
How much will that be?
The ride will cost $29.93.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a great day.
I want to check the weather Condition for which I need your help.
Do you have any choice of City to check it?
Yes, check it for Atlanta on March 11th.
The average temperature will be 87 degrees Fahrenheit on that day and there will be a 0 percent of chance for rain.
Okay. I need to search for some interesting places to visit there like a Historical spot. Can you search the one for me which should be a child-friendly.
Found 2 for your selection and the one at King Jr Martin Luther- Birth Home is the nice one to you which is also a Historical Landmark.
That is okay. But I want the places like Museum, can you find it?
Yes, What about a Museum named Atlanta History Center?
Let me decide. I need their contact number. and please check whether the entrance will be free there.
No, entrance is not free and the phone number is 404-814-4000.
Okay, please check with some other places.
What about a Museum named Bodies The Exhibition?
This is perfect I think. Please book a Cab for me to visit there.
What type of ride you want and to how many person do I book the Cab?
I need it for 1 person with Pool Ride.
Please confirm to book a Cab with Pool ride for 1 person to Bodies The Exhibition.
Please book it for Luxury ride. I feel this will be comfortable to me.
Please confirm to book a Cab with Luxury ride for 1 person to Bodies The Exhibition.
Yes, that is correct. Also I need to know the cost and time for that ride.
I have booked the Cab and it will reach you within 12 minutes. Cost for the same is $20.95. Is that information useful.
Yes, thanks for the same.
Anything else?
No, not for now.
Have a good day.
Alright, let's see the weather on March 3rd in London, UK
It's going to be 88 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain
And the humidity?
It'll be around 66 percent
How windy will it be?
It's gonna average around 2 miles per hour wind speed
OK, let's find some child-friendly attractions
OK, you should check out 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin), it's a popular Historical Landmark
OK, but maybe something else might be better, something free. A Place of Worship is ok.
A place of worship? How about All Saints, Margaret Street?
What's their number
It's 20 7636 1788
OK good, get me a luxury cab there please
OK, how many people?
It's just me, the one
OK 1 Luxury ride to All Saints, Margaret Street?
Actually make that a Regular ride so it's cheaper
So 1 regular ride to All Saints, Margaret Street?
Yes that's great.
I booked it and it's on the way.
Thanks so much, that's all
Cool, enjoy All Saints!
I would like to check the weather.
Which city should I look in?
Check Kuala Lumpur.
It should be 102 degrees fahrenheit on average with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How will the weather be on March 4th?
It should be about 87 degrees fahrenheit on average and there is 8 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind and humidity be like?
The wind is 8 miles per hour and the humidity is around 29 percent.
Could you show me some attractions from there?
You should check out the park 99 Wonderland Park.
Does the attraction cost anything? What is the phone number?
The entrance is free. The phone number is 12-559 9034.
Okay, wonderful. Could you get me a cab there?
Is any type of preferred type of ride?
I want a regular ride.
How many seats do you need?
I would like a luxury ride for four people.
Could you confirm that you want a ride to 99 Wonderland Park for 4 in a luxury ride?
That sounds good. What will the total be?
Your ride has been booked. It will cost $50.88.
When will the taxi get here?
It should get there in about 7 minutes.
Thank you for your help.
Could I help with something else?
No, that is all.
Have a great day.
What will the weather be like in Moraga on next Tuesday?
The average daytime temperature will be around 77 degrees and there is a 6 percent chance of rain.
How about the humidity?
The humidity should be around 24 percent.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed should be 1 mile per hour.
What will the weather like be in Vancouver on March 2nd?
The average daytime temperature will be around 67 degrees and there is a 49 percent chance of rain.
Okay great. Are there any attractions such as a Museum there?
There is a Museum called the Museum of Vancouver.
That's great. Is there anything else to see there?
There is another Museum called Science World at TELUS World of Science.
Cool. Is there anything else?
You could visit a Museum called the Vancouver Art Gallery.
Is this a free attraction?
No. An entrance fee applies.
What is the phone number and is it a good place to take children?
It's perfect for children. You can call them on 604-662-4700.
Perfect. Can you arrange a cab to take me there?
What kind of ride would you like to take and for how many people? For example you can take a Regular or Luxury ride.
There will be three people travelling and I'd prefer a Pool ride.
Okay so you would like a Pool ride to Vancouver Art Gallery for 3 people.
That's correct. How much will the ride cost.
Your cab has been booked and should be with you shortly. The total cost will be $12.66.
Thanks for your help. I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day.
What's the weather going to be like in Toronto, Canada on March 12th?
In Toronto, it'll be an average of 64 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent change of rain.
Is it going to be windy?
The average wind speed is going to be around 12 miles per hour.
And how humid will it be?
Humidity levels are going to be around 15 percent.
I see. Do you have any recommendations for child-friendly attractions in Toronto?
If I were you, I'd check out the 3D Toronto sign, it's a really popular Tourist Attraction.
Is admission free? And what number could I reach them at?
Admission is not free, unfortunately. You can reach them at 416-392-2489.
Got it, thanks. Could you book me a cab there?
Sure thing! What type of ride would you like? And how many seats will you need?
I'd like a Luxury ride, and I only need 1 seat.
So just to confirm: you'd like a Luxury ride for 1 to the 3D Toronto sign. Is that right?
Right! When will the cab be here? And how much does the ride cost?
The cab is on its way now. It should be here in about 14 minutes and will cost $24.33.
Okay, great! Thank you for your help!
Of course! Is there anything else I can help you with today?
No, that's all, thank you.
Have a great time at the 3D Toronto sign!
Can you tell me what the weather in Santa Clara will be on March 5th?
There is an average of 88 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent of rain.
And what are the humidity levels?
There is around 44 percent humidity.
But how windy will it be?
There is an average wind speed of 5 miles per hour.
Can you also check the weather in Paris, France for March 10th?
There is an average of 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain
Excellent. Can you recommend any local attractions?
I was able to locate 10 attractions for you. You should visit the American Church in Paris. A local Place of Worship.
Cool. Can you secure a cab for me there? A Regular ride will do.
How many passengers will be riding?
There will be two of us.
To confirm: You'd like a Regular cab for 2 passengers to the American Church in Paris, correct?
No. I'd like a Pool ride for just one person instead.
To confirm: There will be 1 passenger for a Pool ride, correct?
Yes, that's perfect. How much will the ride cost, and how long will it take us to get there?
Your cab has been confirmed and is on it's way. The cost of the ride is $9.91 and should only take 8 minutes.
Thank you or all of your help.
Enjoy your day.
I would like to check the weather.
Where would you like to check the weather for?
I want to know the weather in Los Angeles.
It'll be 76 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 28 percent chance of rain.
Awesome. Could you show me some attractions there? I'd like to find some Tourist Attraction.
One Tourist Attraction you might like is the Hollywood Walk of Fame.
Is it free and child-friendly?
Yes, it's free and child-friendly.
Awesome. Could you get me a cab there?
What kind of ride would you like and how many seats do you need? You could take Luxury or Regular or any other kinds of rides.
I would like a Pool ride for one.
Please confirm the following: You would like a ride to the Hollywood Walk of Fame in a Pool ride for 1 person.
Yes, that would be great.
I have booked your ride and it's on its way.
Thanks so much! That's all for now.
Have a great day!
Check for me the weather please.
In what city are you interested?
I would like to know in Anaheim.
For the day the average temperature should be 78 degrees Fahrenheit and 29 percent chance of rain.
I understand. But in Sacramento?
For the day the average temperature should be 82 degrees Fahrenheit and 26 percent chance of rain.
All right, thanks.
With something else I can help you?
I am interested in finding some attractions.I prefer to be child-friendly without an entry fee.I search for a Theme Park.
I have found for you 1 attractions which you might like.A theme Park at Fairytale Town.
Can you tell me their phone number?
916-808-5233 it's the phone number.
It's okay.Find me please if you can a cab there.
What is the type of ride that you prefer and how many seats do you need.You prefer to take a Pool or Luxury or something else?
I would like a Pool ride and I am in a group of one.
1 seat for the ride to Fairytale Town and prefer a Pool ride.Is that correct?
yes perfect.How long will take to reach the cab?
Book was made and the cab is on its way.Is expected to arrive in 9 minutes.
Thank you. That was all.
Have a great day!
COuld you tell me the weather in fresno, CA?
Today's temperature should be 72 degrees fahrenheit, and there's a 2% chance of rain.
Awesome. Could you show me some attractions? Preferably something child friendly without an entry fee?
How about the christmas tree lane? It's a tourist attraction.
Could you find me a cab to go there?
HOw many seats would you need?
i'd like two seats on a luxury ride please.
please confirm: You'd like a luxury cab ride for 2 to go to the Christmas tree lane?
Yup, works for me.
Alright, the cab is en route.
THank you, that's all I need
have a great day.
Can you look up what the weather will be like in Fresno on March 4th?
Of course: It will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit on March 4th with an 18 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be humid.
Let's see: the humidity will be 19 percent.
Alright, that isn't too bad, I guess. What's there to do there?
There's a tourist attraction on Christmas Tree Lane.
Can you get me a car pool there?
How many people?
It's a group of four, I just want a standard, regular ride.
Alright, so you'd like a regular ride for 4 people to Christmas Tree Lane?
Actually, it's a group of 2, I just got a cancellation here.
So you'd like 2 seats for a regular ride to your destination?
Yeah, great.
Alright, the cab is on it's way.
That's everything now, thanks.
Have a safe trip.
What will the weather be like March 11th?
Where would you like the weather checked?
Anaheim, CA weather, please.
There will be an 11% chance of showers with an average temperature of 70.
I am also looking for attractions.
The Angel Stadium of Anaheim is a Sports Venue.
What are my other choices?
One Tourist Attraction is Cars Land.
I need a cab to get there.
Are you looking for a Luxury ride or a Pool.
A Luxury ride for 2.
I am understanding a Luxury ride for 2 to Cars Land.
Yes,how much time before the ride arrives?
The ride will be here in 9 minutes.
What is the ride charge?
$41.75 is the cost.
You're such a great help, thanks.
Do you need further assistance?
I am all set.
Enjoy your day.
What is the expected weather on March 8th in Sacramento, CA?
The average temperature is 85 degrees with a 21 percent chance of rain.
Cool, can you show me some stuff to do there?
There is the California Automobile Museum. It is a well-known museum.
Awesome, anything else?
You could also visit the California Museum. It is another interesting museum.
That would be cool, but I need a cab to get there.
Do you have a preferred cab?
I need a luxury ride for four people.
Please confirm, 4 people in a luxury ride to the California Museum.
Yes, that is corect.
Your ride is booked an on its way!
Thank you for your help.
Anything else today?
No, that is all.
Have a nice time!
I'm thinking about visiting Montara on March 11th. What's the weather like then?
The weather is estimated to be 86 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 17 percent chance of rain.
I see. How will it be in Philly on March 4th?
It should roughly be 78 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How about the humidity?
The humidity will be about 30 percent.
And how about the windiness?
The wind speed should roughly be 1 mile per hour.
Okay, that's feasible weather. Is there a child-friendly, free museum in the area?
Yes there is. One museum that meets your needs is the Benjamin Franklin Museum.
Ben Franklin certainly was an interesting person. I'd like you to get me a cab to the museum. I'm the only one in my group.
Okay, I can do that. Do you want a pool ride, a regular ride, or something different?
A pool ride sounds best.
So you want a pool ride for 1 to the Benjamin Franklin Museum?
That's all good. How much time before the cab gets here?
I booked the ride for you. The cab should be here in about 8 minutes.
Thanks for helping me out!
Can I help you with anything else?
Not now. Thanks.
Enjoy your day! I hope the museum is an interesting experience for you.
What is the weather forecast March 12th in Sacramento?
A 14% chance of showers with an average temperature of 92.
I see.
Do you need any other information?
Yes, is there a local Museum?
One of 5 found is a Museum called the California Automobile Museum.
I need a ride there.
Would you like Luxury or Pool type ride?
A Regular cab is fine.
How many will be in your party?
Just one rider.
I will set a Regular ride for 1 to the California Automobile Museum if you like.
That will work. What is the charge? How much time do I have?
You have 7 minutes. The charge is $17.74.
Awesome. I'm going to get ready.
Have fun.
I want to see what the weather will be like on the March 12th.
Sure. Where do you want to check the weather?
Please look up the weather for the District of Columbia.
The temperature should be 80 degrees on average and there is a 9 percent chance of it raining.
Okay, cool. Are there any attractions there that are kid-friendly? I would prefer something free.
I've found 10 attractions that might interest you. First on the list is the 56 Signers of the Declaration of Independence Memorial. This is classified as a Nature Preserve.
Sure. What's the number for this place?
Their contact number is 202-426-6841.
Okay. Is there anything else like a Museum?
There's the International Spy Museum. It's quite a great Museum.
What's their phone number?
Their contact number is 202-393-7798.
Alright. I'll also need a cab to get there.
Sure. Do you have a preference on the type of ride and how many seats do you need?
I'd like a Regular ride for a group of three.
To be clear, you want a Regular ride to the International Spy Museum for a group of 3.
That is correct. When will the cab arrive and how much will it cost?
I've booked your cab ride. It will cost $39.82 and will arrive in 4 minutes.
Thank you so much.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that will be all.
Have a great day!
What would the weather be like in Toronto on the 3rd of this month?
It would be 65 degrees Fahrenheit with 58 percent chance of rain.
How windy would it be?
11 miles per hour.
Ok, then. What attractions are there?
There are 10 suitable attractions. There is a tourist attraction called 3D toronto sign.
That's fine, but is there anything else?
How about a museum? There is the aga khan museum.
Are there a museum?
There is a museum called the Art gallery of ontario that might interest you.
Is there an entrance fee?
Yes, there is a charge.
Is there a contact number? Is it a fun place for kids?
No, it is not suitable for kids. The number is 877-225-4246
That would be fine. I need a cab for one.
Would you like a regular or pool ride?
I want a luxury ride.
You want a luxury ride for 1 to the art gallery of ontario?
That would be fine. What is the cost? How much time again do I have to wait for the cab to arrive?
The cab would be here in 14 minutes and costs $28.26
Thanks very much.
Is there anything else you need assistance with?
No, I appreciate your help.
Enjoy your day.
Please check the weather for Toronto, Ontario on March 8th.
It should be around 67 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Sure, that is cool.
Anything else today?
I would like to visit a museum there.
Check out Aga Khan Museum. It is a well-known museum in the area.
Cool, I will need a cab to get there. Please find me a pool ride for one person.
Please confirm, 1 seat on a pool ride to the Aga Khan Museum.
Yes, that is correct.
The cab is on the way.
Thank you, that is all.
Have a nice time!
I need you to check the weather for me in Antioch on March 6th
Today's average temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 7 percent chance of rain
What about humidity? Is it windy?
Humidity is 23 percent and wind' speed is 9 miles per hour.
Okay, now tell me the same parameters in Seattle, WA on the 3rd of this month
Temperature is around 73 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 49 percent of probability that it will rain
Okay now look for some fun for me and my kids, a garden would be perfect.
There' s a park that you and your kids may like, it's the Gas Works Park
We'll see it if you can find a cab to go there
Do you have any preferences like Pool, Luxury or whatever? How many seats in total?
Pool is fine and look for two spots
Confirm me the next action. You want me to book a Pool ride for 2 to reach Gas Works Park
Yes, it's correct.
The ride is on its way to you.
Thank you, you made my day
Is there anything else you want to ask me?
No, I'll be leaving soon, I got to go now.
Enjoy the park. Bye
What's the weather supposed to be like on March 5th?
What city will you be in?
Chicago.
There will be a 28 percent chance of rain, but the average temperature for the day should be 71 degrees.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed will be about 5 miles per hour.
What about the humidity, what will that be like?
It will be around 40 percent that day.
Okay, cool, can you show me some attractions there?
There is this tourist attraction call 360 CHICAGO, you should check it out.
Is it free? And would you say this place is child-friendly?
Yes, it is free and its a good spot to take your kids too!
Great, Can you get me a cab to take me there?
Which kind of ride would you like better, Regular, or Pool? Also, How many seats do you want?
I prefer a regular for a group of 1.
So, you want a 1 seat, regular ride to 360 CHICAGO, correct?
Yep, that works.
I got everything set up and booked, and the cab is on its way.
Thanks a bunch!
Anything else I can help you with right now?
No. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day!
I need to see the weather in Ross
It's 79 degrees with a 14% chance of rain right now.
How about in Nairobi, Kenya on the the 6th
It's hot! 89 Degrees with a 1% chance of rain
What can I do over there?
There are 3 attractions you might like, for example there's a neat Nature Preserve Giraffe Centre
Cool, what else is there?
How about another Nature Preserve called the Karura Forest
Cool, what else can you find for me?
Nairobi National Park is a popular Nature Preserve people like to visit
OK, get me a luxury cab to that venue
How many seats
Just 1 thanks
1 seat to Nairobi National Park in a luxury vehicle yes?
Yes exactly right
I booked it and it's on the way
OK cool thanks
What else can I do?
Nothing else, that's all for now
Great, just buzz me if you need something else
What's the weather like in Fresno?
It's gonna be 72 degrees with a 2% chance of rain
Noted on that. Can you find me some attractions to visit there?
There's a cool tourist attraction called Christmas Tree Lane that you might like?
I see, what else?
There's a great Historical Landmark called the Forestiere Underground Gardens
Nice, let's do that. Find me a cab there
OK, what kind of ride, and for how many passengers?
Just a regular ride for 1 please
OK so a regular ride for 1 to Forestiere Underground Gardens?
Actually let's make that a luxury ride for 2
OK so 2 Luxury seats instead?
Yes that's right. How much is it and how long till it gets here?
It's booked! It'll be there in 12 minutes and cost you $23.00
Thanks for your help
Sure, what else can I do?
Nothing else, that's all
Great, enjoy the Forestiere Underground Gardens
Can you please check the weather for Vegas on the 13th?
The average temperature for the day is 73 Fahrenheit with 14 percent chance of rain.
Perfect. Can you find me some free Tourist Attraction there?
There's 1 Tourist Attraction that matches your criteria, namely SlotZilla Zip Line.
Perfect. Can you get a cab for me to this destination?
Sure. For how many people?
Just one, me.
Do you want a specific ride type?
If possible, I'd like a Luxury ride.
Can you please confirm that you need 1 seat on a Luxury ride to Slotzilla Zip Line?
Yes, that's correct.
Your cab is booked and on its way.
Thanks a lot for everything.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, not at the moment. Thanks so much!
Have a great one!
Hello! please can you look my availability in my calendar?
When do you wish to know your availability?
Please can you look for Saturday this week?
Sure, you've an empty slot from 6:30 pm to 11 pm on March 2nd.
Sounds good. please can you find something interesting stuff to do on March 2nd?
Sure. Are you interested in Music or Sports or anything else in particular?
Yup, I like Sports events and looking for any upcoming events around Washington D.C.
Okay, the popular event Dc United Vs Revolution is going to take place at Audi Field on March 2nd at 8:30 pm.
Oh! Is it so! Please can I have details about this event, as well as the address of the event location?
Sure, its a Football event taking place at 100 Potomac avenue Southwest.
Sounds good to me.
Do you wish to get tickets for this event?
Yup, I would like to.
For how many persons?
Please can you get 2 tickets?
Please can you confirm me that you wish to get 2 tickets for Dc United Vs Revolution on March 2nd that is taking place at Washington D.C., right?
Sounds great.
Okay! I've booked the tickets for this event. Have fun.
Thanks much for the help.
Do you want me to assist you with anything else?
Nope, thanks much for the help.
Have a fantastic day.
Can you tell me when I will be available?
For which date you want to know when you are available?
I want to know when I will be available next Wednesday.
For March 6th you will be free from 7 am till 8:30 pm.
Seems nice to me.
Do you want an event to be added to your calendar?
No, I do not want to add an event to the calendar. I am looking for something interesting to do on that day. I usually like attending Sports events.
Is there a specific city you want me to search for the vent?
I am interested to know about events around Atlanta.
There are 7 events which match what you are asking for. One of the events is the match of Falcons Vs Buccaneers which is very popular. The event will happen at Mercedes-Benz stadium on March 6th at 6 pm.
That seems nice.
Do you want having tickets bought for this event?
Yes I want to buy 4 tickets for this event.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy 4 tickets for the match of Falcons Vs Buccaneers which will happen on March 6th in Atlanta?
Yes, that is what I want.
Your requested tickets have been booked. Enjoy your time there!
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can help you with for today?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me.
Have a good time!
When do I have availability in my schedule?
What date should I look at?
Look at this Sunday.
On March 3rd you have an opening from 4:30 pm to 9 pm.
Sounds good, thank you.
Are you wanting to add an event to your calendar?
No, help me find something fun to do. How about concert events in San Diego.
Jon Bellion is playing at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater on March 3rd at 6:30 pm.
Oh, that sounds like a good idea.
Do you want to purchase tickets?
Yes, purchase three tickets.
Please confirm the following: You want 3 tickets to Jon Bellion on March 3rd in San Diego.
Yes, that's right.
Your reservation is complete, have a fun time!
Thanks for the help!
Is there anything else you could use assistance with?
No, that's all I want, thanks.
Enjoy!
Please can you look into my calendar and tell me when I'm available?
When do you wish to know your availability?
Please look for Wednesday next week.
On March 6th, you've an empty slot from 6 am to 10 pm.
Sounds good. Please can you find something interestingly to do on that day.
Sure. Do you have interest in any particular city?
Yup, am looking for in and around SF.
Okay! Which event interests you more - Music or Sports or any other events?
I would like to have Sports events.
Okay! I have 4 events for you. The popular event Giants Vs Brewers is taking place at Oracle Park on March 6th at 7 pm.
Please can I have the address of the location?
Sure, it is at 24 Willie Mays Plaza.
Sounds great.
So, do you have any plan to get tickets for this event?
Yup, I wish to get tickets for this event.
For how many you wish to get the ticket?
I wish to get three tickets.
Please can you confirm me that you wish to book 3 tickets for the event Giants Vs Brewers that is going to happen on March 6th at San Francisco, right?
Yup, sounds good.
Okay! I've reserved the tickets for you successfully. Have fun there!
Thanks much for the help.
Do you want anything to be assisted with?
Nope, thanks much for the help.
Have a fantastic day.
What's my schedule availability please?
On which date?
For Monday next week.
On March 4th, your schedule is clear from 7:45 pm to 10 pm.
Okay, good, thank you.
Anything else right now?
Yes, I need something interesting to go. How about a rock event in San Diego?
What kind of event?
A concert please.
I have 4 for you. Local Natives will be at The Observatory North Park on March 4th at 8 pm.
Great. May I get tickets please?
How many would you like?
I'd like 4.
Confirming 4 tickets for Local Natives in San Diego on March 4th.
I think I'd like 3 tickets actually.
Confirming 3 tickets on March 4th.
Yes, that's good.
The reservation has completed successfully.
What is that address please?
It's 2891 University Avenue.
Okay, great, thanks.
Anything else today?
Not today, no.
Thank you very much.
Hey, show me when I'm free.
In which day?
Friday next week.
On March 8th you're free from 8 am to 3 pm.
Do I have any other free time this Saturday?
On March 2nd you're free from 12 pm to 11 pm.
Sounds real good.
Would you like to add an event?
No, thanks. I want to find something interesting to do that day.
In which city? What kind of event do you like? Like Music or Sports or anything else?
I'd love a Music event here in Philadelphia.
I found 7 of them. Blueface is performing at The Fillmore Philadelphia on March 2nd at 7 pm.
Sounds great. I want to reserve 3 tickets to it.
So 3 tickets to Blueface on March 2nd in Philadelphia?
Yes, that's it. Where is their venue?
Their venue is at 29 East Allen Street. Your reservation was successful, have fun!
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you further?
No, thanks a lot.
Have an amazing day.
Can you check my planner and see when I am free on 8th of March?
On March 8th you are free from 1:45 pm until 10 pm.
ok fine.
Is there an event you would like me to add on that day?
No I dont need anything added but can you find me an activity to do that day.
Which city are you wanting me to search?
Something in Philly.
Music or sports or what type of event?
I think Music.
There are 3 events, one is Conan Gray on at The Fillmore Philadelphia at 8 pm on March 8th, he has a big following.
Sounds perfect, book me a ticket.
How many would you like.
Just 1 please.
To confirm then that is 1 ticket to see Conan Gray on March 8th in Philadelphia.
Yes that suits fine.
You booking has gone through I hope you have fun.
Where is the venue?
At 29 East Allen Street.
That's all thanks so much for your help.
Have a lovely day.
Show me when I am Available next Friday.
You are available from March 8th at 4:30 pm to 5:30 pm.
When am I available Monday next week.
You are available from 3:30 pm to 10 pm on March 4th.
Sounds great thanks.
Can I do anything else for you?
I need something fun like a blues concert in Phoenix.
Greensky Bluegrass is at the Van Buren on March 4th at 6:30 pm.
That sounds great thanks.
Do you want to buy tickets?
Yes please, I need 2.
You want 2 tickets to Greensky Bluegrass on March 4th in Phoenix, correct?
No actually I need 4.
You want to buy 4 tickets for the event in Phoenix, correct?
Yes that is correct.
Your tickets are confirmed, enjoy the show.
What is the address?
It's located at 401 West Van Buren Street.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a nice day, goodbye.
I need to know my free time slots.
When do you want to check your schedule?
Check it for Thursday next week.
On March 7th you have free time slot from 7 pm to 11 pm.
That is great. I want to find something to do on that day, show me things in Phoenix, AZ.
Are you looking for a certain type of event? Either Music, Sports or another type?
Is there any concert going to happen there?
There are 3 events you might like. There is Greensky Bluegrass playing at The Van Buren on March 7th at 8:30 pm.
Where is the place located?
The address is 401 West Van Buren Street.
That sounds great.
Do you want to buy some tickets?
Yes, please. Get three tickets for me and my friends.
Please confirm: Booking 3 tickets for Greensky Bluegrass on March 7th in Phoenix.
That is correct.
The tickets have been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all for now.
Have a great day.
When does my calendar show I'm free?
Which day?
The 8th of March.
You have time free from 2:45 pm until 11 pm on March 8th.
I see.
Should I add something to your scheduler.
Not right now.
Do you need further assistance?
What would I like to do there on that day?
Which city and what event type would you prefer?
A Concert in NY would be awesome.
La Boom is hosting Americo, which many like, this March 8th at 8 pm.
What are my other choices?
Pier 17 is hosting Ben Harper at 8 pm on March 8th.
What are some other good choices?
On March 8th at 6 pm Knockdown Center is hosting a much liked Blowout Music Festival.
That's perfect.
Shall I purchase seats for you?
I want 4 tickets.
I will purchase 4 tickets for the Blowout Music Festival on March 8th in New York with your permission.
Permission granted but I need an address.
You have booked the event located at 52-19 Flushing Avenue Maspeth.
You're wonderful.
Do you need my help again?
Not right now, thanks.
Enjoy the day.
What are my free times on the 12th?
On March 12th you have an empty time slot between 6:15 pm and 11 pm.
That is great.
Do you want to add something to your calendar?
No, not right now.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, please find something interesting to do on that day. Are there any Games going to happen?
Where do you want to look for?
Search in Philadelphia.
There is Eagles Vs Cowboys on March 12th at 6 pm. It is taking place at Lincoln Financial Field.
What is the address?
The address is 1 Lincoln Financial Field Way.
Sounds good but I think I prefer a music event, is there anything rock related?
There is 1 event you might like. The Melvins are playing at Underground Arts on March 12th at 7:30 pm.
What is the address of the place?
The address is 1200 Callowhill Street.
That sounds great.
Do you want to buy tickets?
Yes, please buy three tickets. Will be going with some friends.
Please confirm: Booking 3 tickets for The Melvins on March 12th in Philadelphia.
That is correct.
The tickets have been booked.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
What is my availability?
On which date?
On Monday next week.
On March 4th, you are available from 9 am until 11 pm.
Okay. Thanks for the info.
Should I add the event?
No. That's okay.
Is there anything I can do for you?
I'm looking for some interesting things to do there.
In which city and what do you prefer?
I'm looking for a sports event in Vancouver, BC.
The Whitecaps vs Colorado Rapids event on March 4th takes place at BC Place at 6:30 pm.
What is the address of the place?
It is a football event taking place at 777 Pacific Boulevard.
Great. Can you help me reserve tickets?
How many in your party?
I need 1 ticket.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 ticket for the Whitecaps Vs Colorado Rapids event on March 4th in Vancouver.
Yes. That's it.
Your booking was successful. Emjoy your event.
Thanks. That's all.
Okay. Have a great evening.
Can you tell me when I have free time on my schedule?
What day would you like to review?
I'd like to check March 11th.
You have free time available starting at 2:15 pm and ending at 9 pm on March 11th.
That sounds good. Can you find me something to do that will fit in that time frame? I'd like to attend a Music event and I prefer Rock.
Where would you like to begin the search?
I need something in or around Vegas.
I have 1 event you might like. Young the Giant will be performing at Downtown Las Vegas Events Center - DLVEC on March 11th at 7:30 pm.
I'd like to purchase one ticket.
You'd like 1 ticket to s ee Young the Giant on March 11th in Las Vegas. Is this correct?
Yes, that is correct. Can you tell me where the venue is located?
It's located at 200 South 3rd Street. Your ticket has been purchased. Enjoy the show!
Thank you for the assistance.
Is there anything else I can do for you today?
No, you've covered everything. Thank you again.
You're very welcome. Enjoy the rest of your day.
I need to know when I am available.
What day?
13th of this month.
On March 13th, you are available from 3:45 pm to 11 pm.
Cool.
Do you want to add an event to your calendar?
No, not now.
Anything else?
I want to find something to do in Seattle that day.
Music? Sports? Museums?
I like music.
Cody Johnson is playing at the Flamingo Lot on March 13th at 7:30 pm.
Perfect, reserve me 4 tickets.
Please confirm, 4 tickets for Cody Johnson on March 13th in Seattle.
Yes, what is the address?
Your reservation is complete. The address is 5500 Phinney Avenue North.
Thanks!
Anything else?
No, that is all. Thanks!
Have a nice day.
Tell me when I am free.
What day shall I search?
Search next Tuesday.
You are free from 9 am to 11 pm on March 5th.
That is great. Find me something fun to do that day.
What city do you want to visit?
Find me something fun in NY.
Do you like Music, Sports, or some other type of category?
Search for Music events.
Amber Run Brooklyn is playing at Warsaw on March 5th at 7:30 pm.
What is their location?
They are located at 261 Driggs Avenue, Brooklyn.
That is great, but what else can you find?
Americo is playing at La Boom on March 5th at 7 pm.
That is good, but what else is there?
Blowout Music Festival is at the Knockdown Center at 6 pm on March 5th.
That is perfect.
Shall I get you tickets?
Yes, but me two tickets.
You want 2 tickets to the Blowout Music Festival in New York on March 5th, correct?
That would be correct.
Your tickets are ordered. I hope you have fun.
Thanks a bunch. I don't need anything else.
Have a good day.
Can you tell me when i am available.
On which date you want to know?
The day is 6th of this month
On march 6th there is 1 empty slots on your calendar. The empty slot begins at 2 pm and ends at 9 pm.
This is cool. I want to do something interesting on that day.
Do you want any particular event? like music or sports etc.
Sports is my favorite.
Do you want me to search in any particular city?
I am searching around Sacramento, CA.
One event called Republic Vs Toros is very famous which takes place at Papa Murphy's park on march 6th at 6:30 pm.
This is too good.
Are you like to purchase tickets for this event?
Yes, of course.
Number of tickets you want?
I need one ticket.
Please give confirmation details: 1 Ticket booking for the event Republic Vs Toros on march 6th which takes place in Sacramento city.
Fine, this is okay for me.
Your booking is confirmed . Have a nice time there.
Thanks a lot
Are you need any other help?
No, thank u so much
Have a wonderful day.
Hi, could you tell me when am I available?
Which date are you referring to?
On the March 7th, please.
You are free from 12:30 pm to 11 pm on March 7th.
I see, thank you!
Would you like me to schedule an event for you?
No, that is not necessary.
Could I further assist you then?
Could you help me find some nice Jazz events taking place in Philadelphia on that day?
Any preference on the type of events you will like?
I would prefer Music events please.
Sure, there is 1 event by Lauv held at The Fillmore Philadelphia which occurs at 8:30 pm on March 7th.
I see, could I reserve one tickets for this event?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 1 to the Lauv event in Philadelphia on March 7th.
Sorry, could you change it to 4 tickets instead?
Sure, please confirm your reservation for 4 to the event in Philadelphia.
Yes, I am fine with that. May I know where the event is held at?
Your reservation has been made, have fun! This event takes place at 29 East Allen Street.
I see, that is all I need, thank you!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
Tell me when I am available.
What day would you like to know?
The day is next Thursday.
The day is March 7th. You have an empty spot that begins at 4:45 pm and ends at 10 pm.
That sounds perfect.
Could I assist you with something else?
I'd like to look for something fun to do on that day. I enjoy American Football and Sports activities, and am searching for something near LAX.
I discovered 3 activities you may enjoy. Trojans Vs Bulldogs is popular, and will occur at LA Memorial Coliseum. It will occur on March 7th at 8:30 pm.
What is the location of the event?
The event is located at 3911 Figueroa Street.
That's fine. But could you look for alternative activities?
Usc vs Ucla is well received. The event occurs at LA Memorial Coliseum. It will occur on March 7th at 6 pm.
Where is the location of the event?
The event is located at 3911 Figueroa Street.
That is wonderful news.
Would you like to purchase tickets for the activity?
Yeah, I'd like to purchase tickets.
How many tickets do you want?
I'd like three tickets.
Please verify the following information: book tickets for Usc vs Ucla. You have 3 tickets booked. The event occurs at Los Angeles, on March 7th.
Nah. I'd like 2 tickets.
Please verify the following information: you have 2 tickets booked. The event date is March 7th.
Yeah, that's fine by me.
Your booking is confirmed. Have fun there!
Thank you so much for your help. That's all.
Have a wonderful afternoon.
Am i free on 3rd of march?
For March 3rd there is free slot form 6 am to 9 pm
ok, Find me some any baseball sports in Phoenix, AZ on that day
there are 5 events of which there is a Arizona Vs La Dodgers game at the Chase Field on march 3rd at 6 pm
That is good
Should i buy its tickets?
Yes please buy Four
Please confirm: Booking 4 tickets for the Arizona Vs La Dodgers game at Phoenix on march 3rd at 6 pm
Yes, thats right, whats its address?
Your tickets are booked. The address is 401 East Jefferson street
Thanks, thats all for now
have a good day!
Hey, show me when I'm available on the 2nd of March. I want to see if I can take a break.
On March 2nd you're free from 1 pm to 11 pm.
Good to know.
Would you like to add a new event?
No, thanks. Find me something interesting to do in NY at that time, a Concert.
Americo is very popular and it will take place at La Boom on March 2nd at 7 pm.
Where is their venue?
At 56-15 Northern Boulevard, Woodside.
Tell me more about it.
It's a International event.
Sounds great. Please reserve me 4 tickets to it.
So 4 tickets to Americo on March 2nd in New York?
Yes that's it.
Your reservation was successful, have fun there!
Thanks a lot, that's all.
Have an amazing day.
Can you find out when I am free?
What date do you want to check?
I would like you to pick the 4th.
You have a free slot from 1 pm to 10 pm on March 4th.
Is there any other free time on next Thursday?
On March 7th you are free from 12:45 pm to 9:30 pm.
That is great.
Should I add any event to your calendar?
Nope. Cancel adding any event.
Shall I assist you with anything else?
Can you look for something to do on that day?
Do you like any particular event type? What city should I look in?
I do love Games. I need something in DC area.
There are 9 events. Would you want to attend the Mystics Vs Sun in the Entertainment & Sports Arena on March 7th that begins at 7 pm?
Can you give me more information about the event? Where is this place located?
There is a Basketball event in 1100 Oak Drive SE.
That is fantastic. Book me 2 tickets to this event.
So can you confirm that you want 2 tickets for the Mystics Vs Sun event in Washington D.C. which is held on March 7th?
Yeah that will be very good.
I have your reservation. Have fun at this place!
Thank you very much. That will be it.
I wish you a wonderful day!
Check my availability. I want to plan things.
What date do you want me to check?
Day after tomorrow is the date I am talking about.
The date will be March 3rd and you are free starting from 9 am until 9 pm.
Am I free on other time on the 10th?
On March 10th you will be free from 9 am till 9 pm.
That is great. Find me something fun to do on that day.
What sort of events would you like?
I love Music.
What city shall I look into?
Check out something in Philadelphia. That is where I will be.
There are 3 events based on your needs. Conan Gray will be at The Fillmore Philadelphia. It is on March 10th and begins at 7:30 pm. You should go there.
Can you get me more information about this event?
The event is classified as Pop.
That is ok but I think I want you to look for other events.
The Foundry is hosting a popular event called Lights on March 10th and starts at 6 pm.
Can I know more about this event?
The event is Electronica.
That is nice but what about Sports events? I am a huge fan of Baseball.
You will like Phillies Vs Braves at Citizens Bank Park. You can go there on March 10th and it begins at 6 pm.
That will be ideal.
Shall I buy you the event tickets?
Sure. Get me the tickets.
What number of tickets are you thinking of buying?
I will go there with two others. So I will be needing three tickets in all.
So you want to buy 3 tickets for Phillies Vs Braves on March 10th in Philadelphia. Is that right?
Yep. That is what I want. Also get me their address.
I have the event reserved for you, enjoy! It is located on 1 Citizens Bank Way.
Thank you very much.
Shall I help you some more?
Nope that is all. Thanks.
I wish you a nice day!
When am I available on the 12th of this month?
On March 12th you are available from 3:15 pm until 9 pm.
Sounds good. Can you find me something to do that day?
Any preferences such as Music, Sports or something else? What city should I search in?
Search for Music events in Chi-town.
I found you 2 events. How about Billy Currington at Gallagher Way?
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to buy tickets?
Yes. Get me four tickets.
Confirming that you want 4 tickets to the Billy Currington event taking place in Chicago on March 12th.
That works for me.
Your reservation is complete. Have fun!
Thanks for your help. That will be all for now.
You're welcome. Have a great day.
Hi, i need a help, i have some programs to do on next weeks, show me when i am available on Tuesday next week.
Sure, i will help you, The date i March 5th , In that date you have an empty slot starting at 6 am and ends at 11 pm
it seems good to me, i am interested to some things to do, Could you find some events for me? I like sports or baseball events in Chicago.
Okay, i have found 6 events for you at Wrigley Field, the event name is Cubs Vs Giants.
Okay, could you find some other event is New York.
Okay, i have found another event for you, The event name is Mets Vs Pirates and it is located at Citi Field.
Cool, Where is the venue located and When does the event starts?
The venue is located at 123-01 Roosevelt Avenue and the event begins at 5:30 pm
Okay, It seems good to me.
Do you need to book tickets for that event?
Yes, i need to buy tickets.
Okay, how many tickets you need?
i need only one tickets.
Please confirm the following details: the event name is Mets Vs Pirates and it is located at New York on March 5th The number of tickets is 1.
Yes, it seems good to me.
congratulations, your reservation is successful, Shall i help you with anything more?
Thanks for your great help, bye
You are welcome, Have a good day, bye
show availability now
what date then?
the date of the 8th
march 8th 1 pm 11 pm
sounds very good
say music or sports
chi-town sports
cubs vs brewers wrigley field
that works for me
wanna get tickets?
I need four
cubs vs brewers 4 tickets march 8th in chicago
I need one
cubs vs brewers 1 ticket
yes that works
1060 west addison street
thanks a lot
have a good one
When am I available?
For what date?
The 6th of this month.
On March 6th you have an empty slot starting at 12:15 pm and ending at 11 pm.
Can you find me some Sports events in Portland, OR on that date? How about Soccer?
There is a Timbers Vs Earthquakes event at Providence Park.
Where is the venue? What time does the event start?
The event starts at 5 pm and is located at 1844 Southwest Morrison Street.
Sounds good. Get me some tickets.
How many?
I need 3.
Confirming that you need 3 tickets to the Timbers Vs Earthquakes event taking place in Portland on March 6th.
No, I need four tickets.
Confirming that you need 4 tickets to the Portland event?
Yes, that works.
Your reservation is complete. Have fun!
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you with something else?
No. Thank you.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
I'm looking for more things to do to preoccupy my time the day after tomorrow. Can you tell me when I am free?
Looking at March 3rd, you are free the whole day, from 9 am to 10 pm.
Okay, now I would like to find something to fill that day.
Let's start with some basics like what type of things you want to do and the location where you would like to do them.
I would like to look at games in New York if possible.
It appears that the Mets Vs Diamondbacks game will be playing at Citi Field.
No, I don't care for that game. What else do you have?
I see here that the Mets Vs Indians game will be held at Citi Field as well.
Now that's a game I can get behind. I would like three tickets to that game please.
Okay, you would like me to reserve 3 tickets to the Mets Vs Indians game playing in New York on March 3rd, correct?
No, my friends can get their own tickets, I will only need 1 ticket.
I've changed the number of tickets to 1 on March 3rd, is that right?
Yes, that sounds better.
I was able to confirm that for you. Enjoy the game?
Thanks so much, that is all I needed right now.
Okay, enjoy the rest of your day!
Do i have any availability on the 5th?
On March 5th you have availability from 6:45 pm until 11 pm.
Good, I am looking for something to do on that day.
What interest you? Do you have a particular city I should search?
I am looking for Games in San Francisco.
I found 2 events that match your request. The Giants Vs Marlins at Oracle Park.
That sounds great to me.
Would you like to purchase tickets for this event?
Yes, I want to buy 2 tickets.
Please confirm: Purchase 2 tickets for Giants Vs Marlins in San Francisco on March 5th.
That is correct.
Your tickets have been purchased. Have fun there!
Thanks for the assistance.
May I help you with something else?
No thank you.
Enjoy your day.
Can you show me my availability?
For which date would you like to know your availability?
I'm looking for the 11th of this month.
You are free from 9:30 am to 11 pm on March 11th.
That means I have pretty much the whole day free. Can you find some things that I can do on that day?
Are you interested in any specific events like Music or Sports?
I am into Sports. Are there any Soccer events?
In which city would you like to find the events?
Find me events in Sydney.
There is 1 soccer event which is the Melbourne Knights Vs Avondale match at the Football Federation Australia.
Where is the venue located and when does the event start?
The address of the venue is 1 Oxford Street and the event starts at 6:30 pm.
That sounds good to me. Can you get me tickets to the match?
How many tickets do you want me to get for you?
Get me two tickets please.
Please confirm that you need 2 tickets to the Melbourne Knights Vs Avondale soccer match scheduled for March 11th in Sydney.
That's perfect!
Your tickets are confirmed. Have fun at the match!
Thanks a bunch!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
When am I available on Saturday this week?
On March 2nd you have an empty slot from 1:30 pm until 7:30 pm.
Good. I'd like to find some Sports events for that date. How about Football events in Berkeley?
There is a Golden Bears Vs Cougars event at California Memorial Stadium.
Sounds good. Find me one ticket.
Confirming that you need 1 ticket to the Golden Bears Vs Cougars event taking place on March 2nd in Berkeley.
No, get me 3 tickets.
Confirming that you want 3 tickets to the March 2nd event?
Yes, that's correct.
Your tickets are confirmed. Have fun!
Thanks a lot!
Is there anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
No problem. Have a great day.
What's my availability on the 13th?
On March 13th, you're free from 9:45 pm until 11 pm.
How about on March 9th?
March 9th, you have free time from 7 am until 11 pm.
Okay, that's good.
Shall I update your calendar with that event?
No, that's okay. I'd like to find a music event that day, a pop event in Yountville.
I have 1 event, which is Todd Rundgren at Napa Valley Performing Arts Center.
Okay. I'd like to buy two tickets please.
Confirming 2 tickets to Todd Rundgren on March 9th in Yountville.
Yes, thank you. What is that address?
It's 100 California Drive and the tickets have been purchased.
What time does it start?
At 6 pm.
Thank you for helping me.
Sure. Anything else?
No thank you.
Thank you very much.
Hi, could you tell me when I am available please?
On which date are you interested in?
On March 4th, please.
You are available from 1 pm to 11 pm on March 4th.
Thats sounds great!
Would you like to add an event to your calendar?
No, that is not necessary.
Could I further assist you then?
Could you help me search for activities to do on that day?
Sure, any preference on the location or type of events, such as Music or Sports events?
I would like a Concert held in the Napa area please.
Sure, there are 2 events which you might like, 1 of which is the Mandy Harvey event located at Blue Note Napa.
That sounds perfect!
Would you like to purchase the event tickets?
Sure, could you help me do so?
How many tickets are you looking at?
Just one will do.
Please confirm your purchase for 1 tickets for the Mandy Harvey event on March 4th in Napa.
Sorry, could I purchase 2 tickets instead?
No problem, please confirm your purchase of 2 tickets fo the March 4th event.
That is fine with me, where is the venue of the event?
The event is held at 1030 Main Street.
And when does the event commence?
The event commences at 6:30 pm.
Thanks so much for your help!
Do you need any other help?
No, that is all the help I need, thank you!
No worries, have a great day ahead!
Do I have free time on the 2nd of this month?
On March 2nd you have an empty time slot between 9 am and 12:30 pm
Are there other free time slots? Check on March 12th?
On March 12th you have an empty time slot between 5:30 pm and 8:30 pm.
That sounds great. What is there to do in Chicago on that day?
What type of event are you looking for? A Music or Sports event? Or which?
Look for sports events.
There are 7 events you might like. There is Cubs Vs Brewers at Wrigley Field.
What type of event is it?
It is a Baseball game.
Sure, that sounds great.
Do you want to buy tickets?
Yes, please buy some tickets.
How many tickets?
Just 1 ticket.
Please confirm: Booking 1 ticket for Cubs Vs Brewers on March 12th in Chicago.
That is correct.
The ticket has been booked.
Thanks a lot, that would be all for now.
Have a great day.
Show me my availability on the 3rd
You have a empty slot on 6 am to 9 pm on March 3rd
Sounds good to me
Should I add an event on your calendar?
No, skip that. Show me some games I can watch that day
Which city should I search for?
In Chi-town please.
I have found 7 events for you. How about cubs vs brewers at wrigley field?
What type of event is this?
It is a baseball event
Sounds perfect to me
Should I but the tickets for you?
Yes, buy them for me.
How many tickets should I book?
Just one ticket
Booking 1 ticket for the cubs vs brewers event in chicago on mArch 3rd
Cool, when does it start and where is it located?
The event starts at 6 pm and takes place at 1060 west addison street
Thanks a lot. That would be all
Have a fantastic day. enjoy the game!
I want to know when I am available on the 7th.
On March 7th you are free from 2:30 pm to 10 pm.
Sounds great to me.
Would you like to add any events that day?
No don't add anything. I want to do something that day, though.
What do you like doing?
I want to look for Games in Washington.
I have 5 events for you but what about Dc United Vs Revolution at Audi Field?
That sounds like a good one to me. Can you buy me 4 tickets.
Let's confirm the details first. Booking for 4 tickets on March 7th in Washington D.C. To see Dc United Vs Revolution.
Yes that works perfectly for me.
Your tickets have been confirmed.
Thanks for your help.
Thank you, have a nice day.
When do I have available free time?
Which date are do you want to know about?
I want to know about the 8th.
You have openings from 4:15 pm until 10 pm on March 8th.
That is great.
Do you want to add an event to your calendar?
No thanks.
Can I assist you with something else?
I am looking for something to do in District of Columbia on that day. I prefer Sports.
I found 7 events that match your request. Dc United Vs Revolution is at Audi Field.
I like the sound of that.
Do you want me to purchase tickets for the event?
Yes, I want to buy two event tickets.
Please confrim: 2 tickets for DC United Vs Revolution on March 8th in Washington D.C.
Yes, that is correct. Where is the venue?
Your reservation is complete. The venue location is 100 Potomac Avenue Southwest. Have fun!
Thanks for the help.
Can i assist you with something else?
No thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Tell me what free time I have on the 7th of this month.
You are free from 7 am to 11 pm on March 7th.
That is good. Find me cool things to do in Phoenix that day.
What genres do you like?
I like Music events.
Search revealed 3 results. Dodie is playing at The Van Buren.
That works for me. Get me two event tickets.
You want 2 tickets to see Dodie in Phoenix on March 7th. Is that correct?
That is right.
Your tickets have been ordered. I hope you have a good time.
Thanks a bunch. That is everything for now.
Have a good day.
Pull up my availability please.
For which date would you like discuss?
The 4th of March please.
On March 4th your availability starts at 4 pm and ends at 10 pm.
Great, I need to look up some things to do. Let's pull up soccer sports events in Washington D.C.
Ok, I found 1 event. El Salvador Vs Haiti at RFK Stadium.
Need more information please. When and where does this start?
Your event starts at 7:30 pm and is located at 2400 East Capitol Street Southeast.
Alright thank you.
Should we reserve some tickets now?
Yes, can you please help me buy four tickets?
please go ahead and confirm we are booking 4 tickets for El Salvador Vs Haiti. Your event is for March 4th in Washington D.C.
Yes that is right.
Your reservation was completed. Enjoy!
Thank you for helping me.
Your welcome, can I assist you with anything else?
Nope, good bye.
alright, good bye.
Tell me when I have free time.
Can you tell me for which date you want to know when you will be free?
I want you to check for March 9th.
On March 9th, you will be free from 9 am till 11 pm.
Seems nice. I also want to find things I can do for that day?
Is there a specific city where you want me to look for an event?
I am interested to find something in Atlanta.
Is there a particular event you like? It can be Music, Sports, or something else.
I am interested in finding a Concert.
The event I am looking for is the Atlanta Summer Organ Festival in Peachtree Road United Methodist Church.
Can you tell me the category of this event, and the address of the venue?
The address of the evenue is 3180 Peachtree Road Northeast, and the event is categorized as a Classical one.
Is there some other event you can recommend? More specifically I am interested in Games, and I want the event to be a Football one.
There are 4 events which you might enjoy. One of the events is the match of Falcons Vs Rams at Mercedes-Benz Stadium.
That seems nice. I want to buy four tickets for this event.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy 4 tickets for the match of Falcons Vs Rams in Atlanta on March 9th?
Yes, that is correct.
Your requested tickets have been booked. Enjoy your time there!
Can you give me the address of the venue?
The venue can be found at 1 AMB Drive Northwest.
At what time does the event start?
The event is expected to start at 7:30 pm.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I appreciate your help very much.
Have a good time!
Show me when I am free on the 11th.
On March 11th you are free from 8 am till 11 pm.
Sounds perfect. I want something to do that day.
Do you want to go to see some Music or sports, or something else?
I want to go to a concert.
Do you know in which city?
I want something in Vancouver, BC.
I have 1 event for you. The Beach boys are playing at PNE Amphitheatre.
When does this event start exactly?
The event will start at 5:30 pm and the venue is located at 2901 East Hastings Street.
This is exactly what I want.
How many tickets do you want.
Can you get me four tickets.
Let's confirm the details. You want 4 ticekts for the Beach Boys on March 11th at Vancouver.
Yes, that is it.
I have made the booking, have a great time!
Thanks for your help.
Thank you, have a nice day.
Can you show me my spare time?
On what date?
On the 12th of March.
You have a large chunk of spare time on March 12th, spanning 9 am to 11 pm.
Sounds good to me.
Want to put an event on your calendar?
Not right now.
Can I help you out further?
Can you find me some rock music playing in London on that day?
How about Crystal Lake at Boston Music Room?
When and where does it start?
At 5:30 pm at 178 Junction Road.
I think I'd rather find an electronica event in LAX.
I found 2 relevant events, including Lights at The Teragram Ballroom.
Okay, that sounds good.
Want to get tickets?
Yes I do.
How many tickets?
Two tickets, please.
You want 2 tickets for Lights at March 12th in Los Angeles?
Yes, I do.
I booked the tickets. Enjoy!
When and where does it start?
At 5:30 pm at 1234 West 7th Street.
Thanks for the help. I need nothing more.
Have a wonderful day!
What is my availability please?
On which date?
On Monday next week.
On March 4th, you're free from 10 am until 8:30 pm.
Okay, that's good.
Do you want to add something to your schedule?
No, not right now.
What else may I do for you?
I want to find a baseball event to see.
For what city?
In Los Angeles please.
What would you like to see?
Something to do with sports.
I have 2 sports event. Dodgers Vs Diamondbacks will be at Dodger Stadium.
Where is that happening?
At 1000 Vin Scully Ave.
Sounds like a good one.
Anything else today?
I want to buy tickets please.
How many would you like?
I'd like one.
Confirming 1 ticket for Dodgers Vs Diamondbacks on March 4th in Los Angeles.
Great, all set.
The reservation is complete.
Thank for your help.
It's my pleasure.
I haven't gone out to do something fun in a long time. Can you see when I'm free on my calendar?
Sure, for what date?
Can you check the 10th of this month?
Sure. It looks like on March 10th you're open from 9 am to 9:30 pm.
Awesome, I want to find something to do that day then. Can you see what's going on?
Sure. Where at, and what kind of event do you prefer? Like Music, Sports, or something else?
It would be nice to find a concert to go to in NYC.
Ok, it looks like Ben Harper is playing at Pier 17. How about that?
What else can you find? I'd be interested in going to baseball games also.
Ok, I found 7 that are coming up. How about the Mets Vs Diamondbacks at Citi Field?
Nah, what else can you find?
There's also the Mets Vs Padres at Citi Field.
Where's that venue and when does it start?
The venue is at 123-01 Roosevelt Avenue, and it starts at 7 pm.
Ok, that sounds good.
Do you want to buy tickets?
Yes, can you get me 1 ticket?
Sure. To confirm, you want 1 ticket to the Mets Vs Padres in New York on March 10th. Is that right?
Actually, I'll probably bring my roommates, so can you make it three tickets?
Sure. To confirm, you want 3 tickets to the game in New York. Is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Ok, your tickets have been booked. Have fun!
Great, thanks for your help! That's all for now.
Ok, have a good day.
I'd like to check the weather in Sunol.
The average weather is 92 degrees F with a 12 % chance of rain.
How about ATL on March 14th?
The average temperature is 86 degrees F with a 1 % chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is 16 % about.
What about on the next Wednesday?
The average temperature is 87 degrees F with a 25 % chance of rain.
Sure that would be great. I need things to do.
What types of activities are you interested in?
I'm looking at doing Sports.
The event will be Falcons Vs Buccaneers at Mercedes-Benz Stadium.
That is great. I'd like to buy tickets there.
How many tickets do I need?
I would like one ticket.
Please confirm 1 ticket for the Falcons Vs Buccaneers in Atlanta on March 6th.
That works for me.
The reservation has been made so have fun!
Thanks so much for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Tell me what the weather is going to be in San Lorenzo on March 6th.
It should be around 77 degrees with a 25 percent chance of rain.
What about humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be around 17 percent and the wind should be around 6 miles per hour.
Can you tell me the weather in SF on March 11th?
The temperature should average around 72 degrees with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Can you find me some things to do?
Do you prefer Music, Sports, or any other type of events?
Find me some Games.
Search revealed 6 events. Do you like Giants Vs Cardinals at Oracle Park?
What else do you have?
There is Giants Vs Diamondbacks at Oracle Park.
That works for me.
Do you need something more?
Buy me 1 ticket to the event.
You want 1 ticket to the Giants Vs Diamondbacks game on March 11th in San Francisco. Is that right?
Yes, that is right. What is their address and what time is first pitch?
Your ticket has been ordered. The event location is 24 Willie Mays Plaza and it starts at 6 pm.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a wonderful day.
Hi, I need to check the weather at Rohnert Park, on 3rd of March.
The average Temperature for that day is 75 degrees Fahrenheit. There is about 23 percent of chance of rain.
Yeah, okay. I am looking for somethings to do.
Do you have any preference for the events like Music or sports or anything else that I could help you find?
I would like to find Music events like Country.
There is event at SOMO Village Event Center, named Aaron Lewis.
yeah, that sounds good for me.
Do you want me to buy tickets for this event?
Yeah, sure.
How many tickets would you like to buy?
I want 3 tickets.
Please confirm the details for booking of 3 tickets for the event Aaron Lewis, on March 3rd at Rohnert Park.
Yeah, that works for me. Give me the details for the event venue and the timing?
Your reservation was made successfully. Have fun there! The Venue is located at 1100 Valley House Drive at 7 pm.
Thanks a lot for your help. That's all I need.
Have a great day.
I want to know the weather.
What city?
Atlanta, Ga please.
The temperature will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 28 percent chance of rain.
Good. I want to do something.
What do you want?
I want games on March 1st.
I found an event it's United Vs United at Mercedes-Benz Stadium.
That's great.
Will I buy you tickets for this?
Yes please.
How many tickets?
Just four please.
Okay, you want 4 tickets for United Vs United on March 1st at Atlanta. Please confirm.
I want three tickets only.
You want 3 tickets for United Vs United event?
That's excellent!
Reservation done. Enjoy!
Thank you for your help.
Have a good day.
What's the weather in Napa for March 2nd?
The forecast calls for average temperature of 72 degrees for the day. There is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed is forecast at 5 miles per hour.
Okay. What's to do there?
What type of events do you like? You can give me a keyword like music or sports.
I am looking for a concert.
I have 1 event you may like. How about Roy Ayers at Blue Note Napa?
That's good. I would like to buy tickets.
How many tickets would you like?
I want 4 tickets please.
Please confirm: You are booking 4 tickets for Roy Ayers on March 2nd in Napa.
No, sorry, please make that two tickets.
Please confirm: You are booking 2 tickets for Roy Ayers.
Yes, that's correct.
Your reservation has been made. Have fun!
Thanks very much. That's all.
Have a great day.
What's the weather forecast for Portland, OR on the 5th of this month?
The average temperature for the day will be 56 degrees. There is a 12 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is about 24 percent.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed will be 9 miles per hour.
Okay. I need something to do.
What are you interested in?
I am looking for a concert.
How about Bryan Adams at Theater of the Clouds?
Where is that venue located? When is the event?
The venue is located at 1016-1098 North Center Court Street. It starts at 7:30 pm.
That's good. I want to buy tickets for that one.
How many tickets do you want?
Three tickets please.
Please confirm: you are reserving 3 tickets for Bryan Adams, on March 5th, in Portland.
Yes, that's good.
Your reservation has been made. Have fun!
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
What is the weather forecast for LA on March 5th?
The average temperature for the day is forecast to be 87 degrees. There's a 12 percent chance of rain.
Okay. What's there to do?
What type of things are you interested in?
I am interested in games.
The next event will be Dodgers vs Giants at Dodger Stadium.
Okay, cool. I'm also looking for a pop concert. What's on?
How about Girl In Red at The Teragram Ballroom?
What else is happening? How about a jazz event?
I have 1 event you may like. That's Jordan Rakei at the Masonic Lodge at Hollywood Forever.
When does that one start?
That event starts at 6:30 pm.
That's perfect.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I want to buy tickets to that event.
How many did you need?
Just 1 ticket please.
Please confirm these details. You are booking 1 ticket for Jordan Rakei in Los Angeles on March 5th.
No, sorry, please make that 3 tickets.
OK, confirming your update. You are buying 3 tickets for the event on March 5th.
Yes, that's right. Where is the venue for that?
Your tickets have been booked. The venue is located at 5970 Santa Monica Boulevard. Have a great time!
Thanks very much.
Can I help with anything else?
Nope, that's all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Check weather conditions for March 7th in Vancouver please.
The weather will be about 63 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind factor? How humid will it be?
Humidity should be around 11 percent with the wind factor at 13 miles per hour.
I see, I'm trying to find something to do there.
Ok, I can help with that. What are you interested in?
Concert would be nice. I haven't done one in awhile.
Well, i've found 4 events you may be interested in. Starting with Billy Idol at PNE Amphitheatre.
Sounds good to me.
Glad to help. Can I assist further?
I would like to buy two tickets.
Ok, I can help with that. Please confirm you would like to buy 2 tickets to Billy Idol playing Vancouver on March 7th. Is this correct?
Yeah. Go ahead and book.
Great, Your reservation is complete. Have fun at the concert!
I will. Tell me the address please.
The address is 2901 East Hastings Street.
Thanks for that information.
your welcome. Can I help further?
Nope, that was all.
Ok, Have a great day.
Will you check the weather in San Francisco on March 3rd?
Average temperature is 83 degrees Fahrenheit with 27 percent chance of rain.
I am looking for Games. Any Baseball events?
I found 2 events. Giants Vs Nationals at Oracle Park.
What's the address and start time?
24 Willie Mays Plaza at 6 pm.
Anything else?
Giants Vs Rockies at Oracle Park.
Sounds good. Will you buy me tickets?
How many?
Two.
Please confirm 2 tickets for Giants Vs Rockies on March 3rd in San Francisco.
Perfect.
Reservation is complete. Enjoy!
What's the address and start time?
24 Willie Mays Plaza at 5 pm.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like on March 2nd in Sacramento?
Sure. The average temperature will be 93 degrees and the chances of rain will be 27 percent.
What about the wind and humidity?
4 mph and 24 percent.
Sounds alright. I want something fun to do.
What kind of activity would you be interested in? Music? Sports? Something else?
Sports. Maybe a soccer game?
There is 1 soccer game: Republic vs Toros at Papa Murphy's Park.
What time does that game begin?
6:30 pm.
What's the address of Papa Murphy's Park?
1600 Exposition Boulevard.
Perfect. Can you get me some tickets?
What number of tickets?
3.
You want 3 tickets to see the Republic vs Toros game in Sacramento on March 2nd?
That's right.
I bought your tickets. Enjoy the game!
Thank you very much. I don't need anything else.
Enjoy your day.
Can you tell me the weather in Yountville?
Sure, the average temperature today is 75 degrees Fahrenheit. There's a 7 percent chance of rain.
Sounds good, can you find me a Music event to go to on the 1st of March?
There's a Todd Rundgren performance at the Napa Valley Performing Arts Center.
That sounds great.
Should I buy your tickets?
Yes, please buy them.
How many would you like?
Just one thanks.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like 1 ticket to Todd Rundgren in Yountville on March 1st.
Yes, that's correct.
Your booking is complete, have fun.
Thanks so much.
No worries, is there anything else?
No, nothing else.
Okay, see you.
What's the forecast for the March 14th?
In which city?
Stanford.
It should be 82 degrees F that day with a 5 % chance of rain.
Any wind?
Just 5 miles per hour.
Ok, I'm looking for something to do.
Do you like music or sports or other events?
Look for games.
I found 1 event. Cardinal vs Ducks at Stanford Stadium.
What kind of event? Where?
Football at 625 Nelson Road.
Sound good.
Do you want tickets?
Yes, I do.
Number?
Just 2.
Please confirm: 2 tickets to Cardinal vs Ducks at Stanford March 14th.
Yes, what time is that?
Your tickets are booked. It's at 6:30 pm.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No,thanks.
Have a nice day.
Can you tell me the weather in ATL on March 1st? I may need to dress differently.
For ATL on March 1st, the average temperature should be 86 degrees with a 28 percent chance of rain.
Okay that's not too bad. Can you suggest good ideas for events that I can take part in?
What type of event would you like to attend? Try saying Music or Sports for example.
I'm in the mood for Games. Search those for me.
There are 2 events that fall into that category. A good event is United Vs United taking place at Mercedes-Benz Stadium.
Oh that sounds perfect for me.
Would you like me to purchase tickets to this event?
Of course. Please purchase the tickets right away.
How many ticket purchases would you like me to make?
Buy four tickets for the United Vs United game.
Tell me if this is correct. You want 4 tickets for the United Vs United game on March 1st in Atlanta?
That's exactly right.
Your reservation has been made and confirmed. Please enjoy your game.
Thank you for all your help.
Do you require any other assistance today?
That will be all for now thanks.
You are quite welcome. Enjoy the rest of your day.
Check for me please the weather on 11th of this month in District of Columbia.
Will be 25 percent chance of rain and average temperature for the day should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
Tell me how it will be humidity and wind.
Around 58 percent will be the humidity and average wind speed should be 8 miles per hour.
It's okay for me. Help me find something to do then.
What do you prefer?
I would like to find something in Games.
Nationals Vs Braves is on Nationals Park.
Some events in Baseball you can find me?
I have 2 options for you that you might like.Nationals Vs Diamondbacks is the event and it is at Nationals Park.
When does this begin?
Will start at 5:30 pm
Are others events available?
At Nationals Park is Nationals Vs Rockies.
Sounds perfect,buy for me tickets.
How many tickets would you like to buy?
Four tickets will be good.
Book 4 tickets at Nationals Vs Rockies in Washington D.C. on March 11th.Is it okay for you?
Yes is good.Tell me the location of the venue and when will start.
The reservation was made.You can find it at 1500 South Capitol Street Southeast and is starts at 5:30 pm.Have fun!
Thank you for your help!That's what I wanted now.
Have a nice day!
Can you tell me what the weather will be in Sonoma on the March 12th?
The temperature that day should average 86 degrees with a 15 percent chance of rain.
What about Brisbane on March 8th?
It should average 83 degrees with a 0 percent chance of rain.
I'd also like to go to a concert.
I found 1 event you might like. It's the Star City Music Festival at Brisbane Community Park.
Where is it and what kind of music will they have?
It's a blues event at Brisbane, California 94005, United States.
That sounds good.
Would you like to reserve tickets?
Yes, I'd like to get 2 tickets.
To confirm: You'd like 2 tickets for the Star City Music Festival in Brisbane on March 8th.
That's right. What time does it start?
It starts at 5:30 pm. Your reservations are made, have a great time!
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
Could you please check for me the weather in Marshall on march 2nd?
The average temperature should be 84 F with a 14 % chance of rain
Thanks, and what about March 14th?
the average temperature should be 78 F with 15 % chance of rain
Thanks, and what about Vancouver, BC?
The average temperature should be 64 F with 30 % chance of rain
Perfect, thanks
Is there anything else I can do for you?
Could you suggest me things to do please?
Is there something are you interested in?
I'd like to go to something concerned with music
Here is 1 event that may suit you: Beach boys at PNE amphitheatre
That sounds good
Would you like to buy tickets for the event?
Yes, please, I'd like to have tickets
How many tickets do you need?
I need two tickets
Please confirm the following details: 2 tickets for beach boys on march 14th in Vancouver
Yes, that's it. When does the event start?
Your reservation has been successfully confirmed. The event will start at 6:30 pm
Thank you so much, that's all I needed
Have a good day
I need to check the next Wednesday weather please.
Which city do you want to check in?
In San Jose.
The average temp is 87 degrees and there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
Okay, can you find me some games?
I found 1, Cruz Azul Vs Atlas at Avaya Stadium.
Where is it located?
The stadium is at 1145 Coleman Avenue.
That's perfect, I need to purchase a ticket.
How many do you need?
I need 1 ticket.
I have 1 ticket for Cruz Azul Vs Atlas on March 6th in San Jose.
Yes that's perfect.
Your reservation has been made. Have fun!
Thanks for your assistance.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Please check the weather in LAX for March 10th.
The average temperature for the day is forecast at 91 degrees, with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I will need something fun to do. Are there any concert events? I prefer country.
I have 1 event you may like. How about Bill Callahan at the Lodge Room?
That sounds good to me. Let's buy tickets.
How many tickets do you want?
Just one ticket, please.
Please confirm: I am booking 1 ticket for Bill Callahan on March 10th in Los Angeles.
Yes, that's perfect.
Your reservation has been made. Have a great time!
When does the event start?
It starts at 6:30 pm.
Thanks, that's all I needed.
Have a good day.
I want to know how the weather is in Seattle, WA
From what I can see the temperature for the day will be at an average of 74 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 32 percent chance of raining.
Alright, fine. I also want to find things which I can do.
Do you have a specific kind of event in mind? It can be an event of Music or Sports or something else.
I usually enjoy Music events.
There are 2 events which match what you want. One of the events is Cody Johnson at Flamingo Lot.
Are there other events which I might enjoy? More specifically I am looking for Sports events, especially I like Baseball events.
There are 7 events which you might like. One of the events is the match of Mariners Vs Angels at T-Mobile Park.
That seems nice to me.
Would you like booking tickets for this event?
Actually yes, I want to book tickets for this event.
Is there a specific date for the event you looking for? Which is the number of tickets you want to buy?
I want to buy 3 tickets for the event on 9th of March.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy 3 tickets for the maatch of Mariners Vs Angels on March 9th in Seattle.
That's not right, because I want two tickets for the event on 11th of March.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy 2 tickets for the event which happens on March 11th?
Alright, that suits me well.
Your booking has been made. Enjoy your time there!
I appreciate your help! That would be all.
Have a good time!
Can you tell me what the weather is like on the 11th in Livermore?
It's gonna be 80 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rainfall
Sure, let's find things to do there then
What kind of things?
Let's go to a concert!
Josh Groban is gonna play at Concerts at Wente Vineyards
What kind of genre is he? And where is the venue?
He's a pop singer, and it's located at 5050 Arroyo Road
That sounds fun
Should I book you a ticket
Yes, just one is fine.
1 ticket to Josh Groban on March 11th in Livermore, yes?
Yes that's right
Your reservation is made, enjoy the concert
Thanks for that
Should I do anything else for you
No that's it thanks
Have a good one then!
Please check the weather in Philadelphia for 1st of this month.
The average temperature is 81 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain.
what is the expected humidity?
The humidity will be around 23%.
Great. I would like to find something to do.
What type of events do you like, such as Music or Sports?
Please look for games.
There is the owls vs knights at Lincoln Financial Field.
That soudns perfect.
Would you like to purchase tickets?
Yes, I would like to buy tickets.
How many tickets will you need?
I would like three tickets.
Please confirm 3 tickets to the Owls vs Knights on March 1st in Philadelphia.
Yes, and where is the venue located and what time does it start?
Your reservation is successful. The game is at 1 Lincoln Financial Field Way and is at 7:30 pm
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else today?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a great day!
I want to see the weather forecast.
Is there a specific where you want to check the weather for?
I want to see the weather forecast for San Diego.
From what I can tell the average temperature in San Diego should be 90 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is only 1 percent chance of raining.
Alright, fine. Though I don't want to get bored, so I want to find things I can do.
Is there a specific kind of event you are interested in?
I usually enjoy attending the events which are categorized as Concert.
There are 10 events which match what you want. One of the events is Alejandro Sanz and it is at Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater.
Is there some other event I can attend?
Another event which you might enjoy is ALy And Aj, which is at The Observatory North Park.
Are there other events which are available to me, for example a Sports event?
There is a match of Padres Vs Brewers at the Petco Park.
That seems nice to me. I would like to have tickets bought for this event.
Can you tell me the number of tickets you want to have?
I am in need of having 4 tickets.
Do you have a specific date in mind for the event?
I would like for the event to be on 2nd of this month, since I will be free on that date.
Can you please confirm that you want to buy 4 tickets for the match of Padres Vs Brewers in San Diego, which will happen on March 2nd?
That suits me well. Could you please tell me the time when the event will start, and the location of the venue of the event?
The location of the venue is at 100 Park Boulevard, and it starts at 5:30 pm. Your tickets have been bought. Enjoy the event!
I appreciate your help very much!
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for your help.
Have a good time!
What's the weather forecast for March 13th?
What city do you want the forecast for?
Stanford
The expected temperature for that day is 73 degrees with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I'd also like to find something to do. Any games going on? I really like football.
I found 1 game you might like. The game is the Cardinal vs Wildcats at Stanford Stadium.
Yes, that sounds good.
Should I buy tickets for the game?
Yes, please.
How many tickets would you like?
I only need one ticket.
Please confirm the details: You are getting 1 ticket for the Cardinal vs Wildcats in Stanford on March 13th.
Yes, that's perfect.
I've made the reservation. Enjoy the game!
Thanks, that's it for now.
Have a great day!
I want to know what the weather is like in Phoenix.
The temperature is 89 degrees Fahrenheit with 15 percent chance of rainfall.
That sounds great. I want to attend games. What is available?
There is the Arizona vs La Dodgers at Chase Field.
What type of game is that and when does it start?
It is a baseball game and it starts at 5:30 pm.
That sounds interesting.
Would you like tickets?
Yes, I want two tickets.
When would you like to attend?
next Friday would be great.
You want 2 tickets to see the Arizona vs La dodgers game on March 8th in Phoenix?
I want four tickets for the 11th of March.
You want 4 tickets for the game on March 11th?
Yes, that would be fine.
I have made the reservations. Enjoy the game.
Thanks very much.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
No. Thanks very much.
Enjoy your day.
Can you tell me the weather on 13th of March in Orinda?
Sure, the temperature is expected to be about 78 degrees with a 15 percent chance of rain
How about the wind?
Wind speed is expected to be 2 miles per hour.
How about weather in Sacramento, CA on March 1st?
The temperature is expected to be about 82 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain
What about humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be 27 percent with a wind speed of 7 miles per hour
Okay, show me some things to do there.
What kind of events are you interested in?
Find me some games.
Okay, I have found 1 event to your specifications. How about republic vs toros at papa murphy's park?
What's the time and category for this event?
The soccer event starts at 5:30 pm
Sounds good. I want to buy three tickets to this event
Sure, Booking 3 tickets for republic vs toros in Sacramento on March 1st
Okay, where is the venue?
Booking confirmed. The venue is 1600 exposition Boulevard
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a fantastic day ahead!
What will the weather be like in New York on March 7th?
A 15 percent chance of rain and an average temperature of 65 degrees.
Great, thanks, I want to find something to do.
Like what, what would interest you?
I want to find Sports.
I came across 7 events you may like, one is Mets Vs Dodgers at Citi Field.
That one works buy me a ticket please.
How many ticket do you want?
Just the one.
You want 1 ticket for the Mets Vs Dodgers game on March 7th in New York, correct?
Yes, that's what i want. Where is it at?
Your ticket has been purchased have a good time. You will be going to 123-01 Roosevelt Avenue.
Thanks you and goodbye.
Have a super day.
May I know the weather on March 3rd?
In which city?
Las Vegas please.
It's going to be 91 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 22 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy it's gonna be?
Humidity is around 44 percent and the avaerage wind speed should be 6 miles per hour.
Good. I want something to do.
What do you want?
I want concert.
I found an event it's Life Is Beautiful Festival and it's at Downtown Las Vegas Events Center - DLVEC.
Any other events please?
I found an event and it's Young The Giant at Downtown Las Vegas Events Center - DLVEC.
Good, I want tickets for it.
How many?
Just 2 please.
Okay, you want 2 tickets for Young The Giant on March 3rd at Las Vegas.
Yes, that's good.
Reservation done. Enjoy there.
Thank you for your help.
Have a good day.
On March 13th, I wish to check the weather in Yountville.
The average temperature is 93 degree Fahrenheit. There are 13 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected humidity?
It is around 24 percent.
Sure. I am searching for some thing to do?
What is your interest?
I am searching for Music.
The event Todd Rundgren at Napa Valley Performing Arts Center.
What is the category of the event? Where it is located?
It is a Pop event at 100 California Drive.
It is nice to me.
Shall I book the tickets for this event?
I wish to book three tickets for the event.
Kindly ensure that, on March 13th, 3 tickets have been booked for the event Todd Rundgren at Yountville.
Yes. It is good for me.
Your booking has been done. Have a nice time there!
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any other help?
Nope. Thank you so much for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
What will the weather be on March 13th in SD?
The average temperature will be 75 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Yes. I need something to do.
Do you have a preference like music, sports or something else?
I want to go to a concert.
I found 6 options. Would you be interested in Alejandro Sanz at the Cal Coast Credit Union Amphitheater.
That sounds perfect.
Do you want me to book tickets?
Yes. Please book four tickets.
Please confirm you want me to book 4 tickets for the Alejandro Sanz concert on March 13th in San Diego.
Yes. That is perfect.
Your reservation has been successfully booked.
What is the address and start time of the concert?
The venue address is 5500 Campanile Drive. The concert start at 6:30 pm.
Thanks for your help. That's all.
Please enjoy your day!
Hi there, may I check the weather in Berkeley now please?
The temperature there today should be 91 degress Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of rain.
Sure, could you help me find some things to do please?
Any preference on the type of event, such as Music or Sports?
I would prefer international concert events, thanks.
There is a Berkeley World Music Festival currently held at 2500 Durant Ave.
Where is the venue located?
It is located at 2500 Durant Avenue.
That sounds great to me! Can you help me reserve some tickets for the event too please?
How many tickets would you like and for which day?
I would like 4 tickets on the 11th of March please.
Please confirm your reservation for 4 tickets for the Berkeley World Music Festival in Berkeley on March 11th.
Sure, that's great.
I have made your reservation, enjoy!
May I know when does the event start?
It will commence at 6 pm.
I see, that's all the help I need, thank you!
Sure, have a great day ahead!
Can you show me what the weather would be like for March 3rd?
Which city should I check the weather for?
I want to search for Anaheim
Okay, the average temperature is expected to be 87 degrees with a 22 percent chance of rain
How about humidity and wind?
The humidity is expected to be 35 percent with a wind speed of 2 miles per hour.
Okay, find me things to do there. baseball events would be nice.
What kind of events are you looking for?
I am looking forward to some games
I have found 1 event- the La angels vs houston at angel stadium of anaheim.
Sounds perfect to me
Should I also book the tickets?
Yes, I want to book 4 tickets to it.
Okay, Booking 4 tickets for La angels vs houston in anaheim on March 3rd.
Okay, sounds good.
Your booking is confirmed.
Thanks a lot!
Do you need my help with anything else?
No, thanks again.
my pleasure, enjoy the game.
I'd like to see the weather condition at LAX
It's 76 degrees there with a 28% chance of rain
OK, great, find me things to do there
What kind of things?
I wanna go to a concert
I found 10 of those including Bill Callahan at the Lodge Room
I don't want that, find me something else
How about Girl in Red at The Teragram Ballroom?
That sounds awesome to me.
Do you want to buy tickets for this event?
Yes I wanna buy two tickets on the 5th of this month
Confirming 2 tickets for Girl in Red on March 5th in Los Angeles yes?
Make that three tickets and on the 9th instead
3 tickets on the March 9th then?
Yes that's right
It's done, have fun
Thanks for that
Sure , can I do anything else?
No that's it for now
Cool, enjoy your concert!
Please tell me what the weather will be in London On March 3rd.
The weather reports it has an average temperature of 88 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. What is there to do?
What are your interests?
A concert would be great.
Shakey Graves is playing at the Dome.
When does it start? Where is the concert located.
It is located at 2A Dartmouth Park Hill and starts at 7 pm.
Great. I would like to buy 3 tickets.
So you want me to reserve 3 tickets for the Shakey Graves Concert that takes places on March 3rd in London?
No. Please reserve only 2 tickets please.
Okay, I will book 2 tickets to the Shakey Graves concert for you.
Thank you. That is what I need.
Your reservation is all set. Have a good time.
Thank you for everything.
Anything else I can do?
I am all set. Thanks for everything.
Have a nice day.
Could you help me check the weather in london, England on march 13th
the average temperature for the day should be 94 F with 25 % chance of rain
Thanks, I'm also looking for things to do
What kind of activity are you intrested in?
I'm looking for concert, maybe blues events
There's an event at the The Dome called Shakey Graves
Where is the venue located and when does the event start?
The event is at 2A Dartmouth Park Hill starting at 7:30 pm
Could you find me some other event like rock?
There's an event at Boston Music Room at Crystal lake
Sounds good
Would you like to buy tickets for the event?
Yes, please, I'd like to buy tickets
How many tickets do you need?
I need only 1 ticket
Please confirm the following details: 1 tickets for Crystal lake in London on march 13th
Yes, that's perfect
Your reservation has been successfully confirme
Thanks for your help, that was all I needed
Have a good day
I'd like to spend the day outdoors in Oakland, on March 6th. Please check the weather forecast for me.
The expected average temperature for the day is 90 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What about the wind speed?
The city expects an average wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
What about the expected humidity?
The expected humidity is around 43 percent.
Cool, thanks. Please find me Football events to attend.
Any particular type of event I should search for? It can be Music, Sports of anything else.
Please find Sports events.
I found 2 events you may like. How about the Raiders Vs Lions game at Oakland-Alameda County Coliseum?
That sounds very cool.
Should I go ahead and purchase tickets for the event?
Yes, please buy 1 event ticket.
Okay. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like to book 1 ticket for the March 6th Raiders Vs Lions game in Oakland.
That is correct. Please tell me where the event will be, and what time it will start.
I have successfully made your reservation. Enjoy! The event kicks off at 7:30 pm, at 7000 Coliseum Way.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No, thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Thank you and have a wonderful day!
How is the weather in Long Beach on the 7th of this month.
The temperature would be 94 degrees Fahrenheit with 26 percent chance of rain.
How windy or humid would it be?
The humidity is 39 percent and the wind speed would be 2 miles per hour.
Great. What is there to do there?
What are your interests?
Is there anything available in music?
There is 1 suitable event. There is the Long Beach Jazz Festival at the Rainbow Lagoon Park.
That would be fine.
Would you like tickets?
Yes, I would.
How many tickets?
3 tickets please.
You want 3 tickets to the Long Beach Jazz Festival on Long Beach for March 7th?
That would be fine. Where is it taking place and what is the commencement time.
I have made the reservation. It is at 400 East Shoreline Drive and the show starts at 5 pm. Have a great time.
Thanks very much. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
I want to check the weather in Brisbane on March 2nd.
The temperature on average should be 75 degrees F with a 9 % chance of rain.
What about Seattle, WA on the next Thursday.
The temperature on average should be 69 degrees F with a 16 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind and humidity like?
The humidity is 20 % and wind speed 8 mph.
I like to do baseball events.
Which event are you interested in?
I'm looking for a sports event?
I have 2 events. One is the Mariners vs Angels at T-Mobile Park.
That sounds great to me.
Would you like to buy tickets for the event?
Yes, I'd like to buy some tickets.
What number of tickets should I get.
I would like three tickets.
Please confirm for 3 tickets for the Mariners vs Angels March 7th in Seattle.
No thanks. I'd like two tickets.
Please confirm for 2 tickets in Seattle.
Yes, that would be fine.
I have a reservation made for you. Have a great time!
Where is the location?
The location is 1250 1st Avenue South.
Thanks for your help and that is all I need.
Have a nice day.
I want to search for weather condition. Please search it in Seattle, WA on the 1st.
Checked the same and found the average temperature will be 74 degrees Fahrenheit on that day and there will be chance of 32 % for rain there.
What about the Humidity range?
It is around 25 %.
Okay then, what is the Wind speed?.
It will be around 15 miles per hour.
Okay. Now, I want to search for a Sports event especially Basketball. search it for me.
Found 1 which is Huskies Vs Cougars at Husky Stadium, Is that Okay to you?
Yes, that is okay, please purchase tickets for me.
Let me know the number of tickets you need?
Please book two tickets.
Please confirm to book 2 tickets for Huskies Vs Cougars in Seattle on March 1st.
Yes, that is confirmed to proceed with booking.
Your booking was confirmed successfully.
Thank you for your help and that's all I want now.
Have a good day.
Check the weather in San Fran on the 10th of March
It's gonna be 93 degrees with a 12% chance of rain
Sure, that's good
What else do you need?
I want to find things to do there
What kind of things do you wanna do
Something music related
How about seeing Allan Rayman at August Hall?
Wow, that sounds awesome!
Do you want to buy ticket for this event?
Yeah sure, thanks
How many tickets?
I want 4 tickets please
4 tickets to Allan Rayman on March 10th to San Francisco?
Yes that works. When does the event start? And where is the venue?
Your reservation is made so head to 420 Mason Street at 6 pm for that.
Thanks so much for your help
What else can I help with?
For now it's all good
OK, enjoy your concert!
What events do I have on my calendar?
For which dates?
For the 11th of this month.
You have a Hairdresser appointment at 4:30 pm.
Great. Can I book a cab there?
For how many people?
Just one please.
You will be going to 216 Northgate One, is that correct? What type of ride would you like: Luxury, Regular, or something else?
That sounds great. I would like a Pool ride.
You want a Pool ride for 1 to 216 Northgate One, is that correct?
Yes, that right. What is the total cost?
The cab ride will cost $13.53. It should arrive shortly.
How long should I expect to wait?
The cab should be there in 6 minutes.
That's everything. Thanks for all your help.
My pleasure. Have a lovely day.
I want to check my calendar for events on the 11th of this month.
No problem. You have a Restaurant reservation at Amelie San Francisco at 12:30 pm that day.
Sounds good. Can you call me a cab there?
Sure thing. Are you going to 1754 Polk Street? Which type of ride would you prefer? You can ask for a Pool, luxury or other type of ride.
Yeah that's the address. I'd really prefer a Pool ride.
Okay, how many seats do you need?
I'm going by myself so I just need 1 seat.
Arlight. Please confirm the following for me: You want a Pool ride with 1 seat to 1754 Polk Street. Is that right?
Yes, that is correct.
Alright, your cab is booked an on the way!
Thanks a lot! That's all I need for now.
My Pleasure. Have a wonderful day.
check my calendar for events on 4th of march
You have a movie show scheduled to start at 9 pm
do I have anything else scheduled for the 9th of march?
You also have a stylist appointment at the refinery grooming club at 4:30 pm
Okay, book me a luxury cab for a group of three to get there
Is the venue 2589 mission street?
That is correct
Booking a luxury ride for 3 to 2589 mission street.
What is the cost and estimated arrival
The cost is $31.99 and ETA is 8 minutes
Thanks, that would be all
Have a great time
I would like to check events on my calendar for this Saturday.
There is a movie at 3rd Street Cinema. The event is going to begin at 8:30 pm.
This sounds fine. Can you get me a cab going there for a group of 2.
What is they type of ride you would like? It can be regular or luxury or something else. Will you be going to 620 3rd Street?
Yes that is fine with me. I would like a pool ride.
Okay, confirm these details: you would like a ride going to 620 3rd Street, with 2 seats that is a pool ride.
Yes that is fine with me. How long will it take the cab to get here?
I booked the ride and the cab is coming. The cab will be there in 3 minutes.
Thank you for your help, that was all I wanted.
Have a great day.
I want to see what events are on my calendar. Check the 10th of this month.
You scheduled a movie booking for Long Shot. The movie starts at 10 pm.
Sound great. Can you find me a cab. I prefer Regular rides. I want 2 seats.
Are you traveling to 2525 Sand Creek Road?
Yes, I am.
Please confirm the ride details: 2 seats for a ride to 2525 Sand Creek Road. You prefer regular rides.
Yes, that works.
The ride is booked!
Thanks for the help!
Can I assist you further?
No, thanks. You helped me out.
Have a great day!
Can you tell me about events on my calendar?
What date would you like to check?
Tell me what I have scheduled on the 11th of March.
You have a restaurant reservation for 6 at The Hog's Apothecary starting at 1:30 pm.
Sounds good. Can you get me a cab for 4 people to 375 40th Street?
Would you prefer a luxury or regular ride?
I'd prefer a luxury ride. I'm in a group of one.
Can you please confirm that you want a ride to 375 40th Street and need 1 seat on a luxury ride?
Actually, I want to go to 1621 Travis Boulevard #300 instead.
Please confirm the following changes. You want a luxury ride to 1621 Travis Boulevard #300.
No, I'd prefer a regular ride.
Please confirm the following changes. You want a regular ride to 1621 Travis Boulevard #300.
Yes, that works. How long before the cab reaches here and how much does it cost?
I booked your ride and the cab is on its way. It's expected in 6 minutes and will cost $24.91.
Thanks a lot for your help.
Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's all
Have a great day.
Can you tell me what I have on the 10th.
There's a restaurant reservation for 3 at Lima starting at 6:30 pm
What about the 1st?
At 2 pm there's an Apartment viewing
Great. I'll need a luxury ride for 1 to 1585 Marburg Way # 4
Please confirm: 1 luxury ride to 1585 Marburg Way # 4
Great, how long until it arrives?
Your ride is booked and 14 minutes.
Awesome, thanks so much for all your help.
Enjoy your day.
I need to check my schedule.
For what date?
For later today.
At 4:30 pm, you have a General Practitioner appointment with Sonal Aggarwal, MD.
Ok, great. Thanks.
Anything else I can do?
I need a taxi to 87 Fenton Street Suite 210. Its for a group of three.
Great. A Luxury or Regular?
A Pool ride should do.
3 for a Pool ride to 87 Fenton Street Suite 210?
No, a Luxury ride for two.
2 seats for a Luxury ride?
You got it.
The car is on the way.
Great. Thanks a lot.
No problem. What else do you have?
Nothing. I am good for now.
Great. Speak later.
I'd like to check for scheduled events on my calendar.
Sure, which day?
the 9th
You have a 5:30 pm Water Seed Concert
What do I have on March 10th
There's a 7 pm Reservation at Nopa
Awesome, I'll need a cab.
Great, how many seats? Also will you be going to 560 Divisadero Street?
Yes and only one for the cab.
Would you like regular or luxury?
I'd like to take a pool ride to Belmont Park.
Please confirm: 1 pool ride to Belmont Park
Correct, how much is it?
Your cab is booked and $14.20
Perfect, thanks.
Have a great time.
Find me events in my calendar.
What day shall I look in?
Find me events on the 3rd of March.
There is a Don Broco concert that begins at 5 pm.
Do I have any events scheduled on March 14th?
You have scheduled an Appointment with Steven C Fong at 4 pm.
That is great. I need a ride to get there.
How many people are going and do you need to get to 2211 Parkside Drive?
There are 2 people going and the address is correct.
What type of ride do you want?
Get me a Luxury ride to 39900 Blacow Road.
You want a Luxury ride for 2 people to 39900 Blacow Road. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your ride is booked and is coming for you.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Could you look at events on my calendar for the 14th of this month?
There is an apartment viewing starting at 1:30 pm on the 14th.
Are there any events scheduled on March 2nd?
On this day you have a hairdresser appointment starting at 2:30 pm.
That sounds good. Would you get me a cab to get there?
What sort of ride do you want? You can choose luxury or pool or something else.
I need a luxury ride and am in a group of 1. I need to go to 6493 Portola Drive.
Could you confirm that you want a ride to 6493 Portola Drive and that you need 1 seat in a luxury ride?
Yeah, that is good.
I have reserved your cab and it is on its way.
Thank you for helping.
Would I be able to assist with something else?
No, that is all. Thank you for helping.
Have a good day.
I'd like to check the events on my calendar.
What date did you want to find out about?
I'd like to know about Friday next week.
You have a Hairdresser appointment at 6:30 pm that day.
Sounds great. Could you find me a cab there? I need a ride to 520 Montgomery Street M02, I'm in a group of one, and I prefer a Pool ride.
Please confirm you're finding a ride for 1 seat to 520 Montgomery Street M02 and you prefer a Pool ride.
Yes, that sounds good. How much is the ride and when will the cab arrive?
Your ride has been booked and is on its way. The cab should be here in 9 minutes and it will be $8.75.
Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a great day.
I want to see my events.
On which which day?
The 14th of this month.
You scheduled a restaurant reservation at Firehouse No.1 Gastropub at 11 am.
Can you find me cab to get there. The address is 69 North San Pedro Street.
For how many people? And what type of ride do you like? You can say Luxury, Pool, or something else.
Just for 2 people and I like pool rides.
Please confirm the following details: Booking 2 seats for a pool ride to 69 North San Pedro Street.
No, my friend will likely not join me, make it for one. And change the address to 909 Hyde Street #530.
Please confirm the following details: a ride to 909 Hyde Street #530 and it's for 1 seat.
Yes that works. How long before the cab reaches me.
I booked your ride, the cab is will arrive in 3 minutes.
Thanks for the help. That's all I wanted.
Have a great day!
I need to check my calendar events.
What date do you want to see?
I want to see the 13th of this month.
You have a 1 pm Hairdresser appointment.
That is great.
Can I assist you with something else
Can you get me a cab to my appointment.
How many seats will you need?
I only need one.
You are going to 820 East El Camino Real?
Yes, that is correct.
Do you have a ride preference?
I would like a Pool rid.
Please confirm that you want 1 seat via a Pool ride to 820 East El Camino real?
Yes that is correct.
I booked you a ride and the cab is on the way.
Thanks for the help. That is all I needed.
Enjoy your day.
Can you see what I have going on in my calendar on the 9th of this month?
You have a stylist appointment at Showroom 383 Salon at 5 pm.
Okay, could you help me book a cab there?
Is the ride to 383 Miller Avenue? How many seats and what's your preferred ride type?
Yes, that's correct. It'll be for three, so let's do a pool.
I'll book that as soon as you confirm you'd like a pool for 3 to 383 Miller Avenue.
Yes, that's fine.
Your ride is on the way.
Great, thanks for the help.
Anything else you need?
Nope, that's a lot.
No problem, enjoy the day.
What are my calendar events for the 8th of March?
You have a Dentist appointment with A J Dental Lab at 12 pm on that date.
Sounds great.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Can you book me a cab to the destination?
Do you have a preference for type of ride?
Yes, I would prefer a Pool ride.
How many seat to you need in the cab. Is your destination 2664 Berryessa Road # 206?
Yes, that is where I am going. Just a seat for one.
You want a seat for 1 for a Pool ride to 2664 Berryessa Road # 206, is that correct?
Yes, that is what I want.
You are all set to go, the cab should arrive shortly.
Thank you very much for all your help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
That is everything, thanks again for your help.
My pleasure. Have a lovely day.
I want to check my calendar for the events noted on the date of 9th of this month. Please check the same.
An event name Stylist appointment at Amazon Barber Shop was noted in your calendar for the time 2 pm. Is this the one you are searching for?
Yes, that is the one. I need a Cab to go there that is to the address 949 Geneva Avenue. Book it for me.
What type of ride you like?
I go with Luxury ride.
For how many persons?
I need to book it for three persons.
I need your confirmation to book a Cab with luxury ride for 3 persons to 949 Geneva Avenue.
That is correct to proceed and let me know the cost for that ride and time will be taken by the Cab to reach my place.
Cost for that ride will be $28.99. I have booked the Cab and the same will reach you within 11 minutes.
Thank you for your help.
Any thing else you need?
Not, nothing for now. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Pull up my calendar and let's view next Monday.
I show an Appointment with Darnell Jr Robert at 12 pm.
Ok, can you schedule a cab for me to get there. I would prefer a Regular ride. Book for 1 seat going to 20632 Redwood Road # A.
Sure, please confirm 1 Regular ride being scheduled going to 20632 Redwood Road # A. Is that correct?
Yes, that is right.
Your ride is confirmed and in route.
Alright, great. That will be all.
Alright, have a wonderful day.
I want to see the events on my calendar for the 11th of March.
From what I can see in your calendar you have an event called The Drums concert which happens at 7:30 pm.
Seems fine. Would you please get me a cab, so I can go there? I want to arrive to 401 West Van Buren Street.
Is there a specific kind of ride you want to have? It can be a Luxury, Pool or something else.
I usually like having a Regular ride.
Can you tell me the number of seats you need in your cab?
Actually I would like to have a Pool ride, and for 1 person.
Can you please confirm that you want to have 1 seat in a Pool ride, to go to 401 West Van Buren Street?
That suits me well.
Your request for the ride has been made, and the cab is already on the way.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided me.
Have a good time!
I want to check out my calendar for 10th of March to see what events I have booked.
You have a 10 am appointment with Dr Ashmita Shetty.
ok grand, can you organise me a regular ride cab to get to the apppointment at 2664 Berryessa Road #104.
How many seats will you require?
2 seats please.
To confirm then you want a regular ride cab for 2 to 2664 Berryessa Road #104.
Yes that all sounds right.
You cab is booked and on th way.
How long will it be and how much money will the journey cost?
It will be with you in 3 minutes and costs in total $34.35.
Great thanks for helping.
Do you want anything else?
No thanks for helping.
Have a good one.
Can you tell me what events I have scheduled?
Sure, what day should I check?
What do I have scheduled on the 6th of this month.
Yu have a Dentist appointment that day at 5:30 pm.
Alright, I will need a cab for 1 that day to get to my appointment.
What type of ride would you like? The destination address i 4450 San Pablo Dam Road, correct?
Yes, that is the correct address and I would like a Pool ride.
Please confirm you would like to reserve a Pool ride for 1 person to 4450 San Pablo Dam Road.
Yes, that is correct.
OK, your ride has been confirmed and the cab is currently on the way.
Perfect, thanks!
Is there anything else I can do for you right now?
No, that was all.
Great, have a nice day.
I think I had something planned with a friend later today but I can't remember. Can you check my calendar for March 7th?
Sure. It looks like you have a Movie booking for Breakthrough at 10:30 pm.
Oh, right! Can you book a cab for me there right now?
Is 1069 B Street right for the address? How many seats and what kind of ride do you prefer?
Yep, that's the address. Just 1 seat in a pool ride would be perfect.
Ok. To confirm, you want to book 1 seat in a pool ride to 1069 B Street. Is that right?
Yep, that's perfect.
Your ride has been booked and is on its way.
Great, when will it be here?
It should be here in 7 minutes.
Cool, thanks for your help! That's all for now.
No problem, have a good day.
What do I have going on in my calendar on the 8th?
You have the Melvins concert at 6 pm.
What do I have scheduled for the 10th of this month?
You have a property viewing at 1 pm on that day.
Great, can you help me book a cab?
Sure, will it just be you? What type of ride should I get?
Do a pool ride for 1.
Is your dropoff at 1475 167th Avenue?
Yes, and change that to a ride for 4.
Sure, please confirm you'd like a pool for 4 to 1475 167th Avenue.
Yes, when is it getting here?
Your ride is on the way and will get to you in 5 minutes.
Great, appreciate the help.
Anything else you need?
Nope, thanks a lot.
No problem, enjoy your day.
Hi, I'd like to check my calendar.
Sure, what date would you like to check?
I'd like to know if I have anything on the 5th.
Sure, on the 5th you have an Appointment with New West Dental Laboratory at 3 pm.
Got it. Could you organize a Regular ride for two to 1300 Galaxy Way # 13?
I can. You'd like a Regular ride to 1300 Galaxy Way # 13 for 2. Is that right?
Actually, I'd like a ride to 80 Senter Road.
So instead you want a ride to 80 Senter Road, and this is still for 2 people. Correct?
Yep, that's right.
Your ride has been booked, and the cab will be here soon.
Great! Thanks for the help!
You're welcome! Have a nice day!
Get out my calendar please.
What date may I assist with?
Get the 1st please.
Well, you have a stylist appointment at Salon 815 at 4 pm.
Fine, I want a regular cab ride to there. There will be three of us going to 815 Ulloa Street.
Here's what I heard: 3 seats in a regular ride. You're going to 815 Ulloa Street.
That's exactly great.
You're booked and the cab is en route.
How long must we wait? How many clams is that?
The cab is almost there. It's 3 min. You will be charged $25.76.
Fine, I can live with that. Thanks.
Will there be anything else?
Nothing now, thanks.
Have a good ride.
I'd like to check my calendar for the 3rd of this month.
There is a Billy Idol concert at 5 pm.
That sounds good but I need a cab for 4 to 2901 East Hastings Street.
Which type of ride, Regular or Luxury?
I want a regular ride to Claws and Craws.
Please confirm Claws and Craws regular ride for 4.
Yes, that is great.
I have the ride booked and on its way.
How much is it and how long?
The ride is $20.44 and comes in 2 minutes.
Thanks so much that is all.
Have a great day.
I need to find events on my calendar.
What date are you searching for?
I am wondering about the 10th.
You will hve a viewing at Shayla apartments starting at 12:30 pm.
Is there anything scheduled on March 3rd?
You have a dentist appointment on March 3rd starting at 1:30 pm.
Sounds great. Could you get me a cab for one, regular ride preferred.
Will you be going to 4655 Hoen Avenue # 7?
Yes, that is good.
Could you confirm that you want to go to 4655 Hoen Avenue # 7 and that you need 1 seat in a regular ride?
Yes, that is fine. How long before the cab gets there?
I have booked your ride and the cab is coming. The cab will be there in 6 minutes.
How much will it be?
The ride is $10.88
Thank you for helping. That is all I need.
Have a great day.
Can you check what events are on my calendar? I'm curious about Tuesday next week.
On Tuesday you have a Property viewing scheduled for 12 pm.
Okay, thanks.
Do you need anything else at the moment?
Book me a cab to that event if you would.
What sort of ride would you like - Pool, Regular, or something else? Also, how many people are coming with you?
I'll be in a group of 3 so get us a Pool ride.
And your destination is 2625 South King Road?
Yes, that's right.
Confirm the details for me. You want to book 3 seats in a Pool taxi ride to 2625 South King Road?
Yup, that's perfect.
Alright. I've booked the ride, and the cab is on its way.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else you need right now?
No, I'm fine. Thanks again.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Check the events on my calendar for me.
What dates should I look for?
search for the 8th
You have the paper kites concert starting at 7 pm
okay, find me a luxury ride to the venue, 17 eastern parkway, brooklyn for 2
Booking a luxury ride for 2 for 17 eastern parkway, brooklyn
Actually, change that to a regular ride for one.
sure, booking 1 seat in regular ride.
Sounds good to me.
Booking confirmed. Your cab is on its way
Thanks a ton
Is there anything else I can assist you with
No, thanks once again
Have a great time there.
I'm wondering what my schedule looks like on March 7th.
At 4 pm, you are scheduled for a Hairdresser appointment.
What do I have on March 9th?
On that day at 9:30 pm, you are scheduled for a Movie at CineLux Almaden Cinema.
Terrific. Could I get a taxi there please? It should be a regular ride for 1 passenger with a destination of 2306 Almaden Road.
Confirming a regular ride for 1 to 2306 Almaden Road.
Yes, that's right.
The ride has been booked and the cab will arrive shortly.
Great, thank you!
Is there anything else you need today?
No, I am good to go.
Have a great day, thank you!
I like to check events on my calendar and the date is march 12th.
You have a Movie at AMC Brentwood 14 which starts at 10 pm.
Cool. Could you get mea cab there?
Which type of ride you want ? Is your location is 2525 Sand Creek Road and what is your seat requirement?
this is perfect for me. I need four seats with regular ride.
Please give confirmation details: Your ride to 2525 Sand Creek Road with 4 seats and a regular ride.
This is okay for me. At what time cab reaches here and what is the cost of ride?
I confirmed your ride and cab is coming within 5 minutes. cost of the ride is $42.54.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need any other help?
No, thank you very much for your help.
Have a nice day.
Search for events in my calendar.
What day shall I look in?
Find events on the 1st of this month.
There is a Stylist appointment at 11 am.
Do I have any events scheduled on the 5th?
There is an Ophthalmologist appointment with Dr. Claudia S. Pinilla, MD at 2 pm.
That is good. I need a Pool cab ride to get to 7601 Stoneridge Drive.
How many people are going?
There are two people.
You want a Pool cab for 2 people to get to 7601 Stoneridge Drive. Is that right?
No, I want a Luxury ride for one person.
You want a Luxury ride for 1 person. Is that right?
No, I want to go to the Chicago History Museum.
You want a Luxury ride to the Chicago History Museum. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your cab is booked and is coming for you right now.
Thanks a bunch. That is all.
Have a good day.
Can you check my calendar?
What date do you want?
Check the 12th of March.
At 12 pm you have an Appointment with Tri-Valley Dental Arts.
I need a cab for two. I want a Pool ride to 9260 Alcosta Boulevard.
Confirm a pool ride for 2 to 9260 Alcosta Boulevard.
Thanks that works well.
Your ride is on the way.
That is all I need.
Have a great day.
Pull up my calendar and check upcoming event dates.
I can do that, no problem. What date should we look at?
Pull up the 3rd of March please.
I show an evening event at 7:30 pm titled: Lights Concert.
Great, I will need to reserve a cab for this event.
Ok, no problem. How many people will be riding, and would you prefer a Luxury or Pool ride? Should I book this ride for 29 East Allen Street 2nd Floor?
Yes, go ahead and book. Let's do a Pool ride for 2 please.
Alright, please just confirm, booking a Pool ride for 2. Going to 29 East Allen Street 2nd Floor. Is this correct?
Yes, perfect. Thanks.
Great news, your ride is confirmed and in route.
Alright, that will be all. Thank you.
Your welcome and enjoy your day.
I want to check the events on my calendar.
No problem. What date do you have in mind?
Check events for March 11th please.
Ok got it. You have a Reservation for 3 people at Hot Crab at 7 pm.
Sounds good. Can you call a cab for me? I'm in a group of one and need a ride to 4288 Dublin Boulevard #101-102.
No problem. Do you have a preferred type of ride?
I'd like a Regular ride please.
Okay. Please confirm the following for me: You want a regular ride to 4288 Dublin Boulevard #101-102. You need a ride with 1 seat.
That's right. How much will it cost me? How long untill the cab gets here?
Your ride is booked and on the way. The fair will be $21.99 and the cab should be there in about 5 minutes.
Thanks a lot for the help.
Can I help you with anything else?
No thanks. I appreciate the help.
Thank you and have a wonderful day!
Tell me what events I have scheduled in my calendar for the 13th of this month.
You have a Doctor appointment at 12 pm.
Do I have any events for March 10th?
You have scheduled a Ophthalmologist appointment with Dr. Edward J. Saub at 11 am.
That is fine.
Do you need something more?
I need a ride to get there.
Is 344 East Hamilton Avenue your destination address?
That is right and I would like a Regular ride.
How many people are going?
There are 2 people going.
You want a Regular ride for 2 people to get to 344 East Hamilton Avenue. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your ride is confirmed and is on the way now.
When is the ride expected to be here and what is the bill?
It will arrive in 6 minutes and it costs $32.84.
Thanks a bunch. That is everything.
Have a good day.
I need to check events on my calendar.
No problem. Which date on the schedule would you like to check?
Check events on the 10th of this month for me.
Alright. You have a Chemical Brothers concert scheduled for 7 pm.
Okay, thanks. Do I have anything scheduled for March 3rd?
You have a Billy Idol concert scheduled that date for 5 pm.
Sounds good. Can you call a cab for me? I need a Regular ride with 4 seats. The address is 2901 East Hastings Street.
Okay got it. Please confirm the following: You want a regular ride with 4 seats to 2901 East Hastings Street. Is that correct?
Yeah, that's right. How much is the cab and how long until it gets here?
Your cab is booked and on the way. The fair will be $43.42 and the cab should get there in about 2 minutes.
Thanks alot for the help. That's all I need.
Thank you! Have a wonderful day.
I need to make sure I don't forget anything on my calendar.
What day are you wondering about?
That would be the 1st of this month.
You do have something happening that day at 5:30 pm, it is titled Jethro Tull concert.
Alright! I am going to need a cab for 1 when I go I'll be wanting it to take me to 1 Tennis Place Forest Hills.
Do you care what kind of ride it is like Pool or Regular even something else?
A Pool ride would probably work out good for me.
Okay you want a Pool cab ride for 1 for 1 fare to 1 Tennis Place, Forest Hills is that right?
Okay do it. How long will it take to get here how much do I need for the fare?
The cab should be in here in just 5 minutes and the fare is quoted as $11.00.
Super, you can go now.
Have a fantastic day.
check events for the 9th on my calendar
You have a dermatologist appointment that starts at 5 pm
Any other events for 5th of march?
You also have a stylist appointment at 3 pm
Okay, get me a cab there
is the venue 19655 stevens creek boulevard? How many seats and luxury or pool, which category?
Book a pool ride for one.
Booking 1 seat in a pool ride to 19655 stevens creek boulevard
How long before the cab arrives?
Booking confirmed. The cab arrives in 6 minutes
What is the cost
It is prices at $14.07
Thanks. That would be all
Have a great time.
Please check my calendar on the 14th
you have a stylist appointment at 3:30 pm
ok, can you get me a cab with regular ride to get there
how many people are in your group
there will be three people in my group
is 241 fremont hub courtyard your end destination
yes perfect
Please confirm your booking for 3 seats on a regular ride to 241 fremont hub courtyard
yes please, what is the total cost and how long is the wait
it will be $35.80 and your wait time is 6 minutes
thank you
anything else i can do for you
no that's it
have a nice day
I would like to check some calendar events.
What date are you looking at?
I would like Tuesday next week.
There is a table for 6 at Chianti Cucina at 1:30 pm.
Are there other events for March 3rd.
I have an event at 6 pm called Basta Concert.
That sounds great but I need a cab ride for one to 2047 North Milwaukee Avenue.
What is your preferred type of ride.
I like Luxury.
Please confirm for 2047 North Milwaukee Avenue 1 seat Luxury.
Yes and how much longer before the cab gets here and the cost.
I have booked the cab, it is on its way in 14 minutes for $21.00.
Thanks so much. That is all.
Have a great day.
Check my calendar for events on the 6th of March.
You have movie show at 9:30 pm.
Good, get me a cab there.
Ride type? Going to 109 Plaza Dr. Gateway Plaza Center?
Yes. Pool ride for one.
Please confirm: pool ride for 1 passenger to 109 Plaza Dr. Gateway Plaza Center.
Yes.
Your cab is on its way.
When will it get here?
7 minutes.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a nice day.
I forgot what time my plans were with my friends. Can you check my calendar for March 13th?
Sure, it looks like you have a Movie show planned for 10:30 pm that day.
Ah, right. Can you book me a cab there to 3111 Mission College Boulevard?
No problem. Would you like a Luxury, Pool, other other kind of ride?
Just a regular one is fine.
How many people are riding with you?
It will be four of us total.
Ok, to confirm, you want to book a Regular ride for 4 people to 3111 Mission College Boulevard. Is that right?
Yep, that's perfect.
Ok, I've booked your cab and it's on its way.
Great, thanks! That's all for now.
Sure, have a great day.
Hello, I need to have a look at the events on my calendar.
No problem, which date would you like to see?
I need to know what I'm doing next Thursday.
On Thursday you have a stylist appointment at Herman's Barber Shop & Supply at 2 pm.
Okay, do I have any events going on today?
Today you have a hairdresser appointment at 10:30 am.
Oh great, can you find me a cab going there? I want a luxury ride for two people to 725 Camino Plaza.
Of course, confirming a luxury ride for 2 people to 725 Camino Plaza.
Actually, I need space for 3 people.
Please confirm: booking 3 seats in a luxury cab.
Yep, that's perfect. How long until the cab gets to me?
I reserved the ride and the cab will be there in 7 minutes.
Cool, how much will it cost me?
The cab costs $50.68.
Wow, okay, thanks for your help.
Anything else you need right now?
Not now, thanks for helping.
Have a great day.
I need to check my calendar for some events.
Which date do you need to know?
Look on the 10th of March.
You have a Hairdresser appointment at 12 pm.
Okay, thanks. I need a cab for 1 to get there. I prefer a Regular ride, and the destination is 2094 El Camino Real.
So you need a cab ride for 1 to 2094 El Camino Real, and you prefer a Regular ride, is that correct?
Yeah that sounds good.
I've booked your cab and it is on the way.
When will it arrive, and how much is it?
It should arrive in 2 minutes and the cost is $10.79.
Okay, thanks, that's everything.
Alright, have a nice day!
I need to check my calendar.
What do you need to know?
What do I have on the 14th of March?
You have a general practitioner appointment at 2 pm.
Great can you get me a cab to the appointment?
To 2500 alhambra Avenue, correct?
Yes that is correct.
How many seats and do you prefer pool or luxury?
I want a regular ride for two please.
You want a regular ride for 2 to 2500 Alhambra Avenue, correct?
No I want a luxury ride instead.
You need 2 seats in a luxury ride, correct?
Yes please.
Your cab is on its way.
How much is it? WHen will it arrive?
THe total is $36.53 and will be here in 14 minutes.
Thanks for your help.
Can I do anything else?
No that's all.
Have a great day!
Search my calendar for events.
What day shall I check?
Check next Tuesday.
You have an event at 6 pm and is a Reservation at Obok Restaurant.
What about events on the 7th of this month?
You have an event at 3 pm and is a Viewing at Raintree Condominiums.
That is fine.
Do you need something more?
I need a ride to 101 South Front Street # 1.
Do you prefer a Luxury, Pool, or another type of ride?
Get me a Pool ride.
How many people are going?
I am going to 2936 College Avenue and it is for 1 person.
You want a Pool ride for 1 person to 2936 College Avenue. Is that right?
That is correct.
Your cab is booked and is coming for you right now.
Thanks a bunch. That is everything.
Have a good day.
Can you check my schedule for the 13th of March?
You have a Dentist appointment with Menasco Matthew at 10:30 am.
Thank you. Can you book a cab for me to go there?
Are you headed to 1615 Hill Road and how many of you will be going?
Yes, that's the right address and there will be three of us.
Do you have any ride preferences like Luxury or Regular?
A regular ride would be just fine.
Booking a Regular cab for 3 to 1615 Hill Road. Please confirm.
That's correct. How much will it cost and how long before it gets here?
The cab has been booked and it is expected to arrive in 2 minutes. The ride will cost you $31.64.
Thank you for the assistance.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. That'll be all for now.
Have a great day!
I'd like to check for events on my calendar for the 4th of March.
You have a Styx concert starting at 7 pm.
Okay, can you reserve me a cab to get there?
How many people will be going? Is the destination 2901 East Hastings Street?
Yeah that sounds good. It is just for one person.
Do you prefer a type of ride?
I'd like a luxury ride.
So you would like a Luxury ride for 1 person to 2901 East Hastings Street, is that correct?
That sounds good. How much will that cost, and when will it arrive?
Your cab is booked and on its way. The cost is $26.81 and should arrive in about 13 minutes.
Great, thanks. That's all I need for now.
Alright, have a nice day!
Hi. I need to check events on my calendar.
No problem! Which date would you like me to check?
Tomorrow.
Tomorrow, you have an appointment at Fremont Barber Shop at 5 pm.
Okay, thanks. Do I have anything scheduled on the 7th?
You have a movie booking for Breakthrough at 9 pm.
Okay, great. I need a cab ride to the movie. The address is 400 Newpark Mall.
No problem! How many seats do you need? What type of ride do you prefer ( pool , regular, etc.)?
A pool ride is fine. There are two of us.
Okay! Can you confirm the following details, please? You're booking a pool cab ride to 2 to 400 Newpark Mall.
Yup. How much is this going to cost.
Your cab is booked! This should cost around $22.26.
How long do I need to wait outside for the cab?
5 minutes should be sufficient.
Okay, thanks.
You're welcome! Can I help you with anything else?
No, that's it.
Have a wonderful day!
What do I have scheduled
What date would you like to see?
I need to see what is going on Later today.
You have an appointment with Almaden Dental Care at 2:30 pm.
What else is going on for the 9th.
The only thing you have is a Doctor appointment for 2:30 pm.
Thats good. I'm going to need a cab to get there?
Will you be going to 2452 Watson Court?
Yes thats where i need to goo.
Would you perfer a Pool or Regular cab?
I want a Regular please.
How many people will be going?
Only one and I want to go in Luxury.
Just to confirm you want a cab for 1 person going to 2452 Watson Court in Luxury.
Yes
The cab is on it way.
Thanks that will be all.
Have a great day!
Check my calendar for the 8th of this month.
You're going to a movie at Century at Hayward at 10:30 pm.
Good. Get a cab there, to 1069 B Street.
Number of seats? Ride type? Regular, Luxury, etc.
Pool ride for 2.
Please confirm: pool ride for 2 to 1069 B Street.
Regular ride for three actually.
Please confirm: 3 seats on a regular ride.
Yes.
Your ride is on its way.
What's the cost?
$19.43.
Thanks for the help.
Anything else I can do?
No, thanks.
Have a nice day.
I need to check events on my calendar for the 11th.
You have a dentist appointment at 3 pm.
That is good. Could you get me a cab there? I need a luxury ride and am in a group of one. I would like a ride to 17705 Hale Avenue Ste. B3.
Could you confirm that you need a ride to 17705 Hale Avenue Ste. B3 for 1 and that you prefer a luxury ride?
That sounds good. When will the cab get here and how much does it cost?
I booked your ride and the cab is coming. It should be there in 7 minutes and will be $26.20.
Thank you for helping. That is all I wanted.
Have a great day.
I'd like to check the events on my calendar.
What is the date you wanted to find out about?
I'd like to know about Monday next week.
You have an Apartment viewing which starts at 2:30 pm that day.
That sounds good. Could you help me find a cab for 1 there?
Did you have a preference for the type of ride? You can choose Regular, Luxury, or anything else. Is your destination 293 Shasta Drive?
Yes, that sounds right. I'd like a Luxury ride.
Please confirm you're booking a ride for 1 seat to 293 Shasta Drive and you prefer a Luxury ride.
Yes, that sounds good. How much does the ride cost and when will it arrive?
Your ride has been confirmed and is on its way. The cab should be here in 14 minutes and will be $27.29.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a great day.
I need to figure out when I can visit my mom. Can you check a few things on my calendar for me?
Sure, on what day?
What do I have scheduled on the 4th of this month?
Looks like you have a Stylist appointment at 5 pm.
Ok, cool. Can you see what I have on March 8th also?
Sure. Looks like you have an Apartment viewing at 1:30 pm.
Right, I almost forgot. Can you book me a cab there?
No problem. Would you like a regular, pool, or other kind of ride?
I need a pool ride since 3 of us are going.
Ok, and this is to go to 3400 Richmond Parkway, right?
Yes, that's the address.
Ok. Just to confirm, you'd like to book a pool ride for 3 people to 3400 Richmond Parkway. Is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Ok, I've made your reservation. It's on its way.
Great, thanks. That's all for now.
No problem. Have a good day.
Can you help me to find the events on later today in my Calendar? I need to check it now.
You have an event named Movie Booking for the Aftermath in your Calendar which is going to be start at 7 pm. Any more information you need?
Yes, please check the listed events in my Calendar, I want to find one scheduled on the 10th.
It's name is Dentist Appointment with Ghina Morad and the noted time is at 10 am. Hope this will help you.
Thanks for that information. Please do one more favor for me. I need to book a Cab with Pool ride. Help me to search for the one.
I want to confirm whether you need the Cab for a ride to the address at 1785 San Carlos Avenue #2b? and the cab is for how many people?
Yes the address confirmed and I need the same for 4 persons.
Okay. I need your confirmation to book a Cab with Pool ride for 4 persons to 1785 San Carlos Avenue #2b.
Make it for 1 person only instead of 4.
Please confirm to book a Cab for 1 seat with Pool ride.
That is correct to proceed. Let me know the time will be taken by the Cab to reach my place.
I have booked the Cab and the same will reach you within 8 minutes. Hope this information useful.
Yes thanks for your help. That's all I want.
Have a good day.
I want to check the events on my calendar.
Okay no problem. What date would you like to check?
Check my calendar for events on the 13th of this month.
Sure thing. You have an Apartment viewing at Arbor Ridge Apartments at 12:30 pm.
Sounds good. Can you grab me a cab there?
Are you going to 2400 Shady Willow Lane? Do you have any preferred type of ride?
Yeah, that's the place. I'd prefer a Luxury ride.
How many seats do you need?
I'm traveling solo so I only need one seat.
Okay. Please confirm the following for me: You want a Luxury ride for 1 seat to 2400 Shady Willow lane.
Yes, that's right. How much is the ride? How long until the cab gets here?
Your cab is booked and on the way. The ride is $25.19 and should be there in 10 minutes.
Thanks a lot for the help. That's all I need.
Thank you! Have a wonderful day.
I would like to know what's on my calendar.
For which date?
For the 4th.
You have a Timmy Trumpet concert for 7:30 pm
I would need a luxury ride to take to me 2047 north milwaukee avenue.
How many seats?
Just one person.
You would like 1 seat on a luxury ride heading to 2047 north milwaukee avenue.
That would be great. How long again for the cab to get here?
It would arrive in 14 minutes.
Thanks very much. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
I'd like to check events on my calendar on the 14th of this month.
You have a Basketball game at Wintrust Arena scheduled for 6 pm.
Do I have any events scheduled for the 5th of March?
You are going to a Movie show at 10 pm.
Ok great. Can you find me a Regular cab for 3 people. We are going to 400 Newpark Mall.
That's no problem. So you want a Regular cab for 3 people going to 400 Newpark Mall.
That's correct. How long will the ride cost and how long will it take for the cab to get here?
Your can has been booked and it will be with you in around 7 minutes. The total cost for the cab will be $24.08
Thanks for your help.
Enjoy your day.
I think I have an appointment coming up but I can't remember. Can you check my calendar for the 4th of this month?
Sure. It looks like you have a General Practitioner appointment with Hipolito Ernesto B MD at 1 pm.
Ah, right. Can you book me a regular cab ride there? I think the address is 1 Baywood Ave # 6.
Sure, how many people?
Just one person.
Ok, to confirm, you want a regular cab ride for 1 person to 1 Baywood Ave # 6. Is that right?
Actually, can you switch that to a Luxury ride?
Sure. To confirm, you want to book a Luxury cab ride for 1 person.
Oh, wait, I forgot I wanted to stop by my friend's place with a few people first. Can you book the cab for 3 people to Amador Apartments instead?
No problem. To confirm, you want to book a cab ride for 3 people to Amador Apartments. Is that right?
Yes, that's good. How much is it?
I've booked the cab. It's on its way now. The total cost will be $44.65.
Ok, not bad. Thanks for your help.
Sure, anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks.
No problem. Have a good day.
I want to check the list of events noted in my Calendar for which I need your help.
In which date do you want me to check the events in your Calendar?
Check it on Thursday next week.
Your Calendar have a note of an event named Appointment with Petaluma Dental Associates for the time 3:30 pm. Is this the one you are searching for?
Yes, I want to go there for which I need to book a Cab. Please search the one for me.
What type of ride you want to book in the Cab.
I go with Pool ride option.
For how many persons, you want to book the Cab and please confirm you destination address 1580 East Washington Street # 107.
Yes, address is correct and book the cab for two persons.
Need your confirmation to book a Cab with Pool ride for 2 to 1580 East Washington Street # 107.
That is confirmed. Go ahead.
I have booked the cab and the same will reach you soon.
Thanks and that's all for now.
Have a great day.
Check for me please events on my calendar.
On what date you want to know?
On March 3rd will be fine.
You have event at 4 pm called Movie at AMC Deer Valley 16.
Is perfect.Get me a cab there because i want a ride to 4204 Lone Tree Way.A Pool ride will be great.
How many seats you want?
I am part of a group of 2.
You want a Pool ride with 2 seats to 4204 Lone Tree Way.I'm right?
It's okay.Also I want to know how long it takes for cab to reaches here and how much is cost?
Book is made and the cab is on its way.Cab is expected in 8 minutes and cost $12.64.
Thank you for all.
With something else I can help you?
No.All good.Thanks.
Have a great day!
Can you look at what I have on my calendar?
Which date do you want to know?
Check on the 8th.
At 6:30 pm you have a baseball game: Arizona Vs La Dodgers.
What's happening on the 13th?
At 1 pm you have a viewing at Oregon Park Senior Apartments.
Great, can you book me a luxury cab ride for one to get there?
Is it at 1425 Oregon Street?
Yes that's right.
Okay, please confirm you'd like me to book a luxury ride for 1 to 1425 Oregon Street.
Yes please do.
Your ride is coming to get you now.
How much is it?
It will cost $15.98.
How long before it gets here?
It should be there in 9 minutes.
Thanks, that's all I need.
Have a good day.
Please check my calendar events.
For which date?
Please check for March 9th.
An appointment nat 5:30 pm has been scheduled with Stylist appointment at Sport Clips Haircuts of Morgan Hill.
Are there other event on the 13th of this month?
The Lights concert is scheduled for 6:30 pm.
I need a cab for one to get me there.
Do you prefer a regular, luxury or other type of car? Will your destination be 1234 West 7th Street?
Yes, that's right a pool ride is fine.
Please confirm you want me to book 1 pool ride going to 1234 West 7th Street.
Yes. That is perfect.
Your ride has been booked.
How long before the cab arrives and what is the total cost?
The ride will arrive in approximately 3 minutes. The total is $7.02
Thanks. That's all for now.
Please have a great day.
I need to find out what's on my calendar for the 13th.
At 1 pm I see an Apartment Viewing at Sherwood Oaks Apartments.
That's great. I need a cab to get to the viewing. There will be 4 of us
You have some choices: Pool or Regular or whatever you like. That will be to 200 Bolinas Road # 62.
That's great. Let's go with a regular ride.
to confirm: You need a Regular ride for 4 to 200 Bolinas Road # 62.
Yes, thank you.
Your cab is booked and arriving soon.
Thank you, that's it.
Tale care now.
Check my calendar
For what day?
The 10th
Your have a Doctor appointment at 4 pm.
Can you get me a cab?
Pool or luxury? How many seats?
3 seats in a regular ride
To 491 30th Street #201?
Yes please
So 3 seats in a regular ride to 491 30th Street #201?
That's correct.
Your cab is on the way.
How long will it be and what's the cost?
It will be there in 6 minutes and will be $18.76.
Thanks so much.
Have a great day.
Will you check events on my calendar?
Which date?
10th of March.
Stylist appointment at 5:30 pm.
Great. Will you reserve a cab there?
What type of ride to 2327 Blanding Avenue STE D?
Luxury.
How many seats?
1.
Please confirm 1 Luxury ride to 2327 Blanding Avenue STE D.
That's fine.
I've reserved your ride.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a great day.
Check my calendar.
For what date?
March 8th
You have a reservation for 5 people at Beso Bistronomia at 11:30 am.
Can you reserve a cab for me?
What type of ride? Regular or Pool? Are you going to 4058 18th Street A?
Yes please. I'd like one seat in a luxury ride.
So you want 1 luxury ride to 4058 18th Street A?
Yes please. How long will it be and how much is it?
The cab will be there in 9 minutes and will cost $19.86.
Thanks.
Anything else?
Nope. Thanks again.
Have a good day.
I would like to check my calendar.
What date do you want to look?
I would like to see the 14th of March.
You have an Apartment viewing at arbors at mountain view at 3 pm.
Can you get me a cab to get there?
Do you have a preferred type of ride?
I would like a luxury ride to 2290 California Street.
How many people are going?
There will be a group of four.
4 seats in a luxury ride to 2290 California Street.
I would prefer a regular ride and only for three people.
You need 3 seats on a regular ride.
Yes, what is the cost and when does the cab get here?
The cab should be there in 7 minutes and the cost is $28.42.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help with something else?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
I need to check events on my calendar.
What date would you like to check?
Check the 7th of this month.
There is a viewing at Napa Park Homes at 3:30 pm.
Is there anything else scheduled on March 8th?
There is a stylist appointment at Supercuts at 12:30 pm.
That sounds good. Find me a cab to get there.
Is there a certain type of ride that you like? How many seats would you like?
I want a luxury ride for a group of 1.
Would you like to go to 2792 Pinole Valley Road?
Yeah that is good.
Could you confirm that you want a ride to 2792 Pinole Valley Road for 1 and that you prefer a luxury ride?
Yes, that is good. How much will it be?
I have booked your ride and the cab is coming. It will cost $20.24.
Thank you for helping. That is all I wanted.
Have a great day.
I need to check what events I have on my calendar.
Sure, what day?
the 5th of this month.
There's a 1 pm general practitioner appointment
What do I have going on for march 7th?
At 7:30 pm there's a Timmy Trumpet concert.
Awesome, I'll need a luxury ride to 2047 North Milwaukee Avenue
How many seats?
1
Please confirm your ride details: 1 luxury ride to 2047 North Milwaukee Avenue
Perfect, thanks.
Your ride is on the way
Great, thanks for all your help.
Have a nice day.
Please help me check events in my calendar
Any particular date I should search?
Please search the 5th of March.
You have a Hairdresser appointment at 2:30 pm.
All right, thanks. Now please book me a Pool ride for two to 37485 Fremont Boulevard B.
Okay, no problem. Please confirm that you'd like 2 Pool ride seats to 37485 Fremont Boulevard B.
That is correct.
I have successfully booked your ride and the cab should be here shortly.
What is the price of the ride?
The price of the ride is $23.41.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Thank you and have a wonderful day.
I need to check my events calendar.
Is there a specific date you want to look at?
Please check March 12th.
You have a movie at Alamo Drafthouse Cinema at 12 pm that day.
Okay. Can you get me a cab to the movie? I would like a luxury ride for 1 to 2550 Mission Street.
Just to make sure, you want a luxury ride for 1 to 2550 Mission Street?
Yes. How much will the taxi be? How long until the cab arrives?
I have it booked. It will cost $19.45 and will arrive in 7 minutes.
Thank you for your help.
Is there anything else you need help with?
No that will be all.
Enjoy your day.
I would like to check my calendar events.
What date are you looking at?
I would like Monday next week.
The event is happening 10:30 pm for a movie at AMC NewPark 12.
What other events do you have March 11th?
I have a doctor appointment at 3:30 pm.
That sounds very good.
What else can I help you with?
I would like a group of one to ride to 500 Doyle Park Drive #200.
Do you have a ride you prefer.
I would like a regular ride for a group of 3.
I would like a ride to 500 Doyle Park Drive #200. It has 3 seats and is regular ride.
That will work for me.
I have booked the ride and the cab is on its way.
How long before the cab comes?
The cab will be here in 6 minutes.
Thanks for the help that is all.
Have a great day.
Hi, I want to check what I have on my calendar.
Okay, which date do you want to look at?
I need to see the 7th of this month.
You have an appointment at Sunny Salon at 10:30 am.
Do I have any events on the 12th of this month?
That day you have a dentist appointment with Kobayashi James Y at 11:30 am.
That's great, can you get me a luxury cab there?
Of course, how many seats would you like?
I only have a group of one.
Okay, and you're headed to 318 Diablo Rd # 245?
Yep, that's it.
Please confirm: 1 seat in a luxury cab to 318 Diablo Rd # 245.
Yep, that's perfect.
I booked it for you and the cab is coming.
Thanks so much for your help.
Can I do anything else for you today?
Nope, thank you!
Have an amazing day.
Please check events on my calendar for March 1st.
At 11:30 am you have a viewing at Aster Park Apartments.
Great. I would like to take a cab to this place.
How many seats will you need and what is your ride preference.
This will be for one and I would prefer a luxury ride.
Is your destination 1059 Reed Avenue?
Yes, that is correct.
Please confirm a luxury ride for 1 to 1059 Reed Avenue.
Yes, that is correct.
Your cab is reserved and is on the way.
Thank you for your assistance.
do you need further assistance today?
No, thank you that will be all for now.
Enjoy the day!
What is on my calendar for the 11th of this month?
You have a 10:30 am viewing at Keller Plaza Apartments.
What about March 7th?
A 2 pm Dermatologist appointment with Sumaira Z. Aasi MD.
Ok. I need a taxi to get there.
A taxi to 321 Middlefield Road?
Yes, that is right.
A Luxury ride? Regular? Just you?
A Pool ride. There are 4 of us.
4 seats on a Pool ride to 321 Middlefield Road?
That is correct.
The car is on the way.
How long is this ride? What is the total due?
Its 4 minutes and will run you $27.78.
Great. I am set.
Take it easy.
I want to see what's currently in my calendar.
Shall I check a particular date?
Look at the day after tomorrow.
You've got an apartment viewing starting at 3 pm.
What's going on on the 4th of this month?
You have a doctor appointment at 5:30 pm.
Alright then, thanks for checking.
Do you want help with anything else?
Can you book me a cab to go to the doctor appointment? It's just a ride for one, but I'd like to Pool ride, and I need to go to 100 North Wiget Lane.
So to confirm, I'll find a pool ride can for 1, going to 100 North Wiget Lane.
That's right. What will be the cost and when should it get here?
I've booked a cab for you. It will cost $11.33, and it should arrive in 9 minutes.
Thanks a lot, that's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day!
I wanna see what's on my calendar for the 14th of March.
There is an apartment viewing at 5:30 pm.
Is there anything else on March 3rd?
There is 1 event. An ophthalmologist appointment at 1:30 pm.
Okay. I'd like a cab to get there.
How many people is it for?
I want a pool ride for 3 people.
Is this to go to 400 29th Street #315?
Yes.
You want a pool ride for 3 people to go to 400 29th Street #315. Is this right?
I want a luxury ride for two.
You want a luxury ride for 2 people. Is this right?
I wanna go to 1400 California 1.
You want a luxury ride to get to 1400 California 1. Is this right?
Yes, that's it.
Your cab is on its way.
How much will it cost me?
It will cost $45.81.
Thanks for everything.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a nice day.
What does my March 2nd look like?
You have to go to an Apartment viewing at 3 pm.
Fine, I need a ride and I prefer to travel in Luxury if you will.
How many seats are needed? You're going to viewing at 4141 Stevenson Boulevard right?
Indeed I am, there shall be 2 of us.
Confirm for me: 2 seats, Luxury, going to 4141 Stevenson Boulevard.
That's the cat's meow, thanks. How long will the cab take and how much will all this divine luxury cost?
Your cab should arrive forthwith and the 11 min. ride will run you $47.60.
I, am indeed in the lap of luxury, thanks.
Have a pleasant ride.
Can you please check my calendar for March 1st?
You have an appointment with Lee Clara starting at 2:30 pm.
Sounds good. Can you please secure me a cab ride there? I'd prefer a pool ride.
How many seats do you need?
Just 1 please.
Are you going to 877 West Fremont Avenue # K2?
Yes, that is correct.
Please confirm the following details: Securing a ride to 877 West Fremont Avenue # K2 in a pool ride for 1.
Yes, that is correct. How long before the cab arrives?
I have booked the cab and it is on its way. It should arrive in 4 minutes.
Thank you for your help.
Can I assist with anything else?
No thank you.
Have a wonderful day.
Could you look up some events on my planner.
On which date will I check?
The 3rd of March.
You have a 10 am General Practitioner appointment with Dr. Mark N. Isaacs, MD.
Grand will you order me a cab to go there?
Which type of ride and how many seats? To confirm also the address is 2621 Shadelands Drive?
A luxury ride for 4 and yes that is the right address.
To confirm then you need a luxury cab ride for 4 to 2621 Shadelands drive.
Yes that suits me. When will the cab reach me?
Your booking is confirmed and your cab will be with you in around 9 minutes.
Thanks for helping me.
Do you need anything more?
No thanks again for helping me.
Have a lovely day.
I would like to check out some events for my calendar of Wednesday next week.
You have an activity at 3 pm for your General Practitioner appointment.
Okay, sounds like a plan. Would you find me a regular cab ride for two? The address is 795 El Camino Real Jamplis Building, Level 1.
Please approve the following details: You need a regular ride for 2 people to 795 El Camino Real Jamplis Building, Level 1.
Yep, that's right. Can you give me a time before the cab arrives?
I have reserved your cab ride and it's head your way. It should be there in about 6 minutes.
That's all I need right now. Thank you so much for your help.
Enjoy your day.
What do I have going on for the 3rd of March?
You got a Colin James Concert at 7:30 pm.
I think I need a taxi there. Can you get me a pool ride.
For just you?
Yeah, just 1.
That is to 2901 East Hastings Street right?
Yes it is.
1 in a pool ride to 2901 East Hastings Street. Correct?
That is correct.
The taxi is on its way.
What is the damage report?
The ride will cost you $8.45.
Great. Thanks for everything.
No problem. What's next?
Nothing. Take a break.
Will do. Thanks.
I need to see what events I have scheduled.
Sure, what date are you interested in?
Check what I have scheduled on March 10th.
You have a Damien Jurado concert starting at 6:30 pm on that day.
Great. I need to arrange a cab ride to get there.
Please confirm the address you will be traveling to is 1422 Southwest 11th Avenue. Also, how many people will be riding in the cab?
Yes that address is correct and I need a cab or 2 people.
What type of ride would you like?
Book me a Pool ride please.
Please confirm you would like to book a Pool ride for 2 people to 1422 Southwest 11th Avenue.
Yep, that's right.
Alright, yiur cab has been booked and is on its way now.
Thanks so much!
Is there anything else you need right now>
No, that's all.
Great, have a nice day.
Will you check my calendar?
Which date?
March 5th.
Shanice concert at 5 pm.
Great. Will you reserve a cab there?
235 West 46th Street? Any ride preference?
Luxury.
How many seats?
2.
Please confirm a Luxury ride for 2 to 235 West 46th Street.
Yes. How long is the wait? How much?
I've reserved a cab expected in 8 minutes for $44.73.
Thanks.
Anything else?
No, that's all.
Have a great day.
What's listed on my calendar for March 14th?
You have a movie at AMC Mercado 20 at 10:30 pm.
Great, can you help me get a cab there?
Sure, what's your preferred ride?
I want a regular ride for one to 3111 Mission College Boulevard.
Okay, I'll do that as soon as you confirm you'd like me to book a regular ride for 1 to 3111 Mission College Boulevard.
Yup, sounds good.
Great, its booked and on its way to you.
Thanks, that's all for now.
No problem, have fun.
Check for me events on my calendar.
On what date you want?
On 4th of this month will be okay.
You have an event called Yunger concert that starts at 7:30 pm.
Sounds great.I want a cab and a shared ride to go there.
for how many people is the cab?
For three people will be the cab.
1517 21st Street is the address?
Yes that's it.
You need to go at 1517 21st Street and you want a shared ride for 3 people.Is that okay?
Yes,perfect but I also need to know how long will be the ride and the cost that I have to pay for it.
Ride was booked for you.Will cost $30.02 and will last about 27 minutes.
Thank you for your he
Can I help you with something else?
No. You've helped me already.
Have a good day!
What events do I have on my calendar?
Is there a specific date that you are interested in?
Yes, the 9th.
You have a Movie show at 4 pm that day.
Oh, good! I was hoping it was that day. I need to schedule a cab to get there.
Sure, the address for the Movie is 531 Davis Street? Will you be riding alone and do you want a shared ride?
Yes, that is the address. I need it for 2 people and we are fine with a shared ride.
Alright, please confirm that you would like a cab shared ride for 2 to 531 Davis Street.
Yes, that is correct.
Ok, the ride is booked.
Thanks so much, that's all I need right now.
I hope you enjoy the movie!
I want to see the events I have planned on my calendar for March 3rd.
I see that you have a General Practitioner appointment planned for 10 am.
Can you see if there are other events scheduled for the 14th?
There is another event called Apartment viewing, which starts at 5:30 pm.
Seems fine. I will need a cab to go there. My destination will be 1220 North Bascom Avenue.
Would you like to have a shared ride?
I am fine with having a shared ride.
Can you tell me for how many people you need the cab?
I need the cab just for 1 person.
Can you please confirm that you want to have a shared ride cab for 1 person to go to 1220 North Bascom Avenue?
That suits me well. Can you tell me how long this ride will last?
Your request for the cab has been made, and it is already on it's way. Your ride with the cab is expected to last about 28 minutes.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else you need from me to help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided.
Have a wonderful time!
Please tell me what events I have scheduled for the 1st.
You have an appointment at Miller and Mane at 10:30 am.
Ok, I'll need a taxi for two people to get there. The address is 45 Camino Alto #106
Would a shared ride be OK?
Yes, a shared ride is ok but I need to change the number of people to 4.
Alright, please confirm you would like to schedule a shared ride for 4 people to 45 Camino Alto #106.
Yes, that is right.
Your ride has been confirmed and the cab is on the way.
Great. How long will it take to get there and what is the cab fare?
it should take about 29 minnutes to reach your destination and the price is $33.92.
Perfect! Thanks for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
Help me look up events on my calendar.
What date do you want to look up?
I want to look up the 13th.
On that date you have a Lunch at Sanctuary Bistro starting at 12:30 pm.
What events do I have scheduled on March 1st?
On that date you a Dentist appointment with Sonrisas Community Dental Center starting at 2 pm.
Okay, nice.
Do you need any other help?
I'd like to book a cab to get there, I'm fine with a shared ride.
The cab is for 210 San Mateo Road # 104?
Yeah, it's for there.
How many passengers will there be?
It's just for 1 person.
I'll book you a shared ride cab for 1 person to 210 San Mateo Road # 104, is that right?
Yeah, please book it.
I've booked the cab and it's on route.
How long is the trip and what's the cost?
The trip is about 18 minutes and it will cost $15.07.
Thanks so much for helping me.
Would you like me to do anything else?
No, thanks again for the help.
Have a wonderful day!
Find me events on my calendar.
What day do you want me to search in?
Find events on the 3rd.
At 12 pm, you have a Reservation at Puesto Santa Clara.
That works. I need a taxi to get there and I am okay with a shared ride.
Is your destination address 2752 Augustine Drive #110?
Yes, that is correct.
How many people are in your group?
There is one person.
You want a shared ride for 1 person to 2752 Augustine Drive #110. Is that right?
That is correct. Can you tell me how long the ride lasts and what the total cost is?
Your taxi is confirmed and is coming right now. Your ride will take 13 minutes and the total price is $11.26.
Thanks a bunch. That is all.
Have a good day.
I need to check calendar events. The date is to be next Thursday.
On your selected date there is a Gorgasm concert. The event will begin at 6 PM.
OK, that sounds good.
Is there anything else that I may help you with?
I need a cab for one person, and to 50 Upper Alabama Street. A shared ride is fine.
Please confirm the following information: You would like to go to 50 Upper Alabama Street in a cab for 1 person and would like a shared ride.
Yes, that works. How much will it cost and how long is the ride?
Your ride is now booked and the cab on its way. It will cost $11.23 and the ride will last 19 minutes.
Thank you for that.
Have a wonderful day.
I'd like to check my calendar for the 2nd of this month.
You have a Dermatologist appointment at 10 am.
Okay thanks. I'd like to take a cab there.
How many people will be travelling in the cab?
Just 1 person.
Is the address you are going to 14911 National Avenue #5? Would you be ok with a shared ride?
Yes that's correct and I'd be happy to take a shared ride.
Ok so you'd like to book a cab for 1 person to go to 14911 National Avenue #5 and a shared ride is fine.
Actually I'd like to go to 1426 Fillmore Street instead.
Ok so that's 1426 Fillmore Street and you are ok with a shared ride.
That's great thanks.
Your cab has been booked and should be with you shortly.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need help with anything else?
No that's all for now thanks.
Enjoy your day.
Can you check events on my calendar for 13th of march
You have a movie show scheduled at 10:30 pm
Cool. Book me a cab to get there
How many people should I book the cab for? Would a shared ride work?
Book for 1 and a shared ride is fine
Is the venue 3111 mission college boulevard?
Yes, that is correct
booking a shared ride for 1 to 3111 mission college boulevard
that sounds perfect
Your ride is on its way
thanks. That would be all for now.
Have a great time
I need to know what upcoming events I have scheduled.
Sure, what date should I check?
Please check my calendar for March 13th.
You have a Movie show starting at 10:30 pm that day.
OK, I will need a cab to get there.
How many people will be riding and would you like a shared ride?
There are 3 of us and a shared ride is fine.
Please confirm the address you will be going to is 3111 Mission College Boulevard.
Yes, that is right.
Ok, you would like a shared ride for 3 people to 3111 Mission College Boulevard. Is that right?
Yes, perfect.
Okay, your ride is confirmed and the cab is in transit to your location.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, nothing else.
Ok, have a nice day.
Today's Friday, March 13th. I'll probably have bad luck if I go out, so I guess I'll just stay home. I wonder if there's anything I was supposed to do? Do I have anything scheduled for today?
You just have a stylist appointment at Exclusive Spa at 5:30 pm.
Exclusive Spa!? I completely forgot! That spa is really exclusive! Screw bad luck, I'm taking my mud bath. I'll just drive over there now... huh? My car's not starting. That's strange, it was working fine yesterday. Whatever. Can you get me a taxi to take me there?
Sure. Are you going alone or with others?
I'm going with two of my sisters, so I need a taxi for three.
Should I get a shared cab? And can you confirm the location of 314 Mendocino Avenue?
Yeah, that should be fine.
You want a shared cab for 3 to 314 Mendocino Avenue?
That's right.
The taxi is on its way.
What's the price?
$21.34.
Damn, I only have $20 on me. Looks like I'll have to ask them for money. Asking your little sisters to lend you $1.34 shouldn't be too humiliating, right? Urgh... Thanks a ton. I don't need anything else.
Try to enjoy your day!
I need to check my calendar to see what I have going on.
Was there a certain date you were curious about?
The date I want is March 12th.
There is Hairdresser Appointment scheduled for 4 pm on that day.
Oh, that's right. I'm going to need a cab to get there.
I will presume your destination is 3410 Stevens Creek Boulevard #101. Will anyone be going with you?
Correctly presumed and no just 1.
Would you accept a shared ride.
I wouldn't mind at all.
For verification you have 1 fare traveling to 3410 Stevens Creek Boulevard #101 shared ride if possible, did I get it all?
You sure did. How long does it take to get there?
The estimated time is 26 minutes to reach your destination and the cab is in route.
What will it cost me?
The bill comes to $16.86.
Okay, well thanks and bye.
Enjoy yourself.
I would like to check the calendar for events.
What date do you want?
I want the date March 12th.
The event starts at 12 pm for the ophthalmologist appointment with Dr. Randal Pham MD, MS, FACS.
That is good, I'd like a cab there.
Would you like a shared ride?
I would like a shared ride.
For how many people do you want?
I would like for 1 person.
Would you like to go to 2110 Forest Avenue Suite b?
Yes, that is great.
Please confirm that you want to go to 2110 Forest Avenue suite b for 1 person a shared ride.
No, I'd like for three people to go to 240 La Casa Via #100.
Please confirm for 240 La Casa Via #100 for 3 people.
Yes, how long is the ride and how much?
The ride will be 8 minutes long and costs $25.93 and it's booked.
Thanks that is all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
I need you to check my calendar for events.
Which date will I check?
Saturday this week.
You have a doctor appointment at 11 am.
ok fine. I need a cab to get there which is at 455 Grand Avenue.
Are there other passengers travelling with you?
yes it is for two and I am good with a shared ride.
To confirm you want a shared ride cab for 2 to 455 Grand Avenue.
Yes that is right. Do you know how much it will be?
It will cost $22.44 and that is the booking through with the cab on the way.
Thanks for your assistance.
Do you want help with more?
No thanks for that.
Have a good day.
I want to check my events on my calendar for Friday next week.
You have a Table for 4 at Wild Goat Bistro at 7:30 pm.
Okay, sounds good. I'd like to grab a cab there. Can you call me a cab to 6 Petaluma Boulevard North for four people?
Sure thing. Please confirm the following for me: Order a shared cab ride to 6 Petaluma Boulevard North for 4 people. Correct?
Yup, that works. How much is the ride?
Your ride is booked and on the way! The ride is $28.26.
Thanks for the help. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
I would like to check my calendar for Tuesday next week.
You have a Movie show at 9 pm.
That sounds good.
Can I help with anything else?
I would like to find a cab or ride share to get there.
You are going to 85 West Portal Avenue?
Yes, for 3 people please.
Cab for 3 people to 85 West Portal Avenue.
Yes, What is the cost and how long is the trip?
The cost is $20.54 and the ride takes around 10 minutes.
Thank you for your help.
Do you need anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
Check for me please in my calendar for events in the 12th.
You at 3:30 pm a Dentist appointment.
Sounds great.Get for me please a cab to go there.
For how many people you want the cab and are you going to 21001 San Ramon Valley Boulevard Ste E-3?
Yes is good ,make it for four people.
A shared ride will be okay for you?
Yes shared ride is great.
You want a cab for 4 people and you go to 21001 San Ramon Valley Boulevard Ste E-3.You wish to be a shared ride.I'm right?
Yes.Tell me the cost.
Cost is $13.92 and the ride was booked and the cab is on its way.
Thank you very much.
Anything else you need?
No.Thank you.
Have a nice day!
I need to check calendar events for next Monday.
You have a restaurant reservation for 4 at Mariscos El Patron at 12 pm.
That sounds nice. Could you get me a cab to go there?
Do you need a shared ride to 458 B Street? How many people is the cab for?
Yes, that works and it's for 2 people. I am fine with a shared ride.
Could you confirm that you want to go to 458 B Street and need a shared ride for 2?
Yes, that works. What will the cost be and how long is the ride?
The ride is booked and the cab is on the way. It will be $12.12 and take about 29 minutes.
Thank you for helping. That is all I need at the moment.
Have a good one!
I would like to check my calendar for the 9th.
You have a general practitioner appointment that starts at 3 pm.
Okay, can you get me a cab there for 4 people?
Is a shared ride okay? Are you going to 500 San Pablo Avenue #300?
Yes, that is correct. I am fine with a shared ride.
Please confirm the following details:Securing a cab to 500 San Pablo Avenue #300 in a shared ride for 4 people.
No, I need to go to 1327 East Monte Vista Avenue.
Please confirm the following: Booking a shared ride going to 1327 East Monte Vista Avenue.
Yes, that is correct. How much does it cost, and how long is the ride?
You ride is booked and is on the way. The cost is $31.06 and is 20 minutes long.
Thank you for your help, that is all I need for now.
You are welcome. Have a great day!
What's on my calendar for the 8th of this month?
You have an apartment viewing at 4:30 pm.
Good, get a cab there.
For a shared ride?
To 750 Brahms Way.
For a shared ride? Number of passengers?
Two people.
For a shared ride?
Shared ride is fine, going to 1301 Ralston Avenue # C.
Please confirm: shared ride for 2 to 1301 Ralston Avenue # C.
Yep.
Your ride is on its way.
Thanks, that's all for now.
Have a nice day.
I would like to check my calendar on the 14th of this month.
You have a viewing at Muir Park Condominiums at 4:30 pm.
Can I get a cab to go there?
How many people will be going?
The cab is for 1 person.
Do you want a ride share to 1241 Arnold Drive?
Yes a ride share works.
Cab for 1 person to 1241 Arnold Drive.
Yes, that is correct.
Your ride is booked and cab is on the way.
How long is ride?
The ride will be around 15 minutes.
Thank you that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
What do I have schedule Tuesday next week?
You have a 12 pm property viewing
Great.
Anything else you need?
Yes, a cab to 200 Greenbriar Circle for 4 people
Please confirm: a cab for 4 people to the destination of 200 Greenbriar Circle
Correct
Your ride is on the way.
Awesome, thanks
Anything else I can help you with?
Nope, thanks
Enjoy your day
Let's peek into my calendar shall we?
What date shall we look at?
Try Next Tuesday for me.
Well, you have Table for 5 at lark Creek Steak at 11 am.
Fine, set me up a cab to get there please.
How about a shared ride to save money?
Fine, you pulled my leg.
How many are you?
We are three.
I think you want 845 Market Street #402 right?
That's the right site.
So, to be clear: 3 for cab to 845 Market Street #402. Shared.
That should get it good. What will my bill total be? How long will the cab ride take?
Your ride is on the way. It's going to be $20.25 and the duration will be 17 minutes.
Thanks, that's great.
May I assist further?
You may not, thanks though.
Have a good time.
Please check my calendar events.
For which date?
Please check the 2nd of this month.
You have a property viewing scheduled at 12 pm.
Okay. I will need a cab to take me there.
Is a shared ride okay? Also, how many in your party and is your destination 575 East Remington Drive?
Yes and it's for one person.
Is a shared ride okay?
Yes a shared ride is okay and actually it's 2 people.
Please confirm you want me to book a shared ride for 2 going to 575 East Remington Drive.
Okay. What's the total?
Your booking was a success. The total is $13.76.
Thanks so much!
Is there anything else?
Nope. That's it.
Okay. Please enjoy the rest of your day.
I want to see what I have scheduled for the 1st of this month.
You have a hair Appointment at Great Clips at 12 pm.
THey thanks. I need a cab for 2 people to get there.
WOuld you like a shred ride? Will you be going to 820 East DUnne Avenue Ste 170?
Yes that will be great.
Would you like to take a economical shared ride?
Yes it will be for one person.
What type of ride do you prefer?
I need it to go too 329 Primrose Road.
Would you like a luxury ride?
I will take the shared ride option.
Just to confirm you want a shared cab for 1 person going to 329 primrose road.
Yes that is great
The cab will be there shortly.
Thanks for you help.
What else can I help with?
Nothing that will be all
Have a super day!
Please check the events on my calendar.
Which date should I view?
Please view March 1st.
On that day you have a 12:30 pm lunch at Old Weang Ping.
Do I have any events scheduled on the 9th of this month?
Yes, you have a movie at Landmark's Piedmont Theatre starting at 9:30 pm.
Great. I would like to schedule a shared ride to 5133.
How many people in your party?
The ride if for one and the address is 26955 California 1.
Please confirm a shared ride for 1 to 26955 California 1.
yes, that is right.
Your booked ride is on the way!
Thank you for your assistance.
Do you need my help with anything else?
No, I appreciate your asistance!
Enjoy the day!
I'd like to see what I have on my calendar for March 4th.
You'll be watching a movie show at 8:30 pm on that day.
Good to know. I'd like to get there via cab.
Is the movie at 3117 16th St? Is a shared ride fine? For how many people will it be?
That's the location, yes. A shared ride is fine, and it's for just 1 person.
Okay. So you want a shared ride for 1 to 3117 16th St?
Yes, that is correct.
I have booked your ride. The cab should be here any minute.
Thanks a lot for the help! I don't need anything else from you.
Have a wonderful day! I hope the movie is great!
Give me the lowdown on what's going on with my calendar on the 10th of this month.
Sure you have a 4 pm General Practitioner appointment.
Fine, set up a cab for 1 to get to 2505 Samaritan Drive. Any type is fine for ride.
Sure, confirm 1 person to 2505 Samaritan Drive, any type ok.
Sure, fine. How long will the trip be?
Your cost is $6.22 and it takes around 25 min.
Fine, that's great.
Do you need any more help?
No bud, that's good.
Enjoy the rest of the day.
I'd like to check events on my calendar for the 7th of March.
That day you have a property viewing at 3:30 pm.
Okay great, I'd like to get a cab there.
How many people will be going in the cab?
I need space for 2 people.
Will you be going to 40640 High Street?
Yeah, that's the one.
Would you be alright with a shared ride?
Yeah, I'm fine with that.
Okay, please confirm: shared cab for 2 people going to 40640 High Street.
Yep, that's great.
The ride has been booked and the cab is en route.
How long will the ride take and how much will I have to pay?
The ride will take around 12 minutes and it costs $18.36.
Thanks so much for helping.
Would you like help with anything else?
No, thank you very much.
Have a nice day!
Check my calendar for the 13th of March.
On March 13th, you have an Apartment viewing at 10 am.
Good. I need a cab for 2 people to 26100 Gading Road. I don't mind a shared ride.
Confirming that you need a shared ride cab for 2 people to 26100 Gading Road. Is this correct?
Yep, that's correct.
Your cab is on its way.
Thanks for helping me. That's all.
You're welcome. Have a good day!
I am looking for events on the 11th of this month.
There is a Murder City Devils concert starting at 7 pm.
Sounds great. I would like to find a cab to get there.
How many people would the cab be for?
The cab is for 1 person.
Do you need a shared ride? Will you be going to 1234 West 7th Street?
Yes, that is good and a shared ride is fine.
Could you confirm that you want to go to 1234 West 7th Street and that you want a shared ride for 1 person?
Yeah, that is good. How long will the ride be?
The ride has been booked and the cab is on its way. It will take about 11 minutes.
Thank you for helping.
Is there anything else you needed?
No, but thank you for helping.
Have a wonderful day!
Please check what's on my calendar.
For what date do you want calendar details?
Please tell me about the 13th of this month.
At 3 pm, you have a General Practitioner appointment with Dr. Vilasini M. Ganesh, MD. That is all.
Okay. I need a cab to get there.
Please confirm that the destination is 1600 West Campbell Avenue #202. How many people will need to ride? Is a shared ride okay?
Yes, that's right. The cab will be for 1 person and a shared ride is fine.
Please confirm: You are reserving a shared cab ride for 1 person to 1600 West Campbell Avenue #202.
Yes, that's right.
Your ride is booked. The cab is on it's way!
How much will that ride be?
The fare is $6.30.
How long will the ride take?
The ride will take about 26 minutes.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a good day.
What do I have going on for Monday next week?
You have a 3:30 pm Dentist appointment.
What about the 11th?
You have a 10 pm movie show.
Can you get me a taxi there?
For just you?
Yes, one person.
Is that 2525 Sand Creek Road?
Yes it is.
1 person to 2525 Sand Creek Road?
Yes. How long does it take to get there?
The car is coming. The ride will be about 17 minutes.
And what will it run me?
It will come in at $14.71.
Great. That will be all.
Take care then.
Please check what events I have on my calendar on March 7th.
You have a Stylist appointment at Wash & Brushup Co. at 11 am.
All right, thanks. Please get me a cab to go to 340 Healdsburg Avenue.
Do you mind sharing a cab?
I don't mind sharing a cab.
How many seats do you want in the cab?
Please get me a cab going to Pasta Pelican Restaurant, for 1 person.
Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like 1 seat in a shared ride, going to Pasta Pelican Restaurant.
That sounds good.
I have successfully booked your cab and it should be here shortly.
What's the fare, and how long is the ride?
It costs $11.26, and it's a 10 minute ride.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Would you like my help with anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Thank you, and have a wonderful day!
Check for me please events on calendar in 10th of March.
You have Appointment with Palo Alto at 2:30 pm.
Sounds okay.Thank you.
Can I help you with something else?
Yes get for me a cab there please.
You want it for how many people.You like a shared ride to 882 Emerson Street?
A shared ride for 2 people will be great.
You a cab for 2 people and a shared ride to 882 Emerson Street.Is that correct?
Yes is good.Tell me how log will be the ride and the cost.
Booked is done and the cab is on its way.Your ride will last about 14 minute and the cost is $11.75.
Thank you for all.
Anything else you need?
No.It's okay.Thanks.
Have a good day!
I want to see events on my calendar.
What date do you want to look up?
I want to look at March 10th.
There is a Jamey Johnson concert starting at 6 pm.
Are there other events on the schedule for the 12th?
You have a dentist appointment starting at 4 pm.
Okay, so I will need a cab to get there for two. A shared ride is fine. We want to go to 1300 University Drive # 5.
Please confirm that you need to go to 1300 University Drive # 5. You need a ride for 2 and a shared ride is ok.
No, it is for one person and I need to get to 710 Florida Street.
So you want to go to 710 Florida Street and need a cab for 1 person, right?
Yeah, that is right. What will it cost me?
Your ride is booked and the cab is coming. It costs $9.78.
Thank you for helping. That is all that I need.
Have a good day!
Can you check if I have any events on the 4th of this month?
You have a Apartment viewing at Park Orchard Apartments at 5 pm.
Do I have any events on March 11th?
You have a apartment viewing at 11 am.
Good to know. Can you book me a cab there?
To 42010 Blacow Road? Can it be a shared ride?
Yes, that's it. No problem with a shared ride.
For how many people?
Three people please.
So a cab with a shared ride for 3 to 42010 Blacow Road?
Actually, make it for one and change the destination to 2250 Hayes Street.
So a cab for 1 to 2250 Hayes Street?
Yes, that's it. How long is the drive there?
Your cab is booked and on the way. The ride should last 17 minutes.
How much will it cost?
It will cost $9.59.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need anything else?
No, thanks very much.
Have an amazing day.
What's on my calendar for Thursday next week?
You have a Hairdresser appointment set for 4 pm
Ok, can you book me a cab there? Just 1 person to 2105 West Pueblo Avenue, and a shared ride is fine
Please confirm: a shared ride to 2105 West Pueblo Avenue. for 1 person
Yes that's fine
I've booked your ride and it's on the way
Thanks so much
Anything else I can do to help?
No thanks
Take care
Please check my calendar
what date do you want me to check
please check on march 13th
you have a movie show at 10:30 pm
Perfect, i also need a cab for three people to go to 3111 mission college boulevard
please confirm your shared ride for 3 people to 3111 mission college boulevard
yes please, how much does it cost and how long is the ride
your ride will take about 32 minutes and cost $17.34
Thank you, that's all i need
have a nice day
I would like to see the events that I have on my calendar.
Can you tell me for which date do you want to check for events?
The date I am looking for is next Thursday.
From what I can see in your calendar you have a Restaurant reservation for 2 at Wago Sushi Sf at 11 am.
Seems nice. I would like to have a cab to go there.
Is your destination 2365 Chestnut Street?
That suits me well.
Would you be willing to have a shared ride?
I do not mind having a shared ride.
Which is the number of people that you need the cab for?
I need the cab for 2 people.
Can you please confirm that you want a shared ride cab for 2 people to go to 2365 Chestnut Street?
That's right. Can you tell me how much it will cost, and how long is the ride going to last?
Your requested cab has been booked, and is already on the way. The cab will cost you $11.64, and the ride is expected to last 31 minutes.
I appreciate your help very much.
Is there something else I can do for you?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided.
Have a wonderful time!
I am wanting to check events on my calendar for March 3rd.
You have a scheduled Viewing at San Jose Apartments that will begin at 2:30 pm.
Are there any other events I have scheduled on the 11th of this month?
You have a scheduled Apartment viewing at Briarwood at Central Park that will begin at 3:30 pm.
Sounds fine. I would like to get a cab to go there.
What number of people is the cab for?
It is for 3 people.
Are you wanting a shared ride going to 4200 Bay Street?
Yes that is fine.
Are you interested in a shared ride?
I want to go to Quail Run Apartments.
Would you like a shared ride?
Yes, that is okay with me.
Okay, confirm these details: you are going to Quail Run Apartments and the cab is for 3 people. You would like a shared ride.
Yes that is fine.
Your ride has been confirmed and it headed your way.
What is the length of the ride?
The ride will take approximately 17 minutes.
What is the cost?
It is $10.91.
Thanks very much for your help. That was all I needed right now.
Have a nice day!
Can you help me check the events on my calendar?
Sure, What date are you interested in hearing about?
What do I have going on the 14th of this month?
For the 14th of this month, I show you have an appointment for a viewing at Civic Plaza Apartments at 1:30 pm.
Great, can you please order me a cab for 2 people to go to 1495 Don Avenue?
What kind of ride would you like?
I am okay with taking a shared ride to Vancouver.
Okay, I am scheduling you a shared ride for 2 to Vancouver, is that correct?
Yes, that is correct. What is the cost of the ride and how long will the ride be?
Your total cost comes to $11.24 and there is an estimated 19 minute drive. I have successfully confirmed your ride.
Thank so much for helping with that.
Is there anything else you need?
No that will be all, goodbye.
You are welcome, goodbye.
Can you check events on my calendar please?
Which date would you like me to check?
Check the 14th and tell me what I have scheduled.
A Movie at AMC Mercado 20 which starts at 10:30 pm.
Thanks. I need a cab to go there.
Is a shared ride ok? How many people will be needing a cab? Are you heading to 3111 Mission College Boulevard?
Yes that is correct. A shared i ok and only one person.
To confirm: You need a cab for 1 person to 3111 Mission College Boulevard. Is this correct?
Yes it is. How long will it take to get there?
Ride confirmed and cab is enroute. It will take 32 minutes to arrive.
Thanks that's all I need.
Have a nice day.
Please help me check events on my calender.
Which date should I search?
Please search tomorrow.
You have a 3 pm Dentist appointment with Andrei Simel , Family & Cosmetic Dentisry.
All right. Please find a cab going there.
Is your destination 990 West Fremont Avenue j? Do you mind sharing a ride?
That is correct. I don't mind a shared ride.
How many people will be needing the cab?
The cab is for 2 people.
Okay, no problem. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like 2 seats in a shared ride to 990 West Fremont Avenue j.
That is correct.
I have successfully booked your cab and it should be here shortly.
How many minutes is the ride, and what's the cost?
It will be a 19 minute ride, and will cost $14.58.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. That will be all.
Thank you and have a wonderful day!
Im looking for events on my calendar
In which date do you want
On 9th of this month
You have a movie booking for hellboy at 8:30 pm
Great. I want a cab to 620 3rd Street for one people and can be a shared ride
Please confirm that you wanna go to 620 3rd Street on a cab for 1 people. It's a shared ride
Yes great
Your booking is confirmed and cab is on its way
How long is the ride to there
11 minutes
What about cost
It's $8.41
Thanks a lot for the help that's all I need
Have a great day
I would like to review my calendar appointments
What specific day are you interested in reviewing?
I'm looking for the 4th
On the 4th, you have a scheduled Appointment at B Parlor beginning at 1:30 pm
Are there any engagements slotted for next Wednesday?
On that day, you have an Apartment viewing at North Dutton Apartments beginning at 1:30 pm.
Great, I need to schedule a taxi to get to that appointment
Sure, your destination is 1814 North Dutton Avenue # 25, correct? And are you looking for a shared taxi?
Sure, a shared car is fine with me.
And how many seats in the taxi will you need?
I need for one person going to SlotZilla Zip Line
So just to confirm, you would like a shared taxi ride for 1 pesron going to SlotZilla Zip Line.
Yes, that's it. Can you tell me how much time that it will take to get there?
Your taxi reservation has been made and the car is on it's way. It will take approximately 10 minutes
And what is the total amount that I will have to pay?
The fare is $7.64
Great, thanks so much
Will there be anything additional?
No, that's it for me
Enjoy your day
Please check my calendar for events.
Which date should I view?
Please look at the 13th of this month.
On that day you have a 3:30 pm appointment at Evoke Beauty Salon.
Great. I would like to schedule a cab on that day for 2 people.
Is the destination 160 south Murphy Avenue A?
Yes, that is right.
Would you like a shared ride?
A shared ride would be okay.
Please confirm a shared ride for 2 people to 160 South Murphy Avenue A.
Great, that is right. What will be my cost?
The scheduled cab is on the way and the price $21.11.
Thank you. I do not need any further assistance right now.
Enjoy the day!
I would like to look for events on my calendar.
What date do you want to check?
I want to check the 12th.
There is a property viewing on the 12th at 12:30 pm.
Are there ay other events scheduled on March 4th?
YOu have lunch at Puccini & Pinetti on March 4th at 5 pm.
That sounds cool. I would like a cab to get there. I need to get to 129 Ellis Street. A shared ride should be fine.
How many people do you need the cab for?
The cab is for one person.
Could you confirm that you want to go to 129 Ellis Street and that you would like a shared ride for 1 person?
Yes, that works.
The ride has been booked and your cab is coming.
Thank you for helping.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that is all. Thanks for helping.
Have a good one.
Would you please run down my calendar with me for the 2nd of this month?
Of course. You have a movie show scheduled on that date for 9:30 pm.
Okay, I need a cab for 2 then to 2525 Sand Creek Road and it's fine if it's a shared ride.
Confirming a shared taxi for 2 to 2525 Sand Creek Road.
Yes, that's right. What will that come to please and how long will the ride take?
The cab has been booked and should arrive shortly. The fare will be $13.60 for the 17 minute ride.
Great, that's perfect.
Thank you very much.
Can you check my calendar for the 4th?
On this date you have an Apartment viewing at 3 pm?
OK. Please find me a cab to get there.
For how many people?
Just for 1, me.
Your destination is 33300 Mission Boulevard?
Yes, that's right. Shared rides are OK.
Can you please confirm that you want a shared ride for 1 to 33300 Mission Boulevard.
Yes, that's correct.
I've booked your ride and it should arrive promptly.
Thanks a lot. That will be all for now!
Have a nice day!
Can you check my calendar event on the 7th of this month?
An event titled Appointment with Ueno Masayuki is scheduled at 12 pm.
Are there any event son the 6th of March?
You have a property viewing at 10 am.
Great. I will need a cab to take me.
Is a shared ride okay?
Yes a shared ride is ok. I'm going to 1595 Sunnyvale Avenue #1.
How many are in your party?
Is it for 1.
Please confirm you want a shared ride to 1595 Sunnyvale Avenue #1 for 1.
Actually, I need to go to 1057 El Monte Avenue Suite D.
Please confirm you want me to book a shared ride to 1057 El Monte Avenue Suite d.
Yes. That's right.
Your ride has been booked successfully.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else.
No. That's all for today.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to check my calendar events.
On which date?
On Thursday next week.
An event named Restaurant reservation at Scott's Seafood Restaurant is scheduled at 7:30 pm.
Sound good. I need a taxi to get there.
Is a shared ride okay.
Yes. That's fine.
Is your destination 1333 North California Boulevard?
Yes. It is.
How many are in your party.
It is for 1.
Please confirm you want a shared ride going to 1333 North California Boulevard for 1.
Okay. How long is the ride trip and how much is the total?
Your ride has been booked. It will last approximately 19 minutes for a total of $15.60.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else?
No. Thanks. That's all.
Great. Enjoy your day.
What's up with me on the 12th of March?
You have a Restaurant reservation for 2 at Izanami. It's at 6 pm.
Fine help me get there. Get a cab.
How about a shared ride?
Well, there are 3 people, shared is probably fine.
Are you headed to 257 Grand Avenue? Izanami?
Certainly, thanks.
Of course, to be sure: 3 people going to 257 Grand Avenue.
That's it. Fine.
Your ride is on it's way.
Fine, thanks. I appreciate it.
Have a good ride, enjoy.
Can you help me check my calendar?
Sure, what date?
The 9th of March please
You're going to a Zz Top concert at 6 pm
Ok, can you book me a cab there?
To 2901 East Hastings Street, right? Is a shared ride ok?
Yes that's fine. I can share
For how many people?
There will be 2 of us going
Please confirm: a shared ride for 2 people to 2901 East Hastings Street
No, make it to Commonwealth instead
Please confirm: a shared ride to Commonwealth
Yes that's fine. How much is it
Your ride is on the way. It costs $12.46
Thanks so much
Anything else you need?
Nope I'm good.
Take care.
I need to check my calendar for events.
What date do you need to check?
Check the 10th of this month.
You have a property viewing starting at 2:30 pm.
Okay, thanks. I'll need a cab to get there.
How many people will be going?
Two people will be going.
Is a shared right okay?
Sure, shared rides are fine.
Is your destination 13949 Doolittle Drive?
Yeah, that's correct.
So you need a cab for 2 people, going to 13949 Doolittle Drive, and a shared ride is fine, is that correct?
Yeah that works. How much will it cost?
I've booked your cab and it's on the way. The cost is $12.88.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can do?
No, that's all, thanks.
Alright, enjoy your day!
Can you check my events calendar?
Which date should I check?
The 12th of this month, please.
You have a Stylist appointment at 11 am.
Do I have any events scheduled for the 11th of March?
You have an Appointment with Linda K. Low at 10 am.
Wonderful. Can you arrange a cab for two people? I need it to take me to 4450 San Pablo Dam Road and I don't mind a shared ride.
Confirming that you want to reserve a cab for 2 people to 4450 San Pablo Dam Road. You don't mind a shared ride. Is this correct?
Yep, that's correct.
I have booked your ride and your cab is on its way.
How long is the ride and how much does it cost?
The ride will take 31 minutes and will cost $12.77.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else?
No. Thanks a lot.
You're welcome. Have a great day!
Check the events on my calendar for me
What date should I search for?
5th of March
You have a stylist appointment at supercuts sequoia station at 10 am
do I have any other events scheduled for friday next week?
You also have a restaurant reservation at platano at 5:30 pm
That sounds okay.
Do you need my help with anything else?
Yes, book me a cab to get there
Is the venue 2042 university avenue? How many people should I book the ride for?
Book it for one person. The venue is correct.
is a shared ride fine?
Yes, shared ride works.
booking a shared ride for 1 to 2042 university avenue.
that sounds perfect
Your ride is confirmed and on its way
Thanks a ton
Can I help you with something else?
No, thanks again. That would be all
Have a fantastic day
Hey, I need to check my calendar.
Which date do you want to check?
The 5th of March.
You have a New Found Glory Concert at 5:30 pm.
Sounds good. I need to get a cab to get there.
Can it be a shared ride?
No problem. My destination is 2047 North Milwaukee Avenue.
How many people will be going?
Just one person.
So a shared ride for 1 to 2047 North Milwaukee Avenue?
Yes, exactly. How long is the trip?
23 minutes. Your cab is booked and on the way.
How much will it cost?
$9.02 dollars.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you further?
No, thank you.
Have an amazing day.
I want to look my events on my calendar
On what date
On the 8th
You have viewing at Willowbrook apartments at 12 pm
Great. I want to take a cab to there
Do you like shared ride? How about taking 110 Bailey road and how many going to travel?
Im ok with shared ride. It's for one people
Please confirm that you want to go to 110 Bailey road for 1 people in a shared ride
Yes great. What's the cost and how long is the ride?
Your cab is booked and is on its way. It costs $9.74 and the ride will be for 17 minutes
Thanks a lot. That's all I need
Have a wonderful day ahead
Can you check events on my calendar?
Which date do you want me to search for?
Check for the date the 13th.
There is a General Practitioner appointment starting at 5 pm.
That sounds good to me. Can you book a cab for one people to 2585 Samaritan Drive?
What type of ride do you want me to book?
I prefer shared ride.
Please confirm: You want to book a shared ride for 1 people in a cab to 2585 Samaritan Drive.
No. Change the destination to Landmark's Albany Twin.
Please confirm again: You want to book a shared ride for 1 people in a cab to Landmark's Albany Twin.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully booked your ride and the cab is on the way.
Thank you so much!
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day.
Check events on my calendar.
What date do you want?
The 1st of this month.
At 10 am you have dentist appointment.
Thanks for the info.
Is there anything else?
I need a cab for it.
Do you want shared cab?
I am good with shared cab.
How many seats is it for?
I need two seats.
Confirm 2000 Appian Way #202.
Yes that is correct.
Confirm shared cab for 2 to 2000 Appian Way #202.
Yes I confirm all.
Your cab is on the way.
Thanks that is all I need.
Have a nice day.
Some friends are coming ovre and I want to know what I have scheduled for the 12th of March.
There is 1 event in your callendar, you have a property viewing at 5 pm.
Dounds great, I will need to get a cab to 2500 Deer Valley Road, if there is a shared ride I am ok with it.
For how many people?
For three people.
Please confirm: Getting a shared ride cab for 3 people to go to 2500 Deer Valley Road.
That is correct.
The cab is on its way to you.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great day.
Can you tell me what my calendar looks like on March 11th?
At 5:30 pm, you are going to a Jordan Rakei concert.
Is there anything else I have on the 10th of this month?
At 11:30 am, you have a dentist appointment with Dr. Sridevi Alapati.
Okay, that's good.
What else may I help you with?
I need a taxi please.
Is a shared ride okay?
Sure, that's fine.
Is your destination 430 East Calaveras Boulevard? And for how many people?
Yes, that's for two people and that's the right address.
Confirming a shared cab for 2 to 430 East Calaveras Boulevard.
Actually I have to go to 251 Geary Street.
Confirming a shared ride to 251 Geary Street.
That's right, thanks.
The cab has been booked and will arrive soon.
Thank you very much.
What else may I help you with?
Nothing right now, thanks.
It's my pleasure.
What do I got going on in my calendar.
For which date.
Monday next week.
You have the Imperial Daze Concert at 5:30 pm.
Nice. Thanks.
You're welcome. What else?
Get me a cab for two. I'm heading to 451 Queensbridge Road.
2 to 451 Queensbridge Road?
That is right.
The car is on its way.
Will this dent my wallet? How long will it take?
About 30 minutes ride time. It will cost you $25.39.
Ok. thank you.
Are you ok or do you need something else?
I am ok, thanks.
You are welcome.
check my calendar for me
which date should I search for?
Find me events for tuesday next week
You have a lights concert starting at 6 pm
Okay, book me a shared ride for 1 to get there
Is the venue 29 east allen street 2nd floor?
Yes, that is correct.
Booking a shared cab for 1 to 29 east allen street 2nd floor
Okay, how long is the ride?
Booking confirmed, the ride is arriving and would last 27 minutes
What is the cost?
It is priced at $9.14
Thanks, that would be all
Have a great time
Can you check calendar events for Monday next week?
You have an Ophthalmologist appointment beginning at 4:30 pm.
So I have any other events scheduled on the 6th of March?
At 10:30 pm, you have a Movie at Century 16.
Awesome. Can I get a cab for 3 people to 15555 East 14th Street? A shared ride is okay.
Please confirm: a cab for 3 people to 15555 East 14th Street. A shared ride is fine.
No, actually, I need to go to 757 1st Street.
Please confirm: a cab to 757 1st Street for 3 people.
Yes, that's great.
Your cab is on the way.
Thank you for your help!
Will there be anything else?
No, that will be it. Thank you again.
Have a wonderful day!
Find me events that I have on my calendar for the 9th of this month.
At 2 pm, you have an Appointment at Drybar Union Square.
That works. I need a ride to get there.
Is your destination address 123 Kearny Street and how many people are going?
The address is correct and the ride is for 1 person.
Is a shared ride okay with you?
A shared ride is fine by me.
You want a shared ride for 1 person to 123 Kearny Street. Is that right?
That is right.
Your taxi is booked and it is coming for you right now.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you need something more?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Can you check the 11th of this month on my calendar?
You have a Movie Show at 10 pm.
I need a cab for it.
The address is 2525 Sand Creek Road. How many passengers?
Yes, and I need it for four.
Is a shared ride ok?
Yes, a shared ride is fine.
Confirm a cab for 4 to 2525 Sand Creek Road.
Change to 377 13th Street.
Confirm change of shared ride to 377 13th Street.
Yes I confirm that.
Your cab is on the way.
What is duration and cost?
The ride is 16 minutes and $32.84.
That is all I need today.
Have a great time.
Can you check my calendar?
Sure, what date should I check?
Do March 5th.
You have a restaurant reservation for 6 at Bangkok Garden at 11:30 am.
Great, get me a cab.
How many people and what kind of ride? Will it be to 5231 College Avenue?
Yes, that's right. Get a shared ride for 4.
Will do, but first confirm you'd like a shared ride for 4 to 5231 College Avenue.
Actually change it to 4 Embarcadero Center.
Sure, please confirm you'd like a shared ride for 4 to 4 Embarcadero Center.
Yes, sounds good.
Your ride is on the way.
Thanks, that's all I need at the moment.
No problem, have a good time.
I'd like to check the events on my calendar.
What is the date you wanted to know about?
I'd like to know about the 11th of this month.
You have a Property viewing starting at 4:30 pm that day.
Did I have any other events schedule for next Wednesday?
You have a Movie booking for Breakthrough event starting at 10 pm.
That sounds good. I'd like to find a cab there.
Is your destination 6000 Bollinger Canyon Road Suite 2300?
Yes, that sounds right.
How many people did you need the ride for and did you want a shared ride?
The ride is for one person. My destination is 750 Brahms Way and I'm fine with a shared ride.
Please confirm you'd like a cab for 1 to 750 Brahms Way and you'd like a shared ride.
Yes, that sounds right. How much does the ride cost and how long is it going to be?
Your ride has been confirmed and the cab will be arriving soon. The ride costs $8.21 and should take about 28 minutes.
Thank you for your help. That's all I need for nwo.
Have a wonderful day!
Check for me my calendar on the 11th, please.
You have an event at 5:30 pm called Appointment with Lee Clara.
Is OK.Get for me a cab to go there.
You are going to 877 West Fremont Avenue # K2?A shared ride will be good for you and for how many people you want to be?
Yes is good a shared ride.Make it for one people.
You are going to 877 West Fremont Avenue # K2 and you want a shared ride and a cab for 1 people.I'm right?
Yes is great.Also I need to know the cost and how long will be the ride.
The ride is booked and the cab is on its way.Will last about 18 minute and cost $12.57
Thank you very much.
Anything else I can do for you?
No.Thank you!
Have a good day!
I want to check my calendar on the 11th.
You are watching a movie show ending at 10 pm.
Is there anything else schedule next Monday?
You have a restaurant reservation for 4 at Mariscos El Patron starting at 12 pm.
Cool, but I need a cab to get there.
How many people?
One person.
Is the address 458 B Street?
Yes, that is it.
Please confirm, shared ride for 1 to 458 B Street.
That is correct.
Your ride is booked and on the way.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I want you to get my calendar.
How about giving me the date?
start with the 9th.
You have a viewing at Casa Bonita. It begins at 12:30 pm.
Fine, organize a cab for me.
How many to ride please? You want 1017 H Street right?
Correct, and it's for three. Shared ride works ok.
I heard: 1017 H Street, 3 people, shared?
That's good thanks.
It is done. Cab will arrive shortly.
How many simoleons is that? How long will I have to sit in the cab?
You fee is $11.02 American cash and lasts 9 minutes.
That's quite precise, thanks.
What more might you need?
Not even a little thing.
Enjoy your cab ride.
I want to see what's happening in my schedule on March 8th.
You have a reservation at Mirchi Cafe that starts at 11:30 am.
Okay, good to know. I'd like to get a cab for that.
For how many people? Is a shared ride fine? Is the cafe at 40900 Fremont Boulevard?
For two people, a shared ride is fine, and you have the correct address.
Okay, so you'll be riding a shared cab for 2 to 40900 Fremont Boulevard?
Yes, that sounds good.
I've booked your ride! The cab should be here very soon.
How long will the ride be?
About 21 minutes.
Thanks for helping arrange that for me.
Do you need anything further?
Nope. Thanks for helping me out.
Have a wonderful day!
What events do I have scheduled on March 1st.
You have a stylist appointment at 6 pm.
Ok, I need a cab to get there.
Are you going to 717 East El Camino Real #4? How many people?
Three people.
Do you want a shared ride?
It is for 1 person, That is ok.
Please confirm, reservation for 1 seat on a shared ride to 717 East El Camino Real #4.
What is the cost? How long is the ride?
Your ride is on its way. The cost is $8.24 and it will be about 15 minutes.
Thanks, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I want to check my calendar for events.
What date should I check?
Check Sunday this week.
On Sunday you have a Stylist appointment at 6:30 pm.
Sounds good. Can you get me a cab for two people to 3977 17th Street? Don't mind a shared ride.
Confirming that you want to book a cab for 2 people to 3977 17th Street. You will accept a shared ride. Is this correct?
Yes. How much will it be?
Your cost will be $12.11. Your cab is on its way.
Thanks for your help.
Anything else today?
No, but thank you.
You're welcome. Have a nice day!
Can you check my schedule for March 11th?
You have a Movie booking for Long Shot which starts at 10:30 pm.
Ok. Thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I want to get a cab to go there.
How many people will be going? Is a shared ride okay? Are you going to 3111 Mission College Boulevard?
The cab is for two people and a shared ride is fine. You have got the right address.
Booking a shared cab for 2 to 3111 Mission College Boulevard. Please confirm.
Yes. That sounds perfect. How long will it take to get there?
Your cab has been booked and it is on its way. The ride is expected to take roughly 32 minutes.
Thank you for the assistance. That'll be all for now.
Have a great day!
Please help me check my calendar events.
What date would you like to check.
Check March 10th.
On that date you have a Movie at The New Parkway Theater that begins at 10:30 pm.
Okay. I'm going to need a cab to get thre.
How many passengers will there be? And would you like a shared ride?
It's just for 1 person and a shared with is fine.
And the address is 474 24th Street?
Yes, that's right.
I'll get you a shared ride cab for 1 person to 474 24th Street, is that correct?
Wait, no. I have to head to Parker Palo Alto Apartments.
Okay, I'll get you a shared ride to Parker Palo Alto Apartments?
Yes, that's right.
I've booked the cab and it's on route.
What's the cost of the cab, and what's the ride duration?
The cost is $14.32 and the rid duration is 29 minutes.
Thanks so much for helping me, I don't need any more help.
Have a wonderful day!
I want to see what I have down on my calendar.
On what day, exactly?
On March 1st.
On that day, you'll be going to a stylist appointment at Quality Men's Haircuts at 6:30 pm.
Good to know. I need a cab for 1 to get to the barber, which is located at 80 West El Camino Real. A shared ride is fine.
Okay, you want a shared ride for 1 to 80 West El Camino Real?
Yes, that's good.
I have booked your ride and it should be arriving shortly.
Thanks for the assistance.
Do you need anything further from me?
Not now. Thanks for everything.
Hope you get a nice haircut!
What do I have going on on the 14th of this month?
You have a gynecologist appointment at 1 pm.
Yikes. What about the 11th?
You have an appointment with Spate Daniel J. at 4 pm.
Ok. Can you get me a cab to 1101 South Winchester Boulevard # I202. There are 4 of us.
4 to 1101 South Winchester Boulevard # I202?
You got it.
The car is on its way.
Great. I'm good to go.
See you later.
Please check on availability on my calendar
For which date do you want me to check
Please check on 4th of this month
You have a movie show start at 8:30 pm
perfect, i also need a cab to get there
Are you traveling to 3117 16th st
yes please
how many people are in your party and do you mind ride sharing
its just 1 people and i am fine with ride share
Please confirm your ride share for 1 people to go to 3117 16th st
yes please
your ride is booked
thank you
have a nice day
Can you check my calendar for me?
What date do you want to look at?
I'd like to see the 8th.
You have a Viewing at Charter Oaks Apartments starting at 4:30 pm.
Do I have anything scheduled on March 14th?
Yes, you have a Reservation for 5 people at Maroo Korean Cuisine at 11:30 am.
Thanks. I'd like to get a cab to go there for one person. The address is 16105 Monterey Road. I'm find with a shared ride.
So you would like a cab for 1 person to 16105 Monterey Road, and you are fine with a shared ride. Is that correct?
Yes that sounds good. How much does the ride cost and how long will it take?
I've booked your cab and it is on its way. The cost is $6.91 and the ride takes about 29 minutes.
Thanks, that's all I need right now.
Alright, have a nice day!
What alarms do I have please?
You have 2 alarms set, one for 7 am that is called Wake up.
Are there any other alarms?
There is an alarm called Pick up kids that is set for 4:30 pm.
Ok, perfect!
Do you want to add any alarms?
Yes, I would like to add one for 4:15 in the evening.
Please confirm that you are creating an alarm for 4:15 pm that is named New alarm.
Yes, that is correct.
Sorry, I wasn't able to set it, is there anything else I can do for you?
Can you add one for 5:15 in the evening?
Please confirm that you are creating an alarm at 5:15 pm that is called New alarm.
Yes, that is correct.
The alarm was has been added successfully.
Thank you!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thank you, thank you for your help!
Thank you, bye!
I want to see my alarms.
You have 2 alarms including one called Wake Up set for 7 am.
Please add an alarm at 17:15 called Cleaning.
Please confirm you want an alarm called Cleaning at 5:15 pm.
Yes please.
The alarm is added.
Thank you.
May I further assist you?
Not at this time.
Thank you.
Please show me the all my current alarms.
You have one alarm for 6:30 am, called Wake up.
Okay, that's good. I'd like to set another alarm for five pm.
Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like a New alarm created for 5 pm. Correct?
That is correct.
I have successfully added your alarm.
Thanks a million. That's all for now.
Thank you and good bye.
Can you display my alarms? I really need to make sure I'm up early tomorrow.
You currently have 2 alarms set, one of which goes off at 8:30 am and has the name wake up.
You said I have two alarms. What does the other alarm do?
The other alarm goes off at 10:30 am and has the name shuttle to work.
I'd like to establish a third alarm, that goes off at evening 4:30.
So you want to set up a new alarm that goes off at 4:30 pm?
Indeed I do.
I have added the alarm for you.
Many thanks. That's all I need.
It was a pleasure to help.
Can you show me all my active alarms?
Sure. You have one at 9 am called Wake Up
Okay great, thanks
Do you want to add another alarm.
Yes please, add an alarm and call it Grocery Run at 4:45 pm
Confirming your 4:45 pm Grocery Run Alarm
Actually make it at quarter past 5 in the evening and name it Leave for Home
Confirming your 5:15 pm alarm named Leave for Home, yes?
Yes? That's right
I've created that alarm for you
Thank you for doing that
Sure, anything else?
Nothing else, thanks so much
You are very welcome
I want to know what alarms I have on.
You have 2 alarms on now. There is one for 6 am to wake up.
Nice. I would like to add one alarm called cleaning.
What time do you want this alarm to be?
Put it for evening 4.
Okay, please confirm that you want to create a 4 pm alarm called cleaning.
Yep.
I made the alarm successfully.
Thanks so much.
Do you need help with something else?
No, that is all. Thank you so much.
Thanks.
I thought I set an alarm? I can't afford to be late again... What alarms do I have set?
You set 2 alarms. One is for 8:30 am and is called Wake up.
Ah, looks like I forgot to set it after all. Can you add a new alarm called Music practice?
Sure. What time do you want this alarm to go off at?
I should set it a little before practice, so 5:15 pm.
You want an alarm called Music practice to go off at 5:15 pm?
Wait a minute. I don't have practice today so there's no point in setting this alarm now. I'll just do it later. Ah, but do have to get groceries today. Forget about the music practice alarm, can you create an alarm called Grocery run for 3 pm?
You want an alarm called Grocery run to go off at 3 pm?
That's right.
Your alarm has been created.
Thank you very much.
Do you need anything else?
That's all, thanks.
Glad to be of help.
What alarms do I have set at the moment?
You've got 2 set up, there's one called Wake Up set for 9 am
Okay, thanks
Do you want me to set another one up?
Yeah actually, can you set one up called Leave for home?
Yeah I can do that. What time shall I add it for?
16:30 please
Okay, just to check, are you happy for me to set up a new alarm for 4:30 pm called Leave for home?
Yes please
Great, I've set it up for you
Thank you! I don't need anything else
No problem! Have a wonderful day
Tell me my alarms.
There's an alarm called Wake up at 8 am.
Alright, fine. I'd like to add a new alarm named Leave for home.
When do you want me to set the alarm at?
Name the new alarm Cleaning and set it at afternoon 3:30.
Please verify the following information: make a new alarm for 3:30 pm called Cleaning.
Correct.
The alarm was created.
Thank you for your assistance; that's all.
Thank you very much.
Hello, could you tell me what alarms I have set?
You have currently set 2 alarms, one of which is titled Wake up to be sound at 6 am.
Sure, could you help me add an alarm titled Grocery run?
What time would you like to set the alarm for?
This evening 5 would be great.
Please confirm your request to set an alarm at 5 pm for Grocery run.
Yes, I would like to confirm.
I have successfully set your alarm.
Sure, thank you very much!
No worries, have a great day.
Please tell me which alarms are currently set.
There are currently 2 alarms set to go off. There is an alarm at 7 am with the title Wake Up.
Good, please add an additional alarm.
For which time would you like to set the alarm?
Please set the alarm for 5:15 pm.
Please verify the following. You would like to set the alarm New Alarm for 5:15 pm. Is this correct?
That's correct.
The new alarm has been added.
Thanks, that's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you please show me the current alarms I have set?
You have 2 alarms set, the first is for 7 am that is named Wake Up.
Are there any others?
There is another alarm at 9 am with a name Shuttle to work.
Okay, thank you. I would like to add an alarm.
What time should I set the alarm for.
It will be for 4:15 in the evening and please name it Cleaning.
Please confirm the following: Creating an alarm for 4:15 pm with the name Cleaning.
Correct.
The alarm has been added.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No thank you.
Thank you.
Show me my alarms, please.
You have a Wake up alarm for 9 am.
Great.
Would you like to add another alarm?
Yes. Add a new alarm and call it Phone home.
What time should I set the new alarm for?
Set it for three pm.
You want me to create an alarm called Phone home set for 3 pm, is that correct?
Yes it is.
Your new alarm was added successfully.
Thanks a ton!
Can I help you with anything else?
No. Thank you.
You're welcome.
What alarms do I currently have set?
You currently have 2 alarms set, one of which is set for 7:30 am and titled Wake up.
Okay, that's fine.
Do you need me to add an alarm to the ones you already have?
Yes, I need to add an alarm at 3:30 in the afternoon for my daughter's game today.
Great, please verify that you need me to create an additional alarm, set to go off at 3:30 pm labeled new alarm.
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully added that alarm for you.
Thank you so much, I really appreciate it.
It is my pleasure. Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, hang on. Never mind. Thanks again.
Thank you for allowing me to help.
Get my alarm monitor.
Sure, you have 2 alarms set. One is 6:30 am for wake up.
And, the other?
8:30 am for shuttle to work.
Great, thanks.
What alarm will you add?
Give me 3:45 pm.
This is what I'm adding. New alarm at 3:45 pm.
confirmed and valid.
Got it added for you.
That's going to be a big help.
What alarm is next?
Nothing. I'm good for now.
Wonderful. I'll alert you at 3:45
What alarms do I have set?
There are 2 alarms set. The first alarm is Wake up at 8 am.
Okay, thank you.
Do you need to add another alarm?
Yes, make an alarm called music practice.
What time is the alarm?
Set it for the evening 4:15.
Please confirm: An alarm called music practice set for 4:15 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
Your alarm has been set.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all.
Thank you very much.
Can you bring up my alarms, please?
You currently have 2 alarms set. One with the name Wake up is set for 6 am.
Nice.
Would you like me to add an alarm?
Yes. Let's make a new alarm called Leave for home.
When should I set this alarm for?
Set it for a quarter past 5 in the evening.
To confirm: You'd like me to create an alarm called Leave for home with a time of 5:15 pm, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I was unable to set the alarm, unfortunately. Is there anything else that I can help you with?
Can you try again? Try calling the alarm Grocery run.
To confirm: You'd like me to create an alarm with the name Grocery run for 5:15 pm.
No. Instead I'd like the alarm set for a quarter past 4 in the evening.
To confirm: You'd like me to create am alarm with the name Grocery run for 4:15 pm, correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I was unable to set the alarm. Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No, thank you. Thanks for your help.
You're quite welcome.
I want to check on my alarms.
You have an alarm set for 6 am called Wake up.
That is fine. I want another alarm set for 3:15 in the afternoon. Name it Cooking.
Let me confirm that you want to create an alarm named Cooking for 3:15 pm.
That is correct.
The alarm was set successfully.
Thank you very much. That is all I need.
Thanks.
Please show me my alarms that are currently active.
Currently, there are 2 alarms set up. There is the alarm Wake up set for 6 am.
What are the other alarms?
You have an alarm called Pick up kids set for 5 pm.
Good, please add another alarm for Grocery Run. Please set this alarm at four pm.
Please verify the following. You would like to create the alarm Grocery run for 4 pm. Is this Correct?
That's correct.
Unfortunately, the alarm was unable to be created. Do you require any further assistance.
No, thank you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you show me my set alarms please?
Yes, you have a Wake up alarm at 8:30 am.
I see, could you add an alarm at 4:15 in the evening?
Please confirm your action to set an alarm at 4:15 pm titled New alarm.
Sure thing, thanks!
Your alarm has been successfully set.
Thanks a bunch!
Do you need any further assistance?
No, that's all i need.
No problem, have a great day!
I want to see my alarms.
You have 2 alarms. The first is Wake up at 6:30 am.
What are the other alarms?
There is an alarm for shuttle to work at 8:30 am.
Okay. I want to add an alarm for the afternoon 3:45.
Please confirm: Adding alarm New alarm at 3:45 pm.
No, set the alarm for quarter past 5 in the evening. The alarm is music practice.
Please confirm: Adding alarm music practice at 5:15 pm.
Yes, that's correct.
The alarm has been added.
Thanks, that's all.
Thanks. Have a good day.
What alarms do I have set?
You have 2 set including Wake up at 7:30 am.
What's the other one?
Shuttle to work at 9:30 am.
Okay good to know.
Do you need to add a new alarm?
Yes can you add another one,
What time should I set it for?
Four in the evening
Confirming New Alarm for 4 pm.
Can you change it to afternoon 3:45 and rename it to Cleaning.
Confirming change name to Cleaning and time to 3:45 pm.
Yes thank you.
That alarm has been set.
Okay thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you show me my alarms?
There is an alarm set at 7 am named Wake up.
Ok thank you for the information.
Do you want to add a new alarm?
Yes, let's add an alarm.
What time do you want the alarm at?
Can you set the alarm for three pm?
Yes creating an alarm for 3 pm with the name New alarm.
Perfect thank you for that.
The alarm had been added.
That is all I needed, thank you.
Have a good day.
Please show me my alarms for the day.
You have an alarm named Wake up set for 6 am.
Awesome, thank you.
Would you like to add an alarm?
Yes, I'd like to add an alarm please.
What time would you like to set the alarm for?
Set it for the afternoon 3:45.
Please confirm the following: Create an alarm at 3:45 pm named New alarm.
Yes, that's right.
Your alarm has been added successfully.
Okay, thanks a ton.
Anything else i can help you with?
No, that is all. Thank you.
Thank you, have a great day.
What are the alarm times?
A Wake up alarm for 6:30 am
That's great
Can i add an alarm?
Yes please
May i know the time of alarm?
Set it for afternoon 3:45
Please confirm this: creating an alarm at 3:45 pm with name New alarm
Please change it to 15:00 with name Cooking
Please confirm this: creating alarm at 3 pm with name Cooking
That's perfect
Successfully added the alarm
Thanks a lot
Do you need anything else?
No. That's all for now. Thank you
Thank you
Can you display my alarms for me?
You have an alarm that goes off at 7:30 am, for when you want to wake up.
Is that the only alarm I have?
No. You have another one that goes off at 3 pm, so you can pick up kids from school.
Good to know.
Would you like to add another alarm?
Yes, I would like to add another alarm. Make it for 5:15 pm.
You want to set up a new alarm that notifies you at 5:15 pm. Is that right?
Wait, I need it to specifically notify me for music practice.
Okay. So this alarm will go off at 5:15 pm and tell you it's time for music practice?
That is correct.
I have added the new alarm.
Great! That's all I need.
Glad I could be of assistance.
Can you please say how are my alarms set?
You set 2 alarms, one is at 6:30 am with Wake up.
Fine, I want to set another one.
Details please sir.
Set it at 4:15 in the evening.
Confirm the details please, New alarm at 4:15 pm.
Great that's it.
I couldn't do it , sorry. Any other help you need?
Can you retry with 3:30 pm?
You demanded New alarm at 3:30 pm, is it right?
Yes, go ahead.
Fine, its done.
Great help, thank you.
Welcome sir, always keep in touch for any help.
Can you show me the alarms I have?
You have an alarm at 7 am called Wake Up.
Okay, that's good. I want to make a new alarm for 5:15 pm. It'll be called Music practice.
Okay, I'll make a new alarm for 5:15 pm called Music practice, is that right?
Yeah, that's right.
I've added the new alarm.
Thanks a lot.
What else can I do for you.
Nothing else, thanks again.
Okay, thanks.
I have to wake up early. Show me my alarms.
There's one for 6 am titled Wake Up.
Any others?
There's one for 8 am titled Shuttle to work.
Good to know.
Do you want to add a new alarm?
Yes, please. Title it Cleaning.
For what time should I set it?
For evening 4:15.
So you want to add an alarm to 4:15 pm titled Cleaning?
Yes, that's it.
Your alarm was successful added.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help you in anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Have a amazing day. Thank you.
Please show me which alarms I currently have set.
There are currently 2 alarms that are set. There is an alarm called Wake up set for 7:30 am.
Good, Please add another alarm for the evening 4:30. This alarm is for Phone home.
Please verify the following details. You would like to set an alarm for 4:30 pm called Phone home. Is this correct?
That's correct.
The new alarm has been successfully created.
Thank you, that's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
When are my alarms?
You have 2 alarms set. One is 6:30 am called wake up.
Ok, I need to add another at quarter to 4 in the afternoon.
Please confirm: add an alarm for 3:45 pm titled new alarm
Yes.
I wasn't able to set an alarm. Can I do anything else for you?
Nope. Thanks though.
You're welcome.
Could you tell me what alarms I have on?
YOu have 2 alarms, and one is for 6:30 am called wake up.
Cool.
Would you like to add an alarm?
Yes, please.
What time do you want me to set it?
Please set it up for 16:30.
Please confirm that you want to create an alarm for 4:30 pm called new alarm.
That is right.
Your alarm was added successfully.
Thank you so much. That is all for now.
Thanks.
I need to know how many alarms are there in my list? can you please show it now?
You have a Wake up alarm at 7:30 am, including this currently you have 2 alarms in total.
That's fine. Please make an addition of new alarm for evening 4:30.
Please confirm to add an alarm at 4:30 pm in the name New Alarm.
That is correct, add it.
Alarm was added to your list.
Thank you for your help.
Anymore help you need from me?
No, that's all for now and thanks.
Thank you.
What time are my alarms set for?
You have an alarm set for 6:30 am called Wake up.
Please can I add a new alarm.
What time would you like to set the alarm for?
For 3:45 PM
Sure. So you would like an alarm to be created for 3:45 pm called New Alarm.
Yes please.
Your alarm has been created.
Thanks.
Do you need help with anything else?
No thanks.
Cheers.
Hey! I set a reminder in my clock. Please can you tell me at what time the alarm is set?
Hello! In the name Wake up, an alarm is set at 7 am and totally there are 2 alarms set currently in your clock.
Oh! is it so.. Fine.
Do you want to modify the alarm timings or do you wish to add any more?
Yup! I wish to add an alarm in the name Phone home. Can you do that for me?
At what time, you want the alarm to be set?
Please set the alarm for 4:45 pm today.
Okay! Can you affirm me that you wish to create a new alarm in the name Phone home at 4:45 pm. Is that correct?
Nope, sorry! Please set at 3:30 in the afternoon.
Okay! I've made the changes. Please confirm me that you wish to create a new alarm in the name Phone home at 3:30 pm, right?
Nope, please can you modify the alarm name to be Leave for home?
Yup! I can do that for you. I've modified your alarm name to be Leave for home and is set at 3:30 pm. Is that okay for you?
Yup!
Your new alarm is added to your clock successfully and you will be reminded of at that time.
Thanks a bunch.
Do you want to set any other alarm timings?
Nope, that's it for the day. Thanks a lot.
Welcome. Thank you too.
Can you tell me what alarms I have saved?
There is an alarm with the name Wake up that is set for 9 am.
Ok, great. I need to add an alarm.
What time should I set the new alarm for?
Set it for four in the evening.
Ok, create alarm for 4 pm with the name New alarm. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Alarm was added successfully.
Thank you. That is all I need for today.
My pleasure. Have a great day.
I want to know how many alarms are there in my list, can you show me
Yes, you have a Wake up alarm for the time 9 am.
am I have any other alarms in my list?
Yes, one more that is for 4:30 pm in the name Pick up kids.
That is okay, fine.
Do you have an idea to add a new alarm now to your list?
Yes, I have. Please do a favor for me.
What is it and at what time you want the alarm and also let me know the name in which I have to store it.
Please make it in the name Music practice for the time 17:15.
need your confirmation to set an alarm at 5:15 pm in the name Music Practice.
That is correct, proceed.
alarm was added to your list successfully.
That's all I want. Thanks.
with Pleasure.
I want to check the weather in El Sobrante on the 6th of March 2019.
The average temperature for the day should be 76 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about the weather in Guerneville on the 1st of March 2019?
The average temperature for the day should be 89 degrees Fahrenheit with an 11 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it supposed to be?
There should be around 28 percent humidity.
Okay.
Do you need anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Goodbye.
Can you tell me what the weather is like in Nairobi, Kenya.
The temperature average during the day is 105 degrees Fahrenheit. And there's also a 0 percent chance it will rain.
Alright, how's the weather for Kenwood on March 5th 2019?
It will be 90 degrees Farhrenheit on average during the day, and there's a 27 percent chance it will rain.
Alright, can you tell me the weather for 1st of March 2019.
It will be 92 degrees Fahrenheight on average during the day, and there's a 23 percent chance it will rain.
Okay, that's all I need. Bye!
Take Care.
Can you check the weather in Montara?
The average temperature for today is 89 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 8 percent chance of rain.
Thank you. That's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
Please check the weather.
What city do you need?
Please check in Clayton.
The temperature is forecasted to be 70 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
What about Forestville on March 12th.
The temperature should be 75 degrees with a 14 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it suppose to be?
The wind should be around 10 mph.
What is the humidity going to be?
The humidity is expected to be around 36 percent.
Yes, that is ok.
Anything else today?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I wonder if it's gonna rain. Can you check the weather?
In which city?
In San Pablo.
The average temperature should be 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Sure, good to know.
Can I help you in anything else?
No, that's all. Thanks.
That's great. Have a good day.
I want to do weather check at San Anselmo
The average day temperature need be 89 degrees Fahrenheit.There it is 28 percent chance of rain
How much windy and humid it might be there
The humidity level there is 23 percent with average wind speed around 3 miles per hour
ok, that is all. Bye then
Cheers for now
Give me the weather update for the 1st of March 2019 please.
Sure, for which city?
Please check the city of Stanford.
Sure thing. On March 1st 2019 the weather is estimated to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit. Please keep in mind there will be a 29 percent chance of rain.
Find the humidity expectation for that day please.
Sure, humidity is expected to be around 47 percent.
ok, thanks for that information.
your welcome. Will there be anything else?
Nope, that's it.
OK, Have a good one.
I'm trying to decide what to do today. Can you tell me what the weather is suppose to be like?
I can help you with that. What location would you like me to check the forecast in?
Can you tell me the forecast for Pinole on March 1st 2019?
I can see that the average temperature for the day you specified should be 91 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
Great, thanks for all your help. Goodbye.
Goodbye.
I want to check the weather for the 12th of March 2019.
Which city?
In El Cerrito, please.
The average temperature for the day should be 88 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 18 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity, and how windy will it be?
The humidity should be around 25 percent, with an average wind speed of 1 mile per hour.
Okay.
Is there anything else you want?
No, that's all, thanks.
Goodbye.
Could you check the weather in Alamo?
The average temperature today should be 81 degrees. There's also a 12 percent chance of rain.
How about Novato on the 12th of March 2019
The average temperature should be 77 degrees and there's a 6 percent chance of rain.
What about March 2nd 2019?
Average temperature should be 71 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Wind speed should be about 3 miles per hour.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else you need?
No thanks, that'll do it.
Have a great day.
Please check the weather in Discovery Bay
77 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature and a 9 percent chance of rain
What about on March 12th
70 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature and there is 23 percent chance of rain
What about on 10th of March 2019
85 degrees Fahrenheit is the average temperature for the day and 15 percent chance of rain
OK perfect. That's all for now. Bye
Cheers
I require to do weather check in San Jose on March 10th 2019
The average day temperature have to be 74 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 18 percent chance of rain
sure that is ok
you need anything more?
No, thank you
Cheers for now
What is the weather like in Bodega Bay.
The average temperature at daytime is 80 degrees and there is only a 28 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity level?
Humidity is around 44 percent.
Okay great. That's all for now.
Thanks.
What's the weather forecast for March 9th 2019 in Seattle?
The average temperature for the day will be 64 degrees. There's a 14 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is forecast at 13 percent.
Will it be windy?
The average wind speed will be around 5 miles per hour.
Okay. Thanks. Bye!
Have a good day.
Please tell me the weather forecast for March 4th.
Can you name the city you wish to know the forecast for?
I want to know the forecast for Toronto.
On March 4th, the temperature should be 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 38 percent chance of rain.
I better make sure to dress cool for that day. Thanks for the information. That will be all for now.
You are quite welcome. Have a nice day.
I have to do weather check in Moraga.
The average day temperature is running at 70 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 23 percent.
What is your opinion on March 7th 2019
The average day temperature is running at 73 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 12 percent.
That is perfect. Bye
Be happy always.
I need to see the weather in Windsor
The average temperature will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain
OK, what about the weather in Las Vegas
It will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and will have an 18 percent chance of rain
Ok, that's good, bye for now
Ok, have a good day
Can you get me a weather report for Yountville California?
Sure, the average temperature will be 75 degrees. There's only a 7 % chance of rain.
What's happening in Morgan Hill, March 4th?
The average temperature there is 72 Degrees F. There is a 29 % chance of rain.
Great, now I know.
Cool, (I think).
What is the weather going to be like on the 10th of March 2019?
What city should I check?
Please look at Lafayette.
There's a 14 percent chance of rain and the temperature will average 75 degrees.
Cool. What about March 6th?
The temperature will be 86 degrees on average and there's only a 1 percent chance of rain.
Alright. Can you check in Bolinas?
There's a 22 percent chance of rain and the temperature will average about 92 degrees.
Cool. Thanks! That'll be it.
Have a good day!
I want to do weather check in San Mateo.
There the average temperature for the day is at 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there is also 13 percent chance of rain.
What is your opinion on Larkspur on March 3rd.
There the average temperature for the day is at 85 degrees Fahrenheit and there is also 23 percent chance of rain.
That is cool.
Any other information you want me to look in?
No, thank you very much.
so be happy
I have a plan to make a trip but if weather is good i wish to travel. So will you find and check the weather on March 6th?
In which city do you wish to check the weather ?
In Petaluma city.
The average temperature for the day is 91 degrees fahrenheit and there is a 10 percent chance of rain.
Okay, Tell me how about the temperature in Union City?
In union city the average temperature for the day should be 71 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 19 percent chance of rain.
Okay, How about the temperature is on March 9th?
The average temperature for the day will be 79 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 1 percent chance of rain.
Ok thats great.
whether i need to find any other thing?
No. thanks a lot!
take care have a great day
Can you tell me the weather in KL?
The average temperature should be 102 Fahrenheit with an 8 percent chance of rain.
How about Clayton on March 14th?
The average temperature should be 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
10 miles per hour on average.
Sure, okay.
Is there anything else?
No, thank you very much!
You're welcome!
I would like to check the weather for the 5th of March 2019.
In which city should I check?
Please check in Tomales on the 11th of March 2019.
The average temperature for the day is 89 degrees and there is a 23 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy? How humid will it be?
The humidity is low at 25 percent as is the wind at around 2 miles per hour.
Thank you.
Is there anything else that you need?
No thank you.
Cheers, have a nice day.
I want to plan something outdoors, so I want to check the weather for March 4th.
Can you tell me the city where you would like to check the weather forecast?
I am planning to go in Tomales, so that's the location for which I want to know the weather forecast.
I can see that the average temperature in Tomales for the day will be 85 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 28 percent chance that there will be rain.
Alright, can you also look into Toronto, Ontario for March 13th 2019?
I can see that the temperature in Toronto, Ontario for the day will be 62 degrees Fahrenheit, also there is a 1 percent chance that it will be raining.
Fine, that's good. That's all I needed. Later then!
It was a pleasure!
Check the weather in Olema, California for me.
The average temperature for the day in Olema is 91 degrees Farenheit. Today, there is a 21 percent chance of rain.
Alright, yea. How about on the 3rd of March 2019?
On the 3rd of March 2019 in Olema, California, the temperature is expected to average around 87 degrees Fahrenheit, and there will be a 23 percent chance of rain.
How about in Marshall on March 1st 2019?
In Marshall on that date the average temperature is expected to be around 86 degrees Fahrenheit, and there will be a 5 percent chance of rain.
Alright, cool. Thanks a bunch.
You're welcome, will that be all?
Yea that's it for now.
Okay, enjoy your day.
I need some quiet, outdoor harmony to balance out a wild day of back-to-back meetings. What kind of weather do you show for March 10th 2019, please?
Ready to assist you. Tell me the city you want to check and I can let you know.
Yes, take a look at Tiburon.
Okay. It is reported that the average day's high is expected to be 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent possibility that it will rain.
Well, now, and what's the weatherman saying for the 5th of March 2019?
It is reported that the average high fo that day is expected to be 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent possibility that it will rain.
I see. Take a look at Calistoga for me, please.
The report for that city is showing an average high of 73 degrees Fahrenheit for the day with a 12 percent possibility that rain will come.
Okay, well done.
Would you like any more assistance at this time?
You've provided all the info I need for now. Many thanks.
That's all for now. Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'd like to check the weather report in Rutherford.
Today's average temperature in Rutherford will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance to rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed will be around 10 miles per hour.
Alright, thanks! That will be all for today.
Thank you, have a great day!
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in San Bruno on the 8th of March 2019?
The average temperature should be 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 10 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how about in Fresno, CA on March 3rd 2019?
The average temperature should be 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 18 percent chance of rain.
Okay, that's all I need. Bye for now.
Have a good day!
Can you tell me if it is going to rain?
What city would like to check?
LAX please.
It will be a nice 76 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What about on March 2nd.
It will be 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Ok thanks
IS there anything else I can do for you.
No that will be all.
Have an enjoyable day ahead.
I want to check the weather in Palo Alto.
The average temperature should be 79 degrees Fahrenheit for the day and chance of rain is 4 percent.
How windy and humid is it expected to be?
The wind average speed should be 4 miles per hour and humidity is around 19 percent.
Sure. It is okay.
Do you like anything else?
No, thanks for your help.
Best wishes.good bye
What is the expected weather in Inverness on March 10th?
The temperature is expected to be 90 degree Fahrenheit with a 3 percent chance of rain.
What about in Union City?
The average temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
What are the humidity and wind suppose to be like?
The humidity is expected to be around 23 percent, wind 6 mph.
Sure, that will be great.
Anything else today?
No, that will be all.
Have a wonderful day.
What is the weather forecast on March 4th in Alamo?
There is a 24 percent chance of showers with an average temperature of 94.
What is the forecast the 1st of March 2019?
A 12 percent chance of showers with an average temperature of 81.
What is the forecsst in Hayward?
A 9 percent chance of showers with an average temperature of 80.
Thank you. That's all I need.
Have a lovely day.
What's the weather in Napa?
The daily average should be 85 degrees with a 24 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Predicted wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
Oh okay.
Anything else I can do?
No, thanks.
Cheers.
I want to know what the weather will be like on March 2nd.
Sure. What city's weather do you need to know?
I want the weather of Nairobi.
The temperature of Nairobi has an average of 86 degrees for March 2nd.There's also a slight 6 percent chance that it will rain.
Not bad. Now, can you tell me the temperature of Valley Ford for the 12th of March 2019?
Valley Ford's average temperature for March 12th is 92 degrees. The percentage of precipitation is 11.
What's the wind going to be like? And what about the humidity?
The wind has an average of just 1 mile per hour, and the humidity is expected to be about 34 percent.
That seems fine.
Do you need help with anything else?
That's all. Thanks!
Have a nice day.
Hi I'm having guests over to BBQ. Can you check the weather in Discovery Bay?
The temperature today will be around 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 9 percent chance of rain.
Thanks, and what about 9th of March 2019?
The temperature for your requested day will be around 89 degrees Fahrenheit with an 11 percent chance of rain.
Great, thanks.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that's all.
Have a nice day.
11th of this month in london, england
71 degrees 15 percent chance
how humid though?
11 miles 41 percent
monday next week premium economy
what city departure?
chicago works for me
southwest airlines 7:10 pm 0 layovers $390
12:30 march 14th
when and where?
11th of this month vancouver bc
yvr international airport march 11th standard accord
tell me the cost
$99 in total
that is good
have a good one
I would like to check the weather on 8th of March.
What city should I check in?
Check Sydney, Australia.
The temperature on average for the day would be about 99 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity would be around 21 percent.
That's okay. I'd like to find a one way flight going there as well. I have 0 bags to check in and will fly out on 8th of March. Find a Premium Economy class ticket.
What city will you leave from?
Find flights from Seattle.
Do you want to fly on United Airlines? The flight leaves at 6:55 am and has 1 layover. The ticket is $537 per person.
Which airport does the flight depart out of?
The flight departs from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
Okay. Could you also find a rental car for me?
Where would you pick it up from and what time?
I would like to pick the car up around ten am from New York City.
What date will you drop the car and from when?
I want the car from 7th of March till the 10th.
There would be a nice car available at JFK International Airport on March 7th. It's a standard Camry.
Sounds good. That's all I need for now.
Have a good one.
I would like to check the weather for the day after tomorrow in Paris, France.
The temperature for the day should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed will be 4 miles per hour.
Okay. I'd like to look for a one way flight that is going there. I will fly out on March 1st from San Diego.
Would you like to go on Alaska Airlines? The flight departs at 9:55 am and has 1 layover. This tiket costs $351 per passenger.
Find me other things.
How about a Southwest Airlines flight that takes off at 11:45 am and has 1 layover? It costs $361.
Would you find me a rental car there?
Where will you pick it up from? What time will you need it?
I want to pick up a car at six in the evening in Toronto.
When would you like the car from and until which date?
I would like the car from the 7th till March 12th. Please make it a compact car.
There is a good car available at Toronto Pearson International Airport on March 7th and it's a compact Cooper.
Sounds great. That is what I need.
Have a good day.
I'd like to check the weather on the 3rd of March.
Where would you like to check?
I'd like to find the weather on the 14th of this month in Los Angeles.
The average temperature will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 17 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The average wind speed will be about 4 miles per hour and the humidity will be around 29 percent.
That will work.
Is there anything else I can help with?
I'd like to find a one-way flight there.
Where are you leaving from? And are you leaving on March 14th?
I'd like to leave on March 8th from San Francisco.
I have found 5 flights that could work. There's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 9:05 am and has 0 layovers. It costs $90.
Find me another option.
There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 6 pm local time and has 0 layovers. It costs $96.
That will work. Could you find me a rental car there? I need it starting on March 13th and want to get it in Anaheim.
What time would you like it at?
I'd like to get it at 12:15 in the afternoon.
What day do you want it until?
I would like it until the 14th of this month.
There's a Standard Accord available on March 13th at John Wayne Airport.
What's the cost of it?
It'll cost $36.
That will work.
Is there anything else?
Nope, thanks for everything.
Have a wonderful day.
I must verify the weather on March 2nd in SFO
The mean temperature on that date ought to be 72 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 15 percent likelihood of rain.
Alright. I'd like to look for one-way flights headed there. I'd like to have 4 economy class tickets on Southwest Airlines.
Will you depart on March 2nd?
That's perfect for me.
What metropolis would you like to leave from?
Search for flights near Chicago.
Would you like a ticket costing $159 for a Southwest airlines flight departing at 8:05 pm local time with 0 layovers?
Okay. Can you also search for rental vehicles there?
What location do you wish to pick it from, and at what day?
I require the vehicle from the 5th of March and would like to pick it from Seattle.
When will you require the vehicle?
I'd like to pick up the vehicle near 12 in the afternoon.
Until what day do you desire the vehicle?
I require the vehicle until next Wednesday.
I discovered 4 vehicles you might enjoy. There is a lovely standard civic vehicle available at King Street Station for pickup on MArch 5th.
That sounds wonderful.
Do you wish to book this vehicle?
Nope, I do not wish to book it now.
Could I assist you with something else?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
What is the weather in London, England?
The average for today is 81 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The average wind speed is estimated at 10 miles per hour with humidity at 35 percent.
Okay, thanks. Can you find me a one-way flight going there?
Would you like to leave on March 1st? Where are you leaving from?
That sounds good. I am leaving from Washington.
I found 4 flights. There is a flight with American Airlines leaving at 1 pm local time with 1 layover for $303 per passenger. Does this work for you?
Can you find me something else?
There is a flight with Delta Airlines leaving at 5:55 pm with 1 layover for $292 per passenger. Does this work for you?
That's fine. Can you find me a rental car?
Where would you like to pick it up?
I want to pick it up in NYC.
What time would you like to pick it up?
I want to pick it up around 12:30 pm.
What day would you like to pick it up?
I want to pick it up on March 9th.
When would you like to return it?
I will return it March 13th.
I found 7 cars for you. There is a Standard Accord available for pickup on March 9th at Grand Central Station. Does this work for you?
Is there anything else? I want to pick it up on the 7th.
I found 3 cars. There is a Standard Altima available for pickup on March 7th at Port Authority Station. Does this work for you?
What is the price?
The total cost is $180.
That sounds good. That's all I need for now.
Okay, have a great day!
Hello. I want to see what the weather is like on the 11th of this month.
At what location?
In KL.
The temperature there is going to be about 99 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. I'd like to find a one-way flight that goes there.
Will you be leaving on March 11th? From what city?
I'm leaving Portland on the 9th of this month.
Want to take a $383 American Airlines flight? It takes off at 7:25 am, and has 1 layover.
Sure. Can you find a rental car for me, as well?
When will you need it? Where you want it?
I want to pick it up from Fremont at around quarter to 4 in the afternoon.
How long do you want it?
From the 2nd to the 4th.
There's a standard Accord you could pick up at Fremont BART Station on March 2nd.
Sounds good to me.
Can I help you out any further?
Not now. Thank you.
Have a wonderful day!
I must verify the weather on 4th of March in Portland.
The mean temperature for the date ought to be 68 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 18 percent probability of raining.
What is the humidity level?
The humidity will be near 32 percent.
How strong will the winds be?
The wind ought to be 12 miles per hour.
Okay, good. I'd like to look for one-way flights headed there as well.
Will you depart on March 4th?
That's fine with me.
What metropolis would you like to leave from?
Search for planes leaving Los Angeles.
What do you think about a ticket costing $146 for an Alaska Airlines flight departing at 11:45 am local time with 0 layovers?
How many seats will this get me, and will it come the day after?
There is 1 seat, and the plane will arrive at its target on the same day.
Okay. Can you also search for rental vehicles for me there?
Until when will you desire the vehicle, and what location will you pick it up from?
I require the vehicle until the 9th, and would like to pick it up from Fremont.
What day would you like it from?
I require the vehicle from the 4th of March.
When will you require the vehicle?
I'd like to pick up the vehicle near eleven in the morning.
There is a lovely standard Accord available at Fremont Bart Station for pickup on March 4th.
That's perfect; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon!
What is the weather like today in Nairobi Kenya?
The temperature for the day is 105 degrees and there is 0 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity level and how windy is it supposed to be?
The humidity is around 15 percent and the wind is 7 miles per hour.
I would like a one-way flight there.
Are you leaving on March 1st?
Yes, that works with me.
In which city are you departing from?
I'm leaving from Philadelphia.
There is a flight with Delta Airlines that leaves at 4:20 am and has 1 layover for $364.
Can you find me a car rental there?
Where are you picking up the car and till when do you need it?
I would like to pick it up from Philly till the 9th of March.
When do you want it and at what time?
I would like it on the 7th of this month evening 4:30.
There is a standard altima available at 30th Street station on March 7th, 8 cars available.
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like to rent the car?
No, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
What is the weather like on the 13th of March?
In which city should I look.
The weather in New York.
The temperature should be around 59 degrees and there is a 33 percent chance of rain.
I would like a one-way flight on Saturday this week.
Where are you departing from?
I am leaving from London.
There is a American Airlines flight leaving at 2 am and has 0 layovers for the cost of $247.
I would like to rent a car till the 6th of this month.
When do you want it from and till when do you need it?
I want it Saturday this week around twelve pm.
Where would you like the car from?
I would like to pick a spacious car from SD.
There are 3 options, there is a Full-size Highlander available at San International Airport on March 2nd.
Yes, that sounds good.
Would you like to reserve the car?
Not at the moment.
Can I help you with something else?
No, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Hi, can you check the weather for me?
Sure what city do you want to know the weather for?
I want the weather in Vancouver.
In Vancouver it will be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit today with a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay thanks, I'd like to get a one-way plane ticket going there. I'm leaving from New York and I need 4 seats.
For sure, will you be departing March 1st?
Yes, that works. I need 2 economy tickets.
There are 4 flights you could take. How about an American Airlines flight that leaves at 9:15 am and has 1 layover? The price is $350 per person.
Can I take 2 checked bags on the plane?
Unfortunately, 0 checked bags are allowed on the flight.
That's okay. Could you get me a rental car for my trip? I'd like a medium-sized car I could pick up at two pm on Wednesday next week.
Sure, how long do you want to rent the car?
I'll need to drive it until the 10th.
Okay, and where would you like to pick it up?
I want to get it in Paris, France and I'll need it until next Thursday.
I found you 4 possible cars. There's a nice standard car, an Accord, that you can pick up from Charles de Gaulle International Airport on March 6th. Does that work?
Can you find something else? I want to pick up the car at quarter to 2 in the afternoon.
Okay, I found 3 cars for you. There's a standard Cruze at Charles de Gaulle International Airport that you can pick up on March 6th.
Right, how much will it cost?
The rental will come to $37.
Is there another car? I want a small car and I need it until Saturday this week.
There are 4 cars you could rent. I found you a compact Bolt available to pick up from Charles de Gaulle International Airport on March 2nd.
Yeah, that works for me.
Can I do anything else for you?
No thanks, you've been a great help.
Okay, have a wonderful day!
I'd like to check the weather.
Where would you like to check the weather for?
I'd like to know the weather in Toronto, Canada.
The average temperature will be 58 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 13 percent chance of rain.
That'll work. I'd like to search for a one-way flight there as well. I want to leave on the 1st of March.
Where would you like to leave from?
I'd like to leave from Las Vegas.
I have found 2 flights that would work. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 4:50 am local time and has 1 layover. It costs $272.
That works. Could you find me a rental car?
When do you want it? And how long do you want it for?
I'd like the car next Thursday until the 9th of this month.
Where do you want to get it from?
I need it next Wednesday and would like to pick it up from Delhi.
What time do you want it?
I'd like to pick it up at around 9:30 in the morning.
There is a Standard Accord available on March 6th at Indira Gandhi International Airport.
That would work. That's all for now.
Have a good day!
I want to know how the weather will be in Philadelphia for March 12th?
For your requested location the average temperature should be 83 degrees Fahrenheit, and the chance of rain at 25 percent.
Can you tell me how windy is it going to be there, and what humidity should I expect to find there?
The average wind speed for that location is expected to be 4 miles per hour, and the humidity at around 27 percent.
Alright, nice. Now I would like to find a one way flight to go there.
Will you be leaving on March 12th?
No, I actually want to fly out later today.
Can you tell me from where will you be leaving from?
I want to have a flight from Paris.
How would you like flying with the Air France flight which has 1 layover and takes off at 5:15 pm? The ticket for this price costs $326 per passenger.
Very nice. I am in need also of finding a rental car there.
Till when will you be needing to have the car rented, and where will you be picking it up from?
I am interested in renting a Standard car, which I want to pick up from Vancouver, and I will need it till 14th of this month.
From when will you be needing the car, and at what time do you want to have it?
I will be needing to rent the car from March 9th, and I want to pick it up around half past 6 in the evening.
There are 5 cars which suits what you requested. One of the cars is a Standard one, and more precisely is an Altima car which can be picked up at YVR International Airport on March 9th.
That is good. That would be all.
Have a wonderful time!
Can you check the weather on March 9th in NYC?
The temperature should be around 70 degrees and there is 38 percent chance of rain.
I would like to find a one-way flight to get here.
In which city are you departing from?
I would like a flight from San Francisco.
Are you leaving on March 9th?
I would like to fly on the 7th on a economy flight and I have zero bags.
There is Alaska Airlines that leaves at 8:20 pm and has 0 layover for $208.
Which airport does the flight leave from and arrive at?
The flight leaves from SFO International Airport and the destination is JFK International Airport.
I would find a car rental around a quarter past 9 in the morning.
When do you need the car rental?
I will need the car on the 13th of March.
Where are you picking up the car from?
I will pick up the car from San Francisco.
Till what date do you want the car?
I need the car until the 14th of this month.
There are 4 cars. There is a standard Altima available at SFO International Airport on March 13th.
Yes, that sounds good. That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Tell me the weather next Wednesday in San Francisco.
It will be 72 degrees with a 3 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity going to be?
It will be near 16 percent.
I see. Get me a one way Economy flight there next Wednesday.
What is your departure city?
I am departing from Los Angeles and I want Premium Economy seats on Southwest Airlines.
Search revealed 1 result which is Southwest Airlines who has a flight that departs at 1:55 pm, has 0 stops, and a total price of $135 a seat.
I see. I need a rental car there.
What date are you getting it?
I will get it this Sunday.
What time will you get it?
I will get it at 17:30.
What city are you picking it up in and when will you return it?
I will get the car in Atlanta and return it next Thursday.
Search revealed 4 results. There is a Standard Camry available March 3rd at Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
How much money will this cost me?
Your bill comes to $116 total.
That works for me.
Do you need more help?
No, not right now. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in San Diego on the 13th of March.
The average high is 75 on that day and you'll have a 19 % chance of rain.
Great, beautiful flying weather. How about a one way from San Francisco Tuesday next week?
There are 5 choices. Try Alaska Airlines, they have great one way tickets you can board at 7:40 pm with 0 layovers for $118.
Fine, I'll need a rental car there. What about if I pick it up on the 6th of March in Seattle, WA and turn back on the 11th?
What time of day on the 6th will you get it?
Around 6:45 pm.
There are 4 options, what about a Civic, Standard? You can get it from King street station on March 6th.
What about a better car?
You can get a Standard Elantra from King street station on March 6th.
That's acceptable, yes.
What else do you want?
Nothing, thanks a lot.
Enjoy your trip.
I must verify the weather on March 5th.
What metropolis would you like to verify the weather in?
The metropolis is Phoenix
The mean temperature for the date ought to be 73 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 12 percent chance of raining.
What is the humidity and wind level?
The wind level ought to be 5 miles per hour, while humidity ought to be around 31 percent.
Alright, fine. I'd like to verify for one-way flights headed there.
Will you depart on March 5th? What metropolis do you wish to leave from?
I'd like to depart on the 2nd from Washington.
I discovered 2 flights for you. There is a ticket costing $282 for a Southwest Airlines flight departing from 8:50 pm local time with 1 layover.
What time does the flight come to my target?
The plane will come at 0:27 am local time.
Is the ticket Business?
The ticket is economy.
Okay, I'm fine with that.
Could I assist you with something else?
Could you also look for a rental vehicle there? I'd like to pick up the vehicle near twelve pm. I require it until the 10th of this month.
Where do you wish to pick the vehicle from, and at what itme?
I require the vehicle from the 9th of March, and I'd like to pick it up from London.
There is a lovely standard Accord vehicle available from Gatwick International Airport for pickup from March 9th.
That sounds perfect; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Hey, what'll the weather be like in Delhi on the 2nd of this month?
It'll be around 95 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Thanks a lot. How windy and humid will it be?
The average wind speed will be 5 miles per hour, the humidity will sit at around 15 percent.
Thanks a lot. Can you book a one-way flight there?
Sure, where are you departing from? Are you leaving on March 2nd?
Yes thanks. From Philadelphia.
Okay, I found 3 flights for you. Will you fly with American Airlines? They have one flight departing at 8:45 am with 1 layover and a total cost of $300 per person.
Sounds good. Could you also get me a rental car from SD?
Sure, at what time?
Around evening 5 thanks.
Okay, on what date?
On the 8th of this month please.
And when will you return it?
I'll return it on the 11th of March.
Okay, I found 6 cars for you. There's a standard Accord at Santa Fe Depot available from March 8th.
Sounds great, thanks.
Should I reserve it for you?
No, not right now thanks.
Okay, anything else?
No that's all thanks.
Okay, see you.
I want the weather in Paris.
It is 77 with a 26 percent chance of rain.
I need a one way flight there.
What city is departure?
Departure is Las Vegas.
Is departure March 1st?
That is right.
I have an American Airlines with 1 layover leaving at 1:55 pm for $422.
What is departure airport and arrival date?
It leaves McCarran International Airport and arrives the next day.
I want something else.
I have Delta Airlines with 1 layover leaving at 2:25 pm for $421.
I need a medium-sized car too.
Where and when do you need it?
I want to pick up in Chicago at 3:30 in the afternoon.
Until when do you need it?
The 13th of this month.
When do you want it?
Pick up on the 9th.
I found 5. I have a standard accord for pickup March 9th at O'Hare International Airport.
That is all I need.
Have a nice day.
Forecast for Vancouver, BC.
The average temperature will be 75 and the chance of rain will be 15 percent.
Humidity and wind?
Average wind speed of 8 miles per hour and humidity of 19 percent.
Ok. Find one-way flights there.
On March 1st? Departing from where?
Leaving Atlanta.
American Airlines has a 0 stop flight leaving 8:05 pm for $186.
Nah, find something on Southwest Airlines.
Southwest Airlines has a flight with 0 stops leaving 4:10 pm for $197.
How many checked bags can I have?
0 checked bags.
Okay. Find a rental car out there.
Pickup date and location?
March 5th in Concord.
Pickup time and return date?
09:30 and March 6th.
There's a standard Accord at Canterbury Village from March 5th.
Total?
$32.
Sounds good.
Do you want to book it?
Not now.
Anything else for you today?
Nope, thanks.
Have a nice day.
What's the weather for the 7th of this month in Cotati?
The forecast is for an average temperature of 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity and wind?
Humidity is expected to be 15 percent, with 8 mile per hour winds.
How about the weather in Seattle, WA?
The forecast is for a temperature of 69 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I'd like to find a one-way flight there. I'd like to leave tomorrow. I need 4 tickets and prefer premium economy class.
Where are you leaving from?
I'm leaving from Phoenix.
I found a flight on Delta Airlines for $379 that departs at 7:55 pm and has 1 layover.
Can you also get me a rental car? I want to pick it up at morning 10:45.
What date do you want to pick it up?
I'll need it on the 3rd.
How long will you need it?
I want the car until the 9th of March.
What location will you pick it up from?
I want to get it in San Francisco.
I found a standard size Nissan Altima available at SFO International Airport available on March 3rd.
Okay, that works.
Is there anything else you need?
No, that's all thank you.
Alright, have a great day.
Check for me please the weather.
In what city do you want to check the weather?
Toronto, Canada will be great.
For the day the average temperature should be 58 dergrees Faherenheit and 13 percent chance of rain.
Great.I also want to find a one-way flight going there.
You want to leave on March 1st?
Yes sounds good.
Tell me from what city you want to depart.
From Las Vegas will be okay.
What do you think about American Airlines?You can take it off at 4:50 am local time.1 layovers have the itinerary.Cost per passenger is $272.
Is for one passengers?
Yes this is for 1 passengers.
Find for me please something else.
United Airlines is the company.The flight takes off at 1:40 pm local time and have 1 layovers Cost per ticket is $284.
Two checked bags is allowed?Tell me the number of passengers did you get for this.
Is permitted 0 checked bags.Is for 1 passengers.
Is okay.Find me a rental car there.
Tell me at what time you need it.
Around afternoon 12:15 I want to be the pick up.
You want to pick it up from where and when?
I would like to pick up from Chi-town and I need it from tomorrow.
On till date you need it?
Till March 4th.
A nice Standard Accord car is available at O'Hare International Airport on March 2nd.
Anything else you can find?
A nice Standard car Altima is available at O'Hare International Airport on March 2nd.
Sounds very good.That's all for now.
Have a nice day!
Can you tell me what the weather forecast is for Paris next Thursday?
It is expected to be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of rain.
Thank you. Can you help me find two seats on a one-way flight there?
Will you be departing for Paris on March 7th?
No, I will be leaving on the 5th of this month.
Where will you be departing from?
I'd like to see if there are any Premium Economy tickets available on Southwest Airlines flights from Washington.
There is 1 flight that matches that criteria. Southwest Airlines has a flight that leaves at 8:15 am with 1 layover for $581 per ticket.
Can you tell me when the flight lands? Is it the next day?
The flight arrives at 7:31 am the next day.
That's fine. I'm going to need a rental car. I'd like to pick it up afternoon 3:45 in Las Vegas on March 3rd.
How long will you need it?
I will return it on the 10th of this month.
There are 2 cars that would work for you. The first is a Standard car, a Civic, and it will be available for pickup at Union Plaza on March 3rd.
That's perfect. Thanks for the help. That will be all.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day!
Check the weather for me please.
In what city you want?
In Portland will be okay.
For the day the average temperature should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and 9 percent chance of rain.
I understand.Find for me one-way flight that goes there.
You want to leave on March 1st?From which city you want to depart?
Sounds good.From San Francisco I want to depart.
What do you think about Alaska Airlines?Cost per passenger is $105 and you can take it off at 4:05 pm.0 layovers have the itinerary.
Tell me if one checked bags is allowed and if will arrive the day after.
0 checked bags is allowed.Flight will arrive on the same day.
I understand.Thanks.
With something else I can help you?
A rental car there you can find?
From where you want to pick it up?
I would like to pick up from Ciudad de Mexico in 2nd of March around 4:30 pm.
You want the car till what date?
Till March 6th.
A nice Standard Camry car is available for pickup on March 2nd from Estacion Buenavista.
Sounds very good.
You want to make a reservation for this car?
No.I don 't want now.That 's all.
Have a good day!
Tell me the weather in Chi-town on March 12th.
The daytime average temperature is 61 degrees with a 26 percent chance of precipitation.
I see. I want a one way flight to there on Alaska Airlines out of Seattle.
Is March 12th your departure date?
I am departing Wednesday next week.
There is an Alaska Airlines flight with 1 layover, a departure time of 11:10 am, and a cost of $317 a ticket.
I see. I want to get a rental car in San Diego.
What time do you want to pick it up and when will you return it?
I want to pick up a large car at 7 in the evening and will return it March 3rd.
What day will you pick it up?
I will get it on March 1st.
Search revealed 3 results. There is a Full-size Cherokee at Santa Fe Depot on March 1st.
That works for me. That is everything for now.
Have a good day.
los altos march 11th
73 degrees 28 percent rain
delhi sounds good
103 degrees 7 percent
how windy then?
10 miles per hour 19 percent
sure that works
what city too?
new york works
march 11th works
monday next week
american airlines 12:35 pm 0 layovers $257 2 flights
alright thank you
anything else then?
vancouver, bc
at what time?
one in the afternoon march 8th
when do you need it?
5th of march
pacific central station march 5th standard cruze
small 6th of this month
march 5th pacific central station 5 cars compact forte
that is good
wanna reserve the car?
no I do not
anything else then?
no thank you
have a good one
Check the forecast on the 3rd of March in San Lorenzo.
Average of 78 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Humidity and wind?
Average windspeed of 9 mph and humidity of 43 percent.
Check it in Mexico City.
Average of 102 degrees and 7 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Get a one way flight there.
Departure city? Is this departing March 3rd?
Leaving today from Portland.
I found 4 flights. Alaska Airlines has a flight with 1 layover leaving 7:15 pm for $273.
Ok. Get a rental car to pick up in San Jose, any kind.
Time and date of pickup?
1:45 pm on the 9th of this month.
Return date?
The 10th of this month.
There's a compact Bolt at SJC International Airport from March 9th.
Good. Ok that's all.
Have a nice day.
I want to check on the weather for the 13th of this month.
What city do you want to check the forecast for?
Check it for Paris, France.
The average temperature is forecasted to be 88 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 23 percent chance of rain.
Sounds good. Find me a one way flight going there too.
Do you want to leave on March 13th?
I would like to fly out on the 8th of this month.
What city would you like to depart from?
Find me Premium Economy class tickets from Atlanta.
I have 2 flights for you. What about American Airlines? This flight takes off at 6:05 am local time and has 1 layover. It's $586 per passenger.
Will it arrive the day after? How many passengers is this for?
The flight arrives the next day. This is for 1 passenger.
Okay. Would you find me a medium-sized rental car there from 10th of this month?
Until what date do you want the car? Where would you like to pick it up?
I want to pick it up in Long Beach, CA around one pm and I need it till 11th of March.
I have 5 cars that should be of interest. What about this nice Standard car at Downtown Station, available for pick up on March 10th? It is a Fusion.
How much would it be in total?
It costs $31 in total.
Do you have anything else at all?
There is a nice car at Downtown Station that you can pickup on March 10th. It's a Standard Prius.
What is the cost in total?
It costs $32 in total.
Sounds good to me.
Would you like to reserve this car?
Not at the moment.
Could I assist with something else?
No, thanks for helping.
Have a good one.
I must verify the weather on the 11th.
What metropolis do you wish to verify the weather for?
The metropolis is Vancouver, BC.
The mean temperature for the date ought to be 66 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 22 percent likelihood of raining.
Sure, alright. I'd like to look for one-way flights headed there.
Will you depart on MArch 11th?
I'd like depart on the 6th.
What metropolis do you wish to leave from?
Search for flights coming out of San Diego.
I discovered 3 flights for you. There is a ticket costing $249 for an Alaska Airlines flight departing at 12:40 pm local time with 1 layovers.
What place doe the flight head to, and what airport does the airport depart from?
The plane is departing from SAN International Airport and is headed to YVR International Airport.
Get me something else; I'd like to fly with United Airlines on premium economy seats.
I discovered 1 flight for you. There is a ticket costing $411 for an United Airlines flight that departs at 6:35 am with 1 layover.
Okay. Can you also look for rental vehicles nearby?
What location would you like to pick it up from?
I'd like to pick the vehicle from Nairobi.
What day will you require the vehicle, and until when? What day would you like it from?
I'd like to pick up the vehicle near half past 3 in the afternoon, and I require the vehicle from March 9th to the 12th.
I possess 2 vehicles you may enjoy. There is a lovely standard Elantra vehicle available at Jomo Kenyatta International Airport for pickup at March 9th.
Do you have some other alternative?
There is a lovely standard Prius vehicle available at Jomo Kenyatta International Airport for pickup on MArch 9th.
That sounds perfect; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Portland, OR please?
Sure, the temperature is 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 9 percent chance of rain.
I see, thank you!
Could I further assist you?
Could you get me a one-way flight there too?
Sure, where will you be departing from?
Could you help to search for a flight from San Francisco please?
Will you depart on March 1st?
Yes, I will.
How about the Alaska Airlines flight which departs at 4:05 pm with 0 layovers costing $105 per passenger?
Sure, could you get me a medium-sized rental car?
When will you be using the car till and what time will you be picking it up?
I will pick the car up at 6:45 pm on the 14th of March.
Sure, when will you be using the car from?
From March 12th, thanks!
Where will you pick up the car from?
Likely in Vancouver.
How about a standard Accord available at YVR International Airport on March 12th?
Sure! That is all I need, thank you.
Have a great day ahead!
I need the weather in Paris on the 7th of March.
Sure, the high is going to be 87 and there's only a 12 % chance of rain.
Get me a one way out on Southwest Airlines this sunday will you?
Sure, leaving where?
I'm taking off from Portland.
There is only 1 with Southwest Airlines and it leaves at 9:20 am, local and has 1 layover. The cost is $356 each.
What about a nice small rental car there?
What dates do you want that?
I'll need it from March 8th until March 13th.
What time will you pick up and where will you pick it up?
I need to get it at 3 pm from SD.
Sure, 5 autos await your choice. What about a compact Bolt from Santa Fe Depot on March 8th?
What will this run me?
That reservation's $125.
What else ya got?
Fit is another compact choice and you can also get from Santa Fe Depot on March 8th.
What is that charge?
It's $140.
Fine, sounds ok.
Shall I book it?
No, I just need the info. for a report.
Fine, good luck with that.
I need to see what the weather is like in Paris.
Paris will have temperatures averaging 77 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 26 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. I'd like to find a one-way American Airlines flight there.
Will you be leaving on March 1st, and from what city?
Yes, March 1st. I leave Chicago.
I found 1 suitable American Airlines flight. It departs at 9:50 am, has 1 layover, and has a cost per passenger of $465.
When will the flight arrive at my destination?
It should arrive at about 11:23 am.
What's the departing airport?
It leaves O'Hare International Airport.
Okay. Can you find me a rental car for when I'm there?
Sure thing. Where will you get it, and how long will you keep it?
I'd like to pick up the car from San Jose on March 5th, and will use it until the 12th of this month.
And at what time?
I want to pick it up at about 1 pm on March 10th.
Okay. I found 6 cars you can pick up on March 10th, including a standard Camry at SJC International Airport.
What'll it cost me in total?
A total of $62.
Sounds good. I need nothing more.
Have a wonderful day.
I need to know the expected weather in Seattle, WA on the 2nd of this month.
The average temperature is 70 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity going to be?
13 percent!
Ok, I need a one-way flight there.
Where are you leaving from? Are you leaving on March 2nd?
I want to leave on the 1st. Find me an economy ticket to Mexico City.
I found 3 flights including one on American Airlines that leaves at 11:40 am with 1 layover. The ticket is $298.
Find me something else.
Delta Airlines has a flight leaving at 6:35 pm with 1 layover. The ticket is $315.
When does it arrive? And at what airport?
Your flight arrives at Benito Juarez International Airport at 1:17 am.
Ok, find me a rental car too.
When do you want to pick it up?
I want to pick it up on the 2nd of this month.
Where do you want to pick it up? How long do you need the car?
I want to pick it up in Phoenix. I need it until the 4th of this month.
What time do you want to pick it up?
3:30 in the afternoon.
I found a car at Sky Harbor International Airport that is available on March 2nd. It is a standard car, like an Accord.
Sounds good, that is all.
Have a super day.
Could you check the weather forecast for me for the day after tomorrow?
Which city will I check?
For Chicago please.
There is a 36 % of rain and the ave temp will be 67 degrees Fahrenheit.
that's fine, could you search for a flight going there for me?
Which city are you leaving from and will it be on March 3rd?
From Vancouver this saturday?
There is an Air Canada flight at 12:15 pm with 1 layover costing $298.
fine, now could you assist me to get a rental car. I will collect it at afternoon 3 in San Francisco nad return it on 4th of March.
What date will you collect it?
This Saturday and could you make sure it is a standard car?
There is a standard Altima at SFO International Airport on March 2nd.
How much will it be?
It costs $74 altogether.
That is good and everything I need for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Give me a weather report for Seattle, WA today.
The high temp is going to be about 74 degrees and there is about a 32 % chance of rain.
Great, thank you.
I can help with something else if you want?
Please reserve a one way flight for me. Lets see if you can get two seats today.
Which city are you leaving?
I'm leaving Paris.
I have 3 options. What about the American Airlines flight that leaves at 5:05 am. There is 1 layover and tickets are $429 Each.
Try again. I want something better.
Try Delta Airlines. They leave at 11:20 am, 1 layover and the charge is $369.
Try to get me a rental car first.
When will you turn in the car?
I'll bring it back on March 10th.
Where will you pick it up? Where will you need it and when can you bring it back?
I will pick up around 12 o"clock in the afternoon on the 9th of this month. I need it in Philadelphia.
You can pick up an Altima, Standard on March 9th at 30th Street Station.
Fine, that'll be all.
Have a great day.
I want to know how the weather will be in San Diego on March 6th.
For the location you asked for, the average temperature should be 80 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of raining is at 6 percent.
Can you tell me how windy is it going to be there, and at what percentage will the humidity be?
The average speed of wind there will be 1 miles per hour, and the humidity is expected at around 23 percent.
Alright, fine. I am interested to find a one-way flight to go there.
Can you tell me the airport from where you will be leaving, and if you are leaving on March 6th?
I am interested in flights from Phoenix, and I want to leave on the 2nd.
How would you like flying with an American Airlines flight which has 0 layovers and leaves at 10:10 am. The ticket for this flight costs $91.
That is okay. I also want to find a car which I can rent there.
From when do you want to have the car, and at what time do you want to have it?
I am interested to rent the car from 3rd of March, and I want to pick it up around quarter past 6 in the evening. I will need to have this car rented till next Thursday.
From where do you want to pick up the car?
I want to pick up the car from Los Angeles.
A nice Standard car I can recommend, which is a Camry, can be picked up at LAX International Airport on March 3rd.
Can you suggest some other car, that I can pick up from Paris, France. I am interested in having a small car.
Another nice Compact car, more specifically a Bolt one, is available at Charles de Gaulle International Airport, and can be picked up on March 3rd.
That is nice. That would be all.
Have a wonderful time!
What's the weather like on the 12th of this month?
In what city?
In Portland, OR.
The temperature there on that day should average 72 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Okay, good to know. I'd like to find a one-way flight there.
Want to leave on March 12th?
No. Make it the 3rd.
From which city do you wish to depart?
I want to leave from Chicago.
I found 4 flights for you, including an American Airlines flight that leaves at 2 pm local time, has 1 layover, and costs $257 a passenger.
Where does the flight leave? How many passengers is this for?
It leaves from O'Hare International Airport, and is for 1 passengers.
Okay. Can you get a rental car for me, too? I need one until the 11th of March.
When and where do you want to get it?
I want it at about 15:45 on the 10th of March in Portland, OR.
You could get a standard Accord at PDX International Airport on March 10th.
Sounds good. I need nothing more.
Have a wonderful day!
What's the weather going to be like on the 11th of March?
What city do you want me to check in?
Check in Vancouver.
The day's average temperature will be 66 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 22 percent.
Alright. I want to look for a one way flight going there also.
Where will you be traveling from?
I'm traveling from San Diego.
Will you be leaving on March 11th?
No, I want to leave on the 5th.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight that leaves at 12:40 pm with 1 layover. It's $264 per ticket.
Okay. I'll need rental car too. I want to get it from SF.
What time do you want it?
I want to get it at half past 1 in the afternoon.
And what date do you need it from and to?
I'll need to from Friday next week to the 10th.
There's a nice Standard Altima available at SFO International Airport on March 8th.
Okay, that might work. I'll think this over, I don't need anything else.
Okay, take care then!
I would like to find out the weather on the 11th of this month.
What city should I check?
Find out what the weather will be like on the 14th of this month in Las Vegas.
On that day the temperature should be around 71 degrees fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
Wind speed should be 6 miles per hour with humidity around 39 percent.
That's fine. I want to look for one way flights going out on the 11th of this month. I'd like economy class tickets.
What city do you want to leave from?
Find me flights from Chicago.
How about American Airlines? This flight takes off at 8:25 am local time and has 1 layover. It costs $288 per ticket.
Okay. Could you also find me a rental car there?
Where will you pick it up from and from when?
I need the car the 7th and will pick it up in Phoenix.
Until what date do you want the car and what time do you want to pick it up?
I would like to pick it up at 3:15 in the afternoon and I need it till the 11th of this month.
I have 3 cars that should be good for you. What about a nice car at Sky Harbor International Airport to be picked up on March 7th? It's a Standard Accord.
Sounds good to me. That is what I needed.
Have a good day.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in phoenix, AZ please?
Sure, it will be 89 degrees fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
I see, could you get me an Alaska Airlines flight today departing from Los Angeles?
Would you like the Alaska Airlines flight with 0 layovers which departs at 7:05 am which costs $102?
Sure, that is fine!
Anything else I can help with?
Sure, could you get me a full-size rental car?
Where and when will you be picking up the car from?
I will pick up the car at Anaheim at around 18:30 on 10th of this month.
And when will you use the car till?
On the 13th, please.
I see, there are 2 cars you may like, one of which is a full-size Escape at John Wayne Airport for your pickup on March 10th.
Sure, that sounds good!
Would you like to make a booking?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
Sure, enjoy your day!
What's the weather going to be on the 3rd?
What city do you want me to look in?
Look in SD.
The predicted temperature is 82 degrees F with a 7 % chance of rain.
And how humid will it be?
Humidity is estimated at 28 %.
And what about wind?
The average wind speed will be 11 mph.
Okay, cool, thank you. Can you help me find a one way flight there?
Would you like to leave on March 3rd?
No, actually I want to leave March 2nd.
And what city are you departing from?
Leaving from Chicago.
I found 1 flight. There is a $288 Delta Airlines flight leaving at 5:45 am with 1 layover.
Okay, can you also find a rental car? I need the car starting the 5th.
Where would you like to pick it up?
Picking up in Vancouver, BC.
How long do you want the car for?
Until March 6th.
What time do you want to pick up the car?
I need to pick it up around 3:15 pm.
I found 7 cars. There is a standard Accord available for pick up on March 5th at YVR International Airport.
What are my other options?
There is a standard Altima available for pick up on March 5th at YVR International Airport.
How much would that be?
The reservation would be $31 in total.
That sounds like it would work.
Can I assist with anything else?
No, I'm good, thank you.
Enjoy your day!
What is the weather like?
What city am I checking the forecast in?
Seattle, please.
There is a 32 percent chance of precipitation and an average daily temperature of 74.
What is the humidity index?
Today the humidity is about 25 percent.
Not bad. Please find me an airplane ride there.
Where from? Is March 1st the departure date?
I am flying out of Los Angeles. The date detail is correct.
One flight with Alaska Airlines for $134 a person has 0 stops with a take off time of 8:15 am.
I see. I also would like to rent a vehicle there.
Where will you pick up the rental and for how long?
Sacramento, Ca is where I want to get the car next Thursday.
When is a good time for you to get the car. What date will you return the car?
1 in the afternoon is a good time for the pick up. The car is needed until the 14th.
A Standard Camry is available at the Sacramento Valley Station on March 7th.
How much will I pay?
The total cost comes to $217.
That's perfect.
What else do you need?
Nothing, thank you.
Have a great day.
Can you check the weather for me?
Which city would you like me to check?
The Phoenix weather.
The average temp is 89 degrees and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
How humid will it be?
Around 23 percent humidity.
How windy will it be?
The average wind is around 11 mph.
Okay please find me a flight. I have 0 bags to check.
Will you be departing on March 1st?
Yes sounds good.
From which city will you be departing.
I will be departing from Los Angeles.
Would you like to fly Alaska Airlines which has 0 layovers and departs at 7:05 am. The flight is $102 per passenger.
Yes sounds good. I also need a spacious rental car at evening 7 from Sacramento.
What is the pick up and return dates?
I need it from march 10th to the 14th of this month
I found 2. How about the full-size Equinox at SMF International Airport on March 10th?
How much is it?
$164 total.
SOunds great that's all I needed.
Have a fabulous day!
Hi! Can you tell me what the weather forecast is for Duncans Mills on the 11th?
I'd be happy to. The forecast predicts an average temperature of 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy?
Wind speeds should average 7 miles per hour.
Is it supposed to be humid?
Humidity is hovering around 19 percent.
What does it look like for Toronto, Canada on the 13th of March?
It should be 62 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Thank you. Can you help me find a one way flight there for March 9th?
Where will you be departing from?
I'll need an Economy flight ticket from Atlanta.
Do you like American Airlines? They are offering a flight at 6:05 am with 1 layover for $246 per ticket.
Can you tell me where it departs from and where it will land?
The flight leaves Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport and arrives at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I'll need to pickup a rental car at 13:15 and I'll need it until next Thursday. I prefer a Compact car.
What day will you be picking it up?
I'll pick it up on the 5th of this month.
Where would you like to pick it up from?
I will get it in Paris.
There are 4 cars that may suit you. The first is a Compact car, a Bolt, and it is available on March 5th at Charles de Gaulle International Airport.
How much will it be?
The total will be $54.
That will work for me.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, that will be all. Thanks for the assistance.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day!
Can you find me the weather for the 1st of this month?
For what city?
For CDMX.
The temperature should be around 102 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Okay, can you find me some one-way flights to CDMX? I want to leave on the 1st of this month.
What city will you be departing from?
From San Francisco.
How about Alaska Airlines? There is a 11:05 am departure with 0 layovers. The ticket costs $148 per passenger.
Can you find something else?
How about American Airlines? There is a flight leaving at 6 pm that has 1 layover. The ticket costs $239.
What is the departure airport? Are zero checked bags allowed?
0 checked bags are allowed. The flight departs from SFO International Airport.
Okay. Can you find me a small rental car to pick up in Philly? I need it from the 11th.
What date will you need it until? What time will you be picking it up?
I will pick it up around afternoon 3:30 and I need it until the 12th of this month.
I found 6 cars for you. How about a Compact Cooper? You can pick it up on March 11th at the Intercity Terminal.
How much?
Your reservation will be $25 total.
Is there anything else?
How about a Compact Fit? It is available for pickup at Intercity Terminal on March 11th.
Sounds great. That's all that I need.
My pleasure to help you. Have a great day.
I would like to know how the weather is in Nairobi, Kenya.
For your requested location the average temperature should be at an average of 105 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 0 percent chance of raining.
Alright, fine. Now I am in need of finding a one way flight to go there. I am interested of having two Economy class tickets for a flight from New York.
Will you be leaving for the flight on March 1st?
Yes, that is good.
There are 2 flights which match your request. One of the flights is with Delta Airlines, which has 0 layovers, and takes off at 8:35 pm local time. The ticket for this flight will cost $256 per passenger.
Can you find me another flight?
How would you like having the flight of Southwest Airlines, which has 0 layovers and takes off at 10:15 am. The ticket for this flight costs $295 per passenger.
Okay. I also need to find a car which I can rent there.
From when do you want to rent the car, and till which date will you need to have it? At what time do you want to rent the car?
I want to rent the car from March 9th at 7:15 in the evening, and I will need to rent it till March 11th.
Can you tell me from where you want to pick up the car?
I am interested in picking the car up from Portland, OR.
There is a good Standard car, more precisely an Accord, which can be picked up at PDX International Airport on March 9th.
That seems nice.
Is there something else you want me to help you with?
Nothing. I am thankful for the help you provided to me.
Have a wonderful time!
I would like to check the weather in SD.
The temperature for the day will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 1 percent chance of rain.
Okay, good. I want to look for a one way flight that goes there. I will fly out 1st of March from Las Vegas.
Do you want to fly on American Airlines? The flight leaves at 12:55 pm local time and has 0 layovers. This ticket costs $86.
Find me another thing. An economy class ticket is good.
Do you want to fly on Delta Airlines? THe flight leaves at 8:35 pm local time and has 0 layovers. This ticket costs $92.
Okay, good. Would you look for a rental car there?
What time do you need it? Where will you pick it up from and until what date will you keep it?
I would like to pick up the car around quarter to 1 in the afternoon from Walnut Creek and need it until March 12th.
When do you want it?
I want it from the 10th of this month.
There is a nice car in BART Station to be picked up on March 10th. It's a Standard Accord.
Sounds great.
Could I assist with something else?
No, thank you for helping.
Have a good day.
Can you check the weather on next Friday for me?
Sure, but first i'll need to know the location.
Look it up for Atlanta.
There is expected to be a 12 percent chance of rain and the average temperature for the day is expected to be around 79 degrees Fahrenheit.
Sounds good. Can you get me a one way flight there from Delhi on March 1st? I have zero bags to check.
Would you like to fly with American Airlines? They have a flight with 1 lay over that leaves at 12:20 pm and costs $375 per passenger.
Will it arrive on the day after?
The flight arrives on the same day.
Where does the flight arrive?
At the Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport.
Sounds good. Can you also find me a rental car for when I get there?
Where would you like to pick it up from?
Right in Atlanta.
Till what date will you need the car, and at what time would you like to pick it up?
I think i'll be able to pick it up around 1:30 pm, and i'll need it till Monday next week.
When do you want it from?
From the 3rd of this month.
There are 4 cars available, would you like a standard Camry which is available at the Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport on March 3rd?
Depends, what's the price?
The total cost is $31.
Okay, thank you for the information. That's all I need for now.
Okay, let me know if you need anything further and enjoy the rest of your day.
What is the weather forecast in Atherton on 13th of March?
The forecast average temperature for the day will be 80 degrees Fahrenheit, with an 11 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I'd like to search for songs now.
I have 10 songs for you. What do you think about Rats by Ghost, from the album Prequelle.
Yes, that's the one. I want to listen to it now.
Please confirm: you are playing the song Rats on the TV.
No. Cast it to my bedroom instead.
Please confirm: you are playing the song Rats on the bedroom speaker.
Sorry, changed rooms. Cast it on my kitchen speaker.
Please confirm: you are playing the song Rats on the kitchen speaker.
Yes, go ahead. Is that from nine years ago?
The song is from the year 2018. Enjoy your music.
What kind of music is that?
It is a metal song.
Thanks, that's all.
Have a good day.
Can you check the weather in Bodega Bay on Wednesday next week?
The average temp that day is 82 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
Wind is estimated at 5 miles per hour.
Okay, what about on the 9th of March?
The average temp that day is 74 degrees with a 14 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thank you. Can you find me a song now? I want a Rock song by Kozoria, maybe on the album K.
How about Worst Ends by Kozoria on the album K?
Yes, that's perfect.
Would you like to play this song now?
Sure!
Okay, I am playing Worst Ends on the TV. Is this correct?
No, play it on my Kitchen speaker.
Okay, I am playing Worst Ends on the Kitchen speaker, correct?
No, play it in my bedroom.
Okay, playing Worst Ends on your Bedroom speaker. Is this correct?
Yes, that's correct.
Enjoy your music!
Thanks! That's all I need.
Have a great day!
check next friday
what city then?
it is millbrae
92 degrees 0 percent
sure then okay
change your life iggy azalea 10 songs the new classic
speaker in the bedroom
change your life bedroom speaker
yes that is right
enjoy it now
what kind then?
it is 2013 pop song
thanks a lot
have a good one
I'd like to know the Newark forecast on the 10th please.
The temperature will average 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent rain possibility that day.
Thanks. Now I want to find a song to listen to.
Would you like to hear the Frank Ocean song Nights from the Blonde album?
How about a song by Skillet?
How about the song The Resistance from the album Unleashed Beyond by Skillet?
What genre is that?
It's rock and roll.
From what year?
It was released in 2016.
Okay, sounds good.
Shall I play it for you now?
Yes, on my tv please.
Confirming playback of The Resistance on the TV device.
Sorry, play it on the kitchen device please.
Confirming playback of The Resistance on the kitchen speaker now.
Thank you so much.
You're very welcome.
I guess I'm all set.
Anything else today?
No, thanks again.
It's my pleasure.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Foster City please.
It is currently 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 22 percent chance of rain.
What is the expected humidity and windiness there?
The humidity is around 38 percent and the wind speed is 8 miles per hour.
Sure, could you help me search for some nice songs please?
There are 10 available songs, how about Love Will Remember by Selena Gomez in her album Stars Dance?
Sure, that is what I'm looking for.
Could I further assist you?
Could you play the music please?
Please confirm your request to play Love Will Remember on the Tv.
Could you play it on the kitchen device instead?
Sure, please confirm your request to play Love Will Remember on the Kitchen Speaker
Could you play it on my bedroom speaker instead?
Sure, please confirm your request to play Love Will Remember on the Bedroom Speaker.
Yes, that is fine with me.
Enjoy listening to your music!
What is the music genre and when was it released?
This is a Pop song released in 2013.
Sure, that is all I need.
Have a great day ahead!
I need to check the weather on the 12th of March.
in which city would you like to see weather for?
The city of Novato on the 6th of this month.
The average temperature for that day is predicted to be around 71 degrees Fahrenheit. There is also a 20 percent chance of rain.
Okay, then I would like to search for songs. There are many good songs in the album Love Town. I want to hear some older stuff from like eight years back. I love Reggae.
I have found 1 song which matches your selection. The song is titled First True Love by Kolohe Kai from the album Love Town.
Yeah, that's it!
Would you like to play this song now?
Yeah, and I want to hear it from the speaker in the kitchen.
Please confirm the following information: Play the song First True Love on the Kitchen speaker.
Yes, that's it.
Enjoy your music.
Thanks so much!
Of course. Is there anything else that I may help you with?
No. Thank you!
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
Can you check the weather for me?
In what city
Check Gilroy on the 3rd of March.
The temperature is expected to average 86 degrees with a 7 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. I'd like to look for a song now.
I found 10 songs. Would you like to hear I Lived It from the album Texoma Shore by Blake Shelton?
Yes, I like that one.
Shall I play it now?
Yes, please play it on the speaker in the kitchen.
You would like me to play I Lived It on the Kitchen speaker. Is that correct?
Yes. Is this song from 2012?
No it's from 2017. Enjoy the music.
I will, thanks.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thanks. I'm good.
Have a great day.
I would like to know the weather in Tiburon on 9th of March.
82 degrees Farenheit is the average temperature for the day. The chance of rain is 27 percent.
Sure. How about the weather in San Rafael?
90 degrees Farenheit is the average temperature for the day. The chance of rain is 9 percent.
How windy and humid is it gonna be?
25 percent is the humidity and it should be 10 miles per hour for the wind speed.
Okay. I'd like to search for songs by Ruth B. I like the Safe Haven album and I prefer Pop songs.
How about the Superficial Love by Ruth B in the Safe Haven album?
Is it from '11 album?
It's from 2015.
Yes. That's it. I want to listen to it. Please cast it on my display.
Please verify the details: Play the song on TV, the Superficial Love.
Yes. That is right.
Hope you enjoy it.
Thanks a lot.
Will there be anything else?
No. That's all. Thanks!
Have a great day.
What is the weather in East Palo Alto?
The temperature should be around 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Can you find me some Ariana Grande songs? Find something from five years back from the album My Everything.
How about Be My Baby? It is from the Ariana Grande album My Everything.
What genre is it?
It is a Pop song.
That's the song.
Can I help you with anything else?
I want to listen to some music.
Confirming that you want me to play Be My Baby on the TV?
No, play it on my bedroom.
Confirming that you want to play Be My Baby on the Bedroom speaker?
Yes, that is correct.
I hope you enjoy your music.
Thanks! That's all for now.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
What's the weather going to be like in Pescadero on the 1st of March?
The forecast average temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Ok. Play me some music. How about a pop song by Zayn Malik from two years ago?
I found 2 songs. How about Zayn Malik 's Dusk Till Dawn? It's from the album Icarus Falls.
Yes, play that one
Please confirm: playing Dusk Till Dawn on your TV
No, I want it on my kitchen device
Please confirm: playing Dusk Till Dawn on your kitchen speaker
Yes play it
Enjoy the song
Thanks so much. Appreciate it.
Take care
I want to check the weather for Tuesday next week.
What location do you want to check the weather?
I want to know the weather in Montara.
The average temperature in Montara should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind and humidity going to be like?
The wind should be around 3 miles per hour and the humidity around 16 percent.
Okay, thanks.
Is there anything else you need?
I'd like to search for songs.
I found 10 songs for you. How about the song Dean Town by Vulfpeck from the album The Beautiful Game?
Is the song from nine years back?
No, it is from 2016.
What other songs are there? I want something from the album Built on Glass from five years back.
I found 1 song for you. It is Gold by Nick Murphy from the album Built on Glass.
What type of song is it?
It is an electronica song.
Yes, that is the one! I'd like to listen to it.
Okay, confirm these details. You want to play the song Gold on the TV.
Yes, that is right.
I have started playing the song, enjoy!
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a great day.
Hi there, may I know how is the weather like at ATL?
The weather is 86 degress Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain!
Could you help me search for songs from two years back too?
Sure, there are 10 available songs, would you like to listen to Airplane Mode by Limbo in the album Holo?
Are there any alternative songs?
How about All On Me by Devin Dawson in the Dark Horse album?
What is the genre of this song?
It is a country song.
Sure, could you play this for me please?
Please confirm your action to play All On Me on the TV.
That is fine with me.
Enjoy your music!
Thank you, that is all I need.
Sure, have a great day ahead!
I want to find weather on the 4th of this month.
What city do you want to check in?
Check Glen Ellen.
The temperature for the day should be 90 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 15 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The wind speed on average will be 11 miles per hour.
Okay. I'd like to find some songs for now. There are good songs in the album Blood. I want something from seven years ago.
How about Adrenalize by In This Moment on Blood
What sort of music is it?
It's a Metalcore song.
Okay. I'd like to listen to music. Put it on my television.
Could you confirm that I should play Adrenalize on the TV?
Sounds right.
Enjoy.
Thanks! That's it.
Have a great day.
I want to know how the weather will be in Duncans Mills for next Thursday.
The average temperature for your requested location should be 87 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of raining of 13 percent.
Alirght, fine. Now I want to find some songs. I would enjoy listening to songs by Cody Johnson. I usually like listening to Country songs.
There is 1 song which you might like. How would you like to listen to With You I Am by Cody Johnson from the album Gotta Be Me.
That is the song I want.
Do you want this song to start playing now?
Yes. I want you to cast the song on my television.
Can you please confirm that you want the song With You I am to be cast on TV.
Yes, that is right.
Enjoy your time listening to the song.
I appreciate it! That would be all.
Have a wonderful time!
Whats the weather supposed to be on the 12th?
Which city are we checking the weather for ?
Check in Calistoga.
Alright, I show should be 80 degrees with 0 percent chance of rain.
Great, find out how windy it will be.
The average wind factor is 9 miles per hour.
Thanks, let's pull up some music now.
Ok, what are you in the mood for? Or if you would like, I can suggest Shy by Jai Waetford off the Heart Miles.
No, not that one, what else can you suggest?
How about Wine For Me by Popcaan off the Forever album.
Maybe, what kind of music is that and what year did it come out?
This is a Reggae hit from 2018.
Yes, that sounds fun.
Great, should I play this song now?
Sure, go ahead.
Please confirm we are going to play Wine For Me on the TV. Is that correct?
Yes, go ahead.
Great, enjoy your selection.
Thanks, Good bye.
Your welcome, Good bye.
I want to find out what the weather is.
What city are you interested in finding out the weather for?
I want to find it for San Leandro.
The average temperature for the day should be 83 degrees Fahrenheit. There is also a 1 percent chance of rain.
Okay, that is fine. I would like to find songs now.
How do you feel about the song Sangria by Blake Shelton that is off the album Bringing Back the Sunshine?
What type of music is that?
This is a country song.
What else can you find? The album Sing To Me Instead has a number of good songs on it.
How do you feel about the Ben Platt song called Bad Habit off the album Sing To Me Instead?
Yes, that is a good one.
Do you want the song to be played?
Yes, cast it to my kitchen speaker.
Confirm these details for me: play the song Bad Habit on the kitchen speaker.
Yes that is what I want.
I hope you enjoy the music.
What year was this song released?
It came out in the year 2019.
What type of music is this?
This is a pop song.
Thanks very much!
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thanks very much!
Have a great day.
I'll be spending the day in Cupertino. Can you check what the weather is like there?
Sure, it looks like it's an average of 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain today.
How windy will it be?
It looks like there will be an average wind of 2 miles per hour.
Ok, not bad. Can you put on some music while I get ready?
Sure, I found a playlist with 10 songs you might like. How about Help by Papa Roach from the album Crooked Teeth?
Yes, that sounds good. Can you play it now?
Sure. I'll play Help on the TV, is that ok?
Yes, that's fine. What genre and year is that song again?
It's a Rock song from 2017. Enjoy!
Thanks! That's all for now.
Ok, have a good day.
Could you check the weather forecast for me in Washington DC.
There is a 13 % chance of rain and the ave temp will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit.
that's fine now will you help me choose a song to listen to.
There are 10 options for you, do you know Mercy by Shawn Mendes from the album Illuminate?
what genre of music would you say it is?
It is a pop song.
ok I choose that one.
Shall I play it?
yes play it on the bedroom speaker.
To confirm then I will play Mercy on the Bedroom speaker.
Yes great, do you know th year it was released?
2010, I hope you like it.
Great thanks for everything.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Check for me the weather on 5th of this month in Santa Rosa.
For the day the average temperature should be 80 degrees Fahrenheit and 20 percent chance of rain.
Humidity how will it be?
Will be around 41 percent.
Tell me how windy will be.
6 miles per hour will be the average wind speed.
Great.Find me some Country songs.I would like something from 2015 by Jon Pardi.
Would you like Head Over Boots by Jon Pardi from album California Sunrise?
Yes,I like it.
You want to play for you this song?
Perfect.Play it on any device please.
Play the song on TV Head Over Boots.It's okay?
No.Cast it on speaker in the kitchen, please.
Play in the Kitchen speaker the song Head Over Boots.Is correct?
Yes is correct.
Enjoy the song.
Thanks.That's all that I needed.
Have a great day!
Hey, what's the weather like in Nairobi?
It's around 105 degrees with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Great, can you find me something to do there?
Sure, there are 3 attractions available. How about the Giraffe Centre nature preserve?
How can I call them?
Their number is 20 891078.
Thanks. Is there anything else? I'd like to find a child-friendly natural spot.
Okay, how about the Karura Forest nature preserve?
Is it free to get in?
No, it's not free.
Okay, can you get me a cab there too?
Sure, a shared ride? For how many people?
Yeah, shared is okay. Just one thanks.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like a shared cab for 1 to Karura Forest.
Yes, that's right. How long will it take? How much does it cost?
It'll take about 30 minutes and cost $6.21. It's on the way.
Okay, thanks a lot.
No worries, anything else?
Nah, that's all thanks.
Okay, see you.
Hello, Please can you check the weather forecast for 7th of this month?
Please may I know in which city you wish to look for?
I wish to look in Nairobi, Kenya.
Okay! as per the forecast, there is a chance of 8 percent rain and the average temperature will be around 86 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thanks. Will it be humidity and windy?
About 23 % it will be humidity and the average wind speed will be around 7 miles per hour.
Thanks for the information. If the climatic condition is good, please can you find me some good attractions there?
Sure, I can find 3 attractions. Do you wish to check out at Giraffe Centre, which is a Nature Preserve?
Seems good. Please can you book a cab for one people to go there?
Sure. Do you prefer to have a shared ride?
Yup, I'm fine with shared rides?
Please can you confirm me that you wish to book a cab for 1 people to reach Giraffe Centre, right?
Yup, that would work.
Okay! Your booking is confirmed and the cab is on the way.
Thanks much for the help. I'm done with.
Have a wonderful day.
Please check the weather on 10th of this month
which city to check?
San Diego please
There is a 1 % chance of rainfall with 87 degrees temperature
ok, and next thursday?
There is a 17 % chance of rainfall with 90 degrees temperature
What will be the wind conditions like and the humidity?
the wind speed is 8 mph and humidity is at 36 %
ok, Find me a theme park there
There is the Belmont park, a theme park
get me a shared cab for 2 there
please confirm: Booking a shared cab for 2 to go to Belmont park
thats right
its booked
whats the cost? and how long is it?
the cost is $15.95 and it will be a 28 minutes ride
thanks
anything else?
No thats it
have a good day
What is the weather supposed to be like on the 10th?
Weather for where?
I was talking about Vancouver, BC
Okay the temperature is expected to reach 68 degrees with a 25 percent chance of showers.
Do you have any information on the humidity or wind speed?
The wind is expected to be 6 miles an hour average and 26 percent humidity.
Thanks, what is there to do there?
Bloedel Conservatory is considered a must see it is a Park.
Super, can you get me cab to there I don't mind ride sharing.
Who is going?
Just 1 person.
Okay you want a shared cab for 1 fare to Bloedel Conservatory, is that correct?
Wait my friend decided to come after all so make the cab for three please.
That will be a shared cab for 3 fares to Bloedel Conservatory is that right now?
That was my request.
The cab is booked and en route.
Thank for everything.
Can I be of any further assistance?
Thanks but you can go now.
Have a nice day.
What will it be like outside in San Francisco on the 11th?
It will be 72 degrees on average with a 7 percent chance of it raining.
What about humidity and wind?
21 percent humidity is forecast and wind will be around 12 mph.
I'd like to check out a museum there.
A museum? You got to see the Cable Car Museum.
Nice. What else. I got to show the kids a good time.
I have a Museum for them, the Children's Creativity Museum.
Nice. Could you hail a cab to get there?
Sure. Is it just you?
No. There are two of us.
How about a shared ride?
Shared is fine.
2 to the Children's Creativity Museum.?
Yes. How long does it take to get there?
About 15 minutes. The car is on the way.
And what will this run me?
$20.97 in total.
OK. Nice job.
Thank you. Enjoy.
I wish to find the weather.
In which city shall I search in?
Search in San Diego.
The temperature is 90 degree Fahrenheit and only 1 % chance of rain.
Okay. I wish to see some attractions there.
Your check out is Balboa Park. It is a park.
Okay. Nice.
Do you need any other help?
I wish to book a cab to go there.
For how many persons?
It is for four persons.
Do you like shared ride?
I am happy with the shared ride
Kindly ensure that, you wish to go to Balboa Park. The shared ride has been booked for 4 persons.
No. I need it for 2 persons.
Kindly ensure that, you wish to go to Balboa Park. The shared ride has been booked for 2 persons.
Okay. It is good. What is the cost?
Your ride has been reserved and it is on its way. The cost is $23.32
Thank you so much for your help.
Do you need any other help?
No, Thank you so much for your help.
Have a fantastic day.
Can you tell me what the weather is expected to be in Paris the 8th of this month.
The temperature should average 78 degrees with a 25 percent chance of rain.
Cool. Can you tell ma about some attractions there?
I found 10 you may like. There's the American Church in Paris, a place of worship.
Is this free?
Yes it is free.
Is it considered child-friendly?
Oh yes, it's a great place for kids.
Okay, I'd like to get a cab to go there, for one. I'm fine with a shared ride.
You would like a shared ride cab for 1 to the American Church in Paris. Is that correct?
Yes, that's it.
Your cab is on its way.
Thanks so much.
Is there anything else you need?
No thanks. I appreciate your help.
Have a wonderful time.
I want to find out what the weather will be on the 12th.
What is the city that you would like to know the weather for?
The city is Pinole.
The average temperature on that day should be 70 degrees Fahrenheit. There will be a 17 percent chance that it will rain.
Okay, what about in Toronto, Ontario on March 10th?
The average temperature on that day should be 73 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 26 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks for that.
Is there anything else that you would like?
Can you find any other attractions for me there?
You should check out a Tourist Attraction called 3D Toronto sign.
Okay, good. I would like to get a cab there for one person and it's okay if it's a shared ride.
Confirm these details: You would like to go to 3D Toronto sign. You want a cab for 1 person that is a shared ride.
Yes that would be fine. What is the length of the ride and what is the price?
Your ride has been booked and your cab is on the way. The price will be $9.06 and it will take about 9 minutes.
Thanks very much for your help.
Is there anything else you would like help with?
No, thanks very much for the help.
Have a wonderful day!
I want to check the weather in Long Beach, CA on the 2nd.
The average temperature should be around 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thanks. I'm also looking for a natural spot attraction there.
I found 1 attraction for you. It is the Nature Preserve Aquarium of the Pacific.
Okay, that sounds good. I'd like to get a cab to get there.
How many people is the cab for? Do you want a shared ride?
It is for 1 person and I am okay with a shared ride.
Okay, confirm the details. You want a shared cab ride for 1 person going to the Aquarium of the Pacific.
Yes, that is correct.
I have booked the cab and it is on the way.
How much does the cab cost? How long is the ride.
The total cost is $10.93 and the ride will take around 25 minutes.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day!
I'm hoping the weather is ok on the 4th. Can you check the whether in Anaheim on that day?
The temperate for that day should be about 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain.
Awesome, that's fine.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
What kind of attractions are out there?
I found 10 attractions that you may like. How about Angel Stadium of Anaheim? It's a Sports Venue.
That sounds good. Can you get me a cab there for 1 person?
Sure, is a shared ride ok?
A shared ride is fine.
So you'd like to go to Angel Stadium of Anaheim and you'd like a shared ride for 1 person. Is this correct?
Yes, that sounds good.
Your ride has been booked and should be there shortly.
Thank you, that's all I needed.
Have a wonderful day!
What's the weather suppose to be for the day after tomorrow in Paris, France?
I show the average temperature as 93 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Oh alright. What kind of attractions can you find for me to do?
There's a great place I can recommend called American Church in Paris, this is a Place of Worship.
Find out if this is a kid friendly venue.
Yes, this place is kid friendly.
Great, what's the phone number please.
I have a phone number listing as 1 40 62 05 00.
Cool beans, are there any other attractions you can recommend?
There is a Theme Park, Aquaboulevard I can recommend.
Okay, that sounds pretty cool. I'm going to need a shared ride over there please set that up.
How many people will be joining you in the ride share.
Just for 1 person, thanks.
Thanks, just need to confirm reserving a rideshare for 1 to go to Aquaboulevard.
Yeah, that will be correct. Find out how much it costs and how long the ride will be?
Your ride is confirmed and is in route. Your ride will be $6.34 and will be an estimated 28 minutes long.
Great, that will be all.
ok, have a great day.
Can you tell me what the weather is expected to be like on the 11th of March?
Where would you like me to check the weather?
Please check the expected weather in New Delhi.
The weather report is estimating the average temperature will be 103 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
That will be hot. What is the humidity and wind factor expected to be like?
The humidity is around 19 percent and the wind speed is estimated at 10 miles an hour.
I'll be taking my family there. Will you help me located a child-friendly attraction. I prefer a theme park.
A highly recommended and fun theme park is Adventure Island.
I'd like to take a cab there for one person. A shared ride works great.
Please verify you'd like to order a cab for 1 person in a shared ride to Adventure Island.
That is correct. How long will it take to get there?
The reservation is complete and the cab is on the way. The ride is expected to take approximately 18 minutes.
What will be the cost?
The total will be $14.21.
Thank you for your assistance. I'll ask for your help again at a later time.
Have a great time!
Find out what the weather is like in SFO on March 12th.
The weather reads an average temperature of 76 Fahrenheit for the day with a 23 percentage possibility of raining.
What is the humidity like and what is the wind like?
It is about 35 percent humid and wind speed on an average is about 6 miles an hour.
Fine. Can you tell me about the attractions there?
You can choose from 10 attractions. How about the Alcatraz which is a Historical Landmark?
Is there any other attraction?
How about the Alcatraz Island and it is a Historical Landmark?
Get me their contact number.
You can call them at 415-561-4900.
Is this place kid-friendly and will they charge an entrance fee to the attraction?
The place is kid-friendly and there is an entry fee.
Cool. I need a shared cab ride to go there?
How many seats do you want in the cab?
I need the ride for one person only.
So you want a shared cab for 1 person to the Alcatraz Island?
Yeah. How much would I be charged and how many minutes will the ride be?
I have your cab booked and it is en route. You will be charged $10.81 and it will take 31 minutes for the journey.
Thank you very much.
Shall I offer you any other help?
Nope. That is it, thanks!
Have a nice day!
What will the weather in Anaheim, CA be on the 1st of this month?
The average temperature will be 78 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
I would like to see some free tourist attraction near there.
Pixar Pier is a nearby tourist attraction.
Is this a kid friendly place?
Yes. It is good for kids.
Can I have their number?
Their phone is 714-781-4636.
In also need a cab for 1.
Is a shared ride okay?
Yes. I would like a shared ride?
Please confirm you want me to book a cab for 1 going to the Pixar Pier.
Yep. What's the trip time and what's the total cost?
The ride is $10.85 and the trip will take about 16 minutes. Your ride was booked successfully.
Thanks. That will be all today.
Is there anything else?
That's it. Thanks.
Okay. Have a wonderful day.
I need to see the weather on Friday next week in CDMX
The average temperature there is 102 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain
Sure, now can you find me some attractions?
There are 10 places including a nice Nature Preserve called Acuario Inbursa
OK, great, I want to find a cab there
Is a shared ride? And for how many?
A shared ride for one is good
Confirming a shared ride for 1 to Acuario Inbursa
Yes, that's fine
Your ride is booked and heading there
How long is the ride there?
It's about 15 minutes
How much is it gonna cost?
It'll be $16.38
Thanks so much
Do you need something else?
No, for now we're all set
Great, good day!
I want to know the weather on the 10th in Long Beach, CA
The temperature will be 75 degree Fahrenheit and 20 % chance of rain.
What about the windy?
The windy speed shall be 11 miles per hour.
Sure. Thanks.I wish to see some attractions which if child friendly.
Your check out Aquarium of the Pacific. It is a Nature Preserve.
Nice. I wish to book a cab to go there.
Do you like shared ride?
I am happy with the shared ride
For how many persons do you need the share ride?
I need it for one person.
Kindly ensure that, you wish to go to Aquarium of the Pacific. The shared ride has been booked for 1 person.
Okay. it is good. How much time the ride will take and what is the cost?
Your ride has been reserved and it is on its way. The cost is $10.93. It will take 25 minutes.
Thank you so much for your help. That is what I need now.
Have a fantastic day.
I need to check the weather in Delhi, India next Monday
The temperature is gonna be 97 degrees with an 8 percent of rain
Sure, can you find me some attractions there too?
How about a theme park like Adventure Island?
OK, now find me a cab there please
Do you want a shared ride? And for how many people?
Just for 1 please
Do you want a shared ride?
I'm ok with that, and it's for 3 people
Confirming you want a shared ride for 3 to Adventure Island
Yes that works, how much does it cost, and how long will that ride take?
It's booked and on the way and will be about an 18 minute trip and will cost $21.39
Thanks so much for that
Do you need something else from me?
No, that's it for now!
Great, have a good one
Assistance, can you tell me the forecast for Seattle, WA?
There is a moderate chance of rain at 32 percent. The temperature will be around 74 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thanks. Can you show me attractions without an entry fee in that area?
There is an interesting Museum called Chihuly Garden and Glass.
That sounds really cool. How about child-friendly attractions?
How about the Columbia Center? It's a Shopping Area that you may be interested in.
I need to know the phone number please.
The Shopping Center's phone number is 206-386-5151.
Okay, that should work fine for me. I'll be needing a cab to get there.
How many people will the cab be for? Also, are you okay with shared rides?
It's only for 1 person and I am very okay with shared rides.
You wish to hire a cab for 1 person to take you to the Columbia Center correct?
Yes, that is correct.
I have hired your cab and it is on the way as we speak.
Nice. Thank you for your help as always.
Do you need anything else today?
No, not right now, but thank you anyway.
Enjoy the rest of your day!
I'm hoping the weather is ok for Friday next week. Can you check for me?
What city should I check the weather in?
Please check in San Rafael.
The forecast for that day should be around 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 8 percent chance of rain.
Please check the 3rd of March in Philly.
The forecast for that day should be around 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
That's great. Can you find me some attractions there? Preferably a museum.
I recommend the Museum called Barnes Foundation.
What is their contact number? Is there an entrance fee?
You can contact them at 215-278-7000. There will be a cost.
Perfect. Please find me a cab to go there.
How many people will be riding in the cab? Would you like a shared ride?
I'd like a cab for one person. A shared ride is fine.
So you'd like a cab for 1 person to go to Barnes Foundation. It is a shared ride. Is this correct?
That works fine. How long will the ride be? What is the cost?
Your cab should arrive shortly. The price is $13.39 and the ride should take around 18 minutes.
Thank you, that's all I needed.
Have a wonderful day!
I must verify the weather for next Wednesday.
What metropolis do you wish to verify the weather for?
The metropolis is SD.
The mean temperature for that date ought to be 80 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 6 percent likelihood for rain.
What is the humidity level and wind level?
The humidity level is close to 23 percent, while the wind level is 1 mile per hour.
Alright. Could you inform me about attractions nearby, preferably one that is friendly to children and is a natural spot?
I recommend you visit a nature preserve called Birch Aquarium at Scripps Institution of Oceanography.
Can you tell me its contact number, and whether the entry is free?
Its contact number is 858-534-3474. And yes, entrance is free.
Alright, wonderful. I'd like to hail a taxi for one person to head there. I'm fine with sharing a ride.
Please verify the following information: you want a taxi ride for 1 on a shared ride to head to Birch Aquarium at Scripps Institution of Oceanography.
Yeah, that's fine.
Your taxi is reserved and the taxi is coming.
Thank you for your assistance.
Do you require assistance with something else?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon!
What's my intention for wanting to go to San Diego on the 5th of March during my vacation? No particular reason other than just relax. Would you tell me what weather I'll encounter there?
Happy to help. You can expect the day to average about 84 degrees Fahrenheit and a forecast of just 8 percent rain.
I see. What are the wind and humidity going to be like?
The wind is expected to average 4 miles an hour with humidity about 21 percent.
Great info, and what do you recommend for some fun sights to see there?
You could visit a Park there called Balboa Park, which is just one of the 10 places of interest you might like.
That would be a relaxing thing to do. Can I get a cab ride there?
I can set that up for you. Are you ready to tell me the number of passengers and if a shared ride will work?
Sure, a shared cab is fine if two persons can ride.
Got it. Shall we confirm a shared cab ride for 2 persons going to Balboa Park?
Oh, new info. Looks like it'll be just me, so make that 1 passenger, please.
All right. Shall we confirm a cab ride for 1 person going to Balboa Park?
You can do that now, and what's the travel time?
Your cab is confirmed and should arrive shortly. You'll be on the road for close to 30 minutes.
Good deal. I'm most grateful for that.
Any more information needed at this time?
Great information and easy set up. Nothing else to do right now. Thanks a million.
Of course. Enjoy the rest of your day.
I will be visiting my sister soonest, can you please check the weather for me?
On which city do you want me to check the weather?
Check it in Washington D.C.
Okay, the temperature on that would be 75 degrees Farenheit. And do not forget to bring an umbrella even there's just 13 percent chance of rain.
Thank you! Do you know some attraction there? I want to spend my free time wisely.
How about 56 Signers of the Declaration of Independence Memorial? It is a famous nature preserve.
That's great. I want to be close to the nature. Help me look for a cab for 3 people.
Please check the details; you will go to 56 Signers of the Declaration of Independence Memorial and you need a cab for 3 people. Would you like a shared ride?
Yes, that would work for me. We are not in a hurry.
I have booked a ride for you and its already on its way. It will arrive in 15 minutes.
Thank you so much. You're such a big help.
You're welcome. Have a nice day!
i have a plan to travel . find the weather condition on march 10th in anaheim.
the average temperature for the day should be 76 degrees fahrenheit. there is a 9 percent chance of rain.
ok thats good. find me some attractions places over there? i prefer a playground which is child-friendly.
what about honda center , which is a sports venue?
cool, fine , is there any other attractions as per my interest?
sorry, i could not find any other thing as per your interest. whether i need to find some other thing?
will you try related to theme park?
what about disney california adventure park which is a theme park?
okay great. find a cab to go there? i need it for two people and i prefer a shared ride.
fine. please check and confirm the following details. RIde to disney california adventure park, number of passengers is 2 and it is a shared ride.
ok that works for me. how much does it cost and how long is the ride?
ride is booked and the cab is on its way. it costs $14.93. the ride will last about 30 minutes.
thanks for you immense help and that's all i need.
take care have a wonderful day.
Whats the weather like?
Well, it depends where.
In SD on March 9th.
It should be around 83 degrees with probably no rain, or just a 25 percent chance of it.
What about wind and humidity?
Humidity should be around 40 percent and you don't really have to worry about your hat since wind will likely clock in at 7 mph.
OK. I got to show my kids a good time.
Take them to a park. Try Balboa Park.
OK. Hail me a cab for one there.
1 person to Balboa Park?
Yes. What will that run. How long does it take to get there?
$13.66. Its about a 30 minute ride.
Great. I got everything I need for now.
Excellent. Speak with you later.
I need to check weather on the 5th of March.
Which city would you like to check in?
I need to check in San Francisco.
The average temperature is expected to be 87 degrees Fahrenheit. There is expected to be a 23 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it expected to be?
The average wind speed is expected to be roughly 1 mile per hour.
Okay, and I also need to find attractions that are child-friendly with no entry fee, like a Park.
I would recommend Fort Funston, a Park.
Is there any other recommendation you would have?
Yes, I would recommend Golden Gate Park, a Park.
Okay, what is their phone number?
It is 415-831-2700.
Cool, are there any others you would recommend?
You should see Japanese Tea Garden, it is another Park.
Okay, I need a cab, a shared ride for three people in total.
Please confirm the following: You would like to go to Japanese Tea Garden. The cab is for 3 people. You would like a shared ride. Is this correct?
Yes, that is it.
Your ride is now confirmed and is en route to your location.
Thank you for that.
Is there anything else that I may help you with?
No, thank you.
Of course. Have a wonderful day.
Hey, how's the weather in SF?
It's around 91 degrees with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. Are there any attractions available there?
Sure, I found 10 attractions. How about Alcatraz? It's a famous historical landmark.
How can I contact them?
You can call them on 415-561-4900.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else?
Yeah, can you get me a shared cab there?
For how many people?
Just one thanks.
Okay, please confirm that you'd like a shared cab for 1 to Alcatraz.
Yeah, that's right.
Okay, your cab is on the way.
Thanks a lot.
No worries, anything else?
No, that's all thanks.
Okay, see you.
What is the weather going to be like on the 13th of this month?
Which city would you like to check.
I need to know the weather in NY.
The average temperature for the day should be 59 degrees. There is a 33 percent chance of rain.
Okay can you find me some attraction?
92nd Street Y is a nice performing arts venue.
Is it child friendly? What's their phone number?
The number is (212) 415-5788. It's not good for kids.
Great I need a cab there please.
How many people will be riding? Is shared okay?
Shared is fine, I need 2 seats.
You want 2 seats to 92nd Street Y in a shared cab, correct?
Yes that's correct.
Your ride is on the way.
How long will it take to get there?
About 20 minutes.
Thanks that is all I need for now.
Okay enjoy yourself!
Hey! Please can you check the weather forecast for Long Beach on 8th of March?
Sure. Its found that there can be 10 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of about 80 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thanks. Please can you suggest me some attractions there?
Sure, I've found 5 attractions that you would prefer to visit. Do you have any idea of visiting Aquarium of the Pacific, which is a Nature Preserve?
Pretty Cool! Please can you suggest me some child-friendly attractions?
Yup, there is a park named Harry Bridges Memorial Park to be visited to have a good time for kids. Do you wish to go here?
Can I have their contact number? Is the entrance free or to be paid?
You can reach them at 562-570-5333 and sorry that you've to pay for the entrance fee.
Thanks. Please do you have any other attractions for I wish to go for some historical spot?
Yup, why don't you visit the Historical Landmark, the Queen Mary?
Sure. Please can you help me to find a shared ride to reach that place?
Sure. How many would be travelling?
Only myself, 1 will be travelling.
Okqy! Please can you confirm me that you wish to have a shared ride for 1 people to reach the place The Queen Mary, right?
Yup, that would work. How much it would come for the ride?
The ride cost will be around $15.07. Your cab is booked and its on the way.
Thanks much for the help.
Do you want me to assist you with anything else?
Nope, thanks much for the help.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to check weather on march 9th in Sacramento.
The average day temperature is running at 92 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 23 percent
Fine, what about the weather on the 5th.
The average day temperature is running at 93 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 2 percent
Is there windy? What about the humidity?
The wind speed is 12 miles per hour and humidity is 17 percent.
Okay, Fine. Could you show some attractions which is chil-friendly? I am searching for a museum.
I have selected 4 attractions of your choice. One of them is a museum called California Museum.
What about the entry fee? is it free? Can you tell me their contact number?
(916) 653-1771 is the contact number and there is a entry fee.
Okay, fine. Can you book me a cab to go there for three people. For me shared ride is okay.
Please give confirmation details: Your ride to California Museum with shared ride and the cab is for 3 people.
This would be perfect. Can you tell me the ride distance and cost of ride?
Your ride is confirmed and the cab is on its way. The ride distance is 8 minutes and cost of ride is $19.23.
Thank you so much
Have a nice day.
What is the weather forecast in New York on the 14th of this month?
The forecast is predicting an average temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 % chance of rain.
What are some fun attractions in the area?
There is a popular performing arts venue called 92nd Street Y that comes highly recommended.
Will you book me a shared ride cab to get there?
How many people will be traveling with you?
The cab ride will be for two people.
Please verify that you'd like me to call a cab for 2 people in a shared ride to go to 92nd Street Y.
The cab ride will be for 1 person.
Can you verify the following: You'd like me to call a cab for 1 person to 92nd Street Y.
Yes, that is correct. What will be the total cost, and how long of a ride will this be?
Your ride is successfully booked and the cab will be there shortly. The ride will last about 20 minutes and will cost $12.43.
Thank you kindly for your help. I don't need anything else at this time.
Enjoy the attraction.
Can you look up the weather in Washington D.C. for March 7th?
It will be 81 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
Will it be humid?
It will be about 27 percent humidity
Will it be windy?
Wind speed will be about 2 miles per hour.
Can you find a free attraction, preferably a child friendly historical spot?
Sure. I've found 4 historical landmark attractions. Check out National Academy of Sciences.
What's their number?
(202) 334-2158.
Can you get a cab there for me?
A shared ride? For how many people?
A shared ride is fine. There will be 3 of us.
So a shared ride for 3 people to National Academy of Sciences?
Actually, it will be 2 of us.
So a cab for 2 to National Academy of Sciences?
Yes please. How long is the ride? How much will it be?
Your cab is on the way and the ride should last about 28 minutes. It will be $23.74.
Thanks so much. That'll be all.
Have a good day.
I want to see what the weather will be like on the 1st of this month in Fresno.
The temperature should average 72 degrees for the day and there is only a 2 percent chance of it raining.
How will the wind and humidity be on this day?
The humidity will be around 18 percent and the winds should average around 10 miles per hour.
Okay, thanks. Can you find some attractions for me to go see?
I've found 4 attractions that might interest you. You could check out the Tourist Attraction of Christmas Tree Lane.
Do they have a phone number? Is it kid-friendly?
Their contact number is 559-348-9200. It is a pretty nice place to take your kids to.
Okay, cool.
Is there anything else I could help you with?
I'll need a cab to get out there.
Would you like a shared ride?
Sure, that would be fine for me.
How many people will be riding in this cab?
It is just for one person.
Okay. So, you want a shared cab ride for 1 person to Christmas Tree Lane, correct?
Yes, that's correct. How long does it take to get there?
I've ordered the cab and it's on the way. The ride lasts about 30 minutes.
Okay. Thanks for the help.
Do you need assistance with anything else?
No. Thanks for the help.
Have a wonderful day!
What kind of weather can I expect on the 11th of this month?
Where did you have in mind?
I was thinking about Atlanta.
There is 0 chance of showers with the day's average being 87 Fahrenheit.
Oh well, what about next Friday?
The average for that day is expected to be 79 and a 12 percent chance of rain showers.
I'll keep that in mind. What is there to do there? Are there any place of interest locations?
CNN Studio Tours is an interesting Tourist Attraction.
Yeah, what else can you find?
Mission Escape Atlanta is supposed to be a popular Tourist Attraction.
Really, okay get me a cab ride for 2 so I can go there.
Would you accept a shared ride?
That wouldn't bother me any.
Is this what you are requesting - a shared cab for 2 going to Mission Escape Atlanta?
You got it.
The cab is ready and on its way.
How long is the ride there? What is it going to set me back?
Once you get in the cab it should get you there in 11 minutes at a cost of $8.65.
You can go now thanks for helping with that.
Have a superb day.
Hi I have plans today so I'm hoping the weather is ok. Can you check for me?
Which city should I check the weather in?
Please check in Chicago.
The forecast today should be about 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Can you also check for the 7th of this month?
The forecast for that day should be around 74 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity supposed to be? Will it be windy?
The humidity prediction for that day is around 30 percent. The wind speed should also be about 14 miles per hour.
What kind of attractions are out there? Preferably something for kids. Any type of attraction is fine.
360 CHICAGO is supposed to be a good Tourist attraction.
Awesome. I need to book a cab to go there for four people.
Would you like a shared ride?
A shared ride is fine with me.
So you'd like a cab for 4 people to go to 360 CHICAGO. It is a shared ride. Is that correct?
Yes, that works fine. How much will the cost be?
Your ride is booked and should be there shortly. The cost in total is $35.44.
How long will the ride be?
The ride should take around 8 minutes.
Thanks for your help, that's all I needed.
Have a wonderful day!
I want to know the weather in Sydney on next Monday. My mother will go there.
There's a 7 % chance of rain that day and the average temperature is at 96 degrees.
Thanks, how about March 6th in San Fran. I will go there on that day.
Low chance of rain at 3 % and the average temperature is at 72 degrees.
Is it that windy or how humid it is? I want to know so that I could plan my itinerary.
Humidity is at 16 % and the wind speed is at 12 miles per hour.
Okay, that is noted. Can you help me find an attraction without an entre fee? I would like to visit a child friendly garden.
There are 5 attraction that I could suggest to you. You may check the Fort Funston, it a park.
Do you know their contact number?
Yes, you may reach them at 415-561-4700.
Thanks! I will be calling them soon. And what are the other attractions that you know?
Golden gate Park, a park that you should visit too.
Yes, I heard its beautiful there. I need a cab to visit it, for 2 people please.
Do you prefer a shared ride?
Yes, make it for 1 person. Ill just meet my friend there.
Okay, booking for 1 person a cab ride to Golden gate Park.
Yes, that's right. How much is it?
It is for $11.78 and its already on its way to you.
Okay, thank you so much! That's all for now.
Sure. Have a nice day.
Hello! Please can you tell me how the weather will be for tomorrow?
Please can I've the zip code or city in which you are looking for?
I'm looking for New York.
Okay! I can see that there is 29 % chance of rain and the average temperature will be around 57 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it gonna be windy or humidity?
About 26 % its gonna to be humidity and the wind speed will be 6 miles per hour on an average.
Thanks. Please can you find some attractions like Museum which would be child-friendly there?
Sure, do you wish to visit American Folk Art Museum for its a good Museum that one visit here.
Might be... Do you have any other attractions?
Yup, how about the Museum, American Museum of Natural History?
Okay. Still do you have some other which would be entry free.
Yup, I've found 9 such attractions for you. Do you wish to visit the Museum, Brooklyn Children's Museum?
Please can I've their contact number?
Sure, they are reachable at 718-735-4400.
Thanks much. Please can you book a cab to go over there?
Sure. Are you looking for a shared ride? For how many people are you looking for?
Yup, I'm looking for a shared ride for 1 person.
Okay! Please can you confirm me that you wish to have a shared ride for 1 person to reach Brooklyn Children's Museum, right?
Yup, that would work. So, how long will be the ride?
It will take around 13 minutes. Your cab is booked and its on the ay.
Please may I know how much it would cost for the travel?
It will cost $6.74.
Thanks much for the help. I'm done with.
Have a good day.
I would like to check the weather please.
What city are we weather checking?
Long Beach, CA please.
The average temp is 80 degrees with a 17 percent chance of rain.
What about for March 12th?
I am showing the average temp to be 90 degrees with a 26 percent chance of rain.
Thanks for that information.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Can you show me some attractions there.
You should check out the Aquarium of the Pacific, this is a Nature Preserve.
Great, but I still want to hear more options please.
There is a park I can recommend, Harry Bridges Memorial Park.
Is this a child friendly park?
Yes, this place definitely is child friendly.
Cool stuff. I am going to need a cab to get there. Go ahead and set that up for me.
Ok, would a shared ride be ok? How many people will be riding?
Just one for now and yes let's do a shared ride.
alright, please confirm 1 person requesting a shared ride to Harry Bridges Memorial Park. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right. How long will the ride take?
Your ride is confirmed and in route. Your ride will be roughly 26 minutes.
Thank you for that.
your welcome. Can i assist with anything else?
Nope, that was all. Good bye.
alright, good bye.
check weather march 3rd fresno
77 degrees 18 percent rain
how humid though?
31 percent rain 8 miles per hour
historical landmark area
forestiere underground gardens historical landmark
okay good then
how many people?
It's for 1
want a shared ride?
I am good
forestiere underground gardens 1 person
how much is it?
$10.26 for 24 minutes
thanks a lot
anything else for you?
no thank you
have a good one
check weather on the 12th
what city then?
next monday chicago
65 degrees 35 percent rain
sure that works
360 chicago tourist attraction
I want a cab there
want a shared ride?
It's for one
360 chicago for 1
yes that works
ride is 8 minutes
thanks a lot
anything else then?
no thank you
have a good one
I am going to SD soon. Can you check the weather in there?
The temperature should be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
That sounds nice. What attractions are there? What is fun to do?
There are 10 attractions you could go to. There is a park you might like, Balboa Park.
Sounds good. I need to get a cab to go there, it is fine if it is a shared ride.
For how many people?
For just 2 people.
Please confirm: Getting a shared ride cab for 2 people to go to Balboa Park.
Make it for 3 people.
Please confirm: Getting a shared ride cab for 3 people to go to Balboa Park.
That is correct.
The car is on its way.
Thanks a lot for everything.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, that would be all for now.
Have a great day.
Check to weather for the 3rd of this month.
For what city?
Duncans Mills
It will be 93 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
How about on the 5th of this month?
It will be about 90 degrees with a 1 percent chance of rain.
How about in Mexico city?
It will be 87 degrees with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Can you find attractions in the area?
If you are interested in a nature preserve, check out Acuario Inbursa.
That sounds great. Can you order me a shared cab ride for 2?
To confirm, you'd like a shared ride for 2 people to Acuario Inbursa?
Yes please. How much is it?
It's $14.28. Your cab is on the way.
Thanks so much.
Have a good day.
I have a couple trips coming up. Can you check what the weather will be like at Muir Beach on the 10th of this month?
Sure, looks like the average temperature will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 22 percent change of rain.
Ok, great. Can you also check the weather in Ciudad de Mexico on the 6th of March?
Sure, it'll be an average of 95 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
Ok, that's alright. Can you look up what attractions there are to do while I'm there?
Sure, if you're interested in seeing a nature preserve, Acuario Inbursa looks pretty nice.
Cool, I might go see that. Is there a museum there I could visit?
Sure, there is a pretty popular museum called Arte Carrillo Gil Museum. Are you interested in that?
Maybe - is it child-friendly and free entry?
Yes, it's definitely child-friendly but not free entry unfortunately.
Ok, that's fine.
Anything else I can do for you?
Yeah, can you call me a cab for 2 people to go there? A shared ride is fine.
Ok. To confirm, you want a shared ride for 2 people to go to Arte Carrillo Gil Museum, right?
No, actually, just make it for one.
Ok, to confirm, you want a cab for 1 person to Arte Carrillo Gil Museum, right?
Yes, that's right.
Ok, your cab is on its way.
Great, thanks for your help.
Sure, anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks.
No problem. Have a good day.
I want to check the weather.
What city are you checking the weather for?
I want to find the weather in Sydney, NSW.
The temperature should be 94 degrees Fahrenheit and a 4 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind going to be like?
The wind speed will be 2 miles per hour.
Okay, what are some attractions? I want to find a wildlife spot without an entry fee.
Featherdale Wildlife Park is a nature preserve.
Sounds good. I want to find a cab there.
Do you want to find a shared ride?
A shared ride is fine.
How many people?
Just one person.
Please confirm: a shared ride for 1 person to Featherdale Wildlife Park.
Yes, sounds good.
Your ride was book and is on the way.
How much is it?
The cost is $9.60.
How long will the ride take?
The ride will be 18 minutes.
Thanks so much.
Anything else I can do?
No, thank you.
Have a good day.
What would the weather be like on the 12th of this month?
In which city?
In atlanta, GA.
It would be 78 degrees fahrenheit with a 19 percent chance of rain.
How windy would it be?
The average wind speed is expected to be 9 miles per hour.
Great. What fun places can I visit when I get there?
There is a park called atlanta botanical garden.
What is the number and is there an entry fee?
The number is 404-876-5859 and there is no entry fee.
That sounds boring. Is there somewhere else I could go?
There is a museum called atlanta history center.
Ok, but still boring. Is there somewhere more exciting where I could take my kids?
There are 8 interesting locations you might like to visit. There is a museum called bodies the exhibition.
That certainly sounds exciting. I would need a shared ride to get there.
For how many persons?
Just one person.
You want a shared ride for 1 to bodies the exhibition?
I need a ride for three people.
You would like a cab for 3 heading to bodies the exhibition?
That is exactly what I would need.
The cab will arrive shortly.
Thanks a lot.
Would there be anything else?
No. Thanks very much.
Enjoy your day.
I will be visiting my sister on Morgan Hill on the 12th, can you please check the weather for me?
Sure, there's a 10 % chance of rain on that day and the average temperature is at 87 degrees.
That's not so cold, how about in Nairobi, Kenya?
There's a 9 percent chance of rain and the average temperature is 103 degrees.
Thanks! That's so helpful. Can you find me some attractions, a wildlife spot I think that is child- friendly.
There's a Giraffe Centre which is a Nature Preserve.
Thanks! I want to visit that now, I want a cab going there.
Would you like a shared ride?
Yes, that would work for me. I am not in a hurry.
For how many people is this booking?
Just for me, 1 person. I will just check it before I bring my kids.
Okay, check the details please; you are going to Giraffe Centre and you need a cab for 1 person.
Yes, how much will it cost? I don't have a big money with me.
Booking is successful. It costs $11.77.
Alright. Thanks! That's all I need. Bye!
Sure. You're welcome. Have a good day!
I will be going to Philadelphia and would like to know the weather on March 10th.
The temperature should be around 91 degrees Fahrenheit and around 4 percent chance of rain.
How will the humidity be?
It will be around 17 percent.
Sounds nice. Do you know what things are there to do in there? I want something like a Museum.
There are 10 possible things you might like to visit. There is a museum for you, Barnes Foundation.
How can I contact them?
Their phone number is 215-278-7000.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I also need to get a cab to go there. It is just for one person.
Do you want a shared ride?
It is okay if it is a shared ride.
Please confirm: Getting a shared ride cab for 1 person to go to Barnes Foundation.
I think some friends will come with me. Make it for 4 people.
Please confirm: Getting a shared ride cab for 4 people.
Thanks a lot. How long will it take to get there/
The can is on its way. It will get 18 minutes to get to your destination.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Nothing else, that would be all for now.
Have a great day.
Hello, Please can you check the weather forecast for SF on March 11th?
Sure. It's found that there can 7 % chance of rain and the average temperature will be around 72 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thanks for the information.Please can you help me to find some child-friendly attractions over there without an entry fee.
Sure. Do you've any idea of visiting Aquarium of the Bay, a Nature Preserve?
Yup. Can I've their contact number?
Sure, you can reach them at 415-623-5300.
Okay! Please can you book a shared ride for one people to reach there?
Sure. Please can you confirm me that you wish to have a shared ride for 1 people to go to Aquarium of the Bay, right?
Yup, sounds good. What would be the ride cost and how long is the travel?
The ride cost will be $10.81 and it will take about 23 minutes. Your cab is confirmed and its on the way.
Thanks much for the help.
Do you want me to assist you with anything else?
Nope thanks much for the help.
Have a wonderful day.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in Los Angeles on the 12th?
The average temperature will be 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 27 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The wind speed will be 9 miles per hour.
Okay. Thanks. What attractions are near there?
Angels Flight Railway is a historical Landmark near there.
Great. I need a cab to take me there.
Is a shared ride okay and for how many?
I don't mind a shared ride. I will need it for four.
Please confirm you want me to book a shared ride for 4 to the Angels Flight Railway.
No. It's only for 1.
Please confirm you want me to book a cab for 1 to Angels Flight Railway.
Yes. that's correct.
Your ride has been successfully booked.
That's all for now.
Okay. Have a wonderful day. Goodbye.
I am very interested in knowing about the weather in Vegas.
You will have temperature averaging 84 degrees Fahrenheit and there is an 18 percent possibility of raining.
Alright. I need to find out about attractions that I can visit whilst I am there?
How do you like the DISCOVERY Children's Museum? It is a nice Museum.
That is nice. Get me a cab to reach that place.
Shall I look for a shared ride?
Yeah I am fine with shared ride.
How many of you will take the cab?
I am just one person travelling.
So you will go to DISCOVERY Children's Museum and you are just 1 person who needs a shared ride?
Yeah that is correct. What is journey time and what will I be charged?
I have your cab booked and it will be here. The charges are $11.24 and the journey will last about 28 minutes.
Thank you, that is all I needed.
Have a wonderful day!
What's the weather going to be like this Saturday in Chi-town?
The average temperature on that day is expected to be 61 degrees Fahrenheit with a 33 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how windy is it supposed to be?
Average wind speed for that day is expected to be around 6 MPH.
Okay, thanks. What attractions around there can you find for me?
I found 10 attractions you might be interested in. How about visiting the popular tourist attraction 360 CHICAGO?
Alright, that sounds interesting. Can you get me a cab to take me there?
Sure, how many people do you need it for and are you okay with a shared ride?
I need a cab for 2 people and, yeah, I'm fine with a shared ride.
Okay, so you want to order a shared cab ride for 2 people to take you to 360 CHICAGO, right?
Yup, that's right.
Your cab has been booked and is on its way now.
Cool, thanks a lot!
Of course. Anything else you need help with?
Nope, that's all I needed, thanks!
No problem, have a nice day.
I have a day off and was thinking about going on a day trip. Can you check what the weather is like in Toronto, Ontario?
Sure, it looks like it'll be an average of 58 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
Not too bad, looks like an average of 9 miles per hour.
Ok, that's fine. Can you look up some free and child-friendly attractions do to there? I'd like to visit a shopping district.
Sure, St. Lawrence Market is a pretty popular shopping area. How about that?
Yeah, that sounds great. Can you call me a cab to get there? It'll be for three people and a shared ride is fine.
Ok. To confirm, you want a shared ride for 3 people to St. Lawrence Market, right?
No, actually, the others can meet me there. Just get it for 1 person.
Ok. To confirm, you want a shared ride for 1 person, right?
Yes, that's good.
Ok, I've booked your ride and it's on its way.
Great, thanks for your help.
Sure, anything else I can do?
No, that's all. Thanks.
Ok, have a good day!
I must verify the weather in Los Angeles.
The mean temperature for the date ought to be 76 degrees fahrenheit. There's a 28 percent likelihood of raining.
Okay, alright. Could you tell me about attractions nearby?
There are 10 attractions that you may like. I recommend the historical landmark Angels Flight Railway.
Can you tell me their contact number, and whether it's friendly to children?
The contact number is 213-626-1901, and no, the place is not friendly to children.
Alright, good. I'd liek to take a taxi to travel there.
How many passengers does the taxi have?
The taxi is for one person.
Would you like share a ride?
I'm alright with sharing rides.
Please verify the following information: you'd like a taxi for 1 person on a shared ride to head to Angels Flight Railway.
Yeah, that's fine with me.
your taxi is reserved and is coming.
Thank you for your aid, that's all.
Have a wonderful afternoon!
Can you check the weather on the 3rd of March
What city do you want to check?
Let's look in Fresno
It'll be 77 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain
Sure, now can you find me some attractions there?
You should check out Christmas Tree Lane, a great Tourist Attraction
Is it free entrance? And what's their phone number?
Entry is free, and their number is 559-348-9200
Great, I want a cab please, for 4 people
Do you want a shared ride?
I'm OK with a shared ride
Confirming you want a shared cab for 4 to Christmas Tree Lane
Yes please, how much is it, and how long is the ride?
Your ride is on the way and will cost you $33.92. The ride will last around 30 minutes
Thanks for that, that's all I need at the moment
OK, thanks so much
Can you help me check the weather on the 14th in Sydney, NSW
The average temperature is 100 Degrees and a 2 percent chance of rain
How humid is it gonna be?
It's around 16 percent humidity
How windy is it gonna be?
The average wind speed will be around 8 miles per hour
OK, sure. Now find me a nice museum to visit please
There's a really popular museum called the Art Gallery of New South Wales
It it free entrance?
Yes, it's free
What's their number? And is it kid friendly?
It is a great place for kids, and reach out to them at 2 9225 1700
OK, thanks so much
What else can I do for you?
I want to get a cab there, shared rides are ok
How many people do you need in the cab
Just for me, so just 1
OK so a shared ride for 1 to the Art Gallery of New South Wales
Yup, that's perfect
Your ride is booked and on the way
Thanks so much for your help
What else can I do?
Nothing right now, thanks
You're very welcome
Can you show me my alarms?
There are currently 2 set. The first is called Wake up and its set at 6 am.
Great, can you add an alarm called Music Practice for half past 4 in the evening?
Sure thing. You'd like me to create an alarm to go off at 4:30 pm titled music practice?
Yes, that's right.
It's been added.
Thank you!
No problem, need anything else?
Nope, I appreciate it.
My pleasure, enjoy your day.
Will you show me my alarms timings? ,i need to sleep according to that
There is an alarm for 6 am with name Wake Up.
Okay, thats good. I need to add an alarm. Name the alarm as Music PRactice and it should be for 16:45.
Please review the details so that i will confirm. Creating an alarm at 4:45 pm with name Music Practice.
ok thats great. fix it.
Alarm created successfully.
Thanks a lot for your help
Whether anything else i need to do?
No, thanks. not now.
Have a great day
My schedule is getting really busy and I need to set some new alarms. Can you see what alarms I have currently?
Sure, you just have one alarm set at 8 am for Wake up.
Ok, that's good.
Did you want me to add an alarm?
Yes, can you do that for me?
Sure, for what time?
Make it for 4:30 pm.
Ok, I'm creating an alarm at 4:30 pm with the name New alarm. Is that right?
No, can you call it Cooking and change the time to 16:45 actually?
Sure. To confirm, you'd like to set an alarm for Cooking at 4:45 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Hm, sorry, I couldn't set that alarm for some reason. Is there something else I could help you with?
No, nevermind. Thanks anyways.
No problem, thanks.
What alarms do I have set?
There is a Wake up alarm for 7 am.
Ok.
Would you like to add an alarm?
Yes. I want to add an alarm for 5 o"clock in the evening.
Please confirm: add a alarm named New alarm for 5 pm.
That is correct.
The alarm has been successfully added.
Thanks, that is all I needed.
Your welcome.
I'd like to see my alarms.
I found an alarm titled Wake Up and is set for 8 am.
Can you see if there are other alarms?
There is an alarm that has a name of Pick up kids and it has a time of 3 pm.
Good, got it. Let me do another alarm.
What is the time you want for your new alarm?
Set it for half past 3 in the afternoon and give it a name of Music Practice.
Making an alarm entry for 3:30 pm and giving it a name of Music Practice. Would you make sure this is correct?
Yep, it's correct.
I apologize as I wasn't able to create the new alarm. Would you like for me to do anything else?
Would you try again? Make one for 15:15 and name it Leave for home.
An alarm creation with a name of Leave for home has been made for 3:15 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
The alarm has been added without any problems.
That's it, and thanks!
Thanks!
I want to know about all the alarms that I have set already. Can you show it to me?
Yes, you have an alarm for 9 am in the name of Wake up.
Is that only the one I have? Show me if anything else.
You have an another alarm in the name of Pick up kids at 3 pm.
That is okay. thanks.
Tell me that you want to add any new alarm now. I am ready to do it for you.
Of-course, I want to add an new alarm.
At what time you need to set it for?
Please make a new alarm for the time five pm.
I need your final confirmation to set an alarm at 5 pm in the name new alarm.
Confirmed to proceed.
I have created the new alarm successfully as you requested.
Thanks a lot.
How can I assist you further?
No, that's all for now.
Thank you and Welcome.
I want to see my alarms.
Alarm is set at 7 am in the name of Wake up.
Is there any other alarms?
Alarm is set at 8 am in the name of Workout.
Okay, nice. Please include an alarm at 5:15 in the evening.
Kindly ensure that, alarm has been included at 5:15 pm in the name of New alarm.
Okay.
Alarm has been included successfully.
Thank you so much.
Do you need any other help?
Nope. Thanks a lot.
Thank you so much.
Can you show me my alarms, please?
You have an alarm named Wake up for 9 am.
Do I have any more alarms?
You have an alarm named Pick up kids set for 4:30 pm.
Great. I want to add an alarm for evening 5.
I am creating an alarm named New alarm for 5 pm. Is this correct?
Yes it is.
Sorry but I couldn't set the alarm. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you try again? Set it for three in the afternoon.
Confirming that you want me to create a New alarm for 3 pm?
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully added your alarm.
Thanks a ton. That's all for now.
You're welcome.
I would like you to look for my alarms.
There's one for 6 am and it's called Wake up.
Perfect, I need to add another one for 16:15 and you should call it Phone home.
I can easily do that if you just confirm me the procedure. You want me to add another alarm for 4:15 pm and it must be called Phone home.
That's wrong, it should be called Cleaning and it must be scheduled for 4:30 pm.
Okay, confirm the following please. I'm about to create an alarm at 4:30 pm and name it Cleaning.
That's right.
It's done.
Great! You can turn off now, bye.
Bye Bye.
I'd like to see my alarms.
There's one called wake up for 7:30 am.
That's good. Put a new alarm on called Phone home.
What time should this alarm be?
Make it 3 o"clock in the afternoon.
Could you confirm that you want to create an alarm at 3 pm called Phone home?
Yeah.
I have successfully added the alarm.
Thank you so much.
Could I help with something else?
No, that is all.
Thanks.
I would like to see all of the alarms that I have set currently
At this time, you have 2 alarms that are ongoing. The first is an 8 am alarm called Wake Up
Can you tell me if there are additional ones?
Sure. You have a 10 am alarm that is called Shuttle to Work
Excellent. That sounds good
Would you like to create a new alarm?
Yes please. I want to create an alarm
What is the time for this new alarm?
I would like to create an alarm for four pm
To confirm, you would like a new alarm set for 4 pm.
Sure, that works for me.
Your alarm has been created
Great, Thank you so much!
Do you need assistance with anything more?
Nope, that's it. Thanks again!
Thanks and take care
Let me see my alarms please.
At this time you have 2 alarms that are active. One is set for 6 am and has a title of Wake up.
Fine, that's perfect.
Would you like an additional alarm?
Sure, I'd like to add another one.
What is the best time to set the new alarm?
Go ahead and make the time for 16:15 and name it Grocery Run.
Please verify: A new alarm creation for 4:15 pm and is titled Grocery Run.
Correct.
The alarm creation was successful.
I really appreciate it very much. That's it.
No problem, thanks.
Show me my alarms.
There is an alarm set for 6:30 am with the name Wake Up.
Okay, thank you.
Would you like to add another alarm?
Yes, I would like to add an alarm.
What time should I set the new alarm for?
Let's set it for afternoon 3:30.
You would like to set an alarm for 3:30 pm with the name New alarm, is this accurate?
No, call the new alarm Cleaning, and let's change that to 5:15 in the evening.
You would like to create an alarm for 5:15 pm with the name Cleaning, is that correct?
Call the new alarm Music practice instead.
You would like to create an alarm at 5:15 pm with the name Music practice, is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
The alarm has been added successfully.
Thanks a lot.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that's all, thanks.
Have a good day!
Show me please my alarms.
Currently set you have 2 alarms.One is for 8:30 am called Wake up.
Are there any other alarms there?
For 9:30 am called Workout.
Sure.That's okay.
You want to add an alarm?
Yes I would like.
At what time you want to be?
For 3 o"clock in the afternoon.
Create an alarm at 3 pm called New alarm.Is that okay?
Yes is very good.
I am sorry but your request could not be made.What else can I do?
Yes try again please but change the time for afternoon 3:30.
Create an alarm at 3:30 pm called New alarm.I'm right?
Yes.Is okay for me.
The alarm was added.
Thank you.That's all that I wanted.
Thank you for all!
Can you show me my alarms please?
There is an alarm named Wake up scheduled for for 8:30 am.
Ok Thanks
Do you want to add an alarm?
Yes please. Create a new alarm labeled Phone home for 3:30 pm.
Please confirm the following details: Creating an alarm at 3:30 pm with name Phone home.
Yes that is correct.
Sorry, I wasn't able to set that alarm. Anything else I can help with?
Can you try to set it for 3 in the afternoon?
Please confirm the following details: Creating an alarm at 3 pm with name Phone home.
No, please change that to Music practice.
Please confirm the following details: Creating an alarm at 3 pm with name Music practice.
Yes that is correct.
Alarm added successfully.
Thanks so much, that is all I need.
Have a nice day.
Please show me my alarms.
You have a Wake up alarm at 6:30 am.
Thanks, that is great.
Would you like me to add an alarm?
Yes, please add an alarm for quarter to 5 in the evening called Phone home.
So you want me to create an alarm at 4:45 pm called phone home.
Yes, I do.
The alarm has been added.
Thanks so much. I am all set.
Have a great day. Thank you.
I would like to see all of the alarms that I have set as of this time.
You have 2 active alarms at this time. One alarm is titled Wake up and it is set for 7:30 am
And can you tell me if there are additional alarms?
You also have an alarm titled Workout that is set for 8:30 am
Excellent. Can you please add a new alarm for 4:45 in the evening and label it Music practice?
Okay, you would like to add a new alarm for 4:45 pm with the name Music practice, correct?
That is correct.
that alarm has been created.
Great. Thanks so much!
Do you need my assistance with anything further?
No, that was all for me. Thanks!
Have a nice day.
I want to check the alarms I have.
There are 2 alarms which you have set currently, with one of the alarms being at 6:30 am, and it is called Wake Up.
Alright, that is good.
Are you interested to add another alarm?
Actually I am, I do want to add another alarm. I want the alarm to be called Grocery run.
Can you tell me the time for when you want the alarm to be set for?
The alarm should be set for 4:45 PM.
Can you please confirm that you want to create an alarm called Grocery run for 4:45 pm?
Yes, that is what I want.
Your requested alarm has been added
I appreciate it very much. That is all I wanted for now.
Thank you too.
I need to set a reminder for my new schedule this week. Can you check what alarms I have set?
Sure, you have 2 alarms set right now. One of them is your Wake up alarm at 6 am.
Ok, cool. Can you add an alarm for me?
Sure, at what time?
Can you make it for 16:15?
No problem. To confirm, you want to set a New alarm for 4:15 pm, is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Ok, the alarm has been added.
Great, thanks for your help.
No problem. Anything else I can do?
No, that's all for now.
Ok, thank you.
What alarms do I have set?
You have 2 alarms set. One is for 8:30 am titled wake up.
Okay, thanks. I'd like to add a new alarm.
What time do you want the alarm for?
It is for evening 5:15.
Okay, you want an alarm created at 5:15 pm titled new alarm, right?
No, title the alarm cooking and set it for evening 4.
Okay, creating a new alarm at 4 pm titled cooking, right?
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully created the alarm.
Thank you. That is all I needed.
Have a great day.
What are my alarms?
You have an alarm for 7 am with the name Wake up.
Right, right. Okay.
Would you like me to add an alarm?
Yes, I would.
When would you like the new alarm to go off?
Make it for a quarter to 5 in the evening.
Please confirm that you would like me to create an alarm for 4:45 pm with the name New Alarm.
Call the alarm Cooking and make it for a quarter past 4 in the evening.
Please confirm that you would like me to create an alarm for 4:15 pm with the name Cooking.
Yes, I confirm.
The alarm Cooking was successfully added.
Nice, i'm glad to hear it.
Will you be needing anything else?
No that will be all for now, good bye.
Okay, let me know if you need anything else.
I want to see my alarms.
You have an alarm set for 7 am which is titled Wake up.
Alright, fine. Though now I would like to add another alarm for 17:00.
Can you please confirm that you want to create an alarm for 5 pm and to name it New alarm?
Yes, that is right.
I apologize but I could not set your alarm with your requested preferences. Is there something else I can help you with?
Would you mind trying to do that again, though now you try to set the alarm for 16:15?
Can you please confirm to me that you want to have an alarm created for 4:15 pm, and for the alarm to be titled New alarm?
Yes, that is what I want.
Your requested alarm has been added.
I appreciate it very much!
Do you want me to help you with something else?
Not now. I am thankful for the help!
Thank you too!
Can you review my alarms for me?
Of course. You have a total of 2 alarms set. The first is a 9 am Wake up alarm.
Thank you! Can you add one at half past 4 in the evening and name it Cleaning?
You'd like to add an alarm for Cleaning at 4:30 pm. Is this correct?
I'm sorry, I have to change that. I'd like it called Phone home and set it for afternoon 3:15.
You'd like an alarm to remind you to Phone home at 3:15 pm. Is that right?
Yes, that's correct.
Your alarm had been added.
Great! Thank you for the help.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day!
Hi there, what alarms do I have that are currently active?
You have 2 set alarms, one of which is at 8:30 am titled Wake up.
Sure, could you add an alarm at four pm titled Phone home please?
Sure, please confirm your request to at an alarm at 4 pm with the title Phone home.
That sounds great to me!
Your alarm has been successfully added!
Thanks alot! That is all I need.
No worries, have a great day ahead!
What alarms do I have set.
You currently have 2 alarms. One alarm named Wake up is set for 6 am.
Okay, I want to add a new alarm named Cooking.
What time would you like to use for the alarm?
Set if for the evening 4:15.
Please confirm: Create an alarm named Cooking for 4:15 pm.
That is correct.
The alarm has been successfully created.
Thanks, that is all.
Your welcome.
Would you show me my alarms?
There is an alarm for 7:30 am called wake up.
That sounds good.
Would you like me to add an alarm?
Yes, do that.
What time should it be?
It will be for 3:30 pm.
Could you confirm that I should create an alarm at 3:30 pm called new alarm?
No, it should be afternoon 3:45.
Could you confirm that I should create an alarm for 3:45 pm called new alarm?
That is right.
Sorry but I could not set the alarm. Is there something else I could assist with?
No, that's all.
Thanks!
I need to set an alarm.
Sure, I can do that. What time?
Set it for 15:15.
Please confirm that you'd like a new alarm set at 3:15 pm.
Yup, thanks!
It was added.
Thanks, that's it.
Have a good day.
I'm hoping to motivate myself to do some chores around the house. I want to add an alarm called Cleaning.
Sure, what time would you like to set the alarm for?
I'd like to make it for five in the evening.
Ok, the alarm will be created with the name Cleaning and is set to go off at 5 pm. Is that correct?
Yes, that is correct.
Sorry, the alarm was not able to be created. Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No, that's all I needed. Thanks.
No problem. Sorry I wasn't able to help.
I would like to create an alarm notification.
For which time?
For 3:45 in the afternoon.
You would like to create a New alarm for 3:45 pm?
Yes, that's right.
I was unable to set the alarm for that time. Would you need anything else?
please try again for evening 4:45
You would like to create an alarm called New alarm for 4:45 pm
Yes, I do.
I have created the alarm.
Thanks a lot.
You need assistance with anything else?
No, that would be all.
My pleasure to assist.
Create an alarm for me for evening 5 and name it Music practice.
You would like to create an alarm for 5 pm and name it Music practice?
Call the alarm Grocery run instead.
You would like to create an alarm for 5 pm and name it Grocery run?
That is correct.
Your alarm has been created.
Thanks a million.
Do you need anything else?
No. Thanks a million.
Thanks a lot.
I want to create a new alarm and name it Cleaning
What time do you want the alarm for?
For quarter past 3 in the afternoon.
You would like to create a new alarm called Cleaning for 3:15 pm
No, I want it for three in the afternoon.
You would like to create a new alarm called Cleaning for 3 pm?
No. I want it to be called Music practice.
You would like to create an alarm for 3 pm and call it Music practice?
That is correct.
I have created the alarm for you.
Thanks a million.
Do you need help with anything else?
No. Thanks a lot.
Thank you very much.
I need to add an alarm
At what time is it
Make it 3:30 in the afternoon
Please confirm that creating an alarm at 3:30 pm with name new alarm
No call it as Cleaning
Please confirm that creating an alarm at 3:30 pm with name cleaning
No make it for 4:15 pm
Please confirm creating alarm at 4:15 pm with name cleaning
Correct
Alarm added successfully
thanks a lot that's all
Thank you
I need to set an alarm titled music practice for 17:15.
OK, please confirm alarm at 5:15 pm named music practice.
That is correct.
Sorry, the alarm is not set. Can I do anything else for you?
Can you try one more time with a new alarm called Grocery run?
OK, new alarm at 5:15 pm titled Grocery run.
Please change it to 4:30 pm.
OK, the details are alarm at 4:30 pm titled Grocery run.
That is correct.
The alarm has been added.
Thanks a lot.
Can I help with anything else?
No, that is all.
Have a nice day.
I would like to add an alarm for 17:15
please confirm the details creating an alarm at 5:15 pm. with name new alarm
no make it for 4:30 in the evening
please confirm creating an alarm at 4:30 pm with name new alarm
no make the name as grocery run
please confirm creating an alarm at 4:30 pm. with the name grocery run
yes correct
the alarm at that is successful
thanks much that's all for now
thank you have a nice day
Set an alarm titled Cleaning for half past 3 in the afternoon.
Please confirm that you want to set an alarm named Cleaning for 3:30 pm.
That's correct.
Sorry, the alarm could not be set. Is there anything else I could help with?
Can you try to set the alarm again with title Phone home?
Please confirm that you want to set an alarm named Phone home for 3:30 pm.
Hold on. Can you make that quarter to 4 in the afternoon?
So you want to set an alarm named Phone home for 3:45 pm. Is that correct?
That's right.
Sorry, the alarm could not be set. Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. That's all. Thank you.
Thank you and have a great day!
I need to set an alarm. Please set alarm time for me.
At what time should i need to set the alarm?
It will be fro 3:15 pm
please confirm the following details. Alarm is set at 3:15 pm with name New Alarm.
No, it should be for evening 4:15 and the alarm name should be Leave for home.
Please confirm the following details. Alarm is set at 4:15 pm with name Leave for home.
ok that sound good.
Sorry, i couldn't able to set the alarm. Whether anything help i need to do?
Can you try it once again? create an alarm as Grocery run.
Please confirm the following details. Alarm is set at 4:15 pm with name Grocery run.
ok thats good.
Alarm added successfully.
Thanks a lot.
Whether i need to do anything else?
no, not for now.
bye take care. have a great day
I have to add an alarm for Leave for home please.
Easy enough, for what time?
Give me 3:45 pm please.
I think I have it: Creating alarm for 3:45 pm for Leave for home.
No silly, I want it for 4:30 in the evening.
All right, I think I can correct that: Alarm for 4:30 pm for Leave for home.
Yes, that's right.
I'm sorry, that didn't work. What else will you want?
Try again, call it Phone home this time.
Sure I'm creating it now for 4:30 pm with the name Phone home.
Yes, you did it.
Alarm works successfully.
Thank you for correcting it.
Nice, thank you.
Can you set me a new alarm called cooking
What time do you want it set for?
Set it for quarter to 4 in the afternoon, and change the name to grocery run
Confirming new alarm, grocery run, for 3:45 pm.
Yes thank you
I'm sorry I was unable to crate the alarm
Okay nevermind then
Thank you.
Can you please add an alarm called Grocery run.
What time would you like that to be set for?
Do it in the evening 5:15.
Let's confirm the details. You want Grocery run alarm set for 5:15 pm.
Yeah, that sounds great.
I couldn't do that for you I'm sorry. Is there anything else I can do?
Try and do it again but for 15:15.
Okay, let's confirm the details. Grocery run at 3:15 pm.
Actually call it phone home.
Okay, let's confirm the details. New alarm Phone home at 3:15 pm.
Okay great, that sounds perfect.
The alarm has been created.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else I can do?
No, that will be all.
Thank you, have a nice day.
I would like to set an alarm for 3:15 pm.
Okay, confirm these details for me: Setting an alarm to go off at 3:15 pm with the name new alarm.
No, please name the alarm Cleaning.
Okay, confirm these details for me please: Creating an alarm for 3:15 pm that is called cleaning.
Yes, that is what I want.
Sorry, I couldn't set the alarm. Is there anything else I can do for you?
Can you try again to do it? It will be for evening 5 and I want the alarm to be called music practice.
Okay, confirm these details: Creating an alarm for 5 pm that is called music practice.
Yes, that sounds good.
The alarm has been successfully created.
Thank you very much.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. Thanks very much.
Thank you very much.
I want to make a new Alarm at 4:30 in the evening in the name of Leave for home. Can you make it for me?
Yes, I need your final confirmation to make a new alarm at 4:30 pm in the name Leave for home.
Please change the time to 15:15.
Okay. Please confirm to make a new alarm at 3:15 pm in the name Leave for home.
Yes, proceed as it is.
Unfortunately I was not able to make the new alarm. How can I assist you further?
I think you can try for one more time. You can use the name Grocery run.
Please confirm finally to make a new alarm at 3:15 pm in the new name Grocery run.
Yes, confirmed to proceed.
Sorry, again it was not possible for me to make it. Anything else you need?
No. Thanks for now.
Have a great day.
Can you add an alarm to go off at 3 pm?
Sure, please confirm you'd like me to set a New alarm for 3 pm.
Yes, but title the alarm Leave for home.
Okay, confirm you'd like a new alarm set for 3 pm titled Leave for home.
Actually, scratch that. Call it cleaning and set is for half past 4 in the evening.
Sure, confirm you'd like an alarm set called cleaning at 4:30 pm?
Yup, that's right.
I've added your new alarm.
Thanks, appreciate it.
Do you need anything else?
Nope, that's all.
Have a great day.
I would like to put in another alarm.
What would be the best time to set for this alarm?
Name it Phone home and make it for 5:15 pm.
Verify the upcoming information: Name the new alarm as Phone home and set it for 5:15 pm.
Right, that sounds good.
I apologize but I wasn't able to get the new alarm set. Would you need additional help with anything else?
Would you be able to give it another go? Make the title Cleaning.
Please verify the upcoming details: The new alarm will be called Cleaning and the time will be 5:15 pm.
Right, that will do.
The alarm was created without an issue.
Thanks so very much for your help and that's takes care of it for now.
Thanks!
Can you add an alarm for me?
What time do you want me add the alarm at?
I would like to add an alarm at 4:45 in the evening with the name Grocery run.
Please confirm: You want me to add an alarm at 4:45 pm with name Grocery run.
Yes, That is correct.
Sorry, Your alarm could not be set. Is there anything else I can help you with?
Can you retry with the time as three pm?
Please confirm: You want me to add an alarm at 3 pm with name Grocery run.
No, Name this alarm as cooking.
Please confirm: You want me to add an alarm at 3 pm with name Cooking.
Yes, That is correct.
I have successfully added the alarm for you.
Thank you so much for your help.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
I need to add a new alarm titled Music Practice.
What time do you want to set the alarm for?
It is for 16:45
Okay, creating an alarm for 4:45 pm titles Music Practice, correct?
No, call it Leave for Home.
Okay, you want to create a new alarm at 4:45 pm titled Leave for Home, right?
Actually, it is going to be at 5 o"clock in the evening.
Okay, creating an alarm titled Leave for Home at 5 pm, sound good?
Yes, that is great.
Unfortunately, I was unable to create this alarm. Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thanks.
Have a great day.
Please help me add an alarm at five pm.
Okay, you want me to create an alarm at 5 pm with name New Alarm. Please confirm.
Exactly.
Apologies, I wasn't able to set it. Do you prefer 5:15 pm and call it New Alarm?
That's good.
Apologies, I still fail to set the alarm. Anything you need?
No, thanks.
You are welcome!
Can you add an alarm for four in the evening?
Understood, I will create an alarm at 4 pm titled New alarm.
Actually change the name of the new alarm to Cleaning.
An alarm called Cleaning will be set for 4 pm, is that correct?
Correct, thank you.
Unfortunately I could not set the alarm for those parameters, can I help you with anything else?
What about if you set the alarm for 4:45 in the evening? Also change the name for Leave for home.
The alarm Leave for home will be set at 4:45 pm, correct?
That is correct, thank you.
The alarm has been added successfully.
Great, thanks a ton. That is all I needed.
Thank you, have a pleasant day.
I need weather info for the 1st of March.
What is the desired city for weather information?
The city is Palo Alto, and weather info for March 2nd.
The average temperature is predicted to be around 83 degrees Farenheit. There is also a 9 percent chance of rain.
Alright then, thanks a billion.
Of course. Have a safe day.
What's the weather like in Stinson Beach today?
It should be around 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Alright. That's all. Thank you.
Have a nice day.
Can you get me the condition of weather in Palo Alto on today?
It is said 79 degrees Fahrenheit of average temperature and 4 percent chance of rain.
Great, thats helpful
Do you need any other service?
Thats all. thank you.
Good day sir.
I would like to know about the weather
Okay, just tell me the city where you want me to look.
The place is Walnut Creek.
Temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent probability of rain.
Got it.
What can I do for you now?
Nothing. Thank you.
Bye
I'd like to know the weather forecast please.
For what city please?
I'd like to know the Woodside forecast for the 10th.
Certainly, Woodside will have an average temperature of 86 degrees Fahrenheit and a 24 percent chance of rain on that day.
Could you also tell me the forecast for Bodega Bay this Sunday?
Yes, the temperature will average 77 degrees Fahrenheit that day and there will be an 8 percent possibility of precipitation.
Terrific, that's all I need. Bye now.
Goodbye, thank you very much.
Find me the weather in Berkeley on this Saturday.
The expected average temperature through the day is 83 degrees Fahrenheit with 26 percent chance of rain.
And how windy is it gonna be?
The expected average speed of the wind is 6 mph.
Okay! That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
Hey I need to check the weather on March 7th in Danville so I can see what it's like that day
It seems like it will be around 73 degrees Fahrenheit on average with a low 15 percent chance of rain
What about the wind?
It'll be around 7 miles per hour wind speed averages
Oh great, that's it for now, thanks so much it was really helpful
I am glad I could be of service!
I want to check about the weather condition in Fremont. I need your help to check the same on the 1st. Do you help me?
Yes, Please note that the average temperature will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance for rain will be 0 percent on that day.
Also let me know about the Wind and Humidity.
The average wind speed will be 1 miles per hour and the humidity is around 15 percent. Hope this information was useful to you.
Yes, that was useful and thanks. That's all for now.
Have a great day.
Hi, could you check the weather on the 10th of this month please.
Sure, which city are you interested in?
Calistoga, please.
The average temperature is 84 degress on that day with a 13 percent chance of rain.
How about the expected humidity on that day?
It should be averaging around 28 percent.
Sure, that is all I need for now. Thank you for your kind assistance!
No worries, have a pleasant day ahead!
Can you check the weather for the 11th of March?
In what city?
look in Millbrae
It is expected to be about 91 degrees with a 25 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No thank you.
Have a good day.
I want updates about the weather.
Where exactly?
Orinda.
Temperature is 81 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 3 percent.
Can you also tell me about humidity and wind speed please?
Humidity is 16 percent and the wind will blow at 9 miles per hour.
Got it.
What can I help you with now?
Nothing, I'm fine. Goodbye.
Have a great day.
Find me the weather in Discovery Bay on 7th of March.
The expected average temperature for the day is 85 degrees Fahrenheit with 28 percent chance of rain.
Can you tell me how humid is it gonna be?
The expected humidity is 56 percent.
Okay! That is all I need for now. Bye!
I am glad I could help. Bye!
Give me a weather report for tomorrow.
Easy enough, where shall I check for you?
Moraga please.
Well, the temp will be 76 degrees and there is only a 4 % chance of rain.
Will there be wind to muss my hair?
No, only 2 mph wind.
Will it be humid?
No, not relatively. 23 percent.
Fine, I guess that's good.
What more can I help with.
Nothing, I'm good.
Good bye, thanks.
I want to check the weather please
What place are you interested in checking?
I wanna see what it's like in Las Vegas
Well right now it's 84 degrees Fahrenheit with a rough 18 percent chance of rain
How about in San Pablo on March 12th?
The temperature there is around 81 degrees with a 28 percent chance of it raining
Is it expected to be humid and windy?
Wind speeds are pretty low at 2 miles per hour, and humidity is at around 15 percent
OK, thanks for all of that information
Anything else you want me to check?
No that's it for now
Cheers, have a good one
I want to know how the weather is going to be on March 8th.
Can you tell me the city you are interested that I check the weather at?
I am interested in Millbrae.
For your requested location the average temperature for the day should be 92 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of raining at 0 percent.
Alright, can you also tell me about it in San Anselmo on Wednesday next week?
In the location you are interested the temperature for the day should be at 91 degrees Fahrenheit, and there will be a raining chance of 15 percent.
Fine, right. Got what I wanted. Bye for now!
Enjoy.
Can you check the weather in South San Francisco on the 13th of this month?
Sure. The average temperature for that day is expected to be 91 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 12 percent chance of rain.
Hmm, alright. How windy do they say it will be?
The average wind speed is expected to be 10 miles per hour.
And how humid is it expected to be?
Around 31 percent.
Awesome, thank you. That will be all.
Anytime, let me know if you need anything further.
I want to check the weather for Marshall on the 5th.
The temperature on average for the day is 76 degrees F. with a 25 percent chance of rain.
Okay what about in San Leandro.
The average temperature for the day is 91 degrees F with an 18 percent chance of rain.
Sure that is fine.
Is there anything else you would like?
No. Thanks so much!
To success.
I would like to check the weather.
Which city would you like me to check the weather for?
I would like to check the weather in Duncans Mills on the 6th.
The average temperature for the day should be 70 degrees Fahrenheit with 12 percent chance of rainfall.
Okay! Thanks for the help. That is all I need for now. Bye!
I am glad I could help. Bye!
I need weather info now, please.
In which city would you like weather info?
I need it for Daly City.
The forecasted temperature is set to be about 77 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 6 percent chance of precipitation.
Wind speed info, please?
The average wind speed is forecasted to be around 6 MPH.
Okay, that's all!
Of course. Have a safe day.
I have a plan to go out . please check the weather on March 7th.
At which city do you wish to check the weather for?
Please check the weather at cloverdale.
The average temperature for the day should be 88 degrees Fahrenheit. And there is a 22 percent chance of rain.
How windy going to be on that day?
the average wind speed should be 3 miles per hour.
Ok sure. thats all i need.
Whether anything else i need to do?
no thanks a lot for your help
have a wonderful day.bye for now
I must verify the climate.
What metropolis would you like to verify the climate for?
The city is St. Helena, and on this Saturday.
The mean temperature for that day ought to be 76 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 1 percent probability of raining.
Okay, I understand.
Is there something else you require help with?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a good day.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in the District of Columbia please?
Sure, the average temperature is 75 degrees on that day with a 13 percent chance of rain.
I see, may I know the humidity and windiness too
The average wind speed is 6 miles per hour with an expected humidity around 36 percent.
I see, thanks alot!
Do you need any other assistance?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
No worries, have a great day ahead!
What's the weather like in San Anselmo on the 1st?
It should be around 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
What about on the 10th of this month?
It should be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
Alright. That's all. Thanks.
Have a nice day.
How will the weather be in Pacifica on the 11th?
The average temperature should be 82 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance of rain on the 11th.
Is it going to be very humid?
Humidity is expected to be around 21 percent.
Thank you. And how about the weather in Martinez on the 12th of March?
The average temperature should be 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 27 percent chance of rain on the 12th.
Okay, thank you.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No. Thanks a bunch!
Have a great day! Bye!
I want to check about the weather condition in NY. Can you do it for me?
Yes please note that the average temperature will be 66 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 37 percent for rain.
That is okay. Also check about the same in Santa Clara on 3rd of March.
the average temperature will be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 24 percent for rain.
I also need to know the Wind speed and Humidity.
Wind speed will be 4 miles per hour in average and Humidity is around 38 percent.
Thanks. Please check the same on March 12th too.
the average temperature will be 85 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 21 percent for rain.
Thank you for your information.
How can I help you further?
Nothing for now. Thanks.
Have a good day.
Im looking for weather in Rutherford
It is 86 degree Fahrenheit for the day and there is a 28 percent chance to rain
What about the humidity
It is about 41 percent
What about Its wind
The average speed is 10 miles per hour
Great
Anything else should I assist for
No thank you for it
Warm regards
I would like to check the weather in Alamo for next Wednesday.
The temperature should be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
How will the humidity be?
The humidity will be around 20 percent.
How will Mountain View be on the 9th of March?
The temperature should be around 77 degrees and there is a 27 percent chance of rain.
That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
I must verify the weather in Foster City later today.
The mean temperature for today ought to be 80 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 22 percent possibility of raining.
How wet will it be, and how much wind will there be?
The mean wind speed ought to be 8 miles per hour, and the wetness is near 38 percent.
Alright, what about Valley Ford?
The mean temperature for today ought to be 72 degrees Fahrenheit, along with a 6 percent probability of raining.
Okay, that's all; see ya!
Goodbye.
Check for me please the weather on March 10th in Vallejo.
For the day the average temperature should be 76 degree Fahrenheit and 10 percent chance of rain.
Tell me how humid is it expected to be.
Around 27 percent is the humidity.
Windy how will be?
Should be 11 miles per hour the average wind speed.
Okay,I understand you.
Can I help you with anything else?
No.Thank you very much!
Bye!
What is the weather going to be on the 4th of March?
What city would you like to know the weather.
I need to know the weather on the 6th of this month in Sausalito please.
There is a 15 percent chance of rain and a temp of 89 degrees Fahrenheit expected.
Can you tell me the expected humidity?
Yes The humidity is expected to bee 22 percent.
Thanks. I am all set.
Have a great day.
Could you please inform me about the weather?
Where should I look?
The city is Toronto, Canada
The temperature is 58 degrees Fahrenheit with a chance of rain of 13 percent.
What about humidity?
It should be around 25 percent
I see.
Do you need more info?
No, that's okay.
Enjoy your time.
What is the weather going to be like on the 1st of March?
For which city?
For Oakley on March 10th.
It should be 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rainfall.
What about in Brentwood?
It should be 71 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rainfall.
How humid would it be?
Around 29 percent.
Well, that would be all. Thank you.
Ok, take care.
Will you check the weather?
Weather for which city?
Chi-town on 14th of March please.
Average temperature is 68 degrees Fahrenheit with a 24 percent chance of rain.
What's the humdity?
Humidity should be around 26 percent.
What's the weather like in Phoenix on next Thursday?
Average temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with 19 percent chance of rain.
What's the humidity? How windy?
Average wind speed is at 11 miles per hour with humidity at 36 percent.
Great. That's all.
Have a nice day.
I want to check weather on the 13th
For which city you want
Make it in Newark
The average temperature should be 82 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 9 percent chance to rain
What about humidity windy
The average wind speed is 2 miles per hour and humidity around 25 Percent
How about in foster city
It is 94 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 23 percent chance to rain
Sure great
Shall I assist anything more
Thanks a lot
Cheers have a nice day
Can you tell me the weather in Campbell on the 4th?
Sure thing. The average temperature for the day will be around 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be that day?
The average wind speed will be around 5 miles per hour.
What's the humidity?
The humidity will be around 44 percent.
Okay thanks. Tell me the weather in Yountville on March 3rd.
The average temperature will be around 75 degrees fahrenheit that day with a 16 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. That's all for now. Appreciate the help.
My pleasure! Goodbye.
I would like weather information.
Which city would you like?
Montara on March 10th.
The average temperature should be 72 degrees with a 20 percent chance of rain.
What about the wind?
The average wind speed should be around 6 miles per hour.
And the humidity percentage?
Humidity is about 22 percent.
Great, thank you.
Cheers.
I want to check the weather condition in Vancouver and I need to check it on 5th of this month. Can you help me to find the one?
Please note that the average temperature will be 62 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a chance of 56 percent for rain on that day.
Thanks for the information and also check the Weather condition in American Canyon on March 6th.
Please note that the average temperature will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a chance of 19 percent for rain on that day.
Let me know the Humidity also.
It will be around 40 percent.
And the Wind condition will be?
the wind speed will be around 3 miles per hour in average
That's okay. Thanks for all.
Have a good day.
Can you tell me what the weather will be in Alameda next Wednesday?
The average temperature on that day is forecast at 88 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 27 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity, that can make a big difference. What is the humidity forecast for that day?
It is projected to be around 27 percent humidity.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed is expected to be about 12 miles per hour.
And what will the weather be like in Washington on the 14th?
The average temperature is expected to be 90 degrees Fahrenheit, and a 2 percent chance of rain is forecast.
OK, I have all I need, thank you!
Have a great day!
What is the weather in New York going to be like on the 11th?
The average temperature in New York on the 11th should be around 65 degrees Fahrenheit with a 34 percent chance of rain.
What about in Stinson Beach?
The average temperature in Stinson Beach on the 11th should be around 78 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent change of rain.
What about on March 5th?
The average temperature in Stinson Beach on March 5th should be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 18 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
The average wind speed should be around 7 miles per hour with a 28 percent humidity.
Okay, thanks.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Hi, what is the weather in London, England on the 5th of this month?
The weather on that day is about 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 28 percent chance of rain.
May I know the windiness and humidity on that day too?
Thea average wind speed is expected to be 12 miles per hour with an average humidity of 23 percent.
Sure, how about at Novato on the 3rd of this month?
The average temperature there should be 82 degrees with a 15 percent chance of rain.
I see, thank you!
Do you need any further assistance?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
Have a great day ahead!
I'm visiting Martinez soon and would like the check the weather there please
After checking it shows that it'll be around 80 degrees Fahrenheit with a 24 percent chance of it raining
I see, can you check on the 5th of March to be more specific
It'll be a little hotter at 83 degrees, but less chance of rain at 22 percent
How humid do you expect it to be?
Right around 29 percent humidity
OK got it, now I know, thanks!
Let me know if you need more help!
Can you check the weather for the 14th?
What city should I check in?
Morgan Hill, make it March 3rd instead.
It should average around 70 degrees with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Is it supposed to be humid?
The humidity should be around 43 percent.
And the wind?
Should be around 7 miles per hour.
Okay, thanks. That's all I needed.
You're welcome. Bye.
I want to see what the weather will be on Sunday this week.
Which city do you want to know the weather for?
That would be Rio Vista on 10th of March.
The temperature on that day looks like it will average 77 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 26 percent chance of rain.
What will the wind be like that day?
The wind speed on that day is forecast to be 9 miles per hour.
What is the humidity level going to be that day?
The humidity is predicted to be about 32 percent.
Okay, how about the weather in Newark that day.
The temperature on that day will average 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 16 percent chance of rain.
Okay, thank you. Good bye for now!
Have a fine day.
Can you help me check the weather?
In which city would you like me to check the weather?
Please check the weather for Anaheim, CA.
There is a 29 percent chance of rain, with an expected temp of 78 degrees Fahrenheit.
What is the humidity expected to be?
The humidity is expected to be 45 percent.
Thanks, can you tell me the weather for March 12th?
There is a 16 percent chance of rain and the temp should be 71 degrees Fahrenheit.
Okay. Thanks I am all set. Goodbye.
Have a great day.
I would like to check the weather.
Where would you like to know the weather.
In Albany, please.
The average temperature should be around 92 degrees with a 19 percent chance of rain.
Is is humid?
The humidity is 29 percent.
What about the wind?
Average speed of 8 miler per hour.
OK, thank you.
You are welcome.
I am thinking of traveling to Healdsburg and would like to know the weather for the 2nd of this month.
On that day the temperature averages 91 degrees Farenheit and there is usually a 21 percent chance of rain.
Thank you. What about on the 10th?
On that day the average temperature is 79 degrees farenheit with the chance of rain at 22 percent.
Is it usually humid and what is it typically?
The humidity averages around 47 percent.
What about the wind? Does it get windy?
The wind speed averages around 3 miles per hour.
Great, thank you for that information.
Do you need further assistance?
No, not at the moment. Thanks again for your help!
Your welcome! Enjoy your day!
I'm gonna be in Clayton on the 12th of March and need to check the weather please
Sure thing, it looks like on that date it's gonna be around 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of it raining
How windy do you expect it to be?
It's gonna be around 8 mile per hour winds going that day
What about in the Hercules area if I pass by that way
It's a little cooler than Clayton at 84 degrees and a very low 3 percent chance of rain
Good to know, okay!
Anything else you need from out end?
For now this is all good, thanks
Alright, take care then!
I want to check weather in Sacramento
The average temperature should be 82 Fahrenheit and it has a 26 percent chance to rain
What about humidity
It's around 27 percent
What about Portland on 12th of march
The average temperature is 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 16 percent chance to rain
How windy it's gonna be in there
It's 11 miles per hour
Great. Thanks that's all for now
Cheers and regards
How's the weather in LA on March 9th?
The average temperature for the day is expected to be 94 degrees Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Thank you. Can you find me a one way flight from London, UK, to go there?
Are you planning to leave on March 9th?
I'll be departing on Tuesday next week.
There are 4 suitable flights. Would you like to consider an American Airlines direct flight that leaves at 12:45 pm, for $292 per ticket?
How many people is the the cost for and in which class?
The price is for 1 traveler in Economy class.
Find me another option. I'm okay with any class.
How about the British Airways direct flight that departs at 2:30 pm and costs $410 per ticket?
Can you find me other options that are available on March 9th? I'm not looking for any specific airline.
There are 2 suitable flights and one of them is a Delta Airlines flight that leaves at 9:30 am and has a layover. The ticket price is $386.
That one sounds good. Can you find me a Sedan that I can rent once I get there? I'll need it by 7:30 in the evening and will return it on the 12th of this month.
Will you be picking up the car on March 9th?
No, I only need it on March 11th.
The is a nice Hyundai Ioniq Sedan available for pickup from the LAX International Airport. Is that okay?
Sounds good to me.
Shall I book the car for you?
Not now; I'll do it later. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I want to check about the weather condition in American canyon on 12th of March for which I need your help.
Please note that the average temperature on that day will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 15 percent for rain fall there on that day.
Please check the same on the 11th in London also.
Please note that the average temperature on that day will be 71 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 15 percent for rain fall there on that day.
And what about Humidity? Please check it in average.
It will be around 41 percent.
Then also check about wind speed.
It will be around 11 miles per hour in average. Anymore information you need to check?
That's enough and thank you. Now I want to search for a one-way flight to go there.
Do you want the flight on March 11th? If so, from which City you need the flight?
I need to take the flight from Seattle, WA and please find it on 7th of this month.
I searched and got 2 results. One is an onward flight from Alaska Airlines which is going to be take off at 7:05 am for the cost $398. What about your opinion on this flight?
This is okay to me and thanks. Please search for a car to go there and I need it for rent.
Please confirm whether you want the car for rent on March 11th or March 7th and tell me the number of days you want the car and also let me know your convenient time to book the same.
Book the car for pick up at quarter to 3 in the afternoon from next Friday to 12th of March.
Okay, How about a Sedan Audi A8 Car available for pick up at Heathrow International Airport?
I think this will be the suitable one for me.
What else you want from me?
No, thanks and that's all.
Have a great day.
What is the weather suppose to be on the 8th of this month in San Diego?
The average temperature is 93 degrees with a 6 percent chance of rain.
What is the average wind and humidity?
The wind is usually around 5 mph and the humidity averages 18 percent.
I also need a one way flight going there on the 6th. I am leaving from SFO.
Alaska Airlines has a flight leaving at 12:25 pm. The ticket is $104.
Awesome! I need a rental car there too. I'll pick it up on the 7th of this month and drop it off on the 10th of March.
What time do you need the car?
14:30.
I found a SUV, a Citroen C5 at SAN International Airport.
That is all I need, thanks!
Have a nice day.
Can you check the weather for me?
In which city?
I want to see the weather in Mexico City on the 14th of this month.
The average temperature will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Okay, that sounds great. Can you find me a one-way flight there? I'll be traveling from Portland on Wednesday next week. Any airline will do.
Do you want to fly with Alaska Airlines? I found a flight for you at 3:10 pm for $251 with one layover.
That sounds great. Can you find me a rental car there?
Do you want to pick the car up on March 14th? When will you be returning it? What time do you want to pick it up?
I'll need it from the 9th of this month until the 14th of this month. I'll pick up at half past 10 in the morning.
There's a great option available at Benito Juarez International Airport. It's a SUV Citroen C5.
How much will that be per day?
It'll be $30.00 per day.
That sounds great. That's all I need.
Thanks, have a great day.
What will the weather be in Marshall on the 1st of this month?
There will be a 5 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 86 degrees.
OK, What is the weather forecast for Delhi, India on the 10th of March?
It is expected to be 102 degrees on average that day with inly a 4 percent chance of rain.
Will it be very humid or windy?
The wind is predicted to be around 4 miles per hour and the humidity should be about 18 percent.
Alright, can you help me find a one-way flight there?
Sure, will you be flying out on March 10th?
Yes, that is when I would like to leave.
What city will be you flying from?
I need a flight that leaves from NYC please.
OK, there are 2 flights available. Southwest Airlines has a flight that leaves at 3:45 pm and costs $232.
What type of ticket is that? I just need 1 ticket.
That is the price for 1 Economy class ticket.
That works. I will need a rental car for my trip. I will need it beginning at 5 in the evening on the 11th and prefer a hatchback car.
How long do you need the car for?
I will return it on the 13th.
I found 4 cars for you. There is a Hatchback Fiat Panda available at the Indira Gandhi International Airport.
That would work great.
Shouold I reserve the car for you?
No, I don't want to reserve it just yet.
Aliright, can I help you with anything else?
No, that is all I needed.
OK. Have a wonderful day.
What will the weather in Portland be on the 14th?
The average temperature will be 57 Fahrenheit with a 13 percent chance of rain.
What about the wind speed?
There will be a wind speed of 6 miles per hour.
What about the humidity
The humidity will be approximately 20 percent.
I would like a one way ticket to get there.
What is your departure city and will your departure date be March 14th?
I'm looking for flights from SD on March 10th.
There is a direct Alaska Airlines flight departing at 2:20 pm for a total of $139.
Great. Can you also help me find a rental car.
What is your pick up time?
Picking up at evening 7:30.
Is your pick up date March 10th and what is your drop off date?
I will need the rental from March 11th until the 14th.
There is a SUV Alfa Romeo Stelvio available at Portland Bus Station.
Is there anything else?
There is a SUV Dacia Duster at Portland Bus Station.
What is the daily cost?
Is is $42.00 per day.
Great. That will be all.
Okay. Have a great day. Goodbye.
Can I get the Portland, OR weather forecast for the 13th of this month?
Portland is going to have an average temperature of 58 degrees Fahrenheit on that day with the chance of rain at 24 percent.
How about the humidity?
On that day, it'll be 13 percent.
And what about the wind conditions?
It should be a 15 mile-per-hour wind speed that day.
All right, thanks. I also need a one-way flight on any airline please.
Is that on March 13th? And where would be leaving from?
From Paris, France please. And it would be for March 8th.
How about a flight on Air France at 7:35 am? It's a layover flight and the fare is $326.
For how many people and what's the arrival time?
For 1 traveler and it's a 5:48 pm arrival time.
Great, thanks. And could I get a rental vehicle there please at 19:30?
For how long? And are planning on a March 8th pickup?
No, the 13th of this month and I would return it on the 14th of this month.
I have 10 possible cars for you. If you would like an SUV, I have an Alfa Romeo Stelvio available for pickup from Portland Bus Station.
That would work, I think
Shall I book that for you?
Not now, thank you.
How else may I help you?
Nope, thank for everything.
You're very welcome, thank you.
Please check the weather forecast for me.
Ok what city should I check the forecast in?
Please check the weather in San Francisco on the 9th of March.
The weather on that day should be around 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity supposed to be?
The humidity on that day should be about 16 percent.
Is it going to be windy?
The wind speed on that day should be about 9 miles per hour.
Ok, great. I'd like to book a one-way flight there.
What city will you be departing from and is this on March 9th?
I'd like three tickets and I want to depart on March 7th from Washington.
How about travelling with American Airlines? The flight will takeoff at 10:30 am and has a layover. The price of the ticket will be $269.
That works for me. Can you also book me a rental car there? I'd like to pick up the car at 17:15 and I need it from the 9th of March until March 13th.
I managed to find 10 cars. There's a Salesforce Transit Center that have a car you may like. It's a Sedan Audi A8.
What is the cost of the rental per day?
The cost of the rental is $25.00 per day.
That's all I needed, thank you so much.
Have a wonderful day!
I'd like to check the weather in Chicago.
The average temperature is 73 Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I want to book a one-way flight there.
What city are you leaving from? Are you leaving on March 1st?
Yes please. I'm leaving from CDMX.
I found 3 flights. There is an American Airlines flight that takes off at 4:25 pm for $285.
Is it for 1 person?
Yes, 1 person.
Is it a business class ticket? When does the flight arrive at the destination?
It is economy class seating and arrives at 3:57 am.
Ok sounds great.
Anything else I can do for you?
I'd like to find a rental car. I need it from the 10th of this month to the 11th of this month.
When do you want to pick it up?
I'd like to pick it up at 5 o'clock in the evening.
I found 10 cars available. There is a SUV Dacia Duster available at Chicago Union Station.
Okay, sounds good.
Would you like to reserve this car?
No, not right now. Thanks.
Have a great day!
I want to check the weather for Wednesday next week.
What city would you like to check?
I want the weather in Cotati
The average temperature should be 93 Fahrenheit with a 27 percent chance of rain.
What will the humidity be? Is it going to be windy?
The humidity is projected to be around 41 percent with a wind speed of 9 miles per hour.
What will the weather be in Chicago on Monday next week?
The average temperature should be 65 degrees Fahrenheit with a 35 percent chance of rain.
Thank you. I want to find a one-way flight there.
Do you want to leave on March 4th?
I am leaving on the 2nd of March.
What city are you departing from?
I'm leaving from New York City.
I found 4 flights. There is an American Airlines flight that leaves at 11:20 am with one layover for $190.
When will my flight arrive?
The flight arrives in Chicago at 3:06 pm.
Great. Can you find a rental car there? I'd like to pick it up at 5:15 pm on the 10th of March.
How long do you need the car?
I need it until the 12th of this month.
.I found 10 cars. There is a SUV Dacia Duster at Chicago Union Station
That sounds good.
Anything else I can do for you?
No, that's all. Thank you.
Have a great day!
Can you show me the weather of New York on the 4th?
The expected temperature will be 59 degrees Fahrenheit with 22 percent chance of rain.
Can you check for the wind speed that day?
The expected average wind speed is 8 mph.
Okay, great. I wold like to book a one-way flight.
What is your city of departure?
I am looking for a flight from Mexico City on 3rd of March.
How about American Airlines, whose onward direct flight departs at 2:05 am with the ticket cost of $163?
Can you check whether it is premium Economy class tickets and the price is for 4 people?
No, It is an Economy -class ticket and the fare is for 1 passenger.
That sounds good. I want to book any type of rental car till March 10th.
Would you like to book the car from March 3rd?
I want to book the car from the 7th.
What will be the time of pickup?
The time of pickup will be four in the evening.
How about a nice SUV Alfa Romeo Stelvio car available for pickup at Port Authority Station.
Can you find me the price per day?
The price per day is $36.00.
That sounds great to me. That will be all for now. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. have a nice day.
Whats the current weather at the moment?
Any particular city that you want to check the weather at the moment?
Check the current weather in Vallejo.
Average temperatures in Vallejo for today is 83 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 10 percent chance of rain.
How about the weather in SF on the 10th?
For SF on the 10th, the average temperatures is expected to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 12 percent chance of rain.
What about the humidity, whats that going to be like on that day?
Humidity is expected to be around 26 percent.
How about wind conditions, how windy is it going to be?
Wind speed should be on average about 6 miles per hour.
Thanks for all the info, I appreciate it.
Is there anything else you need assistance on?
Can you find me a one-way flight going there?
From which city will you depart in plane from?
I want to depart from New York City.
Will you be leaving on March 10th?
No, actually I want to start my travel on the 8th of March.
There is an American Airlines direct flight that takes off at 12:30 pm, it costs $187, will that suffice?
Can you find me something else?
What about a Delta Airlines direct flight that costs $212, this flight takes off at 9:35 pm?
Will that flight be a business class ticket, and when does the flight arrive at my destination?
The flight will arrive at 1:01 am, and it is an economy class seat.
That sounds good, can you find me a rental car in that area?
When will you drop off the rental car?
The rental car will be needed until the 12th of March.
At what time will you pick up the car, and will it be on March 8th, March 10th, or another date?
The car will be picked up on the 11th at evening 5:45.
I found 7 cars available, there is a sedan available at Salesforce Transit Center, are you interested in an Audi A8?
That car sounds enticing, thanks for finding it.
Will that be all for today, or can I help you with anything else?
That will be all for today, thanks for all the help.
Your welcome, enjoy the rest of your day.
Can you tell me what the weather in SF is expected to be today?
There is a 29 percent chance of rain and the average temperature will be 91 degrees Fahrenheit.
Great. Can you help me find a one way flight there?
I'd be happy to. Where will you be traveling from and will you be leaving on March 1st?
Yes, I'm looking for flights from Rio.
There is 1 flight with LATAM Brasil available. Tickets cost $414 and the flight leaves at 0:50 am with 1 layover.
That will work for me. I also need to get a rental car once I'm there.
Will you be picking up the car on March 1st? If so, what time? How long will you need the reservation?
I'd like to pick it up on the 7th of this month at evening 5:30. I'll return it on the 8th.
There are 10 options for you to choose from. May I suggest a Sedan Audi A8 available at Salesforce Transit Center.
That sounds fine.
Do you need any further assistance?
Not right now. Thank you for the help.
You're welcome. Enjoy your flight!
I am going to be outside. Let me know the weather forecast please.
I will check the weather but I need to know the city you need the weather checked in.
New Delhi is the place I need the weather checked for.
New Delhi has a forecast predicting a 4 percent chance of showers. You should expect the temperature during the day to be 99 degrees Fahrenheit.
Thank you. Will you also check for a one-way flight to New Delhi.
Where would you like your flight to take off from? Is the date of travel March 1st?
I would like to board the plane in Las Vegas. The date is correct.
One of 2 one-way flights found is on American Airlines. The plane leaves at 10:25 am, the price is $339. This flight has a layover.
Great. I also need to rent a vehicle at my destination. The dates for the car rental will be the 11th until March 13th.
At what hour do you prefer to pick up the vehicle?
I would like to get the car rental at 6:30 pm.
Indira Gandhi International Airport is showing 8 rental cars available. One of the cars is a lovely Sedan Audi A8.
I would like to hear more rental car choices please.
Another good rental choice at the Indira Gandhi International Airport is a Hatchback Fiat Panda.
I like that choice.
I can reserve the vehicle for you if you wish.
Not at the moment but thanks. I do not need any more help.
Hope your day goes well.
I'd like to check the weather in toronto, canada
The average temp there will be 58 degrees with a 13 % chance of rain.
How humid and windy will it be?
The humidity will be around 25 %, with a wind speed of 9 mph.
Could you find me a plane ticket there, a premium economy one?
Where should it depart from, and when, march 1st?
Yes, leaving from philly.
Would you like to fly with american airlines? It leaves at 5:45 pm for $323.
How many people is this for?
1
Find me something else, I'd like to fly with united airlines frmo washington.
I have 1 option. how about united airlines leaving at 3:05 pm for $144.
How many people is this for, and when does it arrive at my destination?
It is for 1 leaving at 4:30 pm.
That works. Could you find me a rental there? I want to pick it up at 8:30 in the night until the 11th of this month.
Do you want the car from march 1st?
No, the 4th of this month.
There's a nice Dacia Duster, an SUV at the toronto pearson international airport
That works.
Would you like anything else?
No thanks.
have a good day.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in Vancouver on the 4th?
It will be 58 degrees fahrenheit with a 49 % of rain.
will it be humid?
around 54 % humidity.
ok thanks, now can you help me get a flight there.
which dity will you be leaving from?
I need 3 premium economy tickets from LA.
will you be leaving on March 4th?
I want to leave this Saturday.
There are 3 flights. There is one with Alaska Airlines leaving at 8:10 am costing $225.
At what time will it arrive at LA?
At 11:14 am.
That is fine, now could you help me get a rental car?
What date will you return the car and at what time do you want to pick up the car?
The 11th and 3 in the afternoon is when I will pick the car up.
Do you need the car from March 2nd?
no 8th of this month.
There is a Sedan Audi A8 available at Pacific Central Station.
Is there anything else?
There is a SUV Dacia Duster available at YVR International Airport.
How much is it?
It is $51.00 per day.
that sounds fine.
Do you want to book the car?
not right now.
Can I assist you with anything else?
no that is everything, thanks.
have a lovely day.
What's the weather like in LA?
It will be 76 degrees and there is a 28 % chance of rain.
What will be the humidity and how windy do you think it will be?
Humidity in LA will be about 75 % and winds are light at 4 MPH.
Fine, get me four tickets for a flight.
Which city will you leave?
Vegas baby.
Will you leave on March 1st.
I concur with that.
You have 4 choices. Alphabetically first is American Airlines. It takes off at 10:25 am. It costs $84.
Fine, what about a rental car there. I can pick it up on the 3rd and will need a SUV at 1:45 in the afternoon.
When will you return the SUV?
I'll return it on the 4th of this month.
Well, there are 5 choices. You can get a SUV Dacia Duster at LAX International Airport.
Fine, that sounds good.
What more might you like?
Nothing, I'm good.
Have a great trip.
Can you help me check the weather please
What city are we looking at
I want to see what it's like in Vegas
It's gonna be 84 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain
Good to know, now find me a one-way flight there
Are you leaving on March 1st? If so where are you departing from?
Yup, and I'll be coming from Paris, France
Do you want to catch the 7:35 am flight with a layover via Air France? It'll be $356
That's great, now I need a rental car there that I can pick up at 4:15 pm
Do you want the car from March 1st? And for how long?
I need it on the 3rd of March till Thursday next week actually
There's a Audi A8 sedan from Union Plaza you might like
How much is that daily?
It's $27.00 a day
Alright then, that's all, see you
See you, bye!
Can you provide the weather forecast in Chicago for me please?
Yes. The forecast predicts a 29 percent possibility of showers. The temperature throughout the day is predicted to average 73 degrees Fahrenheit.
How muggy is it predicted to be? Also check how breezy it is expected to be please.
The atmospheric moisture is expected to be 29 percent. The breezes are expected to average 15 miles an hour.
I see. Please help me get a plane ride there. I prefer flying with Alaska Airlines. Economy seating will be just fine. I need to leave March 1st.
Where would you like the trip to start?
The airport should be somewhere in SF.
Alaska Airlines has a flight with no stops. The departure time is 6:10 am. The current price for the flight is $188.
I see. I also need help renting a vehicle there please.
Would March 1st be the day you prefer to pick up the rental?
Next Tuesday would be best for me.
Please provide a time of day that is best for you to pick up the car and the best date to return the car.
The rental should start at 3:45 in the afternoon. I would like to have it until the 9th.
I would suggest a SUV Dacia Duster. This vehicle can be picked up at Chicago Union Station.
What are my other choices if any?
O'Hare International Airport has a Sedan Dodge Charger available.
Hmmm, what other cars are available?
O'Hare International Airport also has a Hatchback Fiat Panda as a choice.
I like that.
I can assist you with other needs if you like/
Thanks but I am all set for now.
Stay well!
Tell me about the weather for the date of March 4th.
I can do that for you if you provide the city name.
I want information on weather in Tomales.
In Tomales, the average temperature is 85 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 28 percent of there being rainfall.
Okay tell me about another city. This time, tell me the forecast for next Tuesday in Toronto.
There is a 55 percent chance of there being rain in Toronto. The temperature will hover around 66 degrees Fahrenheit.
What is the humidity and wind speed for that day?
The humidity is around 23 percent with a wind speed of 12 miles per hour.
That's all I need concerning forecasts. I want one ticket for a one-way flight to Toronto. Can you assist me?
Will you be departing on March 5th? If so, what city will you be flying out of?
I'll be traveling starting on the 1st. Find me Economy class tickets for flights leaving from SFO and heading to Toronto.
4 flights match your needs. A ticket with a cost of $240 will fly with you American Airlines. The flight leaves at 4 am.
It leaves at 4 am but when will it arrive in Toronto?
The onward flight will be arriving at 7:34 pm.
That sounds fine to me. Thank you.
Do you require any other assistance with your trip?
Now that you ask, I do need help with finding a rental car. Wanna help?
Certainly. Do you plan to pick up the car on March 1st?
I'll be needing it on March 12th.
How long will you need the car and what time can I set for you to pick it up?
I'll pick up the car at 20:15 and return it on the 14th of March.
Would you like a Sedan? There is a Buick Regal Sportback ready for rental at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
How much will it cost to rent that per day?
It will cost you $38.00 a day to rent the car.
That's not too bad. Sounds pretty good actually.
Do you need help with anything else involving your trip?
That will be all. I appreciate everything you helped me with
Have a great day today. Bye for now.
Hey, check the weather in San Francisco for me.
Sure thing. The average temperature is 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
What's the wind speed and humidity like?
The humidity is around 49 percent and wind speed will be around 2 miles per hour.
Okay, thanks alot. Can you find 2 tickets for a one-way flight there? I'd prefer to fly with American Airlines if I can.
Where are you departing from? Are you leaving on March 1st?
Yeah, March 1st is right. We are flying out of London, England.
Okay, I've found a nice flight with American Airlines for you. The tickets will be $353 and the flight will depart at 12:45 pm. Is this what you're looking for?
Yeah, sounds good to me. thanks.
Anything else I can help you with today?
Yeah, I also need a rental car. I will need to have it until March 9th.
Will you need the car on March 1st as well?
I need to get the car next Thursday.
Okay, what time will you need to pick up the car?
I'd like to pick it up in the morning 9:45.
Okay. How would you like a nice Sedan Audi A8? There is one available at the Salesforce Transit Center.
How much will it cost per day?
The vehicle will be $32.00 a day.
Okay, sounds good. That's all for now.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
What will the weather in San Diego be like.
The average temperature will be 90 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
I'm also looking for an economy one-way flight to go there.
Will you be leaving on March 1st?
Yes and will need three ticket with American Airlines.
What is your departure city?
Leaving from Las Vegas.
Is you preferred airline American Airlines? There is a direct flight taking off at 11:05 pm for a cost of $85.
At what time does the departure flight arrive.
The departure flight arrives of 0:19 am.
Great, I will also need a rental sedan to be picked up at 6:30 pm.
Will you be picking the car on March 1st and for how many days?
I will need it from March 10th until the 12th.
There are 3 options. A sedan Hyundai Ioniq is available at Santa Fe Depot.
Okay, That's all for now.
Okay. Take care and goodbye.
Hello, could you help me check the weather on 7th of March in Los Angeles please?
The average temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 5 percent chance of rain.
I see, could you get me a one-way flight there?
Will you be departing on the March 7th?
No, it will be on Wednesday next week.
And which city are you departing from?
Likely from San Francisco.
There are 5 available flights. How about the flight with Alaska Airlines departing at 12:25 pm costing $99?
Sounds great! Could you get me a rental car there please?
And when do you need the car till?
On the 11th please.
And which date do you need the car from? On the March 6th or March 7th?
On the 9th of March please.
When do you intend to pick up the car?
At 5:45 in the evening probably.
Would you like a SUV Dacia Duster available for your pickup at LAX International Airport?
Sounds great!
Do you need any further assistance?
No, that is all I need. Thank you!
Have a great day ahead!
What will the weather be in Nairobi on March 9th?
The average temperature is 103 degrees with 0 chance of rain.
Okay, I see.
Do you need something else?
I want a one-way plane ride to get there.
What is your departure city?
I am departing from Chicago.
Are you departing on March 9th?
Yes, I am departing that day.
American Airlines has a flight that departs at 5:05 am and costs $410. It has a layover and is 1 of 2 search results that were found.
How many people did you search for?
I searched for 1 person.
I see. Can you find a car to rent when I am there?
When are you returning the car and what time do you wish to get the car?
I will get the car at 1 o'clock in the afternoon and will return it on the 13th.
Are you picking up the car on March 9th?
No, I will get it on the 12th.
There is a Sedan Audi A8 available at Jomo Kenyatta International Airport.
That is perfect.
Do you need more help?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a great day.
I want to check the weather condition in particular area. Do you help me?
Yes, in which area you want to check about the weather?
Check it in Toronto.
Please note that the temperature will be 58 degree Fahrenheit in average and the chance of rain will be at 13 percent.
Thanks. Now I want to go there. Please search for an one-way flight.
What is your current location to search for the flight from and shall I search it for the leaving date on March 1st?
Yes, date is okay and I want the flight from Atlanta.
Do you feel free to travel through American Airlines? I found 4 flights with this Airlines. What about the one which takes off at 5:10 am for the ticket cost $202?
I think you have to search for some other flights.
What about your opinion on a travel through Delta Airlines flight? Please confirm whether a flight which takes off at 6:50 am for ticket cost $195 is okay for you?
Okay, this will be good to me. I need one more help. Can you find a Car for rent to go there and please book it from the 3rd to 6th of March. Any type of ride is okay with me.
What is your convenient time?
I need it at quarter past 4 in the evening.
I got 10 cars and What about a car available for pickup at Toronto Pearson International Airport. This car is Sedan Buick Regal Sportback.
What is the cost per day?
It will be around $35.00 per day.
Okay. This is the car I want. Thanks and that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you tell me the weather?
Where would you like to know the weather?
What's the weather in LA?
The average temperature should be 76 degree F, with a 28 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid is it supposed to be?
The humidity for today is around 75 percent. The average wind is 4 miles an hour.
Okay, thanks for that. Can you find me a one-way ticket there?
Where would you like to leave from? Would you like a departure date of March 1st?
Yes, that works. Find a flight from Chicago.
I found 4 possible flights. There is a $164 American Airlines flight leaving at 10:20 am.
That works. Could you also find me a rental car there? I need it starting Friday next week?
And when would you like to return the car?
I need it until the 13th of this month.
At what time do you want to pick up the rental car?
I need a pick up of 16:45.
I found 10 possible cars. There is a Hatchback Ford Focus at Union Station.
That will work for me.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that was it, thank you.
Enjoy your trip!
I want to check weather on March 13th in Portland
The average temperature for the day should be 58 degree Fahrenheit and there is a 24 percent chance to rain
OK get me one way flight to go there
Are you leaving on March 13th
I want to start my travel on the 10th
Which city will you depart
Make it from Vancouver
i found 1 American Airlines which dates of at 5:10 pm. and it has a layover cost $277
Great can you find me a rental car there
At what time you want it
I will pick it up at 12 o'clock in the afternoon
When do you want it from March 10th for March 13th or any other dates until when you need it
I want it from March 11th till March 13th
There is a good car at Portland bus station it is an SUV Alfa Romeo stelvio
Sounds great that's all I need
Have a nice day
I want the weather in SD for the 9th.
It will be averaging a day temperature of 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent possibility of raining.
Fine. Get me a one-way flight to that place.
What is the city you are leaving from and is it on March 9th?
I am going to travel next Thursday and I need flights from Vegas.
What do you think of flying American Airlines? The departing flight takes off at 11:05 pm and it is a direct flight costing you $85
Is the ticket of Business type?
It will be an Economy class seating
Will it be for one person only?
So it will be for 1 traveller.
Can you get me other options?
What do you think of flying Delta Airlines? The departing flight leaves at 8:20 am. This direct flight will cost you $74.
Great. Will I get a rental car there?
What date would you like? Maybe March 7th or March 9th? What will your time of pick up be like and when will you drop it off?
I want it from next Friday until the 13th. I will pick it up at 5 in the evening.
I can get you a nice SUV Citroen C5 at SAN International Airport.
That is great. That will be all.
Have a nice day.
Can you check the weather forecast in Phoenix for me?
Yes. Phoenix shows a 15 Percent possibility of showers. The temperature throughout the day could average 89 degrees Fahrenheit.
Will there be a lot of wind?
The wind will blow aroubd 11 miles per hour.
How muggy is it expected to be?
There will be about a 23 percent concentration of water vapor in the air.
Thank you for the information. Can you please locate a flight to Phoenix for me?
Is March 1st the day you would like me to schedule the flight?
That is right.
Is there a location you prefer to leave from?
I would like to catch the flight in Atlanta.
You have a choice of 3 transport options. If American Airlines is suitable there is a plane leaving at 4:50 am. The charge will be $158.
I will need passes for two people. What are my other choices?
Southwest Airlines is another available choice. This trip begins at 6:15 am with no stops. The charge is showing as $177.
I like that choice, thanks. I would also like to reserve a vehicle in the area.
Will March 1st be the date you would like the rental for? Is there a time of day you prefer to pick up the car?
Yes. 11:15 am is when I would like to pick up the car. I would like the rental to begin on the 11th.
How long would you like the rental for?
I would like to return the vehicle on the 12th.
I found 8 choices for you. One choice is a Sedan Buick Regal Sportback. This car is available at the Sky Harbor International Airport.
I like that choice, thanks.
What else may I do for you today?
You have been a super help. I don't need anything else at the moment, thanks.
Hope your day is excellent.
I need to see what the weather will be like in London, UK on the 12th of March
It looks like it's gonna be 87 degrees with a 21 percent chance of it raining there
Cool, now how windy and humid is it expected to be?
It's expected to be around 32 percent humidity with a 2 mile per hour wind speed
OK thanks for that
What else can I do for you?
I need a one way ticket there
Where are you flying from? And are you leaving March 12th?
I want to leave on the 11th from Seattle, WA
I found 2 flights including an Alaska Airlines Flight at 7:05 am with a layover, it's $391
Sounds good, can you find me a rental car
When do you need it from? March 11th? March 12th? Also for how long and when are you picking it up?
I I need tie from the 13th of this month at 10:15 am till the 14th of this month
There's a nice Audi A8 Sedan type car you can get from Heathrow International Airport
That's good for now, thanks!
Sure, see you!
I am interested to know how the weather is going to be on 7th of March in San Diego.
For your requested location the temperature should be at an average of 90 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of raining at 17 percent.
Alright, fine. Now I would like to find a one-way flight to go there, and I do not mind which airline I will have.
Will you be having your flight on March 7th?
In fact I will be taking the flight on the 6th.
Can you tell me from which city will you be leaving from?
I will be taking the flight from Paris, France on 2nd of this month.
Would you like to have a flight with Air France which has layover, and leaves at 7:35 am. The price of ticket costs $353.
Can you tell me when the flight will be arriving at the destination of my choice, and could you tell me if the ticket is an Economy one?
The flight ticket is an Economy class ticket, and your flight will be departing at 2:05 pm.
That is alright with me.
Is there something else I can help you with?
Would it be possible for you to find me a rental car to go there?
Till when are you going to need to have the car?
I would like to have a Sedan car, and I will need it till the 14th.
From when will you be needing it, from March 7th, March 2nd or some other day? Which time suits you best to pick up the car?
I want to have the car from 9th of March, and I can pick it up at quarter to 4 in the afternoon.
I found 2 cars which you might like, with one of them being a Sedan Hyundai Ioniq, which you can pick up at Santa Fe Depot.
That seems a nice one.
Can I do something else to help you with?
Nothing. I appreciate your help.
Have a good time!
Show me the weather of Mexico City on March 13th.
The expected average temperature through the day is 91 degrees Fahrenheit with 8 percent chance of rain.
Can you check for the wind speed?
The expected average wind speed is 6 mph.
Okay, That sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I would like to book one-way flight going there.
What will be your city of departure and is your date of departure March 13th?
I will be leaving from Seattle on 1st of this month.
How about an American Airlines flight, whose onward flight takes of at 4:15 pm with the ticket price of $266?
Is the price for economy class or business class?
The price is for Economy class seat.
That sounds good to me. Now, Can you find me a rental car for rent from 10th of this month till March 14th?
What will be time for pickup?
I would like to pick it up at quarter past 12 in the afternoon.
How about a nice SUV Citroen C5 available for pick up at Benito Juarez International Airport?
Can you find me the cost per day?
The cost per day is $35.00.
Can you show me any other Sedan car for pick up at 11:30 am?
How about a nice Sedan Dodge Charger available for pick up at Benito Juarez International Airport?
That sounds nice to me. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
Can you check the weather for me?
Sure thing. Which city would you like to check?
Can you tell me the weather in SFO?
The average temperature will be 91 degrees fahrenheit with a 29 percent chance of rain.
Cool, thanks for the info. Sounds like a nice day out there today. Can you help me find a one-way flight to the area?
No problem. Will you be leaving March 1st? What city will you be departing from?
I need 2 tickets for flights out of Philadelphia.
I've found a $259 dollar flight with American Airlines. The flight will be departing at 5:45 pm. Would you like to book a ticket?
No, I'm really looking for something with United Airlines. I think they have the best flights.
Okay, i've found a flight with United Airlines for you. The flight will depart at 1:55 pm and tickets will cost $296.
Okay, sounds good to me. Can you also find a rental car for me as well? I will need it until Friday next week.
Will you be picking the car up on March 1st? Also, what time would you like to pick up the vehicle?
I'd like to pick it up on the 5th around 19:45.
I've found 7 cars for you. How about a nice Sedan Audi A8? You can pick it up from the Salesforce Transit Center.
Okay, that sounds good. Thanks. That's all for now.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
What's the weather gonna be like in Toronto, Ontario on Thursday next week?
In Toronto, Ontario, there is a 15 percent chance of rain with a temperature of 61 degrees.
I need to know the about the wind and humidity too.
Humidity will be roughly 25 percent with the wind blowing at 12 miles per hour.
Alrigt. I plan to visit there on the 2nd of March. I need a flight to Toronto from SD. Any airline will do fine.
Alaska Airlines has a flight departing from SD on March 2nd at 1:05 pm. The ticket price is $220.
I don't think I want those tickets. Try another airline please.
How about Southwest Airlines instead? This flight in particular departs at 12:20 pm. It will cost you $216.
Will it be available for four people?
I apologize but no. It is for 1 passenger.
Okay then. Let's move on to another option please.
Is United Airlines acceptable? The flight to Toronto leaves at 9:15 am and has a price of $214. It is worth noting that this flight has a layover.
How many people does this include? Oh yeah. And when does it arrive in Toronto?
It is for 1 passenger and has an arrival time of 0:14 am in the morning.
Okay that sounds like what I'm looking for. Can you help me find a rental car as well?
How long do you wish to rent this car for?
I'll be needing it until Friday next week.
Please provide the pick-up date for the vehicle. March 2nd or March 7th for example. I need to know the time as well.
I'm looking for a sedan on March 5th. I'll be picking the car up at 17:00.
There are 4 cars available.There is a nice Buick Regal Sportback Sedan available at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
I'm not too picky about what vehicle I get. That sounds fine.
Okay. Want me to schedule the pick-up?
No thanks. I'll reserve one another time. That's all the information I need for now.
Certainly. Have a great day.
Hi, i need a help, i want to check the weather on 8th of March in London
Okay, The average temperature for the day should be 93 degrees Fahrenheit and 24 percent chance of rain.
Okay, how humidity is it expected to be, and how windy is it gonna be?
The humidity is around 19 percent and the wind speed should be 4 miles per hour.
Okay, i need to find a one way flight going there, i need to start my travel on 6th of this month.
Okay, which city you want depart from?
I am Looking for flights from Philadelphia
Okay, i have found 4 flights for you, are you interested to fly with American Airlines, The onward flight takes off at 1:20 pm and it has a layover, the ticket cost is $234
Okay, Is this an economy class or business class ticket, is it for 1 people?
It is a Economy class and it is for 1 travellers
It seems good to me
Okay, Can i help you with anything more?
Yes, i need a rental car there.
Okay, Please tell me the time do you want to pick up the car? Do you need the car from March 6th and until when do you want the car?
i need to pick up the car at 10 o'clock in the morning, i want it from 12th of march to until 14th of this month.
Okay, i have found a nice car at Heathrow International Airport and it is a Sedan Audi A8
Okay it seems good to me
Okay, can i help you with anything more?
No, thank you very much for your help
You are welcome, have a great day.
Can you check the weather for me?
Sure. For what city?
For London, please.
The average temperature should be around 81 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 23 percent chance of rain.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed should be around 10 miles per hour.
Okay. Can you find me a one-way flight there?
Sure. What is your departure city? Will you be leaving on March 1st?
Yes. I need flights from Los Angeles.
I found 3 flights. How about Delta Airlines? There is a 6:05 am departure with a layover. The ticket costs $403.
Sounds good. I also need to find a rental car for the day after tomorrow. I want to pick it up at four in the evening. A Sedan would be nice.
How long will you need the rental?
Until Wednesday next week.
I found a nice Sedan Audi A8. It is available at the Heathrow International Airport.
Did you find anything else?
There is also a nice Buick Regal Sportback available at Gatwick International Airport. It is a Sedan.
Sounds good. That's all I need for now.
Have a good day!
I want to know about the weather in Toronto, Canada on the 4th of this month.
The temperature average will be 70 degrees Fahrenheit and there will be a 38 percent chance for rain.
Okay, thanks for that.
Do you need me to do anything else?
I need two tickets for a one way flight there. Preferably with United Airlines.
Will you be departing on March 4th?
I'm planning on departing today from Washington.
There is 1 flight that matches. It is on United Airlines and leaves at 3:05 pm. It's direct and is $95.
Yeah, that works. I also need a rental car when I get there.
Do you want the car starting on March 4th? And when will you need it until? And what time do you want pick up to be?
I want it from March 3rd until next Wednesday with a pick up of 20:15.
There's a nice Sedan Buick Regal Sportback from Toronto Pearson International Airport available for that period.
Okay, nice. I don't need any further help.
Have a terrific day.
Hey, can you tell me how's the weather gonna be in Chicago on Saturday this week please?
Sure! The average temperature should be 61 degrees Fahrenheit with a 33 percent chance of rain.
Good to know. Help me book some one-way flights going there please.
Where will you be departing from?
I want Economy tickets with Delta Airlines on a plane leaving from Vancouver.
Are you leaving on March 2nd or some other day?
I want to leave on the 1st of March.
I found 1 flight you may like. It's a Delta Airlines one costing $173 that takes off at 12:20 pm. Sounds good?
Sure. Can you help me rent a car there? I'll pick it up on 7:30 in the evening on Monday next week and I'll return it on the 7th of this month.
Sure, I found 6 cars you may like. There's a great Sedan Dodge Charger at O'Hare International Airport. Does it appeal to you?
Sounds real good.
Should I book it?
Not now, thanks. That's all I need.
Have an amazing day.
Update me about the weather please, the day is wednesday next week
Okay, just tell me which city you're interested in
los angeles
I checked and I have to inform you that the temperature should be around 78 degrees fahrenheit and the chance of rain is equal to 19 percent
Got it. Now, go to see if there's an united airlines flight to fly there.
Okay, where are you leaving from? Is the date of your departure March 6th?
Yes, it is. I'm leaving from berlin
There is 1 option suitable for you if United airlines it's fine with you. there's thise flight leaving at 4:05 am and it's direct. the price for the ticket is $263
Perfect. I think I'll have to rent a Sedan car there, my idea is to pick it up at 4:45 pm on the 7th of this month
tell me the last day you think you'll need the car
it's march 10th
I've found a sedan hyundai ioniq at lax international airport
how much will I pay it for every single day?
it's $32.00
fine. bye
bye sir
Hello. What's the weather like in Atlanta, GA?
The weather is 86 degrees F with a 28 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I need to book a one-way flight there.
Okay, great! Are you leaving on March 1st? Which city are you leaving from?
That will be my departure date, yes. I'm leaving from London, UK.
Perfect! I found 3 flights for you. I recommend the American Airlines flight that leaves at 8:05 pm. It's a direct flight and costs $249.
That would be great! I also need a rental car there until the 10th.
Great! What time would you like to pick up the car?
15:45 would be ideal.
Okay! And the pick up date would be March 1st?
Actually, I only need it starting on March 7th.
Okay, perfect! I found 10 cars you might like. I recommend a car available at the Hartsfield-Jackson International Airport. It's a Sedan Buick Regal Sportback.
How much is the cost per day?
It's $34.00 per day.
Sounds good! That's all I need.
Have a good day!
Can you please check the weather for me for March 7th.
Sure, but first tell me for which city.
For London, UK please!
There's a 27 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 71 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK, thanks. Now please help me look for a one way flight to there, preferably some Economy tickets with Delta Airlines. I'll be taking off from New York.
Sure! Do you plan to leave on March 7th?
No, I'll be starting my travel on March 3rd.
There's 1 flight matching your criteria, a Delta Airlines flight taking off at 8:50 pm. The tickets are $210 and the flight is direct.
OK. When does it arrive?
The flight lands at destination at 9:12 am.
The price you've mentioned is for 1 person, right?
Yes, for 1 person.
Sounds perfect. Now, can you please find me a car to rent at destination?
Sure, but first please tell me you desired pick up date and time as well as the rental period. Do you plan to pick-up the car on March 3rd, March 7th or other day, maybe?
I will be needing the car from March 7th to the 12th and I would like to pick it up at 13:30.
There's a very nice sedan, an Audi A8, available to rent at Heathrow International Airport.
OK. What the per day price for this vehicle?
The car is priced at $36.00 per day.
Sounds perfect to me.
Do you want me to place a reservation for you for this car?
No, not at the moment.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
No, but thanks for everything.
My pleasure! Have a nice day.
Can you check the weather in SD next Tuesday please
It's gonna be 84 degrees with an 8 percent chance of rain
Sure thing, I need a one way flight getting there next Tuesday
Where are you coming from?
I'll be flying from Portland, OR
I found 5 flights including one via Alaska Airlines that leaves at 10:05 am and has a layover for $208
Is it just for 1?
Yes it's for 1 person only
Sounds good, now find me a rental car
What time are you picking it up and till when do you need it?
I need it till the 11th of this month and am picking it up at 19:15
Do you want it from March 5th onwards
Actually I need it starting Thursday next week
There's a Hyundai Ioniq Sedan you can get from Santa Fe Depot
That sounds good for me
What else can I do?
Nothing else for now, thanks
Sure thing, bye!
I need a weather update for Chi-town for 13th of this month.
The temperature will average 65 degrees Fahrenheit with a 37 percent chance that it would rain.
What is the expected humidity?
It's around 47 percent humid.
What is the wind situation like?
5 miles per hour will be the wind speed on average.
Fine. Look for a one-way flight to there.
What city will you leave from?
Find flights from San Francisco.
Do you leave on March 13th?
I start my visit on 11th of this month?
What do you think of flying Alaska Airlines. It's direct onward plane leaves at 6:10 am and will cost you $183.
Perfect. I would be needing a rental car there as well.
What will the time of pick up for the car be? Will you be needing it from March 11th and till when do you want the car?
I want it on 13th of this month till the 14th and the pick up time is at 16:00.
You can choose from 10 cars. A nice SUV Dacia Duster is available at Chicago Union Station.
What is the daily cost?
The daily cost will be $41.00
That sounds fine.
Shall I be of any other help?
Not really. Thank you.
Have a nice day!
I need some information about how the weather will be on the 5th of March.
What city do you wish for me to find the forecast for?
Find the weather forecast for Cotati.
Cotati will have an average temperature of 86 degrees with an 18 percent chance of rain on March 5th.
Thank you. I need another weather forecast. This time for Nairobi.
There temperature for Nairobi is 90 degrees with a 9 percent chance of there being rain.
Okay, thank you very much. I want a one-way flight to that location please.
Please name your departure city.
I'm planning to leave from Chi-town. I'll need 3 tickets preferably from Delta Airlines.
Is your departure date March 5th or another date?
I plan on traveling sooner than that. I plan to travel later today.
Delta Airlines has a flight leaving at 8 am. The cost of the ticket is $425. Is that acceptable?
Is the ticket Economy class at that price? Also, when will the flight arrive at my destination?
It is an Economy -class ticket. The arrival time for your flight is 12:17 pm.
That sounds great. Can you find me a rental car that I can pick up on the 9th?
How long will you be needing the car, and when do you wish to pick up the car?
I will be picking up the car at 4:45 pm and I will keep it until the 11th of March.
There are 5 cars that should fit your needs. There is an Audi A8 Sedan for pick-up at Jomo Kenyatta International Airport.
That sounds like a great car. Thanks for providing me with that info.
Can I help you with anything else right now?
I can't think of anything else right now. Thank you for helping me.
Please have a great day today.
What is the weather in Toronto, Ontario.
The average temperature is 58 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Ok, I also need a flight there.
Are you leaving on March 1st?
Yes, I am.
What city are you leaving from?
San Diego.
Southwest Airlines has a flight that leaves at 1:55 pm with a ticket price of $241.
Is this a business class ticket? For how many people?
It is an economy seat for 1 person.
Find me some other choices.
United Airlines has a flight that leaves at 9:15 am for a ticket price of $215.
Perfect. I'll also need a rental car at 8 pm and I'll drop it off Wednesday next week.
Do you want to pick up the car on March 1st?
I need it the day after tomorrow.
There is a Buick Regal Sportback Sedan available at Toronto Pearson International Airport.
That is perfect. That is all I need for now.
Have a nice day.
I'm traveling soon and need to know the weather about my destination. Can you tell me the forecast for Phoenix, AZ on Friday next week?
Phoenix, AZ should have a temperature of 77 degrees Fahrenheit and a 15 percent chance of rain next Friday. Do you require more information?
I could use some information about the wind speed and humidity as well. Please.
Certainly. The humidity should be 21 percent and the wind speed will be 11 miles per hour.
Nice weather. Perfect for taking a trip. Let's get starting on finding me a one-way flight to Phoenix please.
Will you be leaving on Friday, March 8th? If so, can you tell me what your departure city is?
I plan on leaving from San Francisco today actually.
Would you mind flying with Alaska Airlines? The flight will be leaving at 11:50 pm and costs only $114.
No I don't mind at all. That should be fine. When I get there, I'll be needing a rental car. I want to pick it up around afternoon 3:30.
From what date? March 8th, March 1st, or another day entirely? Once you tell me the pick-up date, we can set the drop off date as well.
I need it starting next Monday until March 9th.
I have found a Sedan at Sky Harbor International Airport. It is a Buick Regal Sportback. Will this suit your needs?
That should do just fine. Thanks for your help. I'll be going now to get ready for the trip.
Enjoy your trip and have a great day.
I want to check about the weather condition on 13th of March and I need your help to do the same.
Where do you want to check for the Weather?
Check it in Toronto, Ontario.
Please note that the temperature will be 62 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there may be a 1 percent chance of rain.
What about the Humidity there?
It will be around 15 percent. What else do you need to know?
I want to check the same on March 8th.
Please note that the temperature will be 67 degrees Fahrenheit in average and there may be a 6 percent chance of rain.
That's fine. Find me an one-way flight to go there. I want to book three Economy class tickets for the leaving date on 5th of March.
What is your present location to search for the flight?
Search it from SD.
Do you like to travel through Alaska Airlines? There is an onward flight which will take off at 1:05 pm for the ticket cost $278. How about your convenience in travel through this flight?
I prefer to travel through United Airlines on Premium Economy Class tickets. Search for the one according to my requirement.
What about an onward flight with United Airlines for the take off time 9:15 am under the ticket cost $362?
I need to search for some other flights.
I can't find anything else. How can I help you further?
Please make a search with Southwest Airlines for two tickets on 6th of March.
Got 1 onward flight with Southwest Airlines which will take off at 12:20 pm. It has a layover and the ticket cost is $420.
It looks good and I want a car for rent. I need the same for pick up at 6:15 pm. I prefer a Sedan Car. Can you get me the one?
Yes, please confirm whether you want the car on March 6th or March 8th and for how many days?
I want to book it from the 12th to March 14th.
Do you like to take a ride on a Sedan Buick Regal Sportback Car which will be available for pick up at Toronto Pearson International Airport?
Can you search for some other car for the date 13th of March?
Yes, what about the one like Sedan Hyundai Ioniq Car which will be available for pick up at Toronto Pearson International Airport?
That looks fine and that's all.
Have a great day.
Can you get me the weather for Phoenix for the 4th of March?
The average temperature for the day should be around 90 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you find me a one-way flight there?
What is your departure city? Will you be leaving on March 4th?
I want to leave on the 2nd of this month. I am departing from Portland, OR.
I found 5 flights for you. How about a flight on Alaska Airlines? It is a direct flight that departs at 10:20 am. The ticket is $135.
Is the flight for 1 person? Is it a business class ticket?
It is an Economy -class seat for 1 person.
Can you find me something else?
How about American Airlines? There is a 11:20 am departure that costs $207.
That sounds good. Can you get me a rental car? I need to pick it up at evening 7:45.
What will be your pick up and drop off dates? March 2nd, March 4th, or some other date?
I need it from the 6th of this month until the 11th of March.
I found a nice Sedan Audi A8 available at the Phoenix Union Station.
How much does it cost per day?
The rental costs $29.00 per day.
That sounds good.
Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No. Thank you for your help.
You're welcome. Have a good day.
Tell me the weather in Portland on the 10th of March.
Portland has an average temperature of 58 degrees on March 10th. There is also a 25 percent chance of rain occurring.
What's the humidity going to be like that day?
The humidity will be about 39 percent that day.
Will it be windy on the 10th?
It should be only 4 miles per hour when it comes to wind speed.
Okay thanks. I wanted to know that because I'm traveling to Portland soon. I want a one way flight with Alaska Airlines if possible.
What city do you want to depart from? Also, will it be on March 10th?
Okay that sounds pretty good. I'll be leaving from LAX and I'll be needing 3 tickets.
There is 1 flight that matches your criteria. It is a flight with Alaska Airlines that takes off at 5:30 am. The cost of the flight will be $145.
Perfect. I'm glad you could find one with Alaska Airlines. Oh right. I'll be needing a rental car as well. Please help me.
What time do you wish to pick up the car and how long will you be needing it?
I'll be needing the car until the 13th of March and I'll pick it up at 1:30 in the afternoon.
Do you wish for the pick up date to be March 10th?
No not the 10th. I'll be needing from the 11th of this month until the 12th of this month. I have no preference when it comes to the type of car.
There are 10 cars that I have found for you. There is a nice SUV available from the Portland Bus Station. It is an Alfa Romeo Stelvio.
I'm fine with that type of car. Anything works.
Shall I proceed with the reservation?
No I just wanted some information about it.
Okay. Do you require any more help at the moment?
That's all for now. Thanks for helping me out.
Have a wonderful day.
I was wondering what the weather is like in Phoenix.
The temperature will average 89 degrees Fahrenheit for the day with a 15 percent possibility of raining.
Alright can you check for NY on March 9th?
The temperature must be 70 degrees for the day on average and I think it will have 38 percent possibility of raining.
What is the wind like?
The wind will average a speed of 7 miles per hour.
What is the humidity like?
About 47 percent should be the humidity.
Alright, get me a one-way flight to there.
Will you leave on March 9th? What city are you leaving from?
I begin on the 6th of this month. So search for flights in Philadelphia.
There are 4 planes suited for you. What do you think of American Airlines. The onward plane departs at 1:20 pm and it is a direct flight. The price is $55.
Fair enough. I want a rental car in that location. I will take it up at 14:30.
Till what date will you be needing the car? Is it on March 9th that you want the car from?
Great. I will drop it off on the 12th of this month.
You can have a nice SUV Alfa Romeo Stelvio at Port Authority Station.
That works for me.
Shall I get you anything else?
Nope. Thank you.
Have a great day!
What's the weather like on the 9th of March?
What's the location you want to check?
I want to check SF.
The temperature will be 70 degrees Fahrenheit on average with a 2 percent chance it will rain.
Alright. I want to book a one way flight to go there.
Will your departure be March 9th?
Yes it will.
And where will you be departing from?
I'll be departing from Kuala Lumpur.
There are 2 flights that might work. There's an American Airlines flight that leaves at 10:30 am, but it has a layover. The ticket is $407.
Yeah, I like that. I'll also need a rental car for when I'm there. I'd like a Hatchback. And I want it on the 13th of March at 19:00.
And when will you return the car?
I'll return it on the 14th of this month.
There's a nice Hatchback Mazda 3 at Salesforce Transit Center that meets your criteria.
Alright, nice. That's all the help I need.
Have a pleasant rest or your day.
What is the weather going to be like Wednesday next week in Philly?
The forecasts are predicting average temperature to be 94 Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of precipitation.
Okay, got it.
Do you still need assistance?
I need you to locate a one way flight to get there.
Where do you plan to be when you leave?
I plan to take off out of NY?
And would that be on March 6th?
No it would be the 5th of March.
I found a direct flight for $54 that leaves at 11:20 am the carrier is American Airlines.
That would probably work, can I get a rental car there?
I need some details when will you pick the car up March 6th? How long do you intend to use it and what time do you want to get it?
The starting date is right and I would be keeping it until the 10th of March I need to pick it up at 3:15 in the afternoon.
Intercity Terminal has a SUV Alfa Romeo Stelvio what do you think?
I am okay with almost any car but do you have anything else?
I found a Dodge Charger Sedan at the 30th Street Station.
What if I want it from March 7th and could take it in the evening 6:30 could you find another option?
I found 5 possibilities including a Ford Focus Hatchback at the 30th Street Station.
What does it run by the day?
It is $27.00.
I like that one.
Should I reserve it for you?
Not right this minute.
Can I be of any further assistance?
Not today, thanks.
Have a most wonderful day.
I would like to check the weather today in Nairobi.
The temperature should be around 105 degrees and there is a 0 percent chance of rain.
How windy is the day going to be?
The wind should be around 7 miles per hour
I would like to find a one way flight to get there today.
Which city are you departing from?
I'm departing from Atlanta.
There is Delta Airlines leaving at 6:05 am and the ticket is $424.
Can you find another flight?
There is United Airlines leaving at 7:25 am for $421.
When does the flight reach destination?
The flight reaches destination at 11:02 am.
Can you find me a car rental.
What time would you like to pick up the car?
I would like to pick up the car around 14:45.
You want the car from March 1st till when?
I will need it on the 8th till March 12th.
There are 5 cars available. There is a Sedan Audi A8 available at Jomo Kenyatta International Airport.
How much is the rental per day?
The cost is $22.00 per day.
Yes, that sounds good.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Can you please check the weather for me for the 8th of March?
Sure, but first tell me for which city.
For Gilroy, please.
There's a 20 percent chance of rain with average temperatures around 85 degrees Fahrenheit.
Is it going to be humid or windy?
The average wind speed is forecast to be 9 miles per hour and the humidity should be around 40 percent.
OK, now let's check the weather for SFO.
There's a 13 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 70 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK, now let's see it for the 12th of this month.
There's a 23 percent change of rain with an average temperature of 76 degrees Fahrenheit.
OK, perfect. Now let's find a one-way flight to there.
Please tell me from where will you be taking off as well as if you plan to travel on March 12th.
I plan to fly out of Los Angeles on the 3rd.
There's an Alaska Airlines flight taking off at 11:40 pm with tickets priced at $91.
Please tell me for how many people is this ticket and for which class.
The tickets are in Economy an the price is for 1 person.
OK, thanks. Now let's find something else, in Premium Economy.
There are 4 flights matching your criteria, out of which I recommend the American Airlines flight taking off at 9:30 am with tickets priced at $170.
Sounds perfect. Now let's find a car rental at destination.
Please tell me the rental period as well as the desired pick up time. Do you plan to rent the car from March 12th?
No, I'll be needing the car from March 10th to the 14th of March. I would like to pick it up at 8:30 pm.
There are 7 cars matching your criteria out of which I recommend a very nice Audi A8 Sedan available for pick up from Salesforce Transit Center.
Sounds perfect. That will be all for now!
Have a great day!
I need to see what the weather is on the 5th of March.
What is the city you want to find out about the weather?
Let's look in Marshall.
There's a 25 percent chance of rain that day. The average temperature will be around 76 degrees Fahrenheit that day.
Right, what about checking San Fran for the 4th.
That day there will be about an average temp of 71 degrees and have a 16 percent rain chance.
Will it be humid or windy?
The average wind will have speeds of 8 miles per hour and a humidity of near 19 percent.
Right, okay then. Please search for some flights that are one way that is going there. I want to go with Delta Airlines and will be leaving from NY.
Will you be leaving on March 4th?
I actually will be going on the 3rd.
There is 1 flight. The onward flight will leave at 9:35 pm and will have a ticket price of $217. Is Delta Airlines your flight choice?
Sounds just right. Will you search for car rentals there?
Do you need a car starting from March 3rd?
I actually need it from the 7th of this month.
What is the pick up time you'd like and how long do you want to keep it?
I will need it until March 8th and will get it at 2:45 in the afternoon.
I found a good car that can be picked up at Salesforce Transit Center. The car is a Sedan Audi A8.
All right, great. That's all.
Enjoy your day.
How will be the weather on the 9th of this month?
In which city are you interested?
I'm interested in the weather in San Diego.
The average temperature for the day is expected to be around 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be windy or humid?
The humidity is expected to be around 40 percent with an average wind speed of 7 miles per hour.
Thank you. Can you find me a one-way flight to go there from Cape Town on South African Airways?
Will you be leaving on March 9th?
I'm planning to depart on March 8th.
There is just 1 flight that is suitable and it is a South African Airways flight the departs at 2:05 pm. A ticket costs $208.
Is this an economy class ticket or a business class ticket?
It is an Economy class ticket.
Is the price for 1 person?
Yes, it is for 1 passenger.
Okay. Can you find me a rental car that I can use once I get there?
On what date will you be picking up the car, March 8th or March 9th? At what time do you need the car to be available and when will you plan to return it?
I need the car in the evening 4:45 on March 11th, till the 13th of March.
There are 10 cars available and one of them is a Citroen C5 which is a nice SUV that is available at SAN International Airport.
What is the rental cost per day?
It costs $53.00 per day.
That sounds good to me. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Tell me what the weather will be Monday next week.
What city do you want me to check?
Check in SD.
The normal temperature is 75 degrees with a 7 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the wind speed?
Winds average 9 miles an hour.
I see. Get me a one-way flight in any class for 1 person to go there on Monday next week.
What city are you leaving?
Search for flights out of Washington.
Search revealed 2 results. American Airlines takes off at 10:30 am, has a layover, and costs $243.
That works for me. I need a rental car when I arrive too.
Will you be picking up the car on March 4th and if so what time do you want to get it? When will you return the car?
I want to pick it up at 2 o'clock in the afternoon on the 5th of March and will return it on the 6th.
Search revealed 10 results. There is a SUV Citroen C5 at SAN International Airport.
What else do you have?
A Sedan Hyundai Ioniq is available at Santa Fe Depot.
That works for me.
Shall I get the car for you?
No, not right now. That is all.
Have a great day.
Please inform me about the weather in Portland, OR.
The temperature is found to be 75 degrees Fahrenheit. 9 percent chance of rain is forecast.
What about the condition on this Saturday.
The temperature is found to be 65 degrees and 15 percent chance for shower.
Please find a one way flight to there.
Date of location of departure please. Are you departing on March 2nd?
Look for flights from Toronto, Canada on March 1st.
2 flights are available. The Air Canada will take off at 4:35 pm with one layover. The cost is $277.
Look for another option. One ticket to leave this Saturday.
You can get 1 flight, United Airlines departing at 4:45 am with one layover and charging $283.
What is the type of class?
It is Economy class ticket.
Great, now look for a Sedan there on March 7th.
Do you need it from March 2nd? what is the time of pick up?
I need it from 6th of March and will pick up at half past 7 in the evening.
At Portland Bus Station you will get one, a Sedan Hyundai Ioniq.
Great, that will do.
Make a memorable day.
What's the weather going to be like in vancouver on March 10th?
The forecast average is 68 degrees with a 25 per cent chance of rain.
Any good attractions in town?
I have 10 good options including Bloedel Conservatory, a city park.
Lovely! Can you book me a ride there?
Do you want a luxury or pool ride? How many people?
Just a normal ride please, book for 1.
Confirming you want to book a regular cab to Bloedel Conservatory for 1 person.
Yes thanks, whats the cost estimate?
Your ride has been booked and is on route. The cost is $24.15.
Great thanks so much.
Do you need anything else?
no that's all for now
Have a safe journey.
I need to check the weather on March 2nd in Long Beach, CA.
The average temperature is 77 degrees F with a 15 percent chance of rain.
How humid is it and windy?
The average wind speed should be 8 mph and humidity 35 %.
Sure that is fine. Can you show me attractions that are there?
Please check out the Aquarium of the Pacific a Nature Preserve.
Is the entrance to the attraction free and what is their phone number?
The phone number is 562-590-3100 and isn't free.
Cool, any other attractions you know of because I'd like something without an entry fee.
There would be 5 attractions of interest including Earl Burns Miller Japanese Garden a Park you should check out.
Okay that is great.
Is there anything else I could assist with?
Can you get me a cab going there?
What type of ride do you prefer? Could you take Pool or Regular or anything else?
I prefer a ride that is expensive.
What number of seats do you need?
I am a with a group of 1.
Please confirm details for a ride to Earl Burns Miller Japanese Garden 1 seat luxury.
Yes, that will work for me.
I booked the ride and the cab is coming.
Thanks so much for your help.
Could I assist you with anything else?
No, thanks so much for the help.
Have a nice day.
What is the weather like in London, UK on the 3rd?
The average temperature should be around 88 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be during the day?
The mile should be around 2 miles per hour and the humidity should be around 66 percent.
Can you find an attraction there?
There is 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin) it's a Historical Landmark.
Is this a child-friendly attraction?
Yes, It's a child-friendly place.
I would like a luxurious ride to get there we are 3 people.
You need a luxury ride to 30 St Mary Axe (The Gherkin) for 3 people.
I would prefer a regular ride instead for one person.
Booking 1 seat in a regular ride.
Yes, how long before the cab gets here and what is the cost?
The cab will be there in 2 minutes and the cost is $21.17.
Thank you for your help.
Can I help with something else?
No, that is all.
Have a good day.
I need to find out the weather.
What city would you like to check the weather in?
Let's check Anaheim, CA.
The average temperature for the day is expected to be 78 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 29 percent chance of rain.
Thank you. I would like to find something to do there. Can you show me some attractions in the area that are child-friendly, with no admission fee? Any type is fine.
There are 6 attractions that meet your criteria, including Angel Stadium of Anaheim, a Sports Venue.
What is the phone number?
The phone number is 714-940-2000.
OK, sounds great. Can you help me order a cab to get there?
What type of ride would you prefer, for example Pool or Luxury? How many seats do you need?
I prefer a Shared ride. We have a group of two.
You would like a car to Angel Stadium of Anaheim with 2 seats available in a Pool ride, is that correct?
Yes, that sounds great.
Your cab is booked and is on its way.
Thanks very much for your help! That's all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day!
Will you see what the weather is on March 9th?
In what city would you like me to find this?
Please look in Fresno, CA.
The day should have an average temperature of 93 degrees Fahrenheit. The chance of rain is 25 percent.
Can you tell me the humidity and how windy it will be that day?
The humidity will have a level of 27 percent and the wind will have average speeds of 5 miles per hour.
Alright, got it. Would you tell me about the attractions that have a natural spot?
There's 1 attraction you may like. The Fresno Chaffee Zoo is a Nature Preserve so you may really like it.
Right, sounds lovely.
Would you like me help with anything else?
Would you find me a cab that would take me there?
What is the number of seats and what is your ride preference?
There will only be 1 and I would like to have a shared ride.
You need a pool ride for 1 to the Fresno Chaffee Zoo. Is that correct?
Yep, that's correct. What will the price?
The ride will be a total charge of $13.19. The ride is reserved and heading your way.
I really appreciate all your help.
Do you need more assistance?
Nope, but thanks so much.
Enjoy this lovely day.
Tell me what the weather is like in Ciudad de Mexico.
It averages a temperature of 102 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
Oh fine. Are there any attractions in the area. I want to take my kids there and I would prefer a Museum.
I have a list of 10 attractions. I recommend the Arte Carrillo Gil Museum which is a Museum.
Fantastic. I want you to fetch me a cab for four people.
Is there a particular ride you prefer?
I want the cheapest ride.
So you would like a ride of 4 seats to the Arte Carrillo Gil Museum. Also you want a pool ride. Is that right?
Yep, sounds good. What is the price?
Your cab will be here soon as I have booked your ride. It will be a total of $32.86.
How much time will it take for the cab to get here?
You can count on the cab to here in 4 minutes.
Thanks very much, that will be all.
Have a great day!
I must verify the climate on the 3rd.
What metropolis would you like to verify the climate for?
It should be in Sydney, NSW.
The mean temperature for that day ought to be 101 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 4 percent probability of raining.
What will the wind speed be like?
The mean wind speed ought to be 2 mile per hour.
How much humidity will there be?
the humidity is expected to be near 17 percent.
Okay, fine. Could you tell me several attractions there? I am searching for a historical spot.
There is 1 attraction that may suit your tastes. You ought to check out Sydney Harbour Bridge, which is a historical landmark.
Alright, fine. Could you get me a cab to go there?
What sort of vehicle would you like? You may have regular, luxury, or something else.
I'd like the cheapest vehicle.
How many spots would you require?
There is one person in my group.
Please verify the following information: you'd like a ride to Sydney Harbour Bridge for a pool ride with 1 seat.
Yeah, that's fine with me. How long will the cab take to arrive, and what is the price?
I reserved ride and the taxi is coming. The taxi will arrive in about 8 minutes, and the price is $17.97.
Thank you for your assistane.
Could I assist you with something else?
Nope; thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
I need to find out what the weather will be on the day after tomorrow.
What city would you like the weather report for?
Please check Portland.
The average temperature for that day is expected to be 70 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 22 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy? And what is the humidity forecast?
The average wind speed is expected to be 5 miles per hour. The humidity is 10 percent.
OK, thank you.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
Yes, I would like to find out what there is to do there. What kind of attractions can you show me? Any type is okay.
There are 10 attractions in the area. Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden is a Park.
Does it seem to be a child-friendly location?
Yes, there are activities at the park for children.
Sounds good, can you help me get a cab to there? I would like a luxury ride and it is one person.
You would like a Luxury ride with 1 seat to Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden, is this correct?
Yes, that is right.
Your ride is booked and is on its way.
Thank you for your help. I'm all done for now.
Have a wonderful day!
Hi I'm hoping the weather is good in New Delhi on Wednesday next week. Can you check it for me?
It looks like the temperature that day should be around 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 0 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity expected to be?
The humidity should be about 15 percent.
Okay, good. What about some attractions? Please find me a shopping district.
I suggest you fo to Khan Market, it is a shopping area.
Sounds good to me. Please get me a cab for two people.
Do you have a ride preference? There's Pool, Luxury, etc.
I would like a pool ride.
So you want a ride for 2 people to Khan Market and you'd like a pool ride. Is this correct?
Sounds good. What will the cost be and when should I expect the cab to be here?
I booked the cab and it should arrive shortly, in about 5 minutes. The cost for the ride should be $13.77
Thank you so much for your help.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
That will be all, thank you again.
Have a great day!
I need to check weather for the 10th of this month.
In which city would you like to check in?
I wanna see for Portland, OR.
The average temp is expected to be 58 degrees Fahrenheit with a 25 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it gonna be?
The average wind speed is expected to be 4 MPH.
Humidity information for that day?
It is expected to have a humidity of 39 percent.
Thanks for that.
Yes, is there anything else to help with?
Is there any good places to visit?
There are 10 options, such as Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden, a park.
Okay, I need a cab for there.
Which type of ride would you like? There is Pool or Regular, and anything else. Seats in total?
I need an expensive one this time and have a group of 2.
So you would like a ride to Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden, and 2 seats as a Luxury ride?
Yes, indeed.
Your ride is now booked and cab is on the way.
Wow then, thanks for that!
Of course. Enjoy your safe travels.
I want to search weather on 4th of this month in Seattle, wa
The average temperature for the day should be 69 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 43 percent chance to rain
Great can you show me some attractions there
You should check out a park called alki beach park
Cool I prefer regular ride shall I get a cab to there
For how many seats do you need
Make it for 1
Please confirm the following you want to write to alki beach park and you prefer a regular ride for 1 seat
Correct that works with me
I booked your cap and it is on its way
What is its cost and how long before the cab reaches here
The cost is $21.14 for and the cab will reach in 4 minutes
Thanks a lot
Can I help you with anything more
No thanks for this
Have a great day
I need to check weather in Cloverdale on the 4th of march.
It'll be 71 degrees with a 24 % chance of rain.
How windy and humid will it be?
The wind speed will be 1 mph with a 26 % humidity.
How about Fresno, CA on the 10th?
It'll be 90 degrees with a 13 % chanc eof rain.
Cool. Can you show me some attractions there?
How about Blackbeard's Family Entertainment? It's a theme park.
is it free? What is their contact number?
559-292-9000, and it is free.
Cool, anything else?
There's the Christmas tree lane, a tourist attraction.
Great, I'd like to get a cab there. The cheapest possible for 3.
Please confirm: A pool cab ride for 3 to Christmas Tree Lane
Exactly. how much will it cost, and how long until it arrives?
It'll cost $23.54, and be there in 5 minutes.
Thank you.
Do you need anything else?
No thanks.
Have a good day!
I want to know what the weather would be like in Sydney, Australia on the 2nd.
The estimated temperature for that day is 101 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rainfall.
Great. What fun places can I visit when I get there?
There are 10 sites that might appeal to you. There is the ANZ stadium, which is a sports venue.
I do not really like sports. Is there anything else which doesn't have an entrance fee?
There is a museum called Australian National Maritime Museum.
Would my kids find the place cool? May I have a contact number?
The number is 2 9298 3777 and your kids would have a good time there.
Ok. I want a cab to get there.
What kind of ride would you like?
A luxury ride.
How may seats?
Just two seats.
You would like 2 seats on a Luxury ride to the Australian National Maritime Museum?
Yes, I would.
I have made the reservation and the cab should arrive shortly.
Thanks very much.
Anything else you need assistance with?
No, that would be all.
Enjoy your day.
Could you tell me what the weather will be on March 9th?
And what location are you interested in?
For Seattle, Wa
The average for today is 64 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 14 percent chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
The wind should be about 5 miles per hour.
Will it be humid?
Expect it to be 13 percent.
Great, how about some attractions?
How about Alki Beach Park. That's a Park.
Do they charge for admission? Would be good for kids?
It's great for kids and there is a charge.
Anything else ?
Take a look at Bill Speidel's Underground Tour. It's a Tourist Attraction.
Please order a cab to take me there.
Do you want that to be Luxury or Regular or another type. For how many people.
Get me an Expensive ride. There's just me. So order one.
To confirm: You need 1 Luxury seat on Bill Speidel's Underground Tour.
Great. How much will they charge. How long before it gets here?
That's booked for 11 minutes from now and will cost $34.79.
Thanks, I appreciate that.
Will there be anythin else?
No, that's great. Thanks
Take care now.
I'd like to know the weather forecast for the 4th of this month.
What city do you need the forecast for?
The forecast for Seattle Washington.
The average temperature for Seattle for the 4th of this month will be 69 degree Fahrenheit with a 43 percent chance of precipitation.
Okay. I want to see some attractions in Seattle.
There are 10 listings for attractions. You may like Alki Beach Park. It is a family park.
Okay. What else is there that's kid-friendly. Maybe something unusual?
There is a tourist attraction, Bill Speidel's Underground Tour.
Okay. What about another one?
There is a museum, the Burke Museum of Natural History and Culture.
Is there a ticket cost for the museum? What is the telephone number?
The entry to the museum is free and the telephone number is 206-685-3861.
Okay. I would like a cab to go to the Burke Museum of Natural History and Culture.
How many passengers will there be?
It's just for me, so 1.
Do you want a regular ride, pool ride, luxury ride or something else?
I think I would just like the regular ride.
Okay. Please confirm the following information. You want a regular ride for 1 to the Burke Museum of Natural History and Culture.
Yes. How much is that going to cost and when will it get here?
The cab has been booked and should arrive in 5 to 8 minutes. The cost will be $16.80.
Great. Thanks. That's all I need for right now.
Enjoy your day at the museum.
Tell me what the weather is.
What city shall I search for?
Tell me the weather in New Delhi.
Today's average temperature is 99 degrees with a 4 percent chance of precipitation.
What is the humidity level?
The average humidity is 21 perent.
I see. What fun things are there to do there?
Adventure Island is a Theme Park and is one of 10 attractions that search found.
Will kids like it and what is their contact number?
Kids will love it and you can contact them at 83770 02902.
I see. I need a ride for two people to get there.
Do you prefer a Regular, Luxury, or some other type of ride?
Book me a Luxurious cab.
You want a Luxury cab for 2 people to Adventure Island, correct?
That is right.
Your ride is confirmed and is coming for you right now.
What is the total cost and my wait time?
The total cost is $27.80 and your ride will be there in 12 minutes.
Thanks a bunch. That is everything for now.
Have a great day.
I would like to know what the weather in Vancouver, BC is like today.
It will be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 % chance of rain.
Will it be windy?
around 8 miles per hour.
That is good. Now I fancy going somewhere. Can you help me to find a free attraction?
There is a Park called Dr. Sun Yat-Sen Classical Chinese Garden.
Sounds fab. I want a cab there, preferably a Pool ride.
How many seats do you require?
Just the one.
To confirm then that is a cab for 1, preferably a Pool ride to Dr. Sun Yat-Sen Classical Chinese Garden.
That all sounds good. How much will it cost and how long will it take to reach me.
the booking is confirmed and it will be with you in round 3 minutes. The total cost is $6.56.
thank you for your assistance.
Anything else you need?
no that is all thanks again.
have a lovely day.
I want to check about the weather condition in Atlanta. Do you check for me?
Yes, Please note that the temperature will be 86 degree Fahrenheit in average and the chance of rain will be at 28 percent.
Also let me know about the Wind speed and Humidity.
45 percent of Humidity and wind speed is will be 11 miles per hour in average. Hope this information useful to you.
Thanks for your information. I want to visit some attractive places there and I need your help to search for the best one.
Got 10 results and what about your decision to visit a place of Worship like Al-Farooq Masjid?
That is great. I want to go there for which I need to book a Cab with normal ride.
Let me know the number of seats required by you to book the same.
I need only one seat.
I need your confirmation to book 1 seat in a Cab with regular ride to Al-Farooq Masjid.
That is correct to proceed and let me know the cost details for that ride.
The total cost will be $24.80 for that ride and your Cab was booked and the same will reach you soon.
Thank you so much. That's all I want now.
Have a good day.
Tell me what the weather is in Phoenix, AZ.
The average temperature is 89 degrees with a 15 percent chance of precipitation.
I see. What is there to do around there?
Arizona Capitol Museum is under the Museum category and is a nice place to see.
Would kids like it?
Yes, kids would enjoy it.
That is perfect. I need a ride for four people to get there.
What type of ride do you want?
Get me a Pool ride.
You want a Pool ride for 4 people to Arizona Capitol Museum, correct?
That is right.
Your ride is confirmed and is coming for you right now.
Thanks a bunch. That is everything for now.
Have a good day.
I have to check the weather on next Wednesday.
What city do you wish to check the weather for?
I need for NYC.
The average temperature for the day is 64 degrees F with a 26 % chance of rain.
Sure that is fine. Will you show me some attractions there?
There will be 10 attractions that interest you. You can check out 9/11 Tribute Museum a museum.
Okay that is great. Will you get me a cab to go there?
What type of ride will you prefer, a luxury or regular or anything else?
I prefer pool rides.
What number of seats do you need?
I am in a group with 2.
Please confirm details that you want a ride to 9/11 Tribute Museum for 2 seats preferring a pool ride.
Yes, that will work for me.
I booked the ride and the cab is on its way.
Thanks for the help. That's all that is needed.
Have a nice day.
I need to know something about the weather. Give me the forecast for March 8th in Chi-town please.
There is a warm temperature of 72 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you also tell me about how humid and windy it will be that day?
There humidity will hover around 31 percent on March 8th. The wind speed is estimated to be 8 miles per hour.
Thank you. That's all I need to know about weather. Moving on, I want to know about attractions in Chicago. I'm not too familiar with the area.
There are many attractions in Chicago. I have narrowed the choices down to 10. To start with, you should consider a Tourist Attraction called 360 CHICAGO.
Sounds quite interesting. I don't want to drive there though. Can you find me a Pool ride there?
How many seats do you wish for me to reserve?
Oh just a group of 1. That should suffice.
Please tell me if I have the right details. You want a 1 seat Pool ride to 360 Chicago. Is that right?
Yep. That's what I'm looking for.
I have successfully booked your ride and the cab is on its way now.
Awesome. Thank you for your help as always.
How can I further assist you today?
That's all the help I need. You've been a big help.
In that case, enjoy the rest of your day.
I need a weather check
What city?
Vancouver please
Today's average is 75 degrees with a 15 per cent chance of rain.
Any good attractions in Vancouver?
I have 10 options including Bloedel Conservatory, a city park.
Cool. Can you book me a taxi, just for 1 please.
Are you after a pool or regular ride?
Get me the most comfortable ride.
Confirming you want to book a luxury ride for 1 to Bloedel Conservatory.
Yep all good
I have booked your ride and the taxi is on the way
Thanks so much, that's it for now
Have a safe journey.
Could you show me the weather for Philadelphia on the 13th of this month?
It'll be 86 degrees in Philadelphia with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Great. Could you show me some attracions? Preferably a free, child friendly museum.
How about the National Constitution Center? it's a museum.
Cool, anything else?
The Philadelphia museum of art is a museum.
Cool, can you get me a cab there?
How many seats do you need? What type of ride? You can do regular or luxury or anything else.
I prefer the most comfortable ride for two.
Please confirm: You want a ride to Philadelphia museum of art for 2 in a luxury ride.
Yes, how much does it cost?
It's en route, it will cost $47.38
Thank you for your help.
Do you need anything else?
NO, thank you for your help.
Have a wonderful day.
What's the weather forecast for Mexico City on March 1st?
The expected average temperature for the day is 102 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 0 percent chance of rain.
What about the expected wind speed?
12 miles per hour winds are expected.
And the expected humidity?
15 percent humidity is expected.
Okay, thanks. Could you also check the forecast for 7th of March?
Sure. The expected average temperature for the day is 93 degrees Fahrenheit, with a 6 percent chance of rain.
Cool! Thanks. Now please help me find some attractions there, preferably a Park.
I found the Bosque de Chapultepec Park.
All right, good! I'd actually like to check it out today! Please find me a cab for 2 going there, preferably a Luxury ride.
Please confirm that you'd like 2 Luxury ride seats in a cab going to Bosque de Chapultepec.
That is correct.
I have successfully booked your cab and it should be here shortly.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. That will be all.
Have a great day.
Will you check the weather in ATL on 7th of March?
Average temperature is 83 degrees Fahrenheit with 26 percent chance of rain.
Humidity and wind speed?
Average wind speed is 9 miles per hour with humidity around 45 percent.
Cool. Will you find attractions there?
Found Al-Farooq Masjid, a Place of Worship.
Free entry? Their phone number?
You may reach them at 678-886-3457. Entry is free.
Fantastic. Will you reserve a shared ride for 2 to go there?
Confirm a Pool ride for 2 to Al-Farooq Masjid.
Great. When does the cab get here?
I've booked your cab. Expect it in 7 minutes.
Cost of the ride?
$13.00 for the ride.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a great day.
I want to check the weather on March 1st in NY.
The average temperature for the day is 66 degrees F with a 37 % chance of rain.
How windy will it be and humid?
The average wind speed will be 12 mph and humidity 41 %.
Sure that is fine. Please show me some attractions there.
There would be 10 attractions of interest including the 9/11 Tribute Museum which is a museum.
Okay, that is good can you get me a shared cab ride for two?
Please confirm these details that you want a ride to the 9/11 tribute Museum for 2 seats with a pool ride.
Yes, that will work for me. What does it cost?
I booked the cab and it is on its way for a cost of $13.38.
Thanks for the help. That is all I need.
Have a nice day.
Hey, can you check for me how's the weather gonna be in Washington D.C. on Thursday next week?
It should be 81 degrees Fahrenheit with a 20 percent chance of rain.
And how humid?
At around 27 percent.
And how windy?
The wind speed should be around 2 miles per hour.
Good to know.
Anything else I can do for you?
Can you check if there'll be occurring any child friendly attractions over there then?
The 56 Signers of the Declaration of Independence Memorial is a nature preserve that's always there.
Any other attraction, like a place of interest?
There's 1 other tourist attraction. The Madame Tussauds Washington DC.
Do they charge an entrance fee? What's their phone number?
They don't charge an entrance fee and their number is 202-942-7300.
Great, good to know.
Can I help you further?
Can you help me find a cab going there?
How many will be going and what type of ride do you prefer? Regular or luxury?
A luxury ride for one would be great.
So 1 luxury ride going to Madame Tussauds Washington DC?
Yes, that's it.
Your cab is booked and on the way.
Thanks a lot for the help.
Can I do anything else for you?
No, thanks a lot.
Have an amazing day.
Check for me the weather on 13th of March in Pinole.
For the day the average temperature should be 84 degrees Fahrenheit and 18 percent of rain.
Tell me how windy will be?
Average wind speed should be 9 miles per hour.
How much humidity will be?
Around 29 percent.
Good.In Ciudad de Mexico how will be?
For the day the average temperature should be 91 degrees Fahrenheit and 8 percent of rain.
Good.Some attractions there you can show me?
I found 10 attractions you might like.You can check out a Nature Preserve called Acuario Inbursa.
Good.Get for me a cab to go there.I want a Cheapest ride and I am part for a group of 4.
You want a Pool ride for with 4 seats to Acuario Inbursa.Is okay?
No.I am part of a group of one.
You want 1 seats at a ride to Acuario Inbursa.I'm right?
No.I want a Regular ride.
You want a Regular ride to Acuario Inbursa.Confirm me please.
That's good.In how much time will arrive the cab?
Your ride was booked and the cab is on its way, should arrive in 4 minutes.
Thank you a lot.That;s all that I wanted.
Have a good day!
Can you get me the weather for the 11th of March?
Sure. For what city?
For the ATL.
The average temperature should be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 0 percent chance of rain.
Okay. Can you find me some local attractions?
You might like Al-Farooq Masjid. It is a Place of Worship.
Can you get me the phone number?
You can reach them at 678-886-3457.
Great. Can you find me a cab to get there?
Do you have a ride preference?
I prefer the Cheapest ride.
How many seats will you be needing?
I have a group of three.
Can you confirm the following: you need a Pool ride with 3 seats to Al-Farooq Masjid.
Yes, that works.
I have successfully booked your ride. Your cab is on its way.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need help with anything else?
No. Thanks a lot.
You're welcome. Have a wonderful day!
I need to check the weather in Portland please
It's gonna be 75 degrees with a 9 percent chance of rain
OK great, now help me find a park to visit there
There are 8 including a park called the Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden
OK cool, can you book me a cab there?
How many people are you with
It'll be 2 of us
Do you prefer any kind of ride?
Yes, a luxury ride please!
Confirming your 2 luxury seats headed to Crystal Springs Rhododendron Garden?
Yes confirm that
It's confirmed and on the way
Thanks so much for your assistance
Can I assist with anything else?
No that's all for now
Sure, enjoy your visit to the garden!
I need to check weather for tomorrow please.
In which city?
In Oakley please.
The average temp is set to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 3 percent chance of rain.
he What about on the 9th of this month in Sacramento?
The temp is to be 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 23 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it?
The average wind speed is 9 MPH.
How humid is it to be?
The humidity is to be 31 percent.
Okay, I need attractions.
You should see California State Capitol Museum, a Museum.
Would you say it is child friendly? What is the attraction fee?
No, this place is not good for kids. Yes entry is free.
Okay, I need a cab to go there, a shared ride in a group of two.
So, a ride to California State Capitol Museum. 2 Seats and a Pool ride?
No, I actually want a Regular one in a group of 1.
So 1 seat in a Regular riode?
Yes, and how long before the cab arrives?
Your ride is now booked with the cab en route to your location, and it is expected in 3 minutes.
Thanks so much for all that!
Of course. Have a safe ride.
Please update me on the weather.
Certainly. Name the city for which you wish to know the forecast.
Oh I forgot to say. I want to know about weather in Phoenix.
Phoenix will have an average temperature of 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I needed to know the weather because I plan on visiting an attraction there. Please help me find attractions that are child-friendly.
There is a museum that children may enjoy. It is called Arizona Capitol Museum.
Okay that can work. Thanks for that info.
Sure. I can help you with more if you still require assistance.
I'll be needing a ride to get there. Find me a cab.
Before I find your ride, how many seats do you need? Would you prefer a Pool or Regular or something entirely different?
If you can, find me a shared ride for a group of 1.
Finding a Pool ride for 1 person to Arizona Capitol Museum. Is that acceptable?
Oh yeah that's fine. What's the cost? Oh and when will it be here?
The cost of the cab is $11.51. The cab is on the way now and should arrive within 8 minutes.
You make things so much easier. Thanks so much.
Anytime. What else can I help you with?
Nothing. That's all I'll be needing for the moment. Once again, thank you.
Please enjoy the rest of your day. See you next time.
May I see my alarms please?
Yes, you have 2 current alarms. There is a 7:30 AM alarm titled wake up.
Thank you very much.
Would you like to set a new alarm?
No, thank you. I'd like to find a restaurant though.
In what location and what kind of cuisine would you like?
I'd like a restaurant in SF, some place with Irish food.
I recommend Johnny Foley's Irish House in San Francisco.
Do they have vegetarian dishes and patio dining?
I'm sorry, they don't have vegetarian dishes nor do they have patio dining.
That's fine. I'd also like to book a car please, something I can pick up from Union Plaza. I'm thinking of an SUV.
When would you like to get the car and Start the rental and until what date will you need it?
I'd like to pick it up in the morning 9:30. I'll need it from next Thursday until the 11th.
Would you like to purchase insurance for the vehicle?
No, that's OK.
Confirming rental of an SUV with pick up from Union Plaza on March 7th at 9:30 AM and returning March 11th. The vehicle will not include insurance.
That's good, thank you. What kind of car is it?
The car is a GMC Terrain and the reservation is complete.
Thanks, I need to share the location as well. With John please.
What is the address you want to share? Is it 243 O'Farrell Street, union Plaza or a different address?
Yes, the address is 243 O'Farrell Street.
Confirming location sharing of 243 O'Farrell Street with John.
That's right, thank you.
The location has been shared.
Great, I guess that's everything.
Have a wonderful day.
Hey. Show me my alarms.
You currently have 2 alarms set. There is one set for 9 am with the name Get up.
What's the other alarm?
It's for 4:30 pm with the name Busy.
That's what I thought. Can you find me a restaurant to eat at?
Certainly. But first i'll need to know in which location should I look, and would you prefer any particular type of food?
Yes. Find me someplace serving Peruvian cuisine in Burlingame.
I've found 1 restaurant that matches your criteria. How about Limon Rotisserie Burlingame in Burlingame?
Yes I've heard of that place. Can you secure me a rental ride there?
I can, but first i'll need a bit of information. Where would you like to pick the car up, and how long will you want it for? Also would you like a Sedan, SUV, or something else?
A Hatchback is always nice. Let me pick it up at the Dulles International Airport, and I'll need it till the 8th of this month.
Would you like to add insurance? Also when would you like to pick the car up?
I don't need any insurance, and I want to pick it up at half past 9 in the morning on the 5th of this month.
You would like to reserve a hatchback rental car from Dulles International Airport from March 5th at 9:30 am until March 8th. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct. Does it say the cars name, or how much the car will cost per day?
The car has been reserved for you. The name of the car is a Fiat Panda and it costs $26.00 per day.
Great, thank you for the help. Can you share the location with Grace?
Which address would you like to share? 1101 Burlingame Avenue, Dulles International Airport, or something else?
Share Dulles International Airport with her so she knows where to pick the car up.
You would like to share the location Dulles International Airport with Grace. Is that correct?
Yes that is correct, go for it.
The location has been shared.
Awesome. You've been super helpful and I appreciate.
I'm always glad to help out. Let me know if you need anything else and I'll be here.
Can you show me my alarms?
You have 1 alarm set. It is for 4 pm and called, pick up kids.
Okay that is good.
Do you want to add one?
No. I want to find a restaurant in Milpitas.
What kind of restaurant.
Find something with Coffee & light bites.
What about Honey Thai Restaurant in Milpitas.
What is the phone number?
The number is 408-719-8200.
Yeah that sounds good.
Would you like a table there.
No, I want a car.
Whan do you want the car rental and do you need insurance.
I don't need insurance thanks. I want the car from 11th of this month.
What time are you able to pick up the car? And What car do you want?
A hatchback would be good. I need to pick it up at half past 10 in the morning. I want to rent it until March 12th.
Where do you want to pick it up from?
From Kuala Lumpur International Airport.
Okay let's confirm the details/ You want to pick up a car from Klia International Airport on March 11th at 10:30 am and drop it off on March 12th. The car will be a Hatchback and there will be no insurance.
Yeah that's perfect.
I have reserved your car.
What is the name of the car?
It is a Fiat Panda.
Thanks for your help.
Can I help you with something else?
Can you share my location?
Who with? Which address do you want me to share? 57 North Milpitas Boulevard, KLIA International Airport or somewhere else?
KLIA International Airport, yes. Please share it with Mary.
Okay let's confirm the detail. KLIA International Airport shared with Mary.
Sounds great.
You've just shared that location.
Thanks you have been really helpful.
Have a nice day.
I want to view my list of alarms. Can you show it now?
Yes, You have an alarm for 5 pm in the name of Meeting.
That's okay. I want to take my meals outside and I need your help to find a restaurant.
Let me know your interested type of food to search for the restaurants which is serving the same.
I like Korean Hot pot.
Where do you want to search for the restaurants?
Find the one in Oakland.
I got 3 places. What about the one named Azit in Oakland?
This is okay to me.
Do you want to book a table at this restaurant now?
I will ask it later. Now, find me a car in Hatchback model for the final date March 7th.
What is your starting date and place of travel?
Find me the one from 2nd of March at PHL International Airport.
What is your convenient time to pick up the car and also let me know your opinion to book it with insurance.
I don't need insurance for this booking and I want the car from Tuesday Next week and for the time afternoon 12:30. Please change your searching process accordingly.
Okay, I need your confirmation once again to book a Hatchback model car available at PHL International Airport from March 5th for the time 12:30 pm up to March 7th without insurance.
That is confirmed. I want to know the name of this car.
It is SEAT Leon and the same was booked successfully.
That's great. What is the total cost per day?
It is $25.00 for one day.
That's okay. Now, please help me to share the location now.
Do you want to share the address 4390 Telegraph Avenue A or PHL International Airport and to whom do you want to share the same?
I want to share the location PHL International Airport with Nicholas.
I need your confirmation to share PHL International Airport with Nicholas
That is correct to proceed.
Your location was shared successfully.
Thanks so much.
How can I help you further?
No, thanks for all.
Have a great day.
Can you show me the alarms that I currently have set?
There is currently only 1 alarm set. This alarm is named Event and set for 4 pm.
Ah thanks for reminding me. I appreciate it.
Can I be of help with anything else today?
While i'm there, I'll be needing a place to grab a bite to eat. Find a restaurant for me.
Find a restaurant in what location?
Look for something average priced in the Pinole area please.
Please tell me about the type of food you wish to eat.
I'd like to eat at a restaurant serving Szcheuan meals.
There are 2 restaurants located in the Pinole area servinc Szcheuan cuisine. One of them is China House Restaurant.
That sounds like a good place to eat.
Id'be happy to reserve a table for your here.
I appreciate it but no thank you.
Do you require assistance with anything else?
Set up a car reservation for me in the same location.
How long will you be renting the car and where is the pick-up location?
I'll be pick it up on March 6th and keep the car until March 11th. The pick-up location is Downtown.
I have the pick-up location. Please provide the pick-up time for me as well. Lastly, indicate whether or not you want insurance.
The pick-up time for the rental vehicle should be afternoon 1:30. I won't be needing insurance for the rental car.
So I can find the correct vehicle for your needs, tell me if you'd like a Sedan, SUV, or another vehicle?
I'd like to drive a Hatchback while I'm there.
Confirm the rental information that follows: Picking up a Hatchback vehicle from Downtown on March 6th at 1:30 PM. This car has insurance. The return date for the vehicle is March 11th.
That sounds right to me. What is the rental car's name?
Your reservation for a rental car is confirmed. The car is a Renault Clio.
I want you to share this location for me. The address to be shared will be 1971 San Pablo Avenue.
It'll be my pleasure to share the location for you. Who will you be sharing it with?
I want to share that address with Kenneth please.
In the process of sharing the location of 1971 San Pablo Avenue with Kenneth. Shall I complete this action?
That sounds good to me.
Your requested location has successfully been shared with Kenneth.
Perfect. Thank you for being so helpful.
What else can I have the pleasure of assisting you with?
You've done more than enough to help me. That's all for now. Thank you.
You are very welcome. Have a lovely day today!
Show me my alarms.
You have 2 alarms. You have an alarm for Coffee at 7 am.
Ok thank you for checking.
Would you like to add an alarm?
Not at the moment.
Can I help you with something else?
I would like to find a restaurant.
What type of food are you wanting and in what city?
I would like Japanese food in Livermore.
There is Kawa Sushi located in Livermore.
What is their phone number and are they affordable?
Their phone number is 925-606-7222 and they are moderate priced.
Thank you for the information.
Can I help with something else?
I would like to rent a car.
When do you want to pick up the car and from which location?
I would like to pick up the car downtown at 10 am and I don't need insurance.
Would you like a SUV, Sedan or other car?
I would like a Hatchback until the 13th of this month.
When do you want the rental to start?
I would like to get it from the 10th of March.
Booking Hatchback from Downtown on March 10th at 10 am until March 13th.
I would like a sedan instead.
Booking a Sedan car instead.
How much does it cost per day?
The cost is $32.00 per day.
Can you share location of 2180 Third Street.
Who would you like to share location with?
I would like to share with William.
Sharing 2180 Third Street with William.
Yes, that sounds good.
You have shared your location.
That was helpful thank you.
Can I help with something else?
No, that is all I needed.
Have a good day.
What alarms do I have?
I found an alarm for 8 am with name Commute.
Ok, that sounds right.
Did you want to add another alarm?
No, not right now. I'd also like to find a restaurant there.
Where did you want me to look in?
I'd like something in San Jose.
What type of food were you looking for?
I'd like something Cambodian.
I found 10 restaurants for you. Erawan Thai Cuisine is a nice restaurant in San Jose.
That sounds good. I'd like to book a car there.
When did you want to start the rental?
I'd like it starting Wednesday next week.
When did you want to pick the car up?
I'd like to pick it up at 10:30.
Did you want SUV, Sedan, or something else? Where did you want to pick up the car and until when did you need it?
I'm looking for a Hatchback. I'd like to pick it up at Intercity Terminal and I will need it till the 10th.
Did you wish to add insurance?
I will not need insurance.
Please confirm you're picking up a Hatchback car from Intercity Terminal on March 6th at 10:30 am and dropping it off on March 10th.
Yes, that is correct.
Your car has been booked.
Could you help me share the location?
Who did you want to share it with and what address: 5945 Almaden Expressway #150, Intercity Terminal, or something else?
I'd like to share 5945 Almaden Expressway #150 with Judy.
Please confirm you're sharing 5945 Almaden Expressway #150 with Judy.
That is correct.
The location has been shared.
Thank you, that was helpful. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
What alarms do I have?
You have one called Get Up for 6 am.
Okay, cool.
Do you want a new alarm?
Not right now. Find me a restaurant there.
What locations should I look in?
Find restaurants that sell Fish in Walnut Creek.
Andy's Sushi is a good restaurant in Walnut Creek.
Is outdoor seating available?
There is no outdoor seating.
Could you tell me their phone number?
The phone number is 925-378-7924.
Sounds good.
Do you need help with something else?
Find me a car there.
Would you like insurance? What time will you pick up the car?
Pick it up at 09:00. Purchase insurance for me.
When and where will you pick up the rental? Do you like Sedan, Hatchback or anything else?
I'd like to pick up a Hatchback at Galeao International Airport on March 4th.
When will you return it?
I will return it the 7th.
Could you confirm that you are picking up the Hatchback car at Galeao International Airport on March 4th at 9 am and returning it on March 7th?
Sounds good. What sort of car is it?
It's a Kia Ceed. Your reservation has bee made.
Thank you for helping. Please share the location.
Who do you want to share the location with? You would like to share the address 1690 Locust Street?
Yep. Share it with Donald.
Please confirm that I should share 1690 Locust Street with Donald.
Yes, right.
The location has been shared successfully.
Thanks. That was a good help. That's it for now.
Enjoy your day.
Show me the alarms I have set.
There is an alarm named Wake up that is set for 8:30 am.
Okay, good. I would like to find a restaurant there in SFO.
What type of food are you interested in?
I want a place that serves Asian and I need vegetarian options.
Bai Thong Thai is a nice restaurant that is located in San Francisco.
Yes, that is good. I would like to reserve a car there to be picked up on March 12th and I need it until March 14th.
Would you like to add insurance?
No, I don't need the insurance.
What type of car would you like to get?
I want to pick it up in Clayton Valley. A hatchback would be nice.
What time would you like to pick the car up?
I would like to pick the car up at 6:30 pm.
Please confirm these details: You want to pick up the car from Clayton Valley om March 12th at 6:30 pm and drop it off on March 14th. This car is a hatchback and doesn't come with insurance.
Yes that sounds fine. What is the cost of the car per day?
Your car is reserved at a cost of $24.00 per day.
Oh, can you share the location? I want to share with Noah the address 298 Gough Street.
Okay, can you confirm these details? You want to share with Noah the location 298 Gough Street.
No, the address I would like to share is Clayton Valley.
Confirm these details: You are sharing with Noah the location Clayton Valley.
No, I want to share the location with Charles.
Okay, confirm these details for me: You will share with Charles the location Clayton Valley.
Yes, that sounds fine.
The location has been successfully shared.
Thank you. That is very helpful. That was all I needed for now.
Have a wonderful day!
What alarms do I have set?
You have Wake up, set for 9 am.
All right, cool.
Would you like to set another alarm?
No, I don't want to set another alarm right now.
Would you like my help with anything else?
Yes, please search for restaurants in that area.
Sorry I didn't understand your request. Please tell me the city I should search in.
Sorry. Please search for Italian restaurants in SFO.
Sure. I found a nice San Francisco known as 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano.
Could you tell me the restaurant's user rating? Also find out if they offer vegetarian dishes.
They are rated around 4.4 stars, and offer a good selection of vegetarian dishes.
Cool, that's great. Please reserve me a car in that area.
No problem. Please tell me your preferred car type, and pick-up and drop-off dates.
I'd like to pick up an SUV at 2 o'clock in the afternoon and drop it off on Friday next week.
what's your preferred pick-up location? Would you like to buy insurance?
Yes, please add insurance. I'd like to pick it up at Sacramento Valley Station.
Okay. What's your preferred pick-up date and time?
I'd like to pick it up next Wednesday at 4 pm.
All right. Please confirm that you'd like to pick an SUV from Sacramento Valley Station on March 6th at 4 pm. and drop it off on March 8th.
No. I'd actually like to pick it at Heathrow Airport. There's been a change of plans and I'll be travelling. My drop-off date is 7th of March
All right, no problem. Please confirm that you'd like to pick up the car from Heathrow International Airport and drop it off on March 7th.
Yes, that is correct. The car make and model, please? And what's the daily cost?
I have successfully reserved your car. The car is a GMC Terrain. The daily cost is $55.00.
Wait, I'd like to share the address.
Please tell me the location you want to share. You can say 16 Mint Plaza, Heathrow International Airport or something else.
Please share the 16 Mint Plaza address with Alan.
All right. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You want to share the 16 Mint Plaza address with Alan.
Yes, that is correct.
Address successfully shared.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Will there be anything else?
No. Thank you very much. You've been very helpful.
Have a great day!
What alarms do I have set?
You have 1 alarm named Errands and it is set for 3:30 pm.
I see. I need a place to eat at.
What city shall I look in?
Find a place in Napa.
What type of food do you like?
Search for something under the Burger category.
Brix Restaurant And Gardens is in Napa and is 1 of 10 results that search found.
What is the venue location?
They are located at 7377 Saint Helena Highway.
Are their prices economical.
No, they are a pricey place.
That is perfect.
Shall I book a reservation for you?
No, but I do need you to get me a rental car.
When will you pick up and drop off the car?
I will pick it up on March 9th and return it on the 13th.
Do you have a car preference and do you need insurance? What time do you wish to get it?
I want to pick up a nice SUV without insurance from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.
What time are you getting it?
I wish to get it at morning 10:30.
You wish to get a SUV without insurance on March 9th at 10:30 am from Seattle-Tacoma International Airport and wish to return it on March 13th, correct?
That is right. What is the name of the car and the daily cost?
Your Suzuki Grand Vitara is reserved and the daily price is $47.00.
Share the location of 7377 Saint Helena Highway for me.
Who should I send the location to?
Send the location to Logan.
You wish to share 7377 Saint Helena Highway with Logan, correct?
That is right.
Your location is now shared with him.
Thanks for the help.
Do you need something more?
No, not right now. Thanks for the help.
Have a pleasant day.
Please show me my alarms.
There is an alarm at 8 am named Wake up.
Okay that is good. I want to find a restaurant there.
What location should I search?
Please look for restaurants in San Jose.
What type of food are you looking for?
I would like something serving Asian Fusion.
I have 10 restaurants you might like including China Garden Restaurant a nice restaurant in San Jose.
Yes, that would be good.
Do you want to reserve a table here?
No, thanks I would like to reserve a car there.
Until when would you want the car and do you want to add insurance? When would you want the car rental started?
I need the car rental from the 12th of March. I need to purchase insurance and need it until March 14th.
What time would you want to pick up the car?
I would like to pick it up 9:15 in the morning.
Where would you like to pick up the car? Would you like Hatchback, Sedan, or something else?
An SUV would be good and Sunnyvale Caltrain Station would be convenient for me to pick it up.
Please confirm details that you are picking up the car from Sunnyvale Caltrain Station March 12th at 9:15 am and dropping off March 14th an SUV with insurance.
No, I'd like to pick it up 9:30 am.
Please confirm details you are picking up the car from Sunnyvale Caltrain Station at 9:30 am.
Yes, that sounds nice. What does it cost daily?
The car has been reserved for $48.00 per day.
What is the name of the car?
The car is called Mazda CX-5.
Thanks for the help. Could you share the location address of 1890 West San Carlos Street.
Who do you wish to share it with?
I would like to share it with Anthony.
Please confirm details to share the location as 1890 West San Carlos Street with Anthony.
That sounds good to me.
You have successfully shared your location.
Thanks, you've been helpful and that is all I need for now.
Have a great day.
Please show me my alarms.
You have 3 alarms set one for 8:30 am with the name get up.
Okay that is great. I would like to find a restaurant there.
What type of food are you seeking?
Please find something serving Southern.
What location should I search?
Please locate restaurants in San Fran.
I have 10 restaurants you might like including 1760 a nice restaurant located in San Francisco.
Tell me the address.
The street address is 1760 Polk Street.
What is the user rating and phone number of the restaurant?
The user rating is around 4.4 and the phone number is 415-359-1212.
Yes, that is great. I'd like to reserve a car that is a nice sedan there.
What time would you like to pick up the car and when do you want to start the rental? Where would you like to pick up the car?
I would like to pick it up at morning 10. Lawrence Station is convenient for me to pick it up as I need it the 3rd.
Would you like to add insurance and until when do you want the car?
I would like to buy insurance and need it until next Tuesday.
Please confirm details that you are picking up the car from Lawrence station March 3rd at 10 am and drop-off date is March 5th for a sedan car with insurance.
Yes, that is sounding good. How much is the cost for the day and the car's name?
The car has been reserved costing $44.00 per day for the Skoda Octavia.
Oh, will you share the location with the address of 1760 Polk Street and can you share it with Juan.
Please confirm details to share the location 1760 Polk Street with Juan.
That sounds good.
You have successfully shared the location.
Thanks that is very helpful.
Will there be something else I can help with?
No thank you that was pretty helpful.
Have a great day.
Please show me my alarms.
There is an alarm at 5 pm with the name busy.
Okay that is good.
Would you like to add an alarm.
No, I don't want to make any new alarms now.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
I would like to find a restaurant there serving Izakaya. I'm seeking a restaurant tagged pricey for price.
What location should I look in?
Please find restaurants in Oakland.
I have 1 restaurant you might like called Delage a nice restaurant located in Oakland.
What is the phone number and are there vegetarian options on the menu?
They don't have any vegetarian options and their phone number is 510-823-2050.
Yes, that will be good.
Do you want to reserve a table here?
No thank you.
Will you help me with anything else?
I would like to reserve a car there.
Until when will you want the car.
I need it until the 12th.
Will you want to add insurance and what kind of car do you like?
I would like a hatchback which is nice and I'd like to buy insurance.
Where would you like to pick up the car and at what time?
I would like to pick up the car at 12:00 at JFK International Airport a convenient location.
When do you wish to start the car rental?
I need it starting March 7th.
Please confirm details that you are picking up the car fro JFK International Airport with a pickup date of March 7th at 12 pm and drop off March 12th for a hatchback car coming with insurance.
No, I'd like to pick it up at 6 o'clock in the evening.
Please confirm details that you'd like to pick up at 6 pm a hatchback car.
Yes, that will sound good.
The car is reserved.
Thanks for the help. Will you share the location address of JFK International Airport with Joe.
Please confirm details to share location of JFK international Airport with Joe.
That sounds good.
You have successfully shared the location.
Thanks this is helpful and all I need for now.
Have a great day.
I'd like to review my alarms.
You have 3 alarms that are currently set with one named Exercise for 8 am.
Thanks! Can you find me a restaurant?
Are you looking for a specific cuisine?
I'd like something that offers Taiwanese cuisine.
In which location would you like to dine?
Find me the ones in Palo Alto.
There are 5 restaurants in Palo Alto, that you might like and Chef Zhao Kitchen is a nice one among them.
Do they have outdoor seating?
Sorry, they don't.
Can you get me their user rating?
The restaurant has a user rating of around 4.2.
Can you find me more restaurants?
Jing-jing Szechwan & Hunan Gourmet is a nice restaurant in Palo Alto.
Thank you. That sounds like a good choice.
Shall I reserve a table for you here?
No, thank you.
What else can I do for you?
I'd like to book a rental car there.
Please provide your pickup date, pick up location and return date.
I'd like to pick it up from the Pacific Central Station on Saturday this week and return it on the 5th of this month.
Do you have a preferred car type and a preferred time for pick up?
Get me a Sedan with insurance that I can pick up at 13:30.
Please confirm that you want to book a rental Sedan with insurance for pick up from the Pacific Central Station at 1:30 pm on March 2nd and with a return date of March 5th.
Yes, that's correct. Which car is it and how much does it cost per day?
Your car has been reserved successfully. It is a Subaru Impreza and costs $45.00 per day.
Oh, can you please share the location?
Would you like to share the location 443 Emerson Street and with who would you like to share it?
No. Share the address Pacific Central Station with Heather.
Are you sure you want to share the location Pacific Central Station with Heather?
No, my bad. I actually want to share the adddress 443 Emerson Street with Harold.
Okay. No problem. Shall I share the location 443 Emerson Street with Harold?
Yes, please proceed.
The location has been successfully shared with Harold.
That was very helpful! Thanks a bunch! That'll be all for now.
Have a great day!
I want to watch my alarms.
Currently there are 2 alarms and there is a alarm called Event for 4 pm.
This is cool..Can you search me a restaurant there where the pasta is available.
Which city you preferred the restaurant?
Search restaurant in San Francisco.
There is a nice restaurant at San Francisco called 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano.
This is perfect..can you reserve me a Sedan car there.I want to pick it up from Grand Central Station and i want the car till 11th of march.
When you want the rental car and what is your time of pick up? Do you need insurance to this car?
I like to pick it up 12:30 on wednesday next week and i like to add insurance.
Please give confirmation details: You want to pick the Sedan car from Grand Central Station on march 6th at 12:30 pm and you need the car till march 11th. you want to add insurance.
Okay..this is cool
Your car is successfully booked.
Thanks a lot. Can i know the location address?
Are you like to share address 16 mint plaza? To whom you want to share?
I like to share the address Grand Central Station with Julie.
Please give confirmation details: You want to share the Address of Grand Central Station with Julie.
Sorry, i want to share the address of 16 mint plaza with Keith.
Please give confirmation details: You want to share the Address of 16 mint plaza with Keith.
This is cool.
Your location address is shared successfully.
Thanks for your sweet help.
Have a wonderful day.
I believe I have some notifications set. Can you please check for me?
Yes. You do have notifications. I found 3. One of them is labeled jogging. It is set for 7 am.
Good. I thought I forgot to set the reminders.
Would you like me to set up another reminder?
Thank you but no. I was just checking what I had set.
Do you require further aid?
Yes. I am looking for a good place to sit down and have a bite to eat there.
I am not sure where you would like me to search.
Locate a good outlet in San Rafael please.
Do you have the taste for any type of particular food?
I am craving a good Latin American dish.
According to your preference and location request 3 places fit your requested criteria. One option in San Rafael is Celia's Mexican Restaurant
Please check if the pricing is cheap or expensive. Oh, are vegetarian dishes served there?
Unfortunately fruitarian dishes are not on the menu. The pricing level is moderate.
I can live with that. Thanks.
Do you want me to have a table saved in your name at the restaurant?
Thanks for offering but no thanks.
I am here if you need any other type of aid.
I do need help securing a rental car there. I need to have coverage on the vehicle. The rental dates will be from the 2nd of this month and will end on the 5th.
I need more detailed information to complete your request. It would help to know the type of car you prefer, where the rental will begin and if there is a preferred time of day to start the rental.
Good questions. The rental should begin at 12 o'clock in the afternoon. I will need to pick up the vehicle at JFK International Airport. I would like a Hatchback style car.
I have gathered you would like to start the rental on March 2nd at 12 pm. You want the Hatchback with coverage included. You will pick up the vehicle at JFK International Airport. You will return the vehicle on March 5th. Are my details in line with your needs?
You have gathered the details just as I have requested, thanks. How much will I pay every day? Does the vehicle have a name?
I have set the rental up for you. You will pay $42.00 every day. This car is named the Kia Ceed.
I also need you to send the location details to Douglas. Please send him 1 Vivian Street.
I will send Douglas a notification. The notification will be 1 Vivian Street.
The location is right but I changed my mind. Please send the details to Nancy.
I want to make sure I complete your request as you wish. I understand to send Nancy a map of 1 Vivian Street.
I made a mistake. The location to send is JFK International Airport.
I do not want to send the incorrect spot to Nancy. You want me to send a map of JFK International Airport to her, right?
That is precisely what I am requesting. Thanks for verifying the details.
I have sent the location information for you.
That's one less thing for me to do. You're really a time saver.
Do you have any other requests?
You have been a great help. I don't need anything else at the moment.
Hope you day is fantastic.
Please show my alarms.
I found one for 4:30 pm called Event.
Find me an restaurant there in Palo Alto that serve Oriental food.
I have 3 options that you may like.A nice restaurant located in Palo Alto called Burma Ruby Burmese Cuisine.
Is this a cheap place?Tell me their phone number.
This place is moderate priced.650-285-2770 is the contact number.
I like this one.I want to reserve a SUV car there from 2nd of March.
At what time you will pick up the card and tell me if you need insurance too.
I will pick it up at 12:45.No, I don't need insurance.
From where you want to pick up the car and until when you want it?
I would like to pick it up from Portland Bus Station and I will need it till 7th of this month.
You want a SUV car without insurance.Pick up will be from Portland Bus Station on March 2nd at 12:45 pm and drop-off on March 7th.Is that correct?
Yes very good for me.
Reservation failed.With something else I can help you?
Try please again the reservation but change on this date:pick up on Monday next week at 12:30 pm till March 9th.
You want a SUV car without insurance.Pick up will be from Portland Bus Station on March 4th at 12:30 pm and drop-off on March 9th.Is that okay?
Sounds good.Tell me the cost per day and the name of the car.
The car is reserved.Name of car is Alfa Romeo Stelvio and cost $38.00 per day.
Share for me please the location.
You want to share this address Portland bus Station?To who you want to be?
Sounds very good.Share it with Katherine.
You share with Katherine the location Portland Bus Station.I'm right?
No.Share it with Carol.
You share with Carol the location Portland Bus Station.Is this correct?
Sounds okay for me.
The locations is successfully shared.
Thank you.You have been of great help to me.
Can I do something else for you?
No.Thank you for all your help.
Have a great day!
What alarms do I have?
You have one for 9 am titled Get up.
Great. I want to find a restaurant.
What kind of cuisine?
Some Korean Barbeque.
In which area?
I want to find somewhere in Burlingame that is average priced.
Sesame is a lovely restaurant in Burlingame.
Do they serve vegetarian food and where is it located?
It is located at 1355 Broadway and there are no vegetarian options.
I want to reserve a nice hatchback when I get there. I want to pick it up at Lawrence Station and keep it till the 9th.
What time would you like to pick up the car?
At half past 10 in the morning.
When would you like the car and would you be needing insurance?
I need it from the 6th of March and I do not require insurance.
You would like to pick up a hatchback at Lawrence Station from March 6th at 10:30 am and drop it off at March 9th, with no insurance?
Yes, that is right.
The car has been reserved.
I want to share the location
Would you like to share the location Lawrence Station, 1355 Broadway or somewhere else? Who would you like to share it with?
I would like to share the location 1355 Broadway with Jacob.
You would like to share the location 1355 broadway with Jacob?
Yes, I do.
I have shared the location for you.
Thanks, you have been very helpful. That's all.
Enjoy your day.
Can you show me my alarms please
Sure, you have 2 alarms, one at 11 am called Catch Bus
Ok thanks for that
Do you want to add any more?
No thanks, but I do need to find a restaurant
Where are you looking?
I want to eat in Belmont
What kind of food?
I want some Italian!
I found 3 Italian places in Belmont including Caprinos which you might like
What else can you fine that is intermediate priced?
I found 2 in Belmont including Divino Ristorante
Yes that's good! Now let's book a rental car
What time do you need the car
I want to get it at 12:30 and I wanna purchase insurance
What kind of car? And till when do you need it?
I need a sedan vehicle till the 9th of this month
When do you want to start using it?
I need it starting the 7th of March
And where do you want to get it?
I think the Portland Bus Station is a good place to get it
Confirming your March 7th 12:30 pm pick up of the Sedan at Portland Bus Station and you'll be returning in on March 9th
Yes that's correct
It has been booked then
Thanks so much, now can you share the location
To whom? And is 968 Ralston Avenue the address you're referring to?
Yes please, share it with Heather
Confirming you're sharing the address 968 Ralston Avenue to Heather
Confirmed, yes please
You've share it
Thanks so much, that's all for now
Happy I could help, see ya!
Tell me about my alarms.
You posses 1 set alarm right now. there is an alarm called Catch Bus at 11 am.
Alright, fine. I'd like to search for a diner in Oakland with vegetarian options and intermediate priced tag.
What sort of cuisine are you searching for?
Get me one that offers Cambodian.
There is a lovely diner callled Phnom Penh Restaurant in Oakland.
Where is it located?
The location is at 3912 MacArthur Boulevard.
Yeah, that's right. I'd like to book a vehicle there from the 10th of March.
Would you like to include insurance?
I'd like to purchase insurance.
How long do you desire the vehicle until?
I require it until the 12th of March.
What location would you like to pick up the vehicle?
Walnut Creek Bart Station is a convenient location for pick up.
When would you like to pick up the vehicle, and what type of vehicle do you enjoy?
I'd like to pick it up at 10:30, and an SUV would be lovely.
Please verify the following information: you are picking the SUV vehicle from Walnut Creek Bart Station on March 10th, 10:30 am, with a drop-off date at March 12th.
Yeah, that sounds alright.
Your vehicle has been booked.
Thank you for your assistance. Can you also share the address? The location to share is 3912 MacArthur Boulevard, and I'd like to share it with Abigail.
Please verify the following information: you are sharing the address 3912 MacArthur Boulevard with Abigail.
That sounds perfect.
The address has been shared.
Thank you for your help; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
May I see the alarms that I have set please?
Yes, there is an alarm entitled catch train which is set for 10 AM.
Terrific, thank you.
Would you like to establish a new alarm?
No, I don't need to.
How else may I help you?
I'm looking for a restaurant as well.
In what area please? And what type of cuisine are you interested in?
I'd like to find a Korean restaurant please in SFO. Someplace with vegetarian meals.
I have 6 possible recommendations for you in San Francisco. How about the restaurant Aato?
Possibly. What else is there?
I also recommend Hwaro, which is in San Francisco as well.
Do they have patio dining? And may I have the telephone number?
Yes, the telephone number is 415-859-7111. I'm sorry, but they do not have outdoor dining.
Are there any other places that you could recommend, again something in the moderate price range?
Yes, also in San Francisco color I recommend Seoul Garden.
That one will work.
Shall I make a reservation for you?
No, that's OK. I do need to reserve a vehicle though, hopefully a hatchback. And I'll need to pick that up at 2 in the afternoon.
Would you like to add insurance to the rental?
That's not necessary.
Where and when would you like to pick up the vehicle and until what date will you need it?
Ideally I'd like to pick it up on the 12th of March from Galeao International Airport and return it on March 14th.
Confirming pick up of a rental hatchback with insurance waived from Galeao International Airport on March 12th at 2 PM with a March 14th vehicle return.
That's correct, thank you.
The vehicle has been reserved.
How much is that going to cost please?
The daily rental price is $26.00.
What type of car is it?
The vehicle type is a Kia Ceed.
Thanks so much. Would you also help me with a location share? I need to share the address 1655 Post Street with Michael.
Confirming location sharing of 1655 Post Street with Michael.
Yes, that's right.
The location has been shared.
Thank you for all your help.
I'm happy to be able to do so.
Well, I'm all set.
Thank you very much.
Tell me what alarms I have set.
You have an alarm named Exercise set for 9:30 am.
That is good.
Shall I set a new alarm for you?
No, not right now.
Do you need any other help?
Find me a place to eat at.
What type of food do you like?
Find a place that serves Breakfast.
What city do you wish to eat in?
I wish to eat in San Bruno.
Jack's Restaurant and Bar - San Bruno meets your requirements and is located in San Bruno.
Do they have pricey food?
They are have moderate prices.
What is their location and do they have a vegetarian menu?
They are located at 1050 Admiral Court A and they have excellent choices for vegetarians.
That is perfect.
Shall I book a reservation for you?
No, not right now.
Do you need any more help?
Book me a car rental with insurance to get there.
What day are you returning the car?
I will return the car on the 14th of March.
Do you prefer a Hatchback, SUV or another type of car and what time and date will you get the car?
I want to pick up a Sedan at King Street Station at 9 o'clock in the morning.
What date are you getting the car?
I want to pick the car up on March 12th.
You want to pick up a Sedan with insurance from King Street Station at 9 am on March 12th and return it on March 14th, correct?
That is right. What is the name of the car I am getting?
Your Audi A8 has been booked.
Share the location with Stephen.
Shall I share King Street Station with him?
Yes, that is right.
You wish to share the King Street Station location with Stephen, correct?
That is right.
Your location has now been shared with him.
Thanks for the help.
Do you need anymore help?
No, that is all. Thanks.
Have a pleasant day.
I have no idea what I have planned today. I'd like to see my alarms, please.
You have 2 active alarms. One is a 7 am alarm named Jogging.
What other alarms are there?
The alarm named Dentist is set for 4:30 pm.
All right, cool. Please find me a restaurant in that area.
What type of cuisine would you like? What area should I search in?
Find Bistro restaurants in SF.
Bistro 10un is a good restaurant located in San Francisco.
Yes, that works.
Should I reserve you a table here?
No, thank you.
Would you like my help with anything else?
Yes, please reserve me a car there.
What type of car would you like? You can say Sedan, SUV, or something else. What pick-up time would be convenient for you? Would you like to add insurance?
I'd like to pick a Hatchback at 10:30. Yes, I'd like insurance.
How long would you like to keep the car for? What pick-up location is convenient for you?
I'll drop the car off on March 6th. My preferred pick-up location is Downtown.
When would you like to pick the car?
I want it starting tomorrow.
Please confirm that you'd like to pick an insured Hatchback car from Downtown on March 2nd at 10:30 am and drop it off on March 6th.
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully reserved your car.
Tell me the car's make and model. What's the daily cost?
The car is a Renault Clio and the daily cost is $40.00
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. Wait, I'd like to share the Downtown address with Jean.
All right. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You want to share the Downtown address with Jean.
Exactly.
I have successfully shared the address.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. At the moment, that's all I need.
Have a wonderful day!
May I see the alarms that I have set?
Yes, there is 1 alarm currently enabled for 10 AM which is called catch bus.
Thank you very much.
Would you like to create a new alarm?
No, I don't need to.
May I help you with anything else?
Yes, I need a restaurant.
What type of cuisine would you like and what area Are you interested in?
I need a fast food place in Pittsburg please.
There is 1 restaurant in Pittsburg I can recommend, which is McDonald's.
Yes, I think that will do.
Is there anything else I can help you with right now?
I need to get a car to rent.
On what date would you like it?
Starting on the 4th of March.
Would you like insurance with the vehicle and would you prefer a hatchback, an SUV or something else? Also where would you like to pick the car up?
I'd like to get the car from PHL International Airport and I'd prefer a sedan if possible. I won't need insurance.
What time will you need the vehicle?
That's going to be 9:30 in the morning please.
When will you be returning the vehicle?
I'll give it back on the 10th of this month and actually I'd like to pick it up at 10:30.
Confirming rental of a sedan from PHL International Airport on March 4th at 10:30 AM and returning on March 10th.
Great, thanks. What is that going to cost?
The vehicle has a daily price of $26.00. The reservation is complete.
Thanks a lot. I also need to share a location of 2203 Loveridge Road.
Who is the recipient please?
His name is Bobby.
Confirming location sharing of 2203 Loveridge Road with Bobby.
Yes, that's correct.
The location has been successfully shared.
Thank you very much, I'm all set.
You are very welcome.
I want to know which alarms I have set.
You have an alarm set at 9:30 am titled Paper.
Are there other alarms set?
There is also an alarm at 8:30 am called Jogging.
Are there anymore alarms set?
Another alarm set for 7:30 am is called Get up.
Alright, that is nice.
Would you like to have an alarm added?
No, I am not interested to have another alarm added now, but I want to find a restaurant there.
Is there some specific kind of food you are looking for?
I would like a place which serves Seafood.
Can you tell me the location where I should look for the restaurant?
The restaurant I am looking for should be in San Leandro.
You might consider Angry Fish restaurant which is a good one, and is located in San Leandro.
Does this restaurant have vegetarian options, and could you also check if the restaurant has outdoor seating?
This restaurant unfortunately does not have outdoor seating, but they actually do have quite great vegetarian options in the menu.
Alright, that is fine. Now I would like to rent a care there, which I will need from the 4th.
Till when do you want to have the car rented, and would you like to have a SUV, Hatchback or some other kind of car. Can you also tell me if you want to have insurance with the car?
I would like to have a Sedan car without insurance, and I will need to rent it till next Tuesday.
Can you tell me where are you able to pick up the car?
It would suit me quite well to pick up the car at Orly International Airport.
Which time is best for you to pick up the car?
I will be available to pick up the car at morning 10:30.
Can you please confirm that you want to rent a Sedan car without insurance which you will pick up from Orly International Airport on March 4th at 10:30 am, and that you will need it till March 5th?
That is not right, because I changed my mind and I do want to have insurance included.
Can you then please once again confirm that you want a car with insurance which you will need till March 5th?
Yes, that is what I want. How much will this car cost me per day to rent?
Your requested car has been booked, and renting it will be costing you $43.00 per day.
Can you tell me the name of the car?
The car is called Skoda Octavia.
I appreciate your help. I just remembered can you share the location?
Can you tell me the address you want to share? It can be 16250 East 14th Street, Orly International Airport or some other address, and please can you also tell me with whom you want to share the address?
The address I would like to share is 16250 East 14th Street, and the person with whom I want to share it is Brittany.
Can you please confirm that you want to share the address 16250 East 14th Street with the person named Brittany?
That is what I want to do.
Your requested location has been shared.
I appreciate it. You have been very helpful. That would be all.
Have a good time!
I would like to take a look in my alarms, please.
There is an alarm for 4 pm with the name Pick up kids.
OK, that's good.
Would you like to add an alarm?
No, that's ok, I don't need to add a new alarm right now. I'd like to look for a Punjabi restaurant in San Fran with a moderate price range.
August 1 Five is a restaurant in San Francisco that matches your search features.
Yes, that's a good restaurant.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
No, I'll just walk in. I would like to reserve a car to get there.
When will you need the car until?
I will need it until the 14th.
What kind of car do you prefer?
Can you find an SUV?
What day would you like to pick up the car? Would you like to add insurance?
I will need the car beginning on the 10th of March. I won't need to add insurance, my coverage includes rental cars.
What time and location would you like to pick up the car?
I would like to pick it up at 2:30 in the afternoon at Sky Harbor Airport, if possible. That's the most convenient location for me.
You would like to pick up your rental SUV at 2:30 pm from Sky Harbor International Airport on March 10th and return it on March 14th, is that correct?
Yes, you got it. How much does the car cost each day?
Your car has been reserved. The cost is $47.00 per day.
Thank you for your help. Almost forgot, I want to share the location with Roger.
Is the address you would like to share Sky Harbor International Airport, 524 Van Ness Avenue?
Yes, share the address 524 Van Ness Avenue.
You would like to share the location 524 Van Ness Avenue with Roger, is this correct?
Yes, that's right.
The location has been successfully shared.
Thank you. You've been very helpful. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
What alarms do I currently have at the moment?
You have one alarm set for 9 am under the name Badminton.
All right, would you help me find a restaurant in that area?
Can you specify which location I should search in?
I want to find restaurants in Santa Rosa.
Do you have a preference in types of food you enjoy eating?
Italian sounds good, find me restaurants that serves it.
There are 10 restaurants matching your description in Santa Rosa, how about Basilico?
That restaurant works, thanks for finding it.
Shall I make a reservation to this establishment?
Not at the moment, I need to reserve a car in that area that I plan on picking up at eleven am on the 9th of March.
What location will you pick up the car from?
I think Union Station works best for me, its seems convenient for a pick up.
When will you drop off the car, what specific date?
The car rental will be needed until the 14th of this month.
Would you like to add insurance to the rental, and are you interested in a Hatchback, SUV, or other type of car?
I think a hatchback sounds nice, and no insurance will be needed for this rental.
You will pick up a hatchback car with no insurance from Union Station on March 9th at 11 am, and will plan on dropping it off on March 14th correct?
That all sounds correct, can you tell me the make and model of the car and the cost per day for the rental?
The car rental costs $29.00 per day, it is a Nissan Qashqai and the car has been reserved.
Great, many thanks for all the help.
Will that be all that I can help you with for today?
Can you share the location with somebody?
To whom will you share the location, 4776 Sonoma Highway?
Actually share the location of Union Station, specifically with Linda.
Linda will receive the location of Union Station, is that fine?
That sounds good, please share the location.
The location has been successfully shared with Linda.
Awesome, you been a great help for me today.
Anything else that I can help you with?
Not really, that's was all I needed, you've been pretty helpful.
Your welcome, have a nice day!
Can you show me my alarms?
You currently have 3 alarms set. You have an alarm for 6:30 am named Get up.
Okay, that's great.
Would you like to add an alarm?
No, not now. Can you find me a restaurant with vegetarian options?
Can you give me a location to search in?
Find me something in Point Reyes Station.
What type of cuisine do you desire?
I would like some Freshwater fish.
I found 1 restaurant for you. You might like Station House Cafe. It is a nice restaurant located in Point Reyes Station.
Is this restaurant ultra high-end? What is their user rating?
It is a moderate priced restaurant. They are rated at around 4.3.
Yes, that sounds good.
Do you want to reserve a table?
No thank you.
Can I assist you with something else?
Can you reserve me a car to pick up from Orly International Airport?
Sure. Can you give me the following information: do you want a SUV, Sedan or something else? What will be your pick up and drop off dates?
I would like a Hatchback. I need it from the 10th until March 13th.
What will be your pick up time? Would you like to add insurance?
I don't need insurance and I will be picking the car up at 10:30.
Confirming that you will be picking up a Hatchback rental car on March 10th from the Orly International Airport. You will pick up at 10:30 am. You will be dropping the car off at March 13th. You do not need insurance. Is this information correct?
Yes, that sounds good.
I have successfully reserved your car.
Can you share the location of Orly International Airport with Matthew?
Confirming that you want to share the location Orly International Airport with Matthew?
Yes, that sounds good.
Location successfully shared.
Thanks. You've been helpful. That's all for now.
You're welcome. Have a nice day!
I would to see my alarms.
You have an alarm set for 4:30 pm and the name on it is Busy.
Do I have any other alarms?
Yes, there is also one with the name Class set for 10 am.
Okay, thank you. I would like to find a restaurant in Livermore that preferable has outdoor seating.
What type of food are you interested in finding?
I would like something that serves Tapas Bar. I want a restaurant that is tagged as reasonably priced.
A nice restaurant in Livermore that I have located is called Pura Vida - Cocina Latina & Sangria Bar.
Yes, that is very good. I would also like to reserve a car there.
Would you like a Sedan, SUV, or are you interested in something different?
I would like to have a hatchback.
What time would you like to pick the car up?
I am interested in picking it up at quarter to 11 in the morning.
When would you like the car rental to begin?
I would like to have it from the day after tomorrow.
Would you like to add insurance? Also, what location would you be wanting to get the car?
I would like to pick it up at Palo Alto Caltrain Station I would also like to purchase insurance.
Until what date do you want to keep the car?
I would like to pick it up at 11:30 and want to keep it up till 8th of March.
Okay, confirm the following details for me: You will be picking up the car from Palo Alto Caltrain Station on March 3rd at 11:30 am and drop it off on March 8th. The car is a Hatchback and it will come with insurance.
No, I want to get the car from next Monday.
Okay, please confirm these details: The pickup date for the car is March 4th and I will drop it off on March 8th.
Yes, that sounds fine.
The car has successfully been reserved for you.
What is the price for the car each day?
The price of this car is $41.00 each day.
What is the name of the car?
The car is called Vauxhaull Astra.
Thank you for the help. Would you be able to share the location? The address I want to share is 2241 First Street and I want to share it with Samuel.
Okay, confirm these details: You want the location of 2241 First Street shared with Samuel.
That sounds very good.
The location has been shared successfully.
Thanks, that is very helpful. That was all was needing for now.
Have a great day!
Let me see my alarms.
You currently have 3 alarms set. One is for 3 pm with name Dentist.
Ok, sounds good.
Did you want to add an alarm?
No, not right now. I'd like to find a restaurant tagged economical for price.
Which location did you want me to look in and what type of food were you looking for?
I'd like to find a Pho restaurant in SFO.
I found 4 restaurants for you. Anh Hong is a nice restaurant in San Francisco.
Yes, that sounds good.
Did you want to book a table here?
No, I did not.
Did you need help with anything else?
I'd like to reserve a car. I'd like a Sedan and Gatwick International Airport is convenient for me to pick it up.
When did you want to pick up the car? Did you want to add insurance?
I'd like to pick it up at 9:30 am and I'd like to buy insurance.
When did you want to begin the rental?
I'll need it from March 3rd.
Until when did you need the car?
I'll need it until the 5th of this month.
Please confirm you're picking up a Sedan car from Gatwick International Airport on March 3rd at 9:30 am and dropping it of on March 5th.
Yes, that is correct. What is the name of the car?
Your booking has been confirmed and the car is a Volvo S90.
How much will the car cost per day?
It will be $45.00 per day.
Thank you for your help. Could you help me share the location?
Which address did you want to share: 808 Geary Street, Gatwick International Airport, or something else? Who were you sharing it with?
I'll share Gatwick International Airport I'd like to share it with Jean.
Please confirm you're sharing the location Gatwick International Airport with Jean.
That is correct.
The location has been successfully shared.
Thank you, that's very helpful. That'll be all I need for now.
Have a great day!
Can you show me my alarms?
You have 2 alarms set currently. There is an alarm for 9 am with the name Gym.
OK, thanks. Let's look for a restaurant in Santa Clara. Something afforadable.
Is there a particular kind of food you would like to look for?
Yes, I would like a restaurant that has Izakaya.
Amakai Japanese Cuisine is located in Santa Clara.
That's right, I remember it now, thank you.
Would you like to reserve a table there?
No, that's ok.
Is there anything else I can help you with?
I would like to reserve a rental car starting next Friday, can you find me one?
What kind of car do you prefer? Where would you like to pick up the car, and when do you plan to return it?
If you can get me a hatchback, that would be my first choice. The best place for me to pick it up is Estacion Buenavista. I will need the car until the 13th of March.
What time would you like to pick up the car?
I would like to pick it up at eleven in the morning.
Would you like to include insurance?
Yes, I will need to buy the insurance.
You would like to pick up a Hatchback car rental with insurance from Estacion Buenavista at 11 am on March 8th, and return it on March 13th, is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
Your rental car has been reserved.
What make and model is the car, and how much does it cost per day?
The car is a Peugeot 208, and it costs $29.00 per day.
Thank you for your help. Oh, I need to share the location for Estacion Buenavista with Walter.
You would like to share the location Estacion Buenavista with Walter, is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
The location has been shared.
Thank you for your help, that's all for now.
Have a great day!
What alarms do I have set?
You have 1 alarm called Get up that is set for 8:30 am.
Ok, perfect.
Would you like to set an additional alarm?
No, not right now but I do want to find a restuarant.
I can help with that. What type of food would you like and in which city?
I would like to find a Szcheuan restaurant in San Jose please.
There are 10 restaurants in San Jose that match your search. How about Chef Li?
Does that restaurant offer vegetarian options and can yu give me their contact number?
The restaurant does offer vegetarian options and can be reached at 408-377-8310.
That sounds great.
Is there something else I can do for you?
Yes, I need to rent a car in the area.
What day should the car rental begin?
I need the car beginning on the 4th.
Alright, what type of car do you prefer and when would you like to pick it up? Also, would you like insurance for the car?
No, I don't need insurance. I would prefer a hatchback that I could pick up at 10:30 am.
Where would you like to pick up the car and when will you return it?
I will return the car on the 9th of March and would like to pick it up at Union Plaza.
Please confirm you would like to reserve a hatchback car with no insurance from March 4th to March 9th and will pick it up at 10:30 am from Union Plaza.
Yes, please make the reservation.
Your car reservation has been confirmed.
How much will I be charged for each day?
The car reservation is $23.00 per day.
What type of vehicle is it?
The car is a Fiat Panda.
Great! Can you share the address of Union Plaza with Billy please?
Yu would like to share the Union PLaza location with Billy, is that correct?
Yes, that is right.
The location has been shared.
Thanks for your help, that's all I needed.
Enjoy your trip!
Could you please show me any alarms I have set.
There is 1 alarm and it is called Wake up, set for 8 am.
that is good. Now could you assist me to find a restaurant?
What type of food do you prefer?
Somewhere that serves Soup & Salad.
Where do you want me to search?
in Fairfield please.
There is a good McDonalds in Fairfield.
yes perfect, I want to get a car there. I want to collect it at 4:30 pm at Portland Bus Station until March 10th.
On what date will you collect it and what type of car do you prefer? Also will you be needing insurance?
no I dont need insurance. I want it from Monday next week and I would prefer a Hatchback.
To confirm then you will collect the Hatchback car on March 4th at Portland Bus Station at 4:30 pm. You will then return the car on March 10th.
yes that is all correct. How much will it be per day?
the booking is now confirmed and is will cost you $28.00 per day.
Great, thanks for that. Now could you share the location for me?
With whom will I share it?
with Tyler please.
Is it the address for Portland Bus Station?
the address is 2212 North Texas Street.
To confirm then you want to share with Tyler the address 2212 North Texas Street.
no sorry could I share it with Henry?
to confirm then you want to share with Henry the address 2212 North Texas Street.
that is it.
the location has now been shared.
Great, thanks for everything, I dont need anything else for now.
have a great day.
Tell me about my alarms.
You have 3 alarms active right now. There is an alarm for 6 am with the title Get up.
Alright, fine. I'd like to look for a diner here.
What place ought I look in?
Look for diners in San Jose.
What type of cuisine are you searching for?
Get diners inside Morgan Hill that offer pasta. I'ma searching for diners with an economical price tag.
I discovered 3 diners you might enjoy. There's a lovely diner called Betto's Bistro situated in Morgan Hill.
Could you offer alternative diners? I require vegetarian options.
There's a lovely diner in Morgan Hill called Maurizio's.
Alright, that's fine. I've like to book a vehicle here. I'd like a hatchback, and Phoenix Sky Harbor Airport is a convenient location for me to pick it up.
Would you like to include insurance? When would you like to pick up the vehicle, and up to what day would you like the vehicle?
I'd like to pick it up at 11 in the morning until 9th of March, and do not require insurance.
What time would you like to begin the vehicle rental?
I require it from 1st of March until March 6th.
Please verify the following information: you are picking up a Hatchback vehicle from Sky Harbor International Airport on March 1st 11 am with a drop off date at March 6th. It does not include insurance.
Nope; I'd like to pick up the vehicle on 11:30 in the morning.
Please verify the following information: the Hatchback vehicle pickup is at 11:30 am.
Yeah, that's fine with me.
Your vehicle has been booked.
Ah, can you share the address?
What location do you wish to share? 25 East 1st Street, Sky Harbor International Airport, or something else? What individual would you like to share it with?
The location for sharing is 25 East 1st Street, and the person to share it with is Evelyn.
Please verify the following information: you are sharing the address 25 East 1st Street with Evelyn.
Nope; the location to share is Sky Harbor International Airport, and the person I'm sharing it is Elizabeth.
Please verify the following information: you are sharing the address Sky Harbor International Airport with Elizabeth.
That's fine with me.
You have been successful in sharing the address.
Thank you for your help.
Could I assist with something else?
No, thank you for your assistance.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
What alarms do I have set?
You have 2 alarms set. There is an alarm for 6 am titled get up.
Okay, thanks. I'm looking for a restaurant.
What type of food are you looking for? What city do you want to search in?
I'm looking for an average priced restaurant serving Indian food in Berkeley.
I found 5 restaurants for you. How about Ajanta in Berkeley?
Yes, that sounds good. I'd like to reserve a rental car there.
What time do you want to pick up the car?
I want to pick it up at two pm.
What date do you want to pick up the car and drop it off?
I want the car from the 5th of March until the 10th.
Do you want to include insurance?
No, I don't
Do you want a hatchback, SUV, or something else?
A hatchback sounds good.
Where do you want to pick up the car from?
I'd like to pick it up from Orly International Airport.
Okay, you want to pickup a hatchback from Orly International Airport from March 5th at 2 pm until March 10th, right?
No, I want to pick it up from Heathrow International Airport on the 4th.
Okay, you'd like to pick the car up from Heathrow International Airport on March 4th, correct?
Yes, that works. What type of car is it and how much is it per day?
I have confirmed the reservation. It is a Nissan Qashqai and it is $28.00 per day.
Okay, thank you. I want to share a location.
Do you want to share the location of Heathrow International Airport? Who do you want to share it with?
No, I want to share the address 1888 Solano Avenue with Maria.
Okay, you'd like to share the address 1888 Solano Avenue with Maria, right?
No, I want to share the address of Heathrow International Airport.
Okay, sharing the address of Heathrow International Airport with Maria, correct?
Yes, that is right.
I have shared the location.
Thank you. That is all I need.
Have a great day.
Please show me my alarms.
There is an alarm for Running at 7 am.
Ok, sounds good.
Did you want to add another alarm?
Not right now. I'd like to find a restaurant in Pinole and I will need vegetarian options.
What type of food did you prefer?
I'd like something serving noodles.
I found 3 restaurants for you. China Delights is a nice restaurant in Pinole.
Yes, that sounds good.
Did you want to book a table here?
Not right now.
Did you need help with anything else?
I'd like to book a car. I will need it from tomorrow and I'd like to pick it up at half past 10 in the morning.
Until when did you need the car?
I will need it until the day after tomorrow.
What type of car did you prefer?
I'd like a SUV.
Did you need insurance?
No, I don't.
Where did you want to pick the car up?
Peachtree Station is convenient for me.
Please confirm you're picking up a SUV car from Peachtree Station on March 2nd at 10:30 am and dropping it off on March 3rd.
Yes, that is correct.
Your car has been booked.
How much will it cost per day and what is the car's name?
The name of the car is GMC Terrain and it will cost $34.00 a day.
Thank you. Could you help share the location?
Which address did you wish to share: Peachtree Station, 1501 Tara Hills Drive, or something else?
I'd like to share 1501 Tara Hills Drive.
Who did you want to share it with?
I'd like to share it with Karen.
Please confirm you're sharing the location 1501 Tara Hills Drive with Karen.
No, I am actually sharing the address Peachtree Station.
Please confirm you're sharing the location Peachtree Station with Karen.
No, I'd like to share it with Theresa.
Please confirm you're sharing the location Peachtree Station with Theresa.
That sounds good.
The location has been successfully shared.
Thank you, that was helpful. That's all I need for now.
Have a great day!
I would like you to show me my alarms.
There is an alarm called get up that has been made for 6:30 am.
Okay, that is good.
Would you like to add an alarm?
No, I don't want to add any more alarms right now.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I would also like to locate a restaurant there.
What is the location where you would like to me to search?
Look for restaurants in Kenwood.
Which type of food would you like to find?
I would like a place that serves Freshwater fish.
I have located 1 restaurant that you might like. It is located in Kenwood and is called Salt and Stone Restaurant.
Can you tell me what the user rating is for the restaurant?
The rating by users is around 4.6.
Okay, that is good.
Do you want to make a reservation for a table there?
Thank you very much, but no.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
I would also like to reserve a car there.
When would you like the car rental? And do you want a hatchback, sedan, or something else?
I would like to get a sedan and I want it beginning on the 8th of this month.
Until what date would you like there and where would you be picking it up? Also, would you like insurance for the car?
An SUV would be nice. I would like to pick the car up at 9 in the morning at Benito Juarez Airport and would like to keep it until the 14th of this month. I don't want to get insurance.
Okay, confirm these details: You will pick up the car at Benito Juarez International Airport on March 8th at 9 am and you will drop it off on March 14th. The car is an SUV and will not have insurance.
Yes that sounds fine.
The car has been successfully been reserved for you.
Oh, and I would like the location shared with Roger. Can you do that?
Would you like the Benito Juarez International Airport address shared?
Yes, the address I would like to share is 9900 Sonoma Highway.
Okay, confirm these details: You will be sharing the location of 9900 Sonoma Highway with Roger.
Okay, that sounds very good.
The location has been successfully shared.
Thank you, that is very helpful. That was all I needed for now.
Have a wonderful day!
Could you show me my alarms?
You have 1 alarm set at the moment at 7:30 am called Get up.
Souns good.
Would you like to add an alarm?
No, not now. I'd like to find a restaurant there.
What sort of food do you want? What location should I look in?
Find Pho restaurants in Walnut Creek
Vanessa's Bistro 2 Vietnamese Restaurant is a nice one in Walnut Creek.
Sounds good. Reserve a car there for me.
Where would you like to pick up the car? Would you like to add insurance? When do you want to return the car?
Nairobi International Airport is a good place to pick it up. No insurance is needed. I will need it until Thursday next week.
Would you like Hatchback, SUV or anything else?
Sedan sounds good.
When will you start the car rental and what time do you want to pick up the car?
I would like to pick up the car at half past 10 in the morning from the 2nd of this month.
So you want to pick up the Sedan car from Jomo Kenyatta International Airport on March 2nd at 10:30 am and drop it off on March 7th. You do not need insurance, right?
Yes, that's right. What is the name of the car? How much is it per day?
The car was reserved. The car is called Audi A8. It's $23.00 per day.
Would you mind sharing the location? The address is 1512 Locust Street.
Who would you like to share it with?
I want to share it with Amy.
Could you confirm that you're sharing the location 1512 Locust Street with Amy?
No, share it with Melissa.
Could you confirm that you want to share the location 1512 Locust Street with Melissa?
No, the address was Jomo Kenyatta International Airport.
Would you confirm that you want to share the location Jomo Kenyatta International Airport with Melissa?
Right.
The location was shared.
Thanks. That's a good help. I will not be needing anything further.
Have a good day.
I need to see my alarms
There are 2 alarms set for you and there is an alarms for you at 6:30 am with wake up name
Fine and search for a hotel with Kaiseki food
Which place you prefer?
I need it in San Mateo
I have short listed 1 restaurant of your liking and that is a nice restaurant called Wakuriya in San Mateo
Can i have their contact number?
Their contact number is 650-286-0410
Is it ultra high-end?
Yes the restaurant is ultra high-end
Fine then and now i also need a car
What is the pick time for car?
I need it around 2:30 pm
which date you want car rental and which car?
I require a Hatchback on March 2nd
Which is your preferred place to car pick up and do you need add insurance?
I don't need insurance and require to pick up at 30th street station
Till which date you need the car?
I require the car till March 9th
Please give confirmation details: You are picking up a Hatchback car at 30th street station on March 2nd at 2:30 pm with drop off date on March 9th and car does not come with insurance
Fine and can i know the cost per day?
Your car is booked and it costs $22.00 per day
Thank you, can you share the location? the address to share is 115 De Anza Boulevard
Who do you need to share it?
I prefer sharing it with Natalie
Please give confirmation details: You are sharing the location 115 De Anza Boulevard with Natalie
No, i need to share it with Catherine
Please give confirmation details: you are sharing location 115 De Anza Boulevard with Catherine.
This is cool.
I have shared the location successfully.
This much is enough for now. Thank you.
Have a great Day.
Hi, could you show me my alarms please?
You currently have 1 alarm set titled Busy at 5 pm.
I see, thank you.
Would you like to add an alarm?
No, that is not necessary.
How can I further help you then?
Could you help me find a cheap restaurant please?
Which location and type of food would you prefer?
I would prefer some Izakaya in San Jose please.
There are 10 restaurants you may like in San Jose, how about Bluefin?
Are there any alternatives?
How about Dan Izakaya Restaurant in San Jose?
Sounds great to me!
Would you like me to make a reservation there?
No, that is not needed.
How can I further assist you then?
Could you get me a car reservation in that area please?
And would you require insurance?
Yes please, can I also pick up the car at Gatwick International Airport?
And when do you need the car till?
I will need the car later today at 08:30 to the 2nd.
And any preference on the type of car?
Could you get me a Sedan please?
Please confirm your booking for a Sedan car from Gatwick International Airport with insurance for pickup at 8:30 am on March 1st till March 2nd.
Sorry, could I pick the car at 9 o'clock in the morning instead?
Please confirm your pickup at 9 am on March 1st.
Sounds great to me!
Your reservation has been made.
Could you share the location 1306 Saratoga Avenue please?
And who are you sharing the location with?
I would like to share with Amy, please.
Please confirm your request to share the location 1306 Saratoga Avenue with Amy.
Yes, that is right.
The location has been shared.
Thank you for your help, that is all I need.
Have a great day ahead!
I'd like to see my alarms.
You have a 10 am alarm named Call.
Alright. I'm looking for a restaurant.
What kind of food do you enjoy?
I want French food.
What city do you want to search in?
I want to find a place in SFO.
There's a nice place called Amelie San Francisco in San Francisco.
Can you tell me their address and if they have outdoor dining.
They are at 1754 Polk Street and unfortunately there is no outdoor dining.
Okay, that's still good.
Do you want to reserve a table?
No, I do need a car rental though.
When do you want the rental to start and where will you be picking it up?
I want it starting on the 3rd of this month and from Dulles International Airport.
What time will you be picking it up and do you prefer a Hatchback, Sedan, or something else?
I'd like to pick it up at ten in the morning. And I'd prefer an SUV.
And until when do you want the car?
I want it until March 4th.
And would you like insurance?
Yes, I will need insurance.
I'll reserve you an SUV with insurance at Dulles International Airport for pick up on March 3rd at 10 am and drop off on March 4th. How does that sound?
That's what I want.
The car has been reserved for you.
And I also want to share the 1754 Polk Street location with Lauren.
I'll share the location of 1754 Polk Street with Lauren, is that right?
Yes, please share it.
I've shared the location.
Thanks for the help.
What else can I do for you?
Nothing else, you've been plenty helpful.
Have a terrific day!
Can you tell me when my alarms are set?
You have an alarm for 9 am that is titled Get up.
Okay. Can you find a restaurant for me?
What city or area should I search in?
How about a restaurant in SFO?
Okay. And what kind of food do you want, Chinese, Mexican or something else?
I want a good Italian place the has pizza and pasta.
There is a restaurant in San Francisco, 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano that is highly rated.
Do they have tables outside?
Yes, they do have tables outside.
Is it an expensive place?
It is considered a mid-price or moderate restaurant.
Okay. I want to book a vehicle to pick up at 13:30.
What are the dates for the car rental and do you want insurance added?
I'll need it from Wednesday next week until March 7th. I won't need any insurance on it.
What city or location would you like to pick up the vehicle and do you have a vehicle preference? It can be an SUV, sedan, Hatchback, or something else.
I'd like a sedan and I'll pick it up at Benito Juarez International Airport.
Please confirm the following information. You want to rent a sedan beginning March 6th and ending March 7th. You will pick it up at Benito Juarez International Airport at 1:30 pm. This vehicle does not have insurance.
That's sound okay. How much does the sedan cost per day?
The sedan has been reserved. The cost is $25.00 per day.
Okay. I need the address for Benito Juarez International Airport and I need to also share it with Vincent.
Please confirm the following information: You want to share the location of Benito Juarez International Airport with Vincent.
Yes. That is correct.
The location has been shared successfully.
That's really a great feature. Thanks.
Would you like assistance with something else?
No. That's all for now. Thanks for your help.
You're very welcome. Good-bye.
Can you show me the alarms?
You have an alarm at 7:30 am named Wake up
Very well, thank you
Do you need to add another alarm?
Not now, thanks. I want to find a restaurant.
In which city do you want to find a restaurant?
I'd like to find a restaurant in Palo Alto
What kind of food would you prefer?
I'd like a restaurant that serves Soup & Salad
In Palo Alto there's Green Elephant Gourmet
This is fine. I need a car at 9:30 in the morning
Which day do you want to rent a car? In which city? Do you prefer to add insurance?
I need the car from Monday next week till the 8th. I prefer to pick it up from PHL International Airport. Yes, I want to add insurance.
Do you prefer Sedan, SUV or something else?
I prefer a Hatchback, please.
A Hatchback wih insurance from PHL International Airport from March 4th at 9:30 am, till March 8th. Do you confirm these details?
No, I prefer a Sedan till 6th of March. Thanks
A sedan car till March 6th. Is it correct?
Yes, now it's correct. What car model is available?
There's a Skoda Octavia. Your car is booked!
Very good, thanks! I want to share the location to 3950 Middlefield Road
What is the name of the person you want to share the location with?
The name is Deborah. Share with her PHL International Airport address
Sharing with Deborah the location PHL International Airport. Is it correct?
Yes, It's correct. Thanks
The location was shared with Deborah
Very good! Thanks
Do you need anything else?
No, It's all for today. Thank you
Have a good day!
Could you tell me what alarms I have set?
There is an alarm titled Wake up at 6:30 am.
Could you find me a restaurant please?
What city do I need to search in and what type of food?
Maybe a Gastropub in SF or the surrounding area?
B-side is a highly rated Gastropub in San Francisco.
Do they have outside tables? Could you give me their telephone number?
Their number is 415-287-6599. I'm sorry, they do not have tables outside.
Okay. So I'd like to rent a car.
What date would you like to start and what type of car do you want?
I want the rental to start Monday next week and I think I want a sedan.
What is the date that you'll return the vehicle and what time would you like to pick it up?
I need it until the 9th. I'll pick it up around 10:30 am.
What location do you want to get the car and would you like insurance added?
I don't need insurance and I'll pick it up at Phoenix Sky Harbor Airport.
Please confirm the following information: You want to rent a sedan beginning March 4th at 10:30 am, dropping it off March 9th. You will pick it up from Sky Harbor International Airport and you do not need insurance.
Could you please change that to picking it up Tuesday next week at Heathrow International Airport?
Please confirm the following information: You want to pick the vehicle up on March 5th at Heathrow International Airport.
And could you change that to a hatchback?
Please confirm the following information. You want to pick up a hatchback at Heathrow International Airport.
Yes. That's it. What is the cost per day for the hatchback?
The vehicle has been reserved. It will be $25.00 per day.
Okay. Could you share the location of Heathrow International Airport with Victoria?
Please confirm the following information: The location of Heathrow International Airport will be shared with Victoria.
Great. That's an amazing service.
The location has been shared with Victoria.
Wow. Thanks for your assistance. That's all.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I want to view my listed alarms. Can you show me the same now?
Yes, you have an alarm for 11 am in the name Call.
That is okay. Now I want to go to a nice restaurant for which I need your help to search for a good one in Lafayette. I can manage with any price range but it should have tasty food.
Okay, let me know your favorite kind of food so that I can search for the suitable one to you.
I like to have Punjabi food and in particular with Vegetarian meals. Search it accordingly.
What about the 1 named Swad Indian Cuisine in Lafayette. This is nice place to eat and you can definitely enjoy here.
This seems okay to me.
Shall I book a table there?
Not now and thanks.
Do you want any more help from me?
Yes, I want to go there on Thursday next week for which I need your help to find a Car. I should come with insurance and a Hatchback type is okay to me.
Which are the convenient place and time for your to pick up the car and till what date you need the same?
Search for the one from Union Station for the pick up time ten am until 13th of this month.
Please confirm to book a Hatchback car available for pick up at Union Station on March 7th at 10 am to the date March 13th including insurance.
That is great and you can proceed.
I have booked the car successfully as per your requirement.
Thanks. Do one more thing. please share the location address 960 Moraga Road #1 to Keith.
Please confirm once again to share the location address 960 Moraga Road #1 to Keith.
Yes, do it now.
I have shared the location as it is.
Thank you so much for your help.
Anything else you need?
Nothing for now. Thanks.
Have a good day.
I would like to see my alarms.
I found an alarm for 6 am with the name wake up.
Okay, That sounds good.
Can I assist you with anything else?
Find me a nice restaurant in Milpitas.
What type food do you prefer?
I am looking for a restaurant which serves Freshwater Fish.
How about a nice restaurant called Fortunes Restaurant Milpitas located in Milpitas.
Are there any other restaurant you can suggest?
How about a nice restaurant called Golden Sun Palace located in Milpitas.
Are there any other restaurant located in San Jose Which has vegetarian options in the menu you can suggest?
How about a nice restaurant called Olive Garden Italian Restaurant located in San Jose.
Can you confirm whether the restaurant is pricey?
No, They are moderate.
Find me their address.
They are located at 940 Blossom Hill Road.
Okay, That sounds good.
Do you want me to reserve a table here?
No, maybe some other time.
Is there anything else I can assist you with?
Find me a car for rent available to pick up on the 8th at ten am with the drop off date as 9th of this month.
Which type of car like Sedan, SUV or something else do you prefer and would you like to have insurance?
Please book a Hatchback with insurance.
Can you tell me the name of the place you want the pick up the car from?
I would like to pick up to pick up the car from Walnut Creek BART Station.
Please confirm: You want me to reserve a Hatchback car for pick up at Walnut Creek BART Station on March 8th at 10 am with the drop off date as March 9th.
Yes, That is correct. Find me the cost per day.
I have successfully reserved the car for you and the cost is $37.00 per day.
Okay. Thank you! And can you share the location 940 Blossom Hill Road with Roy?
Please confirm: You want me to share the location 940 Blossom Hill Road with Roy.
Yes, That is correct.
Your location has successfully been shared.
Okay. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could hep. Have a nice day!
I have absolutely no idea what alarms I have set. Please show me my alarms.
You have the Catch bus alarm set for 10:30 am.
All right. Cool.
Do you want to create a new alarm?
No. At the moment, I don't want to create any additional alarms.
Will there be anything else?
Yes, please find me a Latin American restaurant in that area.
Sorry I didn't understand your request. Tell me the city you would like to conduct the search in.
Oops! Sorry. Please search for Berkeley restaurants.
Juan's Place is 1 nice Berkeley restaurant.
Yes, that works for me.
Would you like my help with anything else?
Yes, please reserve me a car there.
Sure. Tell me the type of car you'd like, and the most convenient location for you to pick up the car.
I prefer a sedan, and would like to pick it up from Downtown.
How long would you like to keep the car?
I'll be keeping the car until 12th of this month.
Would you like to buy insurance?
No. I won't be needing insurance.
What pick-up time works for you?
Half past 5 in the evening would be a perfect pick-up time.
And what pick-up date did you have in mind?
A pick-up date of 5th of March works for me. Listen, there's been a change of plans and I'll be in Europe then. Please change the pick-up location to Heathrow Airport
One moment please. Could you confirm the following details: You'd like to pick up a Sedan car from Heathrow International Airport on March 5th at 5:30 pm and drop it off on March 12th, and you have opted not to add insurance.
Yes, that's correct. The car's make and model, please?
I have successfully reserved your car. The car is a Volvo S90.
How much is the daily cost?
The daily cost is $34.00.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. Wait, one last thing. Please share the Heathrow International Airport address.
Which contact would you like to share it with?
Please share it with Justin.
Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like to share the Heathrow International Airport address with Justin.
No, sorry I made a mistake. I'm very distracted today. Please share the Market Broiler Fremont location instead.
No problem. Please confirm that you're sharing the Market Broiler Fremont address with Justin.
That is correct.
Address successfully shared.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. At the moment, that's all I need.
Have a fabulous day!
I need to see my alarms.
You have 1 alarm now and it is at 9 AM with the name Get Up.
Okay, thanks for that.
Would you like to add an alarm?
No, I don't need to add any.
Anything else to help with?
I need a restaurant there.
What kind of food and in which location?
I need Asian restaurants in Berkeley.
Da Lian Restaurant is a nice restaurant in Berkeley.
Any others?
Great China Restaurant is another in Berkeley.
That's good and I need a reservation for a Hatchback car.
When would you like to begin the rental and until when?
I need it from the 11th of March and until the 14th.
What time would you like to pick it up and where do you want to pick it up?
I need it at half past 10 in the morning. Anaheim Intermodal Center is good to get it from.
Would you like to add insurance?
No, I don't need to add insurance.
So, a car from Anaheim Intermodal Center, pickup date of March 11th at 10:30 AM with a drop-off date at March 14th for the Hatchback?
Yes, that's all good.
Your car has been reserved now.
Thanks for that and I need to share location info.
Would you like to share the address of Anaheim Intermodal Center? Who to share with?
I need to share the address of 2190 Bancroft Way and to share it with Peter.
So share the location 2190 Bancroft Way with Peter?
Yes that's it.
You have shared this location.
Thanks for that so much.
Of course. Enjoy.
I want you to show my alarms
You are having 2 alarms set and one alarm is set at 7 am with name Get up
Any other alarms set?
There is one alarm set at 3:30 pm with name Piano time
That is fine
You require an alarm to be added?
No, i don't need alarms
Any other help?
I want you to look for restaurant there
Which is your preferred location and your choice of food?
I want to look for restaurants in Occidental serving Pizza and Pasta
There is a nice restaurant called Negri's Original Occidental located in Occidental
Do they provide outdoor seating?
They are not having outdoor seating
Can i know their contact number?
Their contact number is 707-874-0301
Fine and i need to do car booking and need it from March 1st and i also require insurance
Which place you like to pick the car and at what time? what is your preferred car type?
I prefer to pick up a Sedan car around 12 in the afternoon around Intercity Terminal and i will be needing it tilll Wednesday next week
Please give confirmation details: You are picking up a sedan car from Intercity Terminal at 12 pm on March 1st and the drop off date is on March 6th and car comes with insurance
That is fine
Your car booking is done
Thank you and can you share your location?
Who do you want to share the location with?
I prefer to share it with Madison
Do you like to share this address 3700 Bohemian Highway?
The sharing location is Intercity Terminal
Please give confirmation details: You will be sharing the location Intercity Terminal with Madison
No, the sharing address is 139 South B Street and like to share with Frank
Please give confirmation details: You will be sharing the location 139 South B Street with Frank
That is fine
Your location sharing is done
Thank you very much
Have a great day
What alarms do I have?
You have 1 alarm set for a Wake up at 8 am.
okay, good. Thanks.
Did you want to add another?
Not just now. I'd like to find a Pizza restaurant in SF. I'd prefer one with outdoor seating.
How about 54 Mint Ristorante Italiano in San Francisco?
Sounds good. I'll want to rent a care there for Wednesday next week.
What kind of care and where and what time do you want to pick it up?
I'd like an SUV that I can pick up at 2:30 in the afternoon at Norman Y. Mineta Airport.
Would you like to add insurance?
Yes, I would.
When did you want to return it?
On March 10th.
To confirm: You would like to pick up an SUV at Norman Y. Mineta Airport at 2:30 pm on March 6th and return it March 10th. You would like to include insurance.
Yes that's right. What kind of SUV is it?
A GMC Terrain.
Sounds great! Can you share the location?
Did you want to share Norman Y. Mineta Airport? Who should I share it with?
No, share 16 Mint Plaza with Jerry.
To confirm: You would like to share the location 16 Mint Plaza with Jerry.
On second thought, share it with Douglas.
So that's sharing 16 Mint Plaza with Douglas.
Yes that's right.
The location has been shared.
Thank you so much.
Is there anything else you need?
No thanks, that's all for now.
Have a good day.
I'd like to see what alarms I have set please.
There is an alarm enabled for 8:30 AM that is titled get up.
Alright, thank you.
Would you like to create an additional alarm?
No, thank you, not right now. I also like to locate a restaurant please.
Where would you like me to look and what kind of cuisine would you like?
I'd like something in Redwood City, a place that serves Persian food.
I found 1 restaurant for you in Redwood City. Would you like to go to Rocknwraps and Kabobs?
Do they have patio dining?
No, I'm sorry, they don't.
That's OK. I would also like to get a rental vehicle.
When would you like to get the car and how long will you need it?
I'd like to get the car at twelve in the afternoon and I will return it next Friday.
Where would you like to pick the car up from and when do you want to begin the rental? Also would you like an SUV, a hatchback or another kind of car?
I would like a sedan. And may I pick it up downtown the 7th of March?
Shall I add insurance do the car?
Yes, please do.
Confirming pick up of a rental sedan March 7th at 12 pm, picking up downtown and returning March 8th.
Yes, that's great. What kind of car is it?
Your reservation has been confirmed. You will be renting an Audi A8.
OK, great. Also, would you mind sharing that location? The sharing address is downtown.
Who is the sharing recipient?
Her name is Sarah.
Confirming location sharing of downtown with Sarah.
Yes, that's correct, thank you.
The location has been successfully shared.
Thank you, I appreciate the help. I'm all set now.
Thank you very much.
I'd like to check my alarms please.
You have 1 alarm set for 5 pm which is called Pick up kids.
Okay thanks. I'm looking to celebrate, can you help me find a restaurant for me to have dinner?
What kind of food would you like to eat?
I'm in the mood for Oriental food.
Where would you like me to search?
Please search in Santa Clara.
How about the Beijing Restaurant in Santa Clara?
That sounds nice.
Do you want to make a reservation now?
Not right now thanks. I'd like to rent a car with insurance, can you help?
Sure, when do you want the rental to begin and for how long? Also, what kind of car are you looking for? For example you could rent a Sedan or a Hatchback.
I need an SUV from the 1st until next Tuesday.
What time do you want to collect the car?
I'd like to collect the car at 1:30 pm at Norman Y. Mineta Airport.
So you'd like to rent an SUV from Norman Y. Mineta Airport on March 1st at 1:30 pm until March 5th?
That's correct yes. What model is the car and what will the cost per day be?
Your GMC Terrain has been reserved for you. It will cost $56.00 per day.
Now I'd like to share a location with my friend Anna. Can you send her the address, it's 1460 Halford Avenue.
Sure so you'd like to share the 1460 Halford Avenue address with Anna?
Yes that's correct.
The location has been shared.
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
Not right now thanks.
Enjoy your day.
What alarms do I have?
You have one for 5 pm titled meeting.
Great. I would like to find a restaurant.
What type of food would you like to eat and in which area?
I would like some old fashioned pizza in san francisco.
There is a lovely restaurant in San Francisco called 54 mint Ristorante Italiano.
Great. I want to reserve a lovely hatchback when I get there on march 2nd and I would be returning it on the 6th.
Where would you like to pick up the car and for what time?
I want to pick it up at 12:30 pm at McCarran International Airport.
You would like to add insurance?
Yes, I do.
You would like to pick up a hatchback at McCarran International Airport on March 2nd at 12:30 pm and return it on March 6th, with insurance?
That would be fine. What model of car is it?
I have reserved a renault clio for you.
Great. I want to share the location.
Which location? 16 Mint Plaza, McCarran International Airport or somewhere else? Who would you like to share it with?
I want to share the location 16 mint plaza with sharon.
You want to share the location 16 Mint plaza with sharon?
I want to share it with Edward.
You want to share the location 16 Mint plaza with Edward?
Yes, I do.
I have shared the location.
Thanks. You have been helpful.
Is there something else you need?
No, thanks. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
Can you please show me active alarms?
You have an alarm named Wake up at 6 am.
Any other active alarms?
Yes, there's also one named Badminton at 7 am.
OK, thanks a lot.
Do you want me to add an alarm?
No, not at the moment. I'd like you to help me find a restaurant now.
Sure, but first tell me in which area to search.
Please find me something in Morgan Hill.
Perfect. Now please tell me about the kind of food you'd like.
I'd like to go to a restaurant that serves Pizza.
There are 3 restaurants matching your criteria in Morgan Hill, out of which I recommend Betto's Bistro.
Sounds perfect.
Do you want me to book a table for you?
No, not at the moment, thank you!
Is there anything else I could do for you?
I need you to find me a rental care in the area, preferably a SUV, that I can pick up on the 9th of March at 10:30 in the morning.
OK, but first please tell me your desired pickup location as well as the date until you need the car.
I'd like to pick up the car from Heathrow International Airport and I will be keeping it until the 14th.
Do you want me to add insurance to your rental?
No, I do not want insurance.
Can you please confirm that you want me to place a reservation for a SUV without added insurance to be picked up from Heathrow International Airport on March 9th at 10:30 am, due for drop-off on March 14th.
Yes, that's correct.
I've successfully placed your reservation.
Can you please tell me the car model as well as the per day rate?
It's a GMC Terrain priced at $37.00 per day.
Thanks for everything! Please share the location for 17385 Monterey Road with Keith?
Can you please confirm that you want me to share the location for 17385 Monterey Road with Keith?
Yes, that's correct.
I've shared the location as requested.
Thank you so much! That will be all for now!
Have a great day!
Tell me about my alarms.
There is an alarm titled Busy at 4 pm.
Alright, fine. I'd like to look for a diner there in Oakland that are cheap in price.
What sort of cuisine are you seaarching for?
Get me one that offers American.
Mcdonald's is a lovely diner situated in Oakland.
Yeah, that's fine. I'd like to book a vehicle there from March 10th.
What location do you wish to pick up the vehicle from? Would you like to include insurance?
Chicago Union Station is a convenient location for me to pick the vehicle. I'd like to purchase insurance.
When do you desire the vehicle until?
I require it until the 14th.
Would you like a sedan, SUV, or something else? When would you like to pick up the vehicle?
A Hatchback would be lovely. I'd like to pick it up at 14:30.
Please verify the following information: you are picking up a Hatchback vehicle from Chicago Union Station from March 10th at 2:30 pm with the drop off date at March 14th.
Yeah, that's fine with me.
Your vehicle has been reserved.
Ah, can you tell me the location?
What address would you like to share? Chicago Union Station, 640 Hegenberger Road, or something else? With whom would you like to share with?
The location to share is 640 Hegenberger Road. I'd like to share it with Samuel.
Please verify the following information: you are sharing the address 640 Hegenberger Road with Samuel.
That's fine with me.
You have share the address.
Thank you for your help; that's all for now.
Have a pleasant afternoon!
Show me my alarms.
You have 3 alarms. There is one for 3 pm with Errands.
Ok, thank you for checking.
Would you like to add an alarm?
No, I would like to find a restaurant reasonably priced in San Jose.
What type of food would you like?
I would like a restaurant in St. Helena serving California for a ultra high-end price.
There is 1 restaurant The Grill At meadowood in St. Helena.
Yes, that works for me.
Can I help with something else?
I would like to rent a car.
When do you want the car and where would you like to pick up?
I would like a car from Fresno Station from 9th of March.
Would you like a hatchback, suv or something else? When are you picking up the car?
I would like a SUV at 11 am.
Until when do you need the car?
I need the car until March 13th.
Would you like insurance?
I would like insurance.
Bookin SUV wit insurance from Fresno station on march 9th at 11 am until march 13th.
I will need the car until the 14th.
The drop-off date will be March 14th for the SUV.
I will need it from march 7th now.
Pick up date will be on March 7th.
Yes, that is correct. What is the price per day and what is the brand of the car?
The car is GMC Terrain and the cost is $61.00 per day.
I would like to share this address 900 Meadowood Lane with Rebecca.
sharing location 900 Meadowood Lane with Rebecca.
Yes, that sounds good.
Your location was shared.
That is all I needed for now.
Have a good day.
Show me my alarms please.
You have 2 alarms set.First is set for 10 am called Commute.
Okay that's great.
You want to add an alarm now?
No,I don't want now.
Can I do something else for you now?
Find me a restaurant there.
What kind of food you want and in which location you want to be?
Find me something where Ramen is served in Livermore.
I have for you 2 restaurants that you may like.A nice restaurant in Livermore is Kawa Sushi.
Tell me the user rating.
Is around 4.3.
Where is this place located?
2180 Third Street is the address.
I like this one, make an reservation for a car there.
When you want to be and at what time?
The pick up I want to be at morning 11 and I will need it from 10th of March.
What type of car you want and until when?
I would like a Sedan and I want to make the pick up from Palo Alto Caltrain Station.I will need it till March 14th.
You need insurance too?
No,I don't need it.
You a Sedan car without insurance from Palo Alto Caltrain Station.Pick up date is March 10th at 11 am and drop-off date on March 14th.Is okay for you?
No.I want to make the pick up from Heathrow International Airport.
You pick up a Sedan car from Heathrow International Airport.Is okay?
Tes is good.What's the car name and how much is cost per day?
The car is reserved.Is a Volvo S90 and cost $28.00 per day.
Thank you a lot.Share please the location with Shirley.
You want to share this location 2180 Third Street?
Sounds really good.
You share location 2180 Third Street with Shirley.I'm right?
No, address is Heathrow International Airport.
You share location Heathrow International Airport with Shirley.Is OK?
Yes is sound good.
The locations is shared.
Thank you. You helped me a lot.That's all.
Have a good day!
Show me alarms that I have set.
Sure, you currently have 2 alarms set. One of the alarms is for an Event at 3 pm.
Ok, thanks. I need to find a restaurant near the event.
I can help with that. Please tell me the location that you would like to search in and if you have any preferences for type of food.
I am going to be in Rio Vista so anywhere in that vicinity will work. I have really been craving a place that makes great burgers.
Alright, The Point Restaurant in Rio Vista is 1 restaurant that you might be interested in.
Yeah, that sounds good. I heard they have good burgers.
Would you like to make a reservation?
No, I think I'll just hope there is not too long of a wait when I get there.
Sure, do you need help with anything else today?
Yeah, I need to rent a car for while I'm there.
Ok, where and when would you like to pick up the car? Also, do you have a preference for type of car?
I would love a hatchback. They work out great for me. I'll be picking it up on the 8th at Gatwick International Airport.
When will you be returning the car?
I'll be leaving on the 11th, so I'll return it that day.
Do you know what time you will be picking up the car?
Yes, I hope to pick it up at about 09:30.
Ok, would you like to add the optional insurance?
No, I think my personal car insurance will cover it.
Alright, can you please confirm the details of the car rental? You will be picking up a hatchback at 9:30 am on March 8th at Gatwick International Airport and returning the car on March 11th. You are declining the insurance.
Oh, silly me. I actually need it from Heathrow International Airport on the 6th of this month.
Ok, so you will be picking the car up at Heathrow International Airport on March 6th.
Yes, that will work. Please tell me what the model of the car is and how much the cost is per day?
The car is a Nissan Qashqai and rents for $28.00 per day. The car reservation has been made.
Thanks so much for all of your help. One more thing, can you share the location?
Would you like to share the address for Heathrow International Airport? And with whom?
I'm sorry, I need to share the address 120 Marina Drive with Carolyn.
Sure, you are sharing the location 120 Marina Drive with Carolyn. Correct?
Yes, that sounds good.
Ok, the location has been shared.
Thanks so much. I don't need anything else right now.
Ok, I hope you have a great day!
Can you please show me my active alarms?
You have an 8 am alarm named Workout.
OK, thanks!
Do you want me to add an alarm for you?
No, not at the moment.
Is there anything else I could do for you?
Yes, please find me a Cantonese restaurant in the area. I don't care about a particular price range.
Sure, but first tell me in which area I should search.
Please find me a restaurant in SFO.
Alice's is a very good San Francisco restaurant.
OK, perfect!
Do you want me to book a table for you?
No, not at the moment, thank you!
Is there anything else I could do for you?
Yes, I'd like to reserve a car there, please.
Please tell me the kind of car you want as well as the time when you want to pick it up.
I'd like to pick the car up at 10:00 and I would prefer it to be a Hatchback.
From where do you want to pick it up?
It would be perfect if I could pick it up at Intercity Terminal.
OK. No please tell me on which date do you want to start your rental, as well as if you'll be needing insurance.
I do not want insurance and I need to pick up the car today.
Until when do you plan to keep the car?
I will be keeping it until this Sunday.
Can you please confirm that you want me to place a reservation for you for a Hatchback, with no extra insurance, to be picked up on March 1st at 10 am from Intercity Terminal, due for drop off on March 3rd.
Yes, that's correct. Can you please tell me what car is it?
I've successfully placed your reservation for a Renault Clio.
Thanks for everything. Could you please share the location for Intercity Terminal?
Yes, with whom?
Please share the address 1599 Sanchez Street with Brittany.
Can you please confirm that you want me to share the location 1599 Sanchez Street with Brittany?
On second thought, please share it with Willie?
Can you please confirm that you want me to share the location 1599 Sanchez Street with Willie?
Yes, that's correct.
I've shared the location.
Thanks a lot!
Anything else I could do for you?
No, that will be all for now. Thanks!
Have a great day!
Show me my alarms.
You have 1 alarm set for 4:30 pm called Busy.
Sounds good.
Would you like to add an alarm?
Not at the moment. Find a restaurant there instead.
What sort of food and what area?
Find restaurants in Sebastopol that sell tacos.
I have 1 restaurant, El Coronel Mexican Restaurant. It's a nice restaurant in Sebastopol.
Is it a pricey restaurant? What is the phone number?
They are moderate priced. The phone number is 707-829-7010.
That's good. Reserve the car there. A Hatchback works. I'll purchase insurance too.
What time will you pick it up?
I'd like to pick it up at 2 pm.
When do you want to start and end the rental? Where would you like to pick it up?
I'd like to pick it up at Indira Gandhi Airport from today till next Monday.
Please confirm that you want to pick up the Hatchback car from Indira Gandhi International Airport on March 1st ta 2 pm. You will drop it off on March 4th. Insurance is included.
No, a Sedan works but I want to pick it up on evening 6:30.
Could you confirm that you want to pick up at 6:30 pm and that you need a Sedan?
Sounds great.
Your car was reserved.
Would you share the location?
So you want to share the address Indira Gandhi International Airport?
Yep.
Who would you like to share weith?
Share with Theresa.
Could you confirm that you want to share Indira Gandhi International Airport with Theresa?
Sounds great.
You have shared the location successfully.
Thank you, that was a good help. That's it for now.
Have a good day.
Can you show me alarms please
There's one set for 8 am called Coffee
OK Cool thanks. Now find me a Ramen place to eat at any price range
Which location are we talking?
I want a place in Santa Rosa
I found 4 restaurants in Santa Rosa that fit including Hikuni
Where are they located?
They are at 4100 Montgomery Drive C
Can you recommend another place?
Osake is good, it's also in Santa Rosa
What's their rating
They have a average 4.5 rating which is pretty solid
Can you recommend me another one
How about Toyo Restaurant in Santa Rosa
Yes that place is good
Wanna book a table?
No need for now thanks
What else can I do
Book me a car that I can pick up at 9:30 am from Benito Juarez International Airport, and I need it till the 7th
When are you gonna get it though?
I'll pick it up today
What kind of car? And do you need insurance?
Any SUV is good, and no insurance necessary
Confirming your SUV car with no insurance for pickup on March 1st 9:30 am and drop-off on March 7th at Benito Juarez International Airport
Yes that's all correct
It has been confirmed and reserved
What's the car name and what will it cost me daily?
It's a Mazda CX-5 and will be $40.00 a day
OK great, now share a location with Virginia, 3082 Marlow Road
Sharing 3082 Marlow Road with Virginia yes?
Yes please, that's right
It's been shared
OK that's it for now thanks so much for your help
I am glad I could be of assistance
Tell me about my alarms.
There exists an alarm at 5 pm under the title shopping.
Alright, that's fine.
Do you wish to include an alarm?
Nope, I do not wish to include new alarms. I want to look for a diner that offers burrito.
What place ought I look in?
Get diners inside Daly City.
There is a lovely diner in Daly City called Celia's.
Could you recommend alternative diners?
There is a lovely diner in Daly City called Lisa's.
Yeah, that's fine. I'd like to book a vehicle there. McCarran International Airport is a convenient location for my to pick it up.
Do you enjoy Hatchback, SUV, or something else? When would you like to pick up the vehicle?
A SUV would be lovely, and I'd like to pick it up at two pm.
What time would you like to begin the vehicle rental, and would you like to include insurance?
I require it from today until the 3rd of this month, and I'd like to purchase insurance.
Please include the following information: you are picking up a SUV vehicle from McCarran International Airport on MArch 1st, 2 pm, and the drop of date is March 3rd. It includes insurance.
Yeah, that's fine. What is the vehicle title, and what is its price per day?
Your vehicle has been booked, the name of the vehicle is Mazda CX-5, and the price is $54.00 per night.
Thank you for your asssitance; could you also share the location? I'd like to share it with Alexis.
What location do you wish to share? McCarran International Airport, 6582 Mission Street, or something else?
The location for sharing is McCarran International Airport.
Please verify the following information: you are sharing the address McCarran International Airport with Alexis.
That sounds perfect.
Your sharing of address is complete.
Thank you for your help; that's all.
Have a pleasant afternoon.
Please show me my alarms.
There was an alarm for 10 am called Running.
Okay that is good. I'd like to find a vegetarian options restaurant there.
What type of food are you looking for?
I want something serving burger.
What location should I search?
Please look for restaurants in SFO.
25 Lusk is a fine restaurant in San Francisco.
Yes, that is great. I'd like to reserve a car there till the 13th of this month.
What type of car do you like and where will you want to pick it up?
I would like a Sedan from Peachtree Station as that is convenient for me to pick it up there.
What time do you wish to pick up the car and would you like to add insurance?
I would like to pick it up half past 2 in the afternoon and I don't need insurance.
When will you want to start the car rental.
Heathrow Airport is convenient as a location for pick up on the 7th of this month.
Please confirm details that you are picking up the sedan car from Heathrow International Airport March 7th at 2:30 pm with a drop-off of March 13th and it doesn't come with insurance.
Yes, that sound nice and what is the car's name?
The car is reserved and its name is the Volvo S90.
Thanks for helping. Could you share the location as 25 Lusk Street with Jerry.
Please confirm details to share the location as 25 Lusk Street with Jerry.
No, the address to share with Ronald is Heathrow International Airport.
Please confirm details to share the location Heathrow International Airport with Ronald.
That sounds good.
You have shared the location successfully.
Thanks and you are pretty helpful.
.What else can I help with?
No thanks that's been pretty helpful.
Have a great day.
Show me the alarms I have.
You have 1 alarm set now for 7 am with the name running.
Okay that is good. I'd like to find a restaurant there that is tagged intermediate priced.
What type of food are you looking for?
Please find something Italian.
What location should I search?
Please find restaurants in Santa Rosa.
Basilico is nice for a restaurant in Santa Rosa.
What is the phone number and are vegetarian options on the menu?
There aren't vegetarian options but their phone is 707-539-0260.
Yes, that is great.
Do you wish to reserve a table there?
No thanks, I'd like to reserve a car there to pick up ten am at Union Plaza which is convenient for me.
What type of car do you want and until when do you want it? When would you like to start the car rental?
A Hatchback is a nice selection which I need from March 7th till the 10th of this month.
Would you like to add insurance?
I won't need insurance.
Please confirm details you are picking up a car from Union Plaza March 7th 10 am and dropping off March 10th in a Hatchback car without insurance.
Yes, that is sounding good.
The car has been reserved.
Oh, will you share the location of Union Plaza with Matthew.
Please confirm details that you are sharing the location Union Plaza with Matthew.
No, I wish to share the information with Alice.
Please confirm details that you're sharing the location of Union Plaza with Alice.
No, the address I want to share is Staten Island Children's Museum.
Please confirm details you are sharing the location Staten Island Children's Museum with Alice.
That sounds good.
You have successfully share the location.
Thanks that is helpful very much.
What else can I assist you with?
No thank you. That has been pretty helpful.
Have a great day.
I forgot what I have planned for the rest of today! I need to see my alarms.
The Pick up kids alarm is set for 5 pm.
All right, cool. Now search for restaurants around that area.
In which city should I center the search?
Look for restaurants San Fran restaurants.
Did you have a particular cuisine in mind?
Anything serving Asian works.
8 Immortals Restaurant is a good San Francisco restaurant.
What other restaurants can you suggest?
Bai Thong Thai is a good San Francisco restaurant.
Do they have al fresco dining? Do they offer vegetarian fare?
They don't have al fresco tables. They offer good choices for vegetarians.
Okay, that works. Please reserve me a car there.
Please tell me the duration of your car rental, and whether you'd like to add insurance.
I want to pick it up on 9th of March and keep it until 14th of March. I am not interested in insurance.
Please tell me your preferred car type, pick-up time, and location.
I prefer a Sedan. Picking it at 09:30 from Benito Juarez Airport works for me.
Okay. Please confirm that you'd like to pick a Sedan car from Benito Juarez International Airport on March 9th at 9:30 am and drop it off on March 14th. Also confirm that you are not adding insurance.
Yes, that is correct. What's the daily cost? What's the car's make and model?
I have successfully reserved your car. The daily cost is $23.00. Dodge Charger is the car's make and model.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. I'd like to share the address.
What's the name of the person to share it with?
Please share it with Dorothy.
Please tell me the location you'd like to share. Is it Benito Juarez International Airport, 298 Gough Street or something else?
Share the Benito Juarez International Airport location.
Please confirm that you'd like to share the Benito Juarez International Airport address with Dorothy.
That is correct.
Address successfully share.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. At the moment, that's all I need.
Have a great day!
Will you let me see my alarms set.
There are 3 alarms set. One of the alarms is at 6:30 am and titled Get Up.
Okay, got it. Will you find a restaurant.
Where should I search?
look for restaurants in Pleasanton.
What foods do you like?
Look for restaurants that serve Punjabi.
There is a good place in Pleasanton and it's named Aappakadai.
Can you tell me what their rating is and give me a phone number?
You can reach them at 925-750-7709 and they have a 3.6 rating.
Okay, I like that.
You would like to book a table?
No, but I want to get a car rental there.
How long will you keep the car?
I will have it until March 9th.
What day and time will you get the car? What are your preferences? You can choose from a Hatchback, Sedan and other choices.
I like driving a Sedan. I would like to get it at Chicago Airport at 16:00 for the day after tomorrow.
Would you like to get insurance?
Insurance is not needed.
You will pick up the car at O'Hare International Airport on March 3rd at 4 pm and keep it until March 9th. You want a Sedan without insurance. Is all of that right?
No, I'd rather have a good Hatchback.
you will pick up a Hatchback from O'Hare International Airport. Will that work?
Yes, that works great.
I have reserved your car.
What is the brand of the car and what will it be in price each day?
The brand is SEAT Leon and will be a daily cost of $32.00.
You are so much help. Also, will you share the address of O'Hare International Airport?
Who would you like to share the location with?
I would like to let Judith have it.
You want to share O'Hare International Airport location with Judith. Is that correct?
Yes, that's right.
The location was a success in sharing.
That really helps me out, thanks.
Do you need anything else?
No, your help is great and thanks.
I hope you enjoy the beautiful day.
Can you inform me of the weather in Benicia on March 6th?
The temperature on March 6th will be 85 degrees Fahrenheit in Benicia. There is a 24 percent chance of rainfall.
Can you tell me the weather on March 12th for the same city?
On March 12th in Benicia, the tempeature will be 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rain.
That's what I needed to know. Can you schedule a visit to a property on that day?
You'll be make a visit to what property?
I'd like to schedule a visit to the Casa Del Sol Apartments please.
I can help you with that. Confirm the following visit details: Scheduling a vist on March 12th to Casa Del Sol Apartments.
Confirm that visit for me. While you are it, provide the address as well as the number of bedrooms for the property.
I have confirmed your visit to the Casa Del Sol Apartments. The property has 1 bed room and is located at 135 135 Acalanes Drive.
I'd like to reserve a car in that area.
What type of car would you like? A Sedan, Hatchback, or something else?
If you can find one, I'd like to rent an SUV.
Will you be renting the car from March 12th? Please provide the pick-up location as well.
I'll pick up the car on March 10th from the McCarran International Airport. It's convenient as I'll be in that area.
When time should I schedule the pick-up for?
I'll be picking it up pretty early. I'd say 9:45 am should work.
Please state how long you plan on keeping the vehicle. Would you like me to add on insurance too?
I'll rent the car until the 13th if possible. Please buy insurance as well.
You will be picking up an SUV from McCarran International Airport starting on March 10th at 9:45 am. You will keep this vehicle until March 13th. Lastly, you wish to add on insurance. If this is right, please confirm the details.
All of that is correct. What kind of car is the rental vehicle and how much will it cost per day?
Your car reservation has been made and confirmed. The cost of the Mazda CX-5 is $52.00 a day.
Alright. Thank you for helping me to schedule that. I won't be needing anything else at the moment.
I hope you have a fantastic day. Bye for now.
Look up the weather forecast for the 11th would you?
The forecast for where?
Make that the 4th, in Lafayette for the weather.
There is a 15 percent chance of rain predicted and an average temperature of 91 Fahrenheit.
Can you tell me anything about the humidity or the wind speed?q
Of course I can humidity is expected to be about 29 percent and a 5 miles and hour wind speed.
Okay now for Bolinas please.
There it is expected to average 85 Fahrenheit with a 12 percent chance of showers.
That is the day I want to visit Evergreen Ridge Apartments I believe I need to schedule that visit.
On March 4th you want to visit Evergreen Ridge Apartments and I am scheduling that visit for you correct?
That is right. Could you tell me a little about it like how many bathrooms and bedrooms they have?
I made arrangements for your visit and there are 2 bedrooms and 2 bathrooms.
I need to get a rental car and I want to get it at Peachtree Station.
What time would be good for you?
Ten in the morning is what suits me.
What type of vehicle do you want a Hatchback, a Sedan maybe or state your preference, how long do you plan to have the vehicle and should I get the insurance?
Insurance won't be necessary and I want a Hatchback that I can keep until March 5th.
Was March 4th the pick up date?
Actually I need it starting this Sunday.
Okay this is what I have you want to rent a Hatchback that you can get at Peachtree Station on March 3rd at 10 am and you plan to return it March 5th is that right?
Yes, you got it.
Your car will be ready.
Thank you that will be all.
Have a splendid day.
I have a few errands to run outside. Can you check what the weather is for March 10th?
Sure, in what city?
It's San Anselmo, and can you actually check it for the 13th of March instead?
Sure, it looks like the average temperature will be 83 degrees Fahrenheit with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Ok, and how windy and humid will it be?
The average wind speed should be 1 mile per hour with a humidity of 16 percent.
Great, thanks. Can you schedule a property visit for me that day at Capri Creek Apartments?
Sure, to confirm, you want to schedule a visit at Capri Creek Apartments on March 13th, is that right?
No, actually, change that to Cherry Creek Apartments.
Ok. To confirm, you want to schedule a visit at Cherry Creek Apartments on March 13th, is that right?
Yes, that's right.
Ok, your visit has been scheduled.
Great, can you also reserve a car for me there?
Sure, with insurance? Is this for March 13th and where do you want to pick it up?
No insurance. I actually need it starting March 10th and would like to pick it up from 30th Street Station if available.
Ok. What kind of car? Also, what time do you want to pick it up and when do you need it until?
If possible, I'd like to pick up a Sedan around 4:45 in the evening and I need it until the 13th of March.
Ok, to confirm, you'd like to book a Sedan to be picked up from 30th Street Station on March 10th at 4:45 pm, to be returned on March 13th, and no insurance. Is that right?
Yes, that's right. What's the car brand?
I've made your reservation for a Volvo S90.
Great, thanks for your help.
Sure, anything else I can help with?
No, that's all. Thanks.
No problem, have a good day.
I want to check the weather in Tomales for March 11th.
The average temperature on that day is expected to be 89 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 23 percent.
What will the humidity level and wind be like?
The wind speed is expected to be 2 miles per hour and the humidity is around 25 percent.
Sure, sounds good. I would like to schedule a visit to a property for that date.
Which property are you interested in?
The property I want to visit is Catalina Crest Apartment Homes.
Okay, confirm these details for me: You would like to schedule a visit to Catalina Crest Apartment Homes on March 11th.
Yes, that is right.
This visit has been scheduled for you.
Thank you very much. I would also like to reserve a car there.
Until what date do you want to keep the car?
I would like the car until March 14th.
Would you like to have the car starting from March 11th?
Yes that sounds fine.
What time do you want to get the car and would you like a Hatchback, SUV, or something else?
I would like to buy insurance. A hatchback would be nice and I would like to pick it up at five pm.
Where would you like to pick the car up?
It would be really convenient for me to pick it up at Fresno Station.
Please confirm these details: You will pick up the car on March 11th at 5 pm at Fresno Station and drop it off on March 14th. The car is a hatchback that will come with insurance.
Yes that sounds very good.
Your reservation has been made
Thank you very much for the help.
Is there anything else I can do for you?
No, thank you very much for the help.
Have a wonderful day.
I want to check the weather condition in Sunol for which I need your help.
The average temperature will be 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 12 percent for rain.
Thanks. I want to make a schedule of visit to a property on a particular day.
I want to know the property details to make a schedule and please confirm to fix the same on March 1st.
Okay, you can fix it on the same day and the property is located at 888 San Mateo.
Once again confirm to book a schedule of visit to the property at 888 San Mateo on March 1st.
That is confirmed to proceed.
Your schedule of visit was successfully confirmed on that day.
Thank you and I want to reserve a car now which should be a Sedan car and I want the same until 3rd of March.
Do you want to rent it with insurance? Also let me know your convenient time to pick up the same.
I want it with insurance and for the time at seven pm.
Which is your convenient place to pick up the car?
I want it from Toronto Pearson Airport.
Do you want it from March 1st?
Yes, of courser, date is okay.
Once again confirm all things: You want to pick up a Sedan Car from Toronto Pearson International Airport from March 1st at 7 pm to March 3rd including insurance.
That is okay and you proceed.
I have booked the car successfully.
Thank you so much.
Have a great day.
What is the weather in Sausalito?
The average temperature today will be 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
What will the weather in Alameda be on the 5th of this month?
The average temperature will be 79 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 percent chance of rain.
I want to visit the Riley Square property on that day.
Please confirm you want to schedule a visit to Riley Square on March 5th.
That is correct. What is their phone number?
The visit is scheduled. You can contact them at 408-649-7906.
What is the cost? How many bedrooms does the property have?
The property has 4 bedrooms and costs $5,200.
I also want to rent a sedan car with insurance and pick up at 12:45.
Where and when do you want to have the car? Do you need it from March 5th?
I would like to pick up the car on the 2nd of March and drop off on the 5th of this month from Benito Juarez Airport.
Please confirm you want to pick up the rental sedan car with insurance from Benito Juarez International Airport on March 2nd at 12:45 pm and drop off on March 5th.
That is perfect. What is the daily cost?
The car has been successfully reserved and will cost $39.00 per day.
Thank you, that will be all.
Bye!
I want to know the weather in San Pablo next Monday.
There will be an 18 percent chance of rain with an average temperature of 80.
Alright. I wish to visit a property on that day.
Which property do you want to visit?
I'm wanting to see Park Hill Apartments.
Okay. To confirm: You want to schedule a visit to Park Hill Apartments on March 4th.
Yes, that's right.
I have scheduled your visit.
What does the apartment cost? Does it include a laundry machine?
The cost is $3,650,000 and it does have laundry inside the unit.
Thanks. I need to rent a car there. I'd like a Hatchback until the 5th of March and would like to pick it up at John Wayne Airport.
When do you want to pick it up?
I'd like to get it at 1:30 in the afternoon.
Would you like insurance?
No, I don't need it.
Do you want it starting March 4th?
I'll need it later today until next Monday.
Okay. Let me confirm. You want to pick up a Hatchback car from John Wayne Airport on March 1st at 1:30 pm. You'd like to drop it off on March 4th. You do not need insurance.
Yes, that's right.
I have reserved your car.
Thank you so much.
Do you need help with anything else?
No, thanks. That's all.
Have a great day!
i have a plan to travel , please check the weather in Antioch on next wednesday.
The average temperature for the day should be 72 degrees fahrenheit. there is a 7 percent chance of rain.
ok thats good. i need to schedule a visit to the property on that day. Will you fix a schedule to the property RIverwood Grove?
please check and review the following details. A visit is scheduled to Riverwood Grove and you need to visit the property on March 6th.
No, i want to visit the property to Cypress Point Villas.
Ok please check and review the following details. A visit is scheduled to Cypress Point Villas and you need to visit the property on March 6th.
ok that's sound good to me
Visit to the property is scheduled successfully.
i want to reserve a car to go over there.
Do you want the car on March 6th? From which place the car is need to pick up?
I need it from the 3rd. I need the car at John F. Kennedy Airport to pick me .
Whether you want to add insurance? Which type of car you like the most, SUV or Sedan or anything else? At what time you want to pick up the car?
i donot need insurance. I need to pick it up at 4:30 pm. i need a Hatchback car.
Till what day you need the car?
i need it till next wednesday.
Please check and confirm the following details. Car is needed from JFK International Airport. Pickup date is March 3rd. The time of the pickup is 4:30 pm. the drop-off date is March 6th. it is a Hatchback car and does not have insurance.
ok that sounds good to me.
Car reservation is done successfully.
thanks for your immense help. that's all i need
have a wonderful day.
I am planning a visit to Larkspur on the 10th of this month. I need to know what the weather will be like so I can pack accordingly.
You probably will not need an umbrella as the rain chance is only 20 percent. Summer clothing will be fine as the temperature should average 85 degrees.
Thanks. I will also like to check out a place to live during my visit. Can you help me book a tour of the Alderwood Apartments please.
I gather I am booking a tour of the Alderwood Apartments on March 10th in your name. Is that right?
You understood my request right. Thanks for verifying. Oh and also could you check if the units have clothes washers inside.
The tour has been booked in your name. There are no clothes washing machines inside the units.
Is there a separate unit designed for parking the car?
No. There is no covered parking.
Thanks for checking. I will also need to rent a vehicle while I am visiting.
Which dates will you need the rental. Will March 10th be the day you would like to pick up the rental?
I will need the rental beginning March 5th. I would like to return the vehicle March 11th.
Do you know where you would like to start the rental? Is there a type of car you have in mind?
I would like to pick up the rental Monday next week at the Anaheim Intermodal Center. I would prefer a Hatchback.
Would you like to add coverage to the rental?
Don't add coverage to the rental but thanks for checking. I would like to get the rental at 9:15 am.
I will secure a rental in your name from March 4th to March 11th. The reservation will be available at 9:15 am at the Anaheim Intermodal Center. You would prefer a Hatchback. Do you approve?
Yes. You have my permission to proceed with those details.
Something happened. I could not secure the vehicle with those details. There is a Mazda 3 available at the Anaheim Intermodal Center that can be picked up March 4th. This car has a charge of $26.00 every day.
Thanks for the suggestion but no thanks.
What else may I assist you with?
Nothing. I will check back when I need you.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
I'd like to know the weather in Burlingame.
The average temperature for that day is looking like 81 degrees F with a 2 percent chance of rain.
Sure, sounds good. I'd like to schedule a visit to a property on the 1st.
Which property did you prefer?
I'd like to visit Washington Creek Apartments.
Please confirm you're booking a visit to Washington Creek Apartments on March 1st.
Yes, that sounds good. Does it have 4 bathrooms and a garage?
Your visit has been booked. It has 3 bathrooms and a garage.
I'd like to book a car and pick it up at Intercity Terminal. I'd also like to buy insurance.
When did you want to pick the car up?
I'd like it at 12:30 in the afternoon.
What kind of car did you prefer and until when did you want it? Did you want it starting March 1st?
Yes, that sounds good. I'd like it until next Wednesday and I prefer a Hatchback.
Please confirm you're picking up a Hatchback from Intercity Terminal on March 1st at 12:30 pm and dropping it off on March 6th.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
How much will the car cost per day?
It will cost $49.00 a day.
What is the car's name?
The car is named Renault Clio.
Thank you for your help.
Did you need help with anything else?
No, but thanks again.
Have a great day.
I want to check the weather in Lafayette on 1st of March.
The average day temperature is running at 87 degrees Fahrenheit and the chances of rain is 29 percent
What is the wind pressure there?
The wind speed is 11 miles per hour.
Okay..this is cool
Any other help you want?
I like to visit the property Chateau Chillon Apartments on that day.
Please give confirmation details: Your property visit to Chateau Chillon Apartments for march 1st.
Okay..this is fine..Can i know the address? Is the apartment have a garage?
Your property visit is confirmed. There is no garage and the apartment is located at 10 Milland Drive.
I want you to book a car there and my pick up is union plaza which is convenient to me.
Are you like to have the car from march 1st?
Yes...this is perfect.
Are you like to add insurance and at what time you want to pick up?
Yes..i like to buy insurance and pick up is at 5:30 pm.
To which date you want the car?
I want the car till the 2nd.
What type of car you want? SUV, Sedan or any other?
For me Sedan is perfect.
Please give confirmation details:You want to pick up the Sedan car from Union Plaza on march 1st at 5:30 pm and want the car till march 2nd. You want to add insurance.
Okay..this is perfect.
Your car booking is confirmed.
Thanks a lot.
Have a nice day.
I'd like to find out what the weather is going to be like on 2nd of March in Vancouver, BC.
The average temperature for the day will be about 67 degrees Fahrenheit and there's a 49 percent chance of rain.
That sounds good. I'd like to schedule a visit to Golf Club Manor Apartments.
Could you confirm that you want to visit Golf Club Manor Apartments on March 2nd?
Sounds good.
Your visit has been scheduled.
I would like to reserve a car there till the 3rd.
Do you like Hatchback, SUV or another type of car? Would you like to pick up the car from March 2nd and from where?
Sounds good. Delhi Airport is a good place for me to pick it up. A hatchback sounds perfect.
Would you like insurance? What time will you pick it up?
I'd like insurance and will pick it up at afternoon 3.
So you want to pick up the car from Indira Gandhi International Airport on March 2nd at 3 pm and drop it off on March 3rd? It's a Hatchback that comes with insurance.
Sounds perfect.
Your reservation was made successfully.
What is the name of the car and how much is it per day?
It is $39.00 per day and it's called a Fiat Panda.
Thanks for helping. That's it for now.
Have a great day.
How's the weather like in Lagunitas?
The average temperature for the day should be around 92 degrees Fahrenheit with an 18 percent chance of rain.
And how about the weather in Campbell on Wednesday next week?
The average temperature for the day is expected to be around 75 degrees Fahrenheit with an 8 percent chance of rain.
Is it going to be very humid?
Humidity will be close to 24 percent.
Okay, can you schedule a property visit to Village At Town Center Apartments on that day, for me?
Please confirm that you would like to schedule a property visit to Village At Town Center Apartments on March 6th.
Yes, that sounds right. How much does the apartment cost?
Your property visit has been scheduled. The apartment cost is $5,200.
I'd like to book a car there.
Do you want the car from March 6th? What kind of car would you like and would you like to include insurance?
I'd like a Sedan from March 6th and i don't need insurance.
At what time will you be picking up the car and until when will you need it?
Find me something that I can pick up from Walnut Creek BART Station at 10:45 in the morning and use till the 7th of this month.
Please confirm that you need a Sedan without insurance for pickup from Walnut Creek BART Station at 10:45 am on March 6th with a drop-off date of March 7th.
That's perfect!
Your car has been booked successfully.
Thank you for the assistance.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No. Thank you. That's all for now.
Have a great day!
What would the weather be like this Saturday.
In which city.
In San Bruno.
The temperature should be around 77 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of rain.
How humid would it be?
It should be around 58 percent.
I want to schedule a visit to Dixon Apartments.
You would like to visit Dixon Apartments on March 2nd.
Yes, that's great. How many baths are there?
It has 2 bathrooms. I have scheduled the visit.
I would like to reserve a car.
Would you like to reserve a SUV, a hatchback or another vehicle? What time would you like to pick it up and when would you like to drop it off.
I need a lovely hatchback from 2:15 in the afternoon till the 5th of this month.
You would like to pick it up on March 2nd?
I would need it from the 1st of this month.
Where would you like to pick it up?
Estacion Buenavista would be convenient for me and I would like to buy insurance.
You would like to pick up a hatchback at Estacion Buenavista on March 1st at 2:15 pm and drop it off on march 5th?
I need it from this Saturday till this Sunday.
I want to pick up the car on march 2nd and drop it off on March 3rd.
That would be fine. What is the daily cost?
The car has been reserved and it would cost $24.00 daily.
Thanks a lot. That would be all.
Enjoy your day.
How is the weather in Pinole?
The temp there is 91 degrees Fahrenheit with 18 percent chance of rain
Okay, visit a property visit for me there
Which property are you planning on visiting?
I want to go see Shorebreeze apartments
The day of visit is March 1st right?
Yes, that is right
Just need your confirmation. Booking a visit to shorebreeze apartments on March 1st
Cool, what's its cost?
Visit successfully scheduled. It costs $4,200.
tell me their phone number
It is 650-966-1328
Thanks. I also need to reserve a car there.
What kind of car? Sedan or hatchback? is there a preferred pickup location? till when would you need it?
I need a sedan till 4th of March from Union plaza
What time would you pick the car on March 1st? should I add insurance as well?
Insurance sounds good. I will pick it up at morning 11:45
Sure, just need your confirmation again. Booking a sedan at 11:45 am on march 1st from union plaza to march 4th
Cool, which car is it and how much does it cost?
subaru impreza is successfully booked. It costs $38.00 per day
Thanks a lot
Anything else I can help with?
No, that would be all.
Have a great time there
Can you get me the weather for San Jose?
The average temperature for the day should be around 78 degrees Fahrenheit. There is also a 19 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I'd like to schedule a property visit.
Will that be for March 1st? What property would you like to visit?
I would like to visit Pine Meadows Apartments on March 1st.
Can you confirm that you want to schedule a visit to Pine Meadows Apartments for March 1st?
Yes, that is correct.
Your visit has been successfully scheduled.
Thanks. I also need to reserve a car for this visit. I'd like a Sedan for the 1st of this month.
Can you tell me the following: how long do you want the car until? Where will you be picking the car up from? And finally, will you be needing insurance?
I need the car until the day after tomorrow. I would like to pick it up from the Fremont BART Station at around 12:30 pm, if possible. Yes, I will be needing insurance.
Can you confirm the following: you would like to pick the Sedan up on March 1st at 12:30 pm from the Fremont BART Station. You will be dropping it off on March 3rd. You will also need insurance.
Yes, that sounds right.
Your car has been successfully reserved.
Thanks for your help.
Is there anything else that I can help you with?
No, thank you for your help.
My pleasure. Have a good day.
I want to know how the weather will be in Castro Valley for March 9th.
For your requested location the average temperature should be at 86 degrees Fahrenheit, and with a chance of raining at 7 percent.
Alright, fine. I want to book a visit in a property for that day.
Can you tell me the kind of property you like?
The property I am looking to visit is Epic.
Can you please confirm that you want to book a visit for March 9th for the Epic property?
Yes, that is what I want.
Your requested visit has been reserved.
Now I need to find a car which I can rent there, more specifically I need the car to be a Hatchback one which I will have from 5th of March, and that I will pick up at 11:30 in the morning.
Can you tell me the location where you want to pick up the car, and till when are you going to have the car? Also could you tell me if you want the insurance with the car?
I am not in need of insurance. I will need to have the car till 11th of this month, and Union Station is a suitable place for me to pick up the car.
Can you please confirm that you want to have a Hatchback car without insurance which you will be picking up at Union Station on March 5th at 11:30 am, and that you will need it till March 11th?
That is correct. Can you tell me how much this car will be costing me per day, and what is the name of it?
Your requested car has been booked, and it will be costing you $28.00 per day. The car is called Kia Ceed.
I appreciate your help.
Can I do something else to help you?
Nothing. I am grateful for your help.
Have a wonderful day!
I would like to check the weather in Bodega Bay.
The average temperature for the day should be around 80 degrees and there is a 28 percent chance of rain.
I would like to schedule a visit for that day.
Which property would you like to visit on March 1st?
I would like to visit the Marymount Apartments.
Scheduling a visit to Marymount Apartments on March 1st.
Yes, what is their address?
They are located on 1405 Marshall Street.
I would like to rent a car.
When do you want the car and where do you want to pick up the car?
I would like to pick up the car downtown around 5:15 pm.
Do you want the car on March 1st? Would you like a SUV, Hatchback or something else?
I would like a hatchback and I don't need insurance.
When are you returning the car?
I will be returning the car on the 7th of this month.
Booking a hatchback car from downtown on March 1st at 5:15 pm and return is March 7th.
What is the car? What is the cost per day?
The car is a Ford Focus and it's $28.00 per day.
That is all I needed.
Have a good day.
Can you tell me what the weather will be like in Santa Rosa on the 9th?
Yes, the average temperature should be 92 degrees, there is a 26 percent chance of rain that day.
What will the humidity level be?
The humidity will be around 41 percent that day.
Okay, sounds good, I would like to schedule a visit to see the property Park View Apartments that day.
Please confirm that you are scheduling a visit to Park View Apartments on March 9th.
Yes, that's right!
Ok, I have scheduled your visit to the property.
Can you tell me the price?
Yes, the price for the property is $2,050.
Thank you, I would also like to reserve a Sedan at Santa Fe Depot and I would like to buy insurance.
Would you be needing the car from March 9th then? I just need to know the time you would like to pick up the car and when you want to return it.
I need it from March 8th until the 10th and I would like to pick it up at afternoon 2.
Please confirm that you are picking up a Sedan from Santa Fe Depot on March 8th at 2 pm and dropping off on March 10th.
That sounds perfect! What is the name of the car?
I have reserved a SEAT Cordoba for you.
Thank you so much for all of your help!
Can I do anything else for you?
No thank you, that will be all!
Okay, have a great day!
Can you show me the weather?
What is the name of the city you want to know the weather of?
I want to know the weather of Brentwood on the 1st.
The expected average temperature for the day iis 77 degrees Fahrenheit with 3 percent chance of rain.
Okay. I would like to schedule a visit to a property called Palm Court Apartment.
Please confirm: You want me to schedule a visit to Palm Court Apartment on March 1st.
Yes, That works for me. Can you check whether it has Laundry service and a garage?
I have successfully scheduled your visit. Yes it has a garage and an in-Unit laundry.
Can you reserve a car available for pickup at Heathrow Airport at 10:30 in the morning.
What will be the date of the return?
I will return it on next Tuesday.
What type of car do you want me to find?
I am looking for SUV.
Do you want to book it from March 1st with insurance?
Yes, that sounds nice to me. I want to book the car with insurance would like 5 o'clock in the evening.
Please confirm: You want me book a SUV car for pick up at Heathrow International Airport on March 1st at 5 pm with the returning date March 5th.
Yes, that is correct.
I have successfully reserved the car.
Okay. That will be all. Thank you!
I am glad I could help. Have a nice day!
Can you tell me the weather?
In which city?
In Napa, please.
The average temperature is 85 degrees Fahrenheit with a 24 percent chance of rain.
Great. I need to schedule a property visit.
Which property would you like to visit?
I want to visit Sunnyhills Apartments on the 1st of March.
Please confirm you want to visit Sunnyhills Apartments on March 1st.
Yes. Do the properties have garages?
The property does not have a garage. Your visit has been confirmed.
Can I have their address and can you tell me the cost?
They're located at 1724 Sunnyhills Court and the cost is $4,300.
Thank you. I also need to reserve a car from Gatwick International Airport.
What is your pick up time and Will you require insurance?
I need to pick up the vehicle at eleven in the morning and I already have insurance.
Will you be picking up on March 1st?
Yes, that's right.
What type of vehicle are you looking for and what is your return date?
I want a hatchback un next Thursday.
Please confirm you want to rent a Hatchback from Gatwick International Airport on March 1st at 11 am until March 7th.
Yes. Correct. What's the daily rate?
The daily rate is $27.00. Your booking was a success.
Thanks so much.
Can I help you with anything else?
No. That will be all.
Okay. Have a great day.
Could you check the weather in Delhi India on the 11th of this month?
The average temp will be 103 degrees with a 7 % chance of rain.
Great, could I visit a property that day?
Which property?
Amador Royal.
Please confirm: Book a visit to the amador royal on march 11th
Yes, correct.
Your visit is scheduled!
Thank you, does it have a garage? And what is their phone number?
It does, and the numb er is 510-782-8753
Thank you, i'd like to reserve a car for pickup at 5:15 in the evening.
Do you want insurance? And would you like it frmo march 11th? And until when?
I'd like insurance, and I need it from next thursday to the 12th of march.
Where do you want to pick up the car, and what kind of car?
I'd like a sedan from portland bus station.
Please confirm: You'd like to pick up a car from the portland bus station on march 7th at 5:15 pm, with a drop off on march 12th, and it's a sedan.
Sounds good, how much is it per day?
$52.00 per day
Thanks for your help.
Do you need anything else?
Nope.
Have a good day!
Would you mind finding the Petaluma weather forecast for me please?
Certainly, the temperature will average 82 degrees Fahrenheit with a 29 percent possibility of precipitation.
Great, thank you.
How else may I help you?
Yes, I need to schedule a property visit to the Casa Del Sol Apartments.
Is that on March 1st?
Yes, it is.
Confirming a March 1st visit to Casa Del Sol Apartments.
Excellent, thank you.
The property visit has been booked.
Thanks again. Oh, do you know if it has laundry machines inside and also a garage?
The property does have a garage but does not have laundry machines.
OK, thanks. I'm going to need to get a rental car as well. I'd like to get something on the 1st from O'Hare International Airport at 4:45 pm if possible.
Would you like an SUV, a sedan, or a different vehicle? And when would you like the car? And should I add insurance?
I do want insurance and I'll need it until the 2nd please. I'm thinking an SUV.
Confirming an SUV rental pick up from O'Hare International Airport on March 1st at 4:45 pm and a return of March 2nd. The vehicle will include insurance.
Sounds great, thank you.
The vehicle has been booked.
Thank you so much.
How else may I help you today?
I think we've done it all.
Have a wonderful day.
I need the weather forecast for the 12th.
Do you want the weather forecast for your current location or some other place?
I need the weather forecast for Dixon.
The average temperature in Dixon on the 12th is expected to be 93 degrees Fahrenheit with a 21 percent chance of precipitation.
Is it supposed to be very humid?
The humidity level is expected to be around 28 percent.
Is it going to be very windy that day?
The average wind speed is predicted to be 4 miles per hour.
Okay. I want to schedule an appointment to visit Bella Rose Apartments on that day.
Please confirm the following information. You want to make an appointment to visit Bella Rose Apartments on March 12th.
No, sorry. I need to schedule an appointment at Village Lake Apartments.
Please confirm the following information: You want to schedule a visit to Village Lake Apartments on March 12th.
Yes, that's right. And do you have the telephone number for Village Lake?
Yes. The telephone number is 650-961-0948 and your appointment has been booked.
Okay. Now I need to book a car rental until the 13th. I'll pick it up at Nairobi International Airport.
Would you like an SUV, Hatchback, compact car or something else? Did you want the car beginning on March 12th? And what time do you want to pick it up?
I need a Hatchback and I'll pick it up at half past 9 in the morning on the 12th.
Would you like to purchase insurance on this rental?
Yes, I'd better add insurance to it.
Please confirm the following information. You want to pick up a Hatchback with insurance on March 12th at 9:30 am from Jomo Kenyatta International Airport. You will return the car on March 13th.
Can you make that a pick up date of 6th of March? And I need to pick it up at Heathrow Airport.
Please confirm the following information: You will pick up the car on March 6th at Heathrow International Airport.
Yes. And what kind of car is it? What is it going to cost?
The car is a Nissan Qashqai and is $51.00 per day. It has been reserved for you.
Great. That's all I need right now.
Enjoy the rest of your day.
Could you find out what the weather will be in American Canyon on March 12th?
On that day, the expected average temperature is 75 degrees wwith a 15 percent chance of rain.
All right, great. Schedule a property visit for me on that day.
I can help you with that. Which property are you interested in?
I'd like to check out Portofino Apartments.
Sure. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'd like to schedule a visit to Portofino Apartments for March 12th?
Yes, you got that right.
I have successfully scheduled your visit to the property.
Okay thanks. I'd like to drive there. Could you reserve me a car?
Will you be picking the car on March 12th?
No. Actually I'd like to pick it on March 11th.
Okay. What is your preferred pick-up location? And your preferred drop-off date?
My preferred pick-up location is Sunnyvale Caltrain Station. I'd like to drop it off on March 12th.
Would you like to buy insurance?
Yes, please add insurance.
Do you have a particular type of car in mind?
I would like a Sedan.
What is a convenient pick-up time for you?
A 3 pm pick-up time works for me.
Okay. Please confirm that you'll be picking an insured Sedan car from Sunnyvale Caltrain Station on March 11th at 3 pm and dropping it off on March 12th.
No. Something came up and I'll need to pick it up on 6th of this month.
No problem. Let me see if I got everything correctly: You'll pick it up on March 6th and you'll be adding insurance.
Yes, that's correct. What's the car's make and model? How much is the daily cost?
I have successfully reserved your car. The car is a Buick Regal Sportback. The daily cost is $47.00.
Thank you very much. You've been very helpful. That will be all.
Goodbye, and have a great day.
I need weather info for Sebastopol on the 11th of this month.
The average temp should be 75 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 6 percent rain chance.
Okay I need to schedule a visit now.
Which property is this for?
It is for the Dana Garden Apartments.
So Dana Garden Apartments on March 11th.
Yes, tat is exact.
Your visit is now scheduled in.
Thanks. I also need a car from March 4th at 3:15 PM. I need a hatchback.
Would you like insurance? Where would you like it from and untikl when?
I need insurance. I need it until the 11th of this month from Orly International Airport.
Okay, so pick up from Orly International Airport at 3:15 PM on March 4th and until March 11th. This is a Hatchback.
Yes, that is fine.
Reservation has failed. There is another at Orly International Airport and is available at March 4th. It is Peugeot 208 and the cost is $51.00 a day.
No, I don't want.
Anything else to help with?
No, thanks though.
Of course. Enjoy.
What is the weather in San Mateo?
The average temperature is 80 degrees with a 13 percent chance of rain.
Can I also have the wind speed and humidity?
The wind speed will be around 11 miles per hour with the humidity approximately 18 percent.
Okay. I would also like to visit the Americana today.
Please confirm you want to visit the Americana on March 1st?
Yes, that's right.
Your visit is confirmed.
How many bedrooms does the property have and does it have a garage?
It has a garage and 3 bedrooms.
Thank you. I need to book a hatchback from King Street Station for today.
What is your pick up time and will you require insurance?
Yes, I will need insurance and will be picking up at 12:30 in the afternoon.
What is your drop off date?
Dropping off on the 6th of this month.
Please confirm you want to rend a hatchback from King Street Station on March 1st at 12:30 pm and returning on March 6th.
Yes. That is correct. What's the vehicle's daily rate?
The daily rate is $40.00. Your booking was a success.
Thanks so much.
Can I do anything else for you today?
No. Thanks. That's all.
You're welcome. Goodbye.
What will the weather be on the 10th of March in Long Beach CA.
The temperature should be 75 degrees with a 20 percent for rain.
Will it be humid or windy?
The humidity should be 50 percent with wind at 11 miles per hour.
Okay, I would like to visit Orange Tree Apartments.
Please confirm an appointment on March 10th at Orange Tree Apartments.
Actually, I want to visit Maplewood.
Confirming a visit to Maplewood on March 10th.
That is correct.
The visit is confirmed.
I need to reserve a car, too.
Would you like insurance?
Yes, I would.
Where will you pick up the car and for how long? Do you want the car starting on March 10th?
I will pick up at Intercity Terminal on March 8th and return it on the 14th.
Do you prefer a sedan, SUV or another model?
Actually, I need the card until the 13th from Thursday next week. I would like a hatchback.
What time will you pick up the car?
Half past 4 in the evening at John Wayne Airport
Confirming renting a hatchback with insurance from John Wayne Airport on March 7th at 4:30 pm and returning March 13th.
That is correct. Which car is it and what is the cost per day?
It is a Kia Ceed and the rental is $48.00 per day.
Thanks, I am all set.
Have a nice day.
I want to check for the weather condition on the 7th. Can you help me to check the same?
Where to you want to check for the weather condition?
I need to check it in Petaluma and please check it for the date on March 1st.
Please note that the average temperature will be 82 degrees Fahrenheit and there may be a chance of 29 percent for rain.
That is okay. Can you make me a Schedule to visit that property on that day?
Let me know the details of property that you want to visit.
Please note that the property that I want to visit is located at Orchard Glen Apartments.
I need your confirmation to book a schedule of visit to Orchard Glen Apartments on March 1st.
That is confirmed and you can proceed now.
I have successfully booked the schedule.
Thank you so much and now please find a car for rent there.
When do you want the same? Shall I find it for the date March 1st?
That is correct.
Is there any particular model of car that you want to book now?
Yes, a SUV is fine.
what is your expected time to pick up the car and to which date you need the same?
I want to pick it up at 6:30 pm and I need the same to 4th of March.
Shall I include the insurance?
Yes, please add insurance and make the booking for pickup time at afternoon 2:45.
At which place you need to pick up this car?
Find the one for the pick up at Port Authority Station.
I need your confirmation once again to book a SUV car for the pick up at Port Authority Station from March 1st at 2:45 pm to March 4th including insurance.
Please find the one at Heathrow International Airport and I need to book a Hatchback model.
Please confirm to book a Hatchback model car from Heathrow International Airport.
That is correct and you can proceed.
Unfortunately I was not able to book that car. Shall I book another car in Nissan Qashqai model available for pick up at Heathrow International Airport on March 1st and the total cost is $42.00 per day?
That's okay and you can book the same.
This time also I was not able to book that car. Shall I book another car in Nissan Qashqai model available for pick up at Heathrow International Airport on March 1st and the total cost is $42.00 per day?
That's okay to proceed.
I have booked the car successfully.
Thanks for your help.
How can I help you further?
No, thanks a lot.
Have a great day.
I would like to check the weather on the 10th.
What city would you like the weather forecast for?
Check Hayward.
The temperature for the day should be 80 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 14 percent chance that it will rain.
How humid will it be?
The humidity is about 30 percent.
How windy will it be?
The average wind speed should be about 8 miles per hour.
That sounds great. I want to schedule a visit to a property on that day.
What property would you like?
I would like to see Archstone Walnut Creek.
Could you confirm that you want to visit Archstone Walnut Creek on March 10th?
SOunds good. How many bedrooms? What is the phone number of the property?
I have scheduled your visit to the property. There are 3 bed rooms and the phone number is 925-943-7977.
I would like to reserve a car.
So you want the car from March 10th? Where will you pick it up from?
No, I need it on March 7th. Heathrow Airport is a good place to pick it up.
What time will you pick up the car? Would you like insurance?
I want to pick up my car at 12:15 pm and I need insurance.
When will you return the car?
I will return it 11th of March.
Would you like SUV, Sedan or anything else?
A Sedan is nice.
Could you confirm that you want to pick up the car from Heathrow International Airport on March 7th at 12:15 pm and drop it off on March 11th? It's a Sedan and comes with Insurance.
Sounds good.
The reservation did not go through. I have a nice car available at Heathrow International Airport for pickup on March 7th. It's a Volvo S90 and it costs $55.00 per day.
No, that's all.
Enjoy your day.
What is the weather like in New Delhi?
It should be 99 degrees Fahrenheit with a 4 percent chance of rainfall.
Great. I want to schedule a visit for then.
For March 1st? What property would you be reviewing?
Yes, I want to visit Santa Familia Apartments on that day.
You would like to visit Santa Familia Apartments on March 1st?
Yes, I do.
I have scheduled the visit.
I would need a car to get there.
Where would you like to pick up the car and at what time?
I want to pick it up at pacific central station for afternoon 2.
Till when would you need the car?
I need a hatchback from the 1st of March to the 4th.
Would you like to add insurance?
Yes, I want to buy some.
You would like to pick up a hatchback at pacific central station on March 1st at 2 pm and drop it off on March 4th?
Yes, that would work. What is the daily cost?
I have reserved the car and it would cost $36.00 daily.
Thanks a lot.
Do you need assistance with something else?
No. I am good. Thanks.
Enjoy your day.
What's the weather like in San Mateo on the 11th of March?
It'll be around 91 degrees Fahrenheit with a 15 percent chance of rain.
Okay then.
What else do you need?
I want to visit Middle Park Apartments that day.
A visit to Middle Park Apartments on March 11th. Is this right?
No, I'm visiting The Hamptons Apartment Homes.
You want to visit The Hamptons Apartment Homes on March 11th?
Yes I do.
Your visit is now scheduled.
I want to rent a car with insurance. A hatchback sounds nice.
How long will you need the car?
Until the 14th of this month.
When will you pick up the car?
I'll pick it up at 15:30.
Where are you going to pick it up? Will you need it on March 11th?
I need it on the 9th of this month. I'll pick it up at PDX Airport.
Picking up a hatchback car from PDX International Airport on March 9th at 3:30 pm until March 14th. Is this right?
Yes it is. How much will it cost?
Your car is reserved. It'll cost $45.00 per day.
What is the car?
It's a Vauxhaull Astra.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a nice day.
Hows the weather in Brentwood on march 8th
It will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 19 % chance of rain
Whats the expected Humidity and the wind speed?
Humidity will be 29 percent and wind speed is 3 mph
Schedule me a visit to the Creekside Terrace Apartments for that day
Please confirm: Scheduling a visit to Creekside Terrace Apartments on March 8th
yes, thats right. Does it have a laundry service?
its scheduled, yes it has a laundry machine
Please book me a car there till march 8th and pick up from Portland Bus station
Whats the pickup time? Also the pick up date will be march 8th?
I need it from the 4th and pick up at quarter to 7 in the evening with insurance
What kind of car SUV, a Hatchback or something else?
A Sedan is good
Please confirm: picking up a Sedan from Portland Bus station on march 4th at 6:45 pm and drop off on march 8th and it is with insurance
Yes, thats good
Sorry, there was an error. Trying again picking up a Sedan from Portland Bus station on march 4th, SEAT cordoba and costs $41.00 a day
no, i dont want that
any thing else?
no, thats all
have a great day!
What's the weather like on the 11th of this month?
What location are you interested in?
Sorry, the weather in Montara.
The temperature average will be 86 degrees Fahrenheit and the chance of rain is 17 percent.
Alright. I'm planning on visiting a property on that day, please help me schedule it?
What property do you want to visit?
It's Foothill - Twin Creeks.
I'll schedule you a visit to Foothill - Twin Creeks on March 11th, is that right?
That is right.
I've scheduled your visit.
Thanks, how much is the property and how many bedrooms does it have?
The property is $3,700,000 and it has 3 bed rooms.
Thanks. I also want to reserve a car on March 10th.
What pick up time do you want and until when will you need the car? Also, do you require insurance?
I'd like pick up to be 12:30 and I'll need the car until the 11th of this month. I don't require insurance.
And where would you like to pick the car up from.
I'd prefer to pick it up at SAN Airport.
Would you like a Sedan, Hatchback, or any other style?
I'd like a Sedan.
I'll reserve a Sedan for you with pick up from SAN International Airport on March 10th at 12:30 pm and drop off on March 11th with no insurance. Are all the details correct?
Everything is correct. What make and model is the car?
I've reserved the car. It is a Volvo S90.
You've been really helpful, thank you. I'll be going now.
Have a pleasant day.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Phoenix on 11th of this month please?
The temperature is 86 degrees Fahrenheit and there is a 8 percent chance of rain.
And how windy is it going to be?
The average wind speed is 11 miles per hour.
May I also know the expected humidity?>
It will be around 27 percent.
I see, could you schedule a visit to Rutherford Townhomes for me on that day?
Please confirm your visit to Rutherford Townhomes on March 11th.
Yes, may I know where are they located?
Your visit has been scheduled, and you can visit them at 1624 Pueblo Avenue.
I see, how many bedrooms do they have and does it has a garage?
This apartment has 4 bedrooms and it has a garage.
I see. Could you get me a Sedan reservation for pickup at two in the afternoon?
Will you be using the car from March 11th, and when will you be using it till? Also, where would you like to pick the car up?
I will need the car from March 7th at Diridon Station till the 13th.
Do you require any insurance?
Sure, that will be great.
Please confirm your reservation for a Sedan at Diridon Station from March 7th at 2 pm to March 13th, with insurance.
That sounds great to me.
Your reservation has been made.
May I have the car name?
You have reserved an Audi A8.
I see, that is great, that is all I need.
Have a great day ahead!
I want to check the weather in Novato on 4th of March.
The average temperature for the day will be 87 degree Fahrenheit and there is a chance of 7 percent rain.
How windy will it be and also how humid is it going to be?
The humidity is around 19 percent and average wind speed would be 5 miles per hour.
Okay. how about Atherton.
The average temperature would be 78 degrees Fahrenheit and there is 10 percent chance of rain.
Sure. Okay. I am looking to schedule my visit to the property Brentwood Parks Apartments.
Can you please confirm the details: The visit is scheduled to Brentwood Parks Apartments on March 4th.
Yes. That's perfect
The visit to property has now been scheduled.
Thanks a lot. I also wanted to reserve a car there.
From which place do you want to pick up the car? Also do you want the car from March 4th and at which time do you want to pick up the car?
I need the car from 1st of March. Murphy and Evelyn would be a convenient place for me to pick it up and I want to pick it up at half past 6 in the evening.
Would you like to add the insurance?
No. I don't need an insurance.
Do you have preference for Sedan, Hatchback, or anything else?
A SUV would be nice.
Until when do you want the car?
I want the car till 7th of March.
Can you please confirm the following details: The car will be picked from Murphy and Evelyn and pickup date is March 1st at 6:30 pm. The drop off date is March 7th and it is a SUV car without any insurance.
Yes. This sounds good. How much will it cost per day?
The car has been reserved. It will cost you $37.00 per day.
Thanks for all your help. That's all I needed.
Have a nice day.
I like to check the weather.
In which area you want me to check the weather?
I like to check the weather in woodside.
The average day temperature is 78 degrees Fahrenheit with 6 percent rain chance.
This is cool..I like to visit the property Wilford Lane Apartments on 1st of march.
please give the confirmation details: Your property visit to Wilford Lane Apartments on march 1st is scheduled.
This is perfect..Is there a laundry service inside the property? Is there a 2 bathrooms?
Your property visit is confirmed and the property has 3 bath rooms and in-unit laundry.
I like to book car there with insurance and want from 1st of march till the 4th.
At what time you want the car and which type of car you want? From where you want to pick up?
I like to pick up the car from Schoenefeld Airport and i want SUV and like to pick up at 12:15.
please give the confirmation details: You want to book SUV car on march 1st at 12:15 pm from Schoenefeld Airport and need the car till march 4th.
This is cool..What about the cost per day?
The cost is $55.00 per day. Your car booking is confirmed.
Thanks a lot.
Any other help you want?
No, not now..thanks
Have a great day.
Can you check the weather in Moraga for the 9th of this month please?
There's a 3 percent chance of rain and an average temperature of 86.
Can you schedule a visit to Westwood Townhouse Apartments for that day?
Sure, just confirm you'd like to schedule a visit to Westwood Townhouse Apartments on March 9th.
Yes, is there 2 bathrooms and a garage?
Your visit is scheduled. It has 1 bathroom and a garage.
Thanks, can you also get me a car rental?
Is it for March 9th as well?
No, the 6th.
Do you want insurance?
Yes, please get that.
When do you want to drop it off and what kind of car do you prefer?
I'll need it until March 10th and prefer a hatchback.
What time do you want to pick it up?
At 12:45 in the afternoon.
Where will you pick up?
Heathrow International Airport.
Just confirm you'd like to reserve a hatchback for pickup March 6th at 12:45 pm at Heathrow International Airport with a drop off date of March 10th.
Actually, I want a sedan and only need it until the 9th of this month.
Confirm you'd like a sedan until March 9th.
Yes, what's the price per day?
I've reserved your sedan. It will be $48.00 a day.
What kind of car?
It's a Volvo S90.
Great, that's all for now.
Enjoy your day.
I want to check the weather in Nairobi on the 2nd of March.
The average temperature should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 6 percent chance of rain.
What about on the 11th of March?
The average temperature should be 89 degrees Fahrenheit with a 3 percent chance of rain.
Thanks. I'd like to schedule a visit to a property on that day.
Which property do you want to visit?
I want to visit Sunridge Apartments.
Okay, you want to visit Sunridge Apartments on March 11th, right?
No, I want to visit Shasta Terrace.
Okay, you'd like to visit Shasta Terrace on March 11th, correct?
Yes, that is right. How much does it cost?
I have scheduled the visit. The property is $2,650,000.
What is the address?
The address is 293 Shasta Drive.
Thanks, I'd like to get a rental car there.
Where do you want to pick it up?
I'd like to pick it up at O'Hare Airport.
What type of car do you like? What time do you want to pick it up and how long do you need it?
I'd like to pick up a sedan at 2 in the afternoon and I need it until the 14th of this month.
Do you want to pick up the car on March 11th? Do you want to purchase insurance?
I need to pick it up on the 10th of March and I don't need insurance.
Okay, you want to reserve a sedan at O'Hare International Airport on March 10th at 2 pm until March 14th, right?
Yes, that is right. What model car is it?
I have reserved the car. It is a Subaru Impreza.
Thank you.
Is there anything else I can help with?
No, thank you.
Have a great day.
Hi, could you help me check the weather in Walnut Creek on the 2nd of this month?
Sure, the average temperature is 76 degrees Fahrenheit with a 26 percent chance of rain.
I see, could you schedule a visit to a property on that day?
Any specific property you are looking at?
I am looking to visit the Courtyard Terrace.
Please confirm your visit to Courtyard Terrace on March 2nd.
Yes, may I know how much does the place cost?
Your visit has been scheduled, and the property will cost you $1,850,000.
May I have their contact number please?
You can contact them at 510-669-1325.
I see, could you get me a car ride there too?
May I know what time will you be picking up the car and when do you need the car till?
I will need the car from afternoon 2:30 and use it till Monday next week.
Are you referring to March 2nd, and where do you need the car from? Do you also require insurance?
No, I do not need insurance. I would like to pick the car up today from Estacion Buenavista, preferably a Sedan.
Sure, please confirm your pickup of a Sedan from Estacion Buenavista fromm March 1st at 2:30 pm to March 4th.
Sounds great! How much will this cost me each day and what is the car called?
Your reservation has been made. The car is a Volvo S90 which will cost you $22.00 each day.
I see, that is all I need. Thank you!
No worries, have a great day ahead!
Check the weather for Nairobi, Kenya for next Thursday.
For that day the average temperature should be 86 degrees Fahrenheit with a 8 percent chance of rain.
Ok. I want to schedule a visit to the Capri Creek Apartments property on that day.
Please confirmat: Schedule a visit to Capri Creek Apartments on March 7th.
Yes, that is correct.
Your visit has been scheduled.
I need to reserve car there for Monday next week. I would like to pick it up at 12 o'clock in the afternoon.
Where would you like to pick up the car?
I would like to pick it up at Gatwick International Airport.
Would you like to add insurance? What kind of car do you want? How long will you need the car?
I don't need insurance. I would like a nice Sedan and I will need it until March 9th.
Please confirm: Pick up a Sedan at Gatwick International Airport on March 4th at 12 pm with a drop-off date of March 9th.
Yes, that is good. What is the daily cost?
The car reservation is complete. The cost is $35.00 per day.
Thanks for the assistance. That is all I need.
Enjoy your day.
What's the weather like in Lagunitas this Saturday?
It should be around 87 degrees Fahrenheit with a 17 percent chance of rain.
I'd like to visit the Creekside Village property there.
A visit to Creekside Village on March 2nd. Is this right?
Yes, that's it.
Your visit is scheduled.
What's the address?
It's at 17055 Creekside Cir.
I need to reserve a car there. I'll pick it up at 12:45.
So you need it for March 2nd? What kind of car do you want? Where will you pick it up?
Yes, that's right. I'd like an SUV. I'll pick it up at Benito Juarez International Airport.
Would you like insurance? How long do you want the car?
I want insurance. I want it until March 4th.
Picking up a SUV from Benito Juarez International Airport on March 2nd at 12:45 pm until March 4th. Is this right?
Yes, that's it.
The SUV has been reserved.
How much will it cost me? What's the car brand?
It'll cost $46.00 per day. It's a Mazda CX-5.
Thanks. That's all.
Have a nice day.
How is the weather in Graton on the 9th of March?
The average temperature is looking like 89 degrees F with a 19 percent chance of rain.
What is the humidity looking like?
It should be about 38 percent.
How windy is it likely to be?
It is looking like 4 miles per hour.
Sounds good. I would like to visit the property called Brookside Oaks.
Please confirm you're booking a visit to Brookside Oaks on March 9th.
Yes, that is correct. Is there a garage?
Your reservation has been confirmed. Yes, it does have a garage.
Thank you. I'd also like to reserve a car at Union Station at 15:00.
What kind of car were you looking for?
I'd like a Sedan.
When did you need the car until and would you like to add insurance?
I will need the car from the 6th of this month until the 10th of March, and yes I'd like to buy insurance.
Please confirm you're picking the Sedan up from Union Station on March 6th at 3 pm and dropping it off on March 10th. The car comes with insurance.
Yes, that is correct.
Your reservation has been confirmed.
Thank you. That will be all I need for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Give me the weather forecast for the 1st of March please.
Which city are we checking for ?
Millbrae on this sunday please.
I show an average temperature for that day should be 73 degrees Fahrenheit with a 23 percent chance of rain.
What is the wind factor going to be?
The wind factor factor will be 7 miles per hour.
What is the expected humidity going to be?
The humidity should be around 20 percent.
Ok, thank you. Let's schedule a visit to the Birchwood Apartments property for that day please.
Alright, please confirm we are scheduling a visit to the Birchwood Apartments on March 3rd.
Yes, that is correct. Find out if there is a Garage there and how much does it cost?
Your request has been scheduled and there is no garage. the cost is $3,550,000.
I want to also reserve an SUV. An afternoon 2:15 pick up would be best.
Should we add insurance also?
No thank you.
Should we reserve from March 3rd? Where would you like to pickup the vehicle and how long do you plan to keep the vehicle for?
I will need the car from this Saturday until the 6th. Kingsford Smith Airport would be the most convenient pick up location for me.
Ok, please confirm you are picking up at Kingsford smith international airport on March 2nd at 2:15 pm and returned on March 6th. this suv does not come with insurance. is this correct?
yes perfect. How much will this cost?
Your car was reserved and will be $42.00 per day.
thank you for you help.
your welcome.
I need to check weather in Menlo Park on the 11th of March.
The average temperature is set to be 71 degrees Fahrenheit. There is a 19 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I need to schedule a visit to a property.
Which property would you like?
I need to visit Park Manor Apartments.
So, schedule a visit to Park Manor Apartments on March 11th.
Yes, indeed. Does it have a garage, and how many baths?
Scheduled now, and it has 2 bathrooms and a garage.
Thanks for the info. I need to reserve a car.
Until when would you like it?
I need it until the 13th of this month from March 9th.
Where would you like it from and at what time?
Union Station is a good pick up area and at 4:30 PM.
Would you like insurance?
No, no insurance now.
Would you prefer Sedan, SUV or other?
I want a Sedan most likely.
So, pick up from Union Station, a sedan vehicle. The date is March 9th at 4:30 PM. The drop off date is March 13th.
No, from the 8th please.
Please confirm the following: The pickup date is March 8th and it does not come with insurance.
Yes that sounds good. How much does it cost?
Your car has been reserved now. The price is $30.00 per day.
Thanks, that was all!
Of course. Enjoy.
Will you check the weather in Clayton on March 1st?
Average temperature is 70 degrees Fahrenheit with a 1 percent chance of rain.
Will you schedule a visit to the property San Marcos?
Confirm a visit to San Marcos on March 1st.
Cool. Does it have 3 bedrooms and in-unit laundry?
I've scheduled your visit. It has in-unit laundry and 3 bed rooms?
Thanks. Will you reserve a car there?
You need the car until when?
6th of March is the return date.
You need it from March 1st?
That's fine.
Any preference? Add insurance?
A Sedan. Insurance is not necessary.
Pick up time?
Pick up at 11 o'clock in the morning.
Pick up location?
I prefer Vancouver Airport for pick up.
Confirm a Sedan for pick up from YVR International Airport on March 1st at 11 am and drop off on March 6th.
Awesome. Cost per day? Car's name?
I've reserved you a Volvo S90 for $35.00 per day.
Thanks.
Anything else?
That's all for now.
Have a wonderful day.
Hey, can you check the weather for me? I need to know the weather in Oakland on March 7th.
Sure. The average temperature for the day is expected to be 80 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 19 percent chance of rain.
How windy is it going to be?
The average wind speed is predicted to be 4 miles per hour.
So far so good. How humid?
The humidity is 28 percent.
Okay how about on the day of March 14th?
The average temperature on that day should be 84 degrees Fahrenheit, and there is a 22 percent chance of rain.
That sounds look a good day for a property visit. Can I schedule one for that day?
Which property would you like to visit?
I would like to visit the Villas Papillon property.
Please confirm the following: Schedule property visit to Villas Papillon for March 14th.
That is incorrect. I changed my mind and want to visit the Glen View Apartments instead.
Please confirm the following: Schedule property visit to Glen View Apartments for March 14th.
That sounds right, I confirm.
Your property visit has been scheduled with the apartment.
Great. Can you tell me how many bedrooms the place has and how much a unit costs?
It has 2 bedrooms and costs $2,500,000.
Perfect. Can you get me a car there?
What kind of car would you like?
I want a Sedan and I'd like to pick it up at half past 8 in the morning.
Until when would you like the car?
I'm going to need it until March 14th.
Where would you like to pick up the car? Also would you like insurance?
I would like insurance and Union Plaza would be the most convenient place for me to pick it up.
Would you like to have the car from March 14th?
No, I'll need it from the 12th of March.
Please confirm the following: You would like to rent a Sedan from Union Plaza. You will pick the car up on March 12th at 8:30 am and drop it off on March 14th. You would like insurance.
That is all correct, I confirm it all.
I'm sorry but the reservation has failed. Is there anything else I could help you with?
Darn. No, forget about it.
Okay, good bye.
Tell me about the weather on the 7th of March.
What is the location you want to check?
I want to check San Ramon.
It will be 74 degrees Fahrenheit on average. The chance of rain is 5 percent.
And what will the wind be like?
The wind speed will be 12 miles per hour on average.
And what about the humidity?
It will be around 17 percent for humidity.
Alright. I want to visit a property on that day, can you schedule the visit?
What property is it?
It's the Grand Oak Apartments.
I'll schedule a visit to Grand Oak Apartments on March 7th. Please confirm.
That is what I want. How much is the cost and does it have 1 bathroom?
I've scheduled the visit. The cost is $4,700 and there are 3 bathrooms.
I'll also need a rental car. I'll be using it until March 11th.
Will you need the car starting March 7th? And is there a type you'd prefer such as a Sedan or SUV?
I want it starting next Wednesday. And I'd prefer an SUV.
What time will you be picking up the car?
I'd like to pick it up at half past 6 in the evening.
And where would you like to pick it up. Also, would you like insurance?
No insurance. I'd like to pick it up at Pacific Central Station, it's convenient.
I'll reserve you an SUV at Pacific Central Station for pick up at 6:30 pm on March 6th and drop off on March 11th, no insurance. Are all the details correct?
Yeah, you got it right.
The car has been reserved successfully.
Thanks a lot. I'll be going now.
Have a good rest of your day.
Can you check the weather on the 1st for me
Sure, in what city
Let's look in San Lorenzo
It'll be 76 degrees with a low 3 percent chance of rain
How about in Chicago on the 5th of this month
It'll be 71 degrees with a higher 28 percent chance of it raining
OK let's book a property visit on that day
Which property are you talking about?
I want to visit the Waterstone Fremont property
Confirming you want to visit the Waterstone Fremont property on March 5th
Actually no, let's make that Pinecrest Apartments
Ok so Pinecrest Apartments on March 5th?
Yeah that's right
It's been booked for you
How many baths does it have, and what's their addresss?
It has 3 bathrooms and it's at 837 Hancock Street
Thanks so much, reserve me a car with insurance now
What time do you want it and till when?
I need it next Wednesday and I want to get it in the evening 5:30 pm
Do you want it form March 5th?
I actually need it the day after tomorrow
Where do you want it from?
I want it from King Street Station
Do you want a Hatchback, and SUV, or something else?
An SUV will suffice
Confirming you want an SUV with insurance from King Street Station from March 3rd 5:30 pm till March 6th yes?
Yes that is right
It's been booked for you
Thanks so much, take care
Bye, you too!
I need weather in Valley Ford on the 12th of March.
The average temp is set to be 92 degrees Fahrenheit and there is an 11 percent chance of rain.
Okay, I also need to schedule a visit to the property Macara Gardens Apartments for that day.
So schedule a visit to Macara Gardens Apartments on March 12th?
Yes, indeed correct.
Your visit has been scheduled.
Thanks and I also need to reserve a car until the 13th of March okay?
Which brand of vehicle would you like?
I'm fine with anything, but a sedan is preferred.
Where would you like to pick up the vehicle? Is it needed from MARCH 12th? At what time?
I need it from the 11th. Toronto Pearson Airport is a convenient place for pick up at 13:45.
Would you like to add insurance?
No, thank you.
So pick up the vehicle from Toronto Pearson International Airport on March 11th. The time of pickup is 1:45 PM and the drop-off date is March 13th, for a Sedan.
Yes, that is correct.
Sorry, but your reservation has failed. Is there anything else?
Can you try it again? SFO Airport is fine too for pick up at 2:45 PM. I am fine with a Hatchback.
So pick up the vehicle from SFO International Airport on March 11th, at 2:45 PM, and the drop-off date is March 13th. A Hatchback is nice.
Yes, that is good. How much is it?
Your car has now been reserved, for $31.00 per day.
Thanks for that. That is what I needed.
Of course. Enjoy.
What will the weather be in Novato on the 9th of March?
The normal temperature is 80 degrees with only a 1 percent chance of precipitation.
That is nice.
Do you need something more?
I want to see a property that day.
Which property do you wish to visit?
Anton La Moraga Apartments is the name of the place that I wish to visit.
You wish to schedule a visit Anton La Moraga Apartments on March 9th, correct?
No, change the name to Chatelaine Apartments.
You wish to schedule a visit to Chatelaine Apartments on March 9th, correct?
That is right. Does it have a garage and 1 bathroom?
Your visit has been confirmed. The place has 1 bathroom and a garage.
Thanks for that.
Do you need help with something else?
I need to rent a car there on the 9th of March.
Should I add insurance to your order?
I need the car next Friday and would like to add insurance to my order.
Where and when do you wish to pick up the car?
I want to get the car at 4:15 in the evening at Port Authority Station.
Do you prefer a SUV, Hatchback or another type of car and when will you return it?
I would like a Sedan until March 12th.
You wish to rent a Sedan with insurance and will pick it up at 4:15 pm on March 8th at Port Authority Station and will return it on March 12th, correct?
No, make that a Hatchback.
You want to rent a Hatchback with insurance, correct?
That is right. Can you tell me the price per day?
Your order is confirmed and the price is $38.00 a day.
Thanks for everything. That is everything for now.
Have a great day.
Can you tell me the weather for next Wednesday?
In which city?
In Alamo, please.
The average temperature will be 75 degrees Fahrenheit with a 7 % chance of rain.
Okay, that sounds good. Can you schedule a property visit for that day?
Which property do you want to see?
I'd like to see Riley Square.
Please confirm: Riley Square visit for March 6th.
Yes, that is correct.
Your property visit is confirmed.
Thanks, I'd like to reserve a car with insurance.
When will you be returning the car?
I'll need it until the 8th.
Do you want to pick up the car on March 6th? Where do you want to pick it up? Do you want a SUV, a Hatchback, or another type of car?
I'll need it from March 4th at YVR airport. An SUV will be nice.
What time would you like to pick up your car?
How about 19:30?
Please confirm: a SUV from YVR International Airport from 7:30 pm on March 4th until March 8th.
Yes, that is all correct.
I've reserved your car.
Thanks for the assistance!
Can I help you with anything else?
No thank you, that will be all.
Have a great night!
